,Unnamed: 0,Job Title,Salary Estimate,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors,salary_type,per_hour,Employer_reported,avg_salary,state,desc_length,seniority,title,python,r studio,ML,spark,deep_learning,aws,phd,undergrad,master
0,0,Data Scientist,$57k-$102k,"A trusted partner at nearly three million commercial customer locations, Ecolab (ECL) is the global leader in water, hygiene and infection prevention solutions and services. With annual sales of $13 billion and more than 45,000 associates, Ecolab delivers comprehensive solutions, data-driven insights and personalized service to advance food safety, maintain clean and safe environments, optimize water and energy use, and improve operational efficiencies and sustainability for customers in the food, healthcare, hospitality and industrial markets in more than 170 countries around the world.

Ecolabs Institutional division, serving the restaurant and hospitality market, is seeking a business focused Data Scientist to unlock the value in data assets while creating new and unique offerings for customers. As a data scientist in the Advanced Analytics organization, you will play a pivotal role in planning, executing and delivering machine learning-based projects. The bulk of the work will be in machine learning (ML) modelling, management and problem analysis, data exploration and preparation, data collection and integration, as well as operationalization. You will be a key interface between the advanced analytics team and the business unit and various other departments (such as IT). Candidates need to be very much self-driven, curious and creative.

In this role, we are looking for:
A problem-solving mindset with the ability to understand business challenges and how to apply your analytics expertise to solve them.
The unique person who can present complex mathematical solutions in a simple manner that most will understand including customers.
An individual excited by innovation and new technology and eager to finds ways to employ these innovations in practice.
A team mentality empowered by the ability to work with a diverse set of individuals.
Whats in it For You:
Opportunity to take on some of the worlds most meaningful challenges, helping customers achieve clean water, safe food, abundant energy and healthy environments.
Ability to make an impact and shape your career with a company that is passionate about growth.
Support of an organization that believes it is vital to include and engage diverse people, perspectives and ideas to achieve our best.
What you will do:
Problem Analysis and Project Management.
Inspire the organization about the business potential and strategy of artificial intelligence.
Collaborate across the business to understand IT and business constraints.
Manage data science projects and the corresponding key performance indicators (KPIs) for success.
Data Collection and Integration.
Understand new data sources and process pipelines and catalog/document them.
Acquire access to various databases and other sources systems such as SQL or graph databases.
Create data pipelines for more efficient and repeatable data science projects.
Data Exploration and Preparation.
Apply statistical analysis and visualization techniques to various data.
Generate hypotheses about the underlying mechanics of the business process.
Test hypotheses using various quantitative methods.
Display drive and curiosity to understand the business process to its core.
Network with domain experts to better understand the business mechanics that generated the data.
Machine Learning.
Apply various ML and advanced analytics techniques to perform classification or prediction tasks.
Acquire domain knowledge and integrate it into ML solutions, for example, from an understanding of financial risk, customer journey, quality prediction, sales, marketing.
Testing of ML models, such as cross-validation, A/B testing, bias and fairness.
Operationalization.
Collaborate with ML operations, data engineers, and IT to deploy ML solutions.
Follow established best practices around ML production infrastructure.
Network with internal and external partners.
Upskill yourself (through conferences, publications, courses, local academia and meetups).
Collaboration with other technical teams within the organization.
Encourage and leverage the reuse of artifacts.
Be encouraged and expected to innovate and be creative in your data analysis, problem solving and presentation of solutions.
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics with 3+ years related experience, or
Masters Degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics with 1+ years of related experience
Experience working with statistics/analytics/visualization tools, preferably in the Microsoft Azure Suite.
Preferred Qualifications:
Ph.D. degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics.
Experience working in Python/SQL/Jupyter.
Self-driven, curious and creative with a collaborative mindset.
Demonstrated ability to work in diverse, cross-functional teams in a dynamic business environment.
Strong communication and presentation skills.
Our Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion

At Ecolab, we believe the best teams are diverse and inclusive, and we are on a journey to create a workplace where every associate can grow and achieve their best. We are committed to fair and equal treatment of associates and applicants. We recruit, hire, promote, transfer and provide opportunities for advancement on the basis of individual qualifications and job performance. In all matters affecting employment, compensation, benefits, working conditions, and opportunities for advancement, we will not discriminate against any associate or applicant for employment because of race, religion, color, creed, national origin, citizenship status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expressions, genetic information, marital status, age, disability, or status as a covered veteran.

In addition, we are committed to furthering the principles of Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) through Affirmative Action (AA). Our goal is to fully utilize minority, female, disabled and covered veteran individuals at all levels of the workforce. Ecolab is a place where you can grow your career, own your future and impact what matters.

We will consider for employment all qualified applicants, including those with criminal histories, in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable state and local laws, including the City of Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance and the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance.",3.6,Ecolab,"Saint Paul, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,97,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,MN,6517,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
1,1,Data Scientist,$57k-$102k,"As Data Scientist in the Pricing Analytics team you will shape HPs future of how we set prices. We are a very dynamic, highly skilled and diverse global team consisting of economists, statisticians, engineers, scientists or even musicians, who are pushing the innovation frontier in pricing. Working with us you will combine your economic thinking, statistical modeling, experimentation and optimization methods to build complex pricing algorithms for most popular Printers and PCs in the market.

About you:
You have deep interests in customer and market behavior and methods to measure and anticipate it
You are passionate about unveiling answers to most difficult questions using data and models
You feel accomplished seeing your pricing recommendations being implemented while shopping for yourself
You cant stop thinking about learning something new every day and enjoy being surrounded by highly talented people
Key responsibilities:
Develop and apply statistical methods and experimentation to analyze the effect of pricing and sales decisions on business performance
Collaborate with internal stakeholders to design and deploy pricing initiatives based upon analytical findings
Present results and recommendations to relevant stakeholders, including senior leadership
Requirements:

Must-haves:
At least 3 years working experience in data science, ideally in a consumer-focused setting
Experience in designing, deploying, and analyzing in-market experiments and/or AB tests
Ability to think creatively and invent original solutions to business and modelling challenges
Proficiency with R and/or Python is required
Proficiency in Microsoft Excel and Microsoft PowerPoint
Excellent written and verbal communication skills with an ability to influence key decision makers
Master's or PhD degree in Quantitative Marketing, Business, Statistics, Economics, Psychology, or other relevant quantitative discipline
Bonus points for:
Interest in pricing, economics, and consumer behavior
Experience in deploying data science in a retail environment
Understanding of CRM and customer segmentation
Knowledge of price optimization approaches, price discrimination models and a general knowledge of main concepts from the industrial organization literature
Basic understanding of finance and product economics
Experience in project and/or product management
Reinventing since 1939. We are one of the leading Print and Personal Systems technology companies in the world and our vision is to create technology that makes life better for everyone, everywhere. Joining HP is joining an adventure to reinvent the tech world and reinvent yourself every day!

#LI-post",4.1,HP Inc.,"San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,81,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,CA,2655,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
2,2,Data Scientist,$57k-$102k,"Job Brief

The ideal candidate will have previous Data Modeling experience. Strong preference will be given to candidates with an actuarial background in the property and casualty insurance space.

Overview

IFG Companies is in search of a Data Scientist to join its growing Predictive Modeling team.

The ideal candidate will have previous Data Modeling experience. Strong preference will be given to candidates with an actuarial background in the property and casualty insurance space.

Responsibilities
Build predictive and/or Machine Learning models in SAS
Research new statistical and mathematical techniques that are suitable and helpful for solving business related problems
Prepare data for modelling and make best/creative use of applicable and available internal or external data
Identifying and integrating new datasets that can be leveraged for modeling efforts
Support related processes around effectively deploying model to business
Effectively communicate results in written, oral and presentation formats to technical and non-technical audiences
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, applied mathematics, or related discipline
3+ years of Data Modeling or similar experience.
Experience with predictive modeling (classification, regression, parameter tuning, optimization criteria, feature selection), preferably with multiple techniques
Experience in model validation techniques, model testing and continuous monitoring of model performance
Experience in Property & Casualty Insurance is strongly preferred.
Demonstrated experience working with large relational data sets.
Working knowledge in SAS, R, Python or another platform to develop and implement predictive models.
Ability and willingness to quickly gain knowledge of SAS enterprise guide and enterprise miner.
Ability to communicate complex technical information in common language to foster teaching and analytics guidance to internal customers.
Advanced experience in analytics, data cleaning, and predictive modeling.
Ability to write queries in SQL.
Detail-oriented and ability to work collaboratively
Physical Demands
Physical demands are considered to be that of an office environment, climate controlled, with minimal physical exertion. This position requires prolonged sitting, ability to utilize a computer and interactions with others in meetings or via phone.
Benefits
We offer a competitive compensation and benefits package including medical, dental, vision, 401(k), flexible spending, short-term and long-term disability insurance, life insurance, long-term care, education assistance and paid time off.
IFG Companies is an equal opportunity employer committed to a diverse workforce. M/F/D/V",2.9,IFG Companies,"Atlanta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,35,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,GA,2692,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
3,3,Data Scientist,$57k-$102k,"Every Analyst a Scientist - One of our primary goals is to empower intelligence analysts to be able to study their data like scientists. The tools we develop focus on streamlining intelligence analysis through integrated algorithms and software that provide insight into the geopolitical landscape for use in operational intelligence missions around the world.

The Role:

As a Data Scientist, you will live by our motto that “Data is Destiny.” You will work with a diverse collection of massive datasets, including social media, structured and unstructured text, geospatial, time series, and imagery data. You will design, test, and validate statistical tests and machine learning models in support of cutting-edge problems in the national security space. Your expertise as a data scientist will aid a diverse team of researchers to build state-of-the-art tools and technologies that are deployed to extract and enrich intelligence used by analysts.

If you would like to help intelligence and defense analysts keep pace with technology-driven innovation, then this role is for you!

Who you are:
A U.S. Citizen with the ability to obtain a Security Clearance
A degree in a scientific field such as Statistics, Mathematics, or Computer Science
Experience in statistical modeling including performance evaluation and uncertainty quantification
Proficiency with a scientific programming language, preferably Python, and familiarity with Numpy, Pandas, and/or Scikit-learn packages
Experience in grooming sparse, incomplete, and noisy datasets
Motivated collaborator who is an excellent communicator of ideas to both technical and non-technical audiences
Even better:
Active Clearance
MS or PhD in a scientific field such as Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, or Data Science or 2+ years of relevant work experience
Familiarity with handling and analyzing data at scale, for example using Hadoop, Dask, Spark, and MapReduce
Working knowledge of data store tools such as SQL and Elasticsearch, and experience interacting with databases
Experience with deep learning and neural network training, testing, and evaluation with fluency in Tensorflow or PyTorch
Specialized expertise in a data-rich field such as time-series analysis, graph analytics, geospatial analysis, image processing, or Bayesian programming",4.5,Systems & Technology Research,"Woburn, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,10,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,MA,2314,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,1,0,0
4,4,Senior Data Scientist,$57k-$102k,"About Us

At GutCheck, we pioneered agile market research to provide our clients with actionable insights at the speed of their business. As the marketplace rapidly evolves, we're evolving with it. By combining qualitative, quantitative, and behavioral methodologies, our team of full-service research experts synthesizes insights to help clients make more confident business decisions -- connecting them with their target consumers earlier and more often in the development process.

What Makes Our Approach Different

We create heroes out of our clients by providing them with contextualized insights to more efficiently and effectively connect with their target audiences. Enabled by technology and automation, we are dedicated partners who take a human-first approach to delivering powerful insights. Today, we are bringing agile to strategy: enabling brands to gather robust foundational insights in an agile, iterative way to inform key business within the demands of today's innovation timelines.

Here's where you come in:

As our Senior Data Scientist, you will be the primary contributor that will operationalize predictive models built with machine learning and advanced analytic technologies. GutCheck owns years of structured and unstructured data. We've started to identify patterns in our world-class market research using machine learning technologies such as TensorFlow. You will help us by providing expertise on mathematical concepts for the broader cross-functional analytics team and inspire the adoption of advanced analytics and data science across the entire breadth of our organization.

You will work closely with our talented and agile Product and Engineering teams to craft scalable, well-designed solutions that address the technical and architectural challenges inherent to making sense of our data. We have a focus on quality, automation, and innovation. We encourage our Engineers to think creatively and flexibly when choosing solutions, tools, and techniques. Our team offers an environment where trust and innovation are encouraged, egos aren't accepted, and collaboration is core to our DNA.

You will advocate, evangelize and build data-fueled products that help our internal and external customers gain deeper insights into direct, targeted consumer feedback. This data can and will be coupled with third-party data sources to help our clients be heroes by making well informed business decisions. You'll help research and choose which data sources will provide unique and compelling insights, and then you'll dig in and become an expert on that data. You will provide insight into leading analytic practices, design and lead iterative learning and development cycles, and ultimately produce new and creative analytic solutions that will become part of our core deliverables.

For more information on the company and the GutCheck team, please go to www.gutcheckit.com

This job description is not a complete list of your qualifications or position roles. GutCheck is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to equal opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, gender, gender identity, genetic information, parental or pregnancy status, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, or Veteran status.",3.9,GutCheck,"Denver, CO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,11,Company - Private,other_industries,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,CO,3310,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
5,5,Senior Data Scientist,$57k-$102k,"NanoMosaic LLC, located in Woburn, Massachusetts, is focused on developing an innovative photonics technology for biomedical diagnostics and drug development. Our cutting-edge technology will enable new frontiers of medical research for ultrahigh-sensitivity detection of single molecules in low volume liquid biopsy samples.
We are looking for a candidate with a strong desire to bring a disruptive technology to market; playing a key role in a multidisciplinary team. This position will primarily focus on implementation of our data processing, informatics, and reporting pipeline.
Successful candidates must have solid knowledge and extensive experience with scripting in Python or similar language with special emphasis in machine vision applications. Emphasis is also placed on image processing techniques via machine learning methods as well as local and hosted system architecture development. Experience providing consumer-facing data visualizations is preferred. Additionally, candidates should possess a strong acumen for on-the-fly problem solving, communication, and system level thinking.

Responsibilities:
Develop, validate, implement, and support image analysis tools for our evolving data pipeline
Incorporate data pipeline revisions into our existing platform
Develop and integrate data reporting mechanism
General Qualifications:
Creative, hardworking, and organized. Must also show a track record of innovative problem solving in technical environments.
BS/BA degree in a Data Science or related field (e.g. Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Bioinformatics, etc.)
5+ years of directly related experience
Strong experience with image processing and image analysis
Strong background in Python
Strong problem-solving skills
Ability to prioritize tasks and remain agile in a small working group
Excellent communication skills are essential
Preferred Qualifications:
Master’s degree in a Data Science or related field (e.g. Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Bioinformatics, etc.) plus 5 years of experience.
Previous experience in application of statistical methods and machine learning techniques
Experience with wet-lab techniques (especially immunological)
Application experience with photonics, machine vision, and microscopy
Experience with laboratory automation including liquid handling, plate readers, plate washers, and incubators
Experience with other software platforms such as LabView, Matlab
Familiarity with regulatory framework and guidance for RUO and Dx software development

NanoMosaic LLC. is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",-1.0,NanoMosaic,"Woburn, MA",-1,Unknown,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,MA,2799,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
6,6,Data Engineer,$57k-$102k,"Job Description: The selected applicant will serve as the Data Engineer for an integrated contractor team, supporting high-fidelity/high-resolution modeling of the Ballistic Missile Defense System (BMDS) in a virtualized, high-performance, high-capacity environment to provide Modeling and Simulation as a Service (MSaaS). The qualified candidate will be responsible for supporting the Integration, Test and Verification of large-scale data storage environments to support the Missile Defense Agency’s digital modeling/simulation programs. This includes working with many of the following technologies: data pipelines, data services, operational data stores, data warehouses, data marts, big data stores, data mining, big data visualization and experiment designs. The right individual will display both a passion for data science and leading a cultural change in how data is used throughout the organization regarding these efforts. Some travel is required.
Primary Duties and Responsibilities:
Design, create, build & maintain data pipelines that enable analytical, business intelligence, and software development use cases
Aggregate & Transform raw data coming from a variety of data sources to fulfill the functional & non-functional business needs
Performance optimization: Automating processes, optimizing data delivery & re-designing the complete architecture to improve performance.
Handling, transforming & managing Big Data using modern frameworks & NoSQL databases.
Building and assisting in building an end to end infrastructure to ingest, transform & store data for further analysis & business requirement.

Minimum Requirements:
A Bachelor of Science degree in Science or Engineering discipline plus two (2) years directly related experience in data.
This position requires the selected candidate have an active DoD Secret clearance with the ability to obtain a TS/SCI clearance
Preferred Capabilities/Experience
Experience with database transformation, modeling and normalization (1NF, 2NF, 3NF)
SQL Code experience
Proficiency using a data ETL tools like Apache NiFi, AWS Glue, Informatica, PowerCenter, IBM Infosphere Information Server, MS SQL Server Integrated Services, Oracle Data Integrator, Qlik Replicate, SAS – Data Integration Studio, SAP – BusinessObjects Data Integrator, or Talend.
High level data literacy
Python developer preferred / desire to learn at an intermediate level or better
Experience with data usage in software and analytical scenarios including Continual Integration and Continual Deployment (CI/CD) frameworks
Proficient in data security management
Prefer experience with open platform (Kubernetes/Istio), microservice/service mesh architectures, and leverage event-driven behavior across the entire portfolio
Competency in Agile Development
Security Clearance Requirements:
Position requires that candidate possess, or be able to acquire an active SECRET security clearance in order to access classified information. Inability to maintain a security clearance will result in candidate being ineligible to support this position.

The AEgis Technologies Group (AEgis) provides advanced engineering solutions across the space superiority, directed energy, missile defense, electronic warfare & cyber, C4ISR, and intelligence markets. The Company was founded in 1989 and has served its core customer base as a trusted partner for decades focused on solving the Defense and National Security Community’s hardest challenges. AEgis is an end to end life cycle partner through R&D, development, and into operations. We are the trusted provider leading the transformation for tomorrow’s multi-modal and multi-domain warfare. AEgis Technologies – Leading the Transformation of Modern Warfare.",4.1,AEgis Technologies,"Colorado Springs, CO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,31,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,CO,3729,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
7,7,Data Scientist BSLEF8,$57k-$102k,"E3/Sentinel’s Homeland Security Enterprise (HSE) division is an integrated organizational entity fostering increased collaboration and synergies across the Homeland domain. HSE combines the skills and talents of over 245 (and growing) E3S employees and subcontractor staff supporting multiple components across DHS, including but not limited to: U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP), Transportation Security Administration (TSA), U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE), Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), U.S. Coast Guard (USCG), Science and Technology Directorate (S&T), Countering Weapons of Mass Destruction Office (CWMD), Federal Protective Services (FPS), and the DHS Headquarters Management Directorate. Our team provides rapid, innovative and specialized solutions that enable our HSE clients to success at meeting dynamic mission objectives.

Each day U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP) oversees the massive flow of people, capital, and products that enter and depart the United States via air, land, sea, and cyberspace. The volume and complexity of both physical and virtual border crossings require the application of “big data” solutions to promote efficient trade and travel. Further, effective “big data” solutions help CBP ensure the movement of people, capital, and products is legal, safe, and secure.
In response to this challenge, E3/Sentinel, as a trusted mission partner of CBP, seeks capable, qualified, and versatile data scientists to help lead the development and delivery of high-quality predictive modelling solutions. Successful applicants will serve as recognized subject matter experts in the application of quantitative methods, machine learning algorithms, and predictive models to address complex national and homeland security challenges. They will help our team to leverage large structured and unstructured datasets to develop and operationalize models, tools, and applications that drive optimized decision making. Project tasks include data collection, mining, data and text analytics, clustering analysis, pattern recognition and extraction, automated classification and categorization, and entity resolution to implement and enhance automated risk assessment. The products we develop provide actionable insight with real and immediate impact on the safety and security of the United States, its citizens, visitors, and economy.

Lead and perform hands-on analysis and modeling involving the creation of intervention hypotheses and experiments, assessment of data needs and available sources, determination of optimal analytical approaches, performance of exploratory data analysis, and feature generation (e.g., identification, derivation, aggregation).
Collaborate with mission stakeholders to define, frame, and scope mission challenges where big data interventions may offer important mitigations and develop robust project plans with key milestones, detailed deliverables, robust work tracking protocols, and risk mitigation strategies.
Demonstrate proficiency in extracting, cleaning, and transforming CBP transactional and mission data associated within an identified problem space to build predictive models as well as develop appropriate supporting documentation.
Leverage expert knowledge of a variety of statistical and machine learning techniques and methods to define and develop programming algorithms; train, evaluate, and deploy predictive analytics models that directly inform mission decisions.
Execute projects including those intended to identify patterns and/or anomalies in large datasets; perform automated text/data classification and categorization as well as entity recognition, resolution and extraction; and named entity matching.
Brief project management, technical design, and outcomes to both technical and non-technical audiences including senior government stakeholders throughout the model development/ project lifecycle through written as well as in-person reporting.

Bachelor’s Degree (required), Master’s or Ph.D. degree (preferred) in operations research, industrial engineering, mathematics, statistics, computer science/engineering, or other related technical fields with equivalent practical experience
Significant experience in developing machine learning models and applying advanced analytics solutions to solve complex business problems.
Proficiency with statistical software packages: SAS, SPSS Modeler, R, WEKA, or equivalent.
Experience with programming languages: R, Python, Scala, Java, SQL, or equivalent.
Experience constructing and executing queries to extract data in support of EDA and model development.
Experience with unsupervised and supervised machine learning techniques and methods.
Experience working with large-scale (e.g., terabyte and petabyte) unstructured and structured data sets and databases.
Experience performing data mining, analysis, and training set construction.
Completed CBP Background Investigation clearance (active or re-instate-able)

Experience with big data technologies (e.g., Hadoop, HIVE, HDFS, HBase, MapReduce, Spark, Kafka, Sqoop).
Proficiency with Unsupervised Machine Learning methods including Cluster Analysis (e.g., K-means, K-nearest Neighbor, Hierarchical, Deep Belief Networks, Principal Component Analysis), Segmentation, etc.
Proficiency with Supervised Machine Learning methods including Decision Trees, Support Vector Machines, Logistic Regression, Random/Rotation Forests, Categorization/Classification, Neural Nets, Bayesian Networks, etc.
Experience with pattern recognition and extraction, automated classification, categorization, and entity resolution (e.g., record linking, named-entity matching, deduplication/ disambiguation).
Experience working in a team and deploying solutions in an iterative or agile/DevOps continuous integration and delivery environment using lifecycle management methods and tools.
Experience with visualization tools and techniques (e.g., Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, Tableau, SAS Visual Analytics, PowerBI).

E3/Sentinel is an equal opportunity employer and Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (VEVRAA) federal contractor. All qualified applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, or status as a qualified individual with a disability. E3/Sentinel hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.",4.4,E3 Federal Solutions,"Alexandria, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,16,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,VA,6516,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,1
9,9,Data Scientist,$57k-$102k,"Data Scientist
In this role, you will be set on a constant “treasure hunt” for new data sources to apply the latest techniques for modeling and data analysis. You will be part of a team driving the profit and customer growth of this growing insurance agency.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities
Working with internal and external data to understand and accurately predict:
Shopping behavior;
Retention behavior;
Quote and conversion rates;
Retention and lifetime customer value;
Contribution to overall margin;
Customer satisfaction; and
Other drivers of success you identify worthy of analysis.
Qualifications and Education
Knowledge of new and innovative modeling and statistical techniques – a relevant specialty is preferred.
Detail orientation – attention and desire to work on large data “crunching” projects.
Strong written and oral communication skills and a proven ability to communicate technical concepts to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Creative thinker with the ability to synthesize information from various sources and apply that information to concrete business problems.
Ability to work with and understanding of the merits of various data structures.
Proficiency with the latest modeling software and techniques, such as SAS, R, Python or Tableau.
Ability to understand the need to balance predictive power, interpretability, and ease of implementation.

Education:
An advanced degree in mathematics, machine learning, economics, statistics or a related field.
About the Company
The Plymouth Rock Company and its affiliated group of companies write and manage over $1.4 billion in personal and commercial auto and homeowner’s insurance throughout the Northeast and mid-Atlantic, where we have built an unparalleled reputation for service. We continuously invest in technology, our employees thrive in our empowering environment, and our customers are among the most loyal in the industry. The Plymouth Rock group of companies employs more than 1,800 people and is headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts. Plymouth Rock Assurance Corporation holds an A.M. Best rating of “A-/Excellent”.",3.5,Plymouth Rock Assurance,"Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,38,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,MA,2121,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
10,10,Data Engineer (Active TS SCI with Polygraph),$57k-$102k,"Volume Integration, LLC partners with our customers to deliver leading edge ""Big Data"" analytics solutions.

By leveraging our teams' extensive experience in cloud capabilities and emerging technologies, we design and deploy custom solutions to unique and evolving challenges. Volume employees and their families are our number one priority, while also ensuring our customer's mission and success remain the primary focus and objective.

If you are a motivated individual willing to tackle challenging, and interesting problems in cyber security, big data, and machine learning, come be a part of our dynamic team!

Job Description

Volume Integration is seeking a highly motivated, self-directed professional to fill the role of Data Engineer. This position will be based at the customer site in the Reston, VA area. The applicant will be supporting a team of data scientists, and will be working with unstructured and structured data. Main tasks include Data Triage, Data Modeling, Data Cleansing, Data Staging and ETL.

Required Skills:
8+ years of experience in multiple modern program languages and data stores supporting activities listed in the position description.
Must be willing to learn new technologies.
Education Requirements:
Bachelor's degree with a technical focus
Desired Skills:

Experience with Data Science technologies
Excellent communication skills
Clearance Requirement;
Active TS SCI with Polygraph Clearance
Location:
Reston, VA
Many Volume positions require an active (or ability to obtain) U.S. Security Clearance, for which the US Government requires US Citizenship. Volume Integration, LLC. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or other characteristics protected by law.",4.4,"Volume Integration, LLC","Reston, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,7,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,VA,1854,0,data engineer,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
11,11,Core Cloud Data Engineer,$57k-$102k,"Cloudreach is the leading multi-cloud services provider. Our mission is to help companies navigate their unique journeys to the cloud and build new foundations for future growth. We're a team of multi-cloud natives with certifications across AWS, GCP and Azure. Businesses that work with Cloudreach adopt cutting-edge technologies to solve challenges and create new opportunities. Working exclusively on public cloud, we deliver unrivaled value for more than 1000 enterprise clients globally.

Behind our services are our Cloudreachers.

We pride ourselves on being the go-to destination for curious, talented, and driven people looking for unique work experiences to maximize their potential. We are passionate about asking questions, finding solutions, playing with the latest tools & technology, doing our lives' work, and having fun along the way. You can learn more about our innovative culture, global workforce, and Cloudy Values on our website.

We're not content with the status quo. We're here to do things better, and then do better things.

What team will you be on?

Joining the Data and Analytics team (DnA), you are part of the broader Cloud Professional Services team. You will form the core of Cloudreach's Data Engineering capability. We currently help customers of all shapes and sizes in their public Cloud Adoption journey, alongside infrastructure as code, DevOps automation and Operational governance experts.

What will your role be?

The purpose of a Cloud Data Engineer is to enable data scientists and analysts to gain insights into data by architecting and implementing data-driven cloud based solutions. At Cloudreach, they will be subject matter experts and will be responsible for the technical leadership for data ingestion and processing engagements. A good understanding of cloud platforms and prior experience working with big data tooling and frameworks is required.
Build technical solutions required for optimal ingestion, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using open source, AWS, Azure or GCP 'big data' frameworks and services.
Work with the product and software team to provide feedback surrounding data-related technical issues and support for data infrastructure needs uncovered during customer engagements / testing.
Understand and formulate processing pipelines of large, complex data sets that meet functional / non-functional business requirements.
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture
Working alongside the Cloud Architect and Cloud Enablement Manager to implement Data Engineering solutions
Collaborating with the customer's data scientists and data stewards/governors during workshop sessions to uncover more detailed business requirements related to data engineering
What are we looking for?
Has experience successfully implementing simple enterprise solutions using a vast range of data engineering technologies. Has experience deploying and using the services in a major cloud platform
Delivers - Significant code contributions to more complex components of ETL pipelines
Writes test, test cases, and code documentation with a high level of detail. Skill mastery in a few areas
Coding - Pushes back bad code and employs ETL best practices
Experience with object-oriented and/or functional programming languages, such as Python, Java and Scala
Experience with Machine Learning toolkits
Experience in building scalable end-to-end data ingestion and processing solutions
Good understanding of data infrastructure and distributed computing principles
Proficient at implementing data processing workflows using Hadoop and frameworks such as Spark and Flink
Good understanding of data governance and how regulations can impact data storage and processing solutions such as GDPR and PCI
Ability to identify and select the right tools for a given problem, such as knowing when to use a relational or non-relational database
Working knowledge of non-relational and row/columnar based relational databases
Stakeholder Management - Has guided & influenced customer stakeholders. Manages customer expectations on project deliverables. Aware of the customers political landscape beyond the technology. Clarifies and communicates internally customer objectives.
What are our perks?
Meaningful and impactful work opportunities at a pioneering, cutting edge cloud services provider
People-first mentality. We know that you and your mental health & wellbeing are #1. That's why we give you an uncapped holiday allowance (+ your birthday off!), employee assistance programs, and resources to support your mental health & wellbeing.
We embrace technologies that unlock agile & flexible ways of working. We respect our people to do their work when and how they work best. Work-life blend is a priority!
Our dynamic work environment enables autonomy while also promoting a sense of belonging to a global community
Opportunity for growth & development. Not only will you work alongside and learn from industry thought leaders, you will also be reimbursed for function-based certifications. We're multi-cloud and proud!
An inclusive workplace where varying backgrounds, ideas, and points of view are celebrated and the individual is respected, included and empowered to bring their whole self to work
Transparency in business updates & communications. Whether you're on the senior leadership team or a brand new employee, you're an integral part of the team and we'll make sure you know what's up
Recognition-rich company culture where daily wins are celebrated and individuals living out our values are applauded
We strive to remove barriers, eliminate discrimination and ensure equal opportunity through our transparent recruitment process. We are open to all groups of people without regard to age, disability, marital status, gender identity, race, colour, sexual orientation, religion, military status, veteran status or any other legally-protected characteristic.",3.4,Cloudreach,Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,11,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,Remote,5955,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
12,12,Data Scientist,$57k-$102k,"TACG is a driven Alaskan Native 8(a) professional consulting firm, that focuses on employee growth in collaboration with client delivery. Our portfolio ranges from support work with Health and Human Services to highly skilled Defense consulting. We have recently been awarded as one of INC.5000's fastest growing companies and received multiple best places to work awards. How can you help shape TACG?
Position Summary:

TACG is looking for a Data Scientist to support the business in defining information/data requirements to allow for the design, development, testing/evaluation, implementation and sustainment of critical business applications and IT capabilities. The Data Scientist will provide technical expertise in Business Intelligence (BI) tools and programming languages to support data analytics, data visualizations, and predictive analysis.

Responsibilities:
Applies analytic methodologies and principles to address client needs.
Applies analytic techniques in the evaluation of project objectives and contributes to the implementation of strategic direction.
Performs analyst functions including data collection, interviewing, data cleansing, data modeling, project testing, and creation of performance measurements to support project objectives.
Performs data collection, interviewing, data cleansing, data modeling, project testing, and creation of performance measurements to support project objectives.
Required Knowledge, Skills and Experience:
Excellent analytical skills
Experience using SQL, Python, and R languages for statistical analysis
Experience using Tableau Desktop, Prep Builder and Reader for the generation, sustainment and viewing of data visualization dashboards
Experience in ETL, specifically with data resident on SharePoint
3 years of experience with a Bachelor's Degree in computer science, information systems management, mathematics, operations research, statistics, or engineering; or, 1 year of experience with a Master's Degree in computer science, information systems management, mathematics, operations research, statistics, or engineering.
Education & Certification Requirements:
Four year degree or a Master's Degree in Computer Science, Business, Management or related field
Preferred Skills:
Creative thinker
Strong communication skills
Proficient in MS Office suite of tools, specifically MS Excel.
Excellent team skills.
Experience or understanding of AF or DoD processes, data and systems
Disclaimer:
The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work performed by employees assigned to this classification. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of personnel so classified.

Work Environment:
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions
All work will be performed in an office environment.
Physical Requirements:
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
The employee is frequently required to talk or hear. The employee is occasionally required to stand, walk; reach with hands and arms to stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision.
Citizenship: United States
Security Clearance: NACI background will be required
Percent of Travel Required: Up to 10%
FLSA Status: Full-time, Exempt
Benefits:
We understand that our employees make us the great company we are, so we want to give back as much as possible. Whether it's our flexible wellness program that gives you the power to do what makes you happy or focusing on career development utilizing our tuition reimbursement, we're sure to have every benefit you're looking for, to also include; matching 401(k), Medical, Vision, and Dental Coverage and much more!

TACG is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",4.6,TACG Solutions,"Dayton, OH",-1,51 to 200 Employees,14,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,OH,4519,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
14,14,Sr. DATA SCIENTIST,$57k-$102k,"Title: Sr. Data Scientist

Company: Samsung Research America (SRA)

Lab: Visual Display Intelligence Lab

Location: Mountain View, CA

Lab Summary:

At Visual Display Intelligence lab, Samsung Research America, we operate as a start-up while leveraging the broader assets of a larger global enterprise. We do advance research and development to immensely benefit our core business verticals in the space of Ads and Marketing. Our team primarily focuses on processing huge data sets, build robust and scalable big data pipelines, conduct advanced research in implementing state-of-the-art ML and AI techniques, build data services that are both real-time and batch based. All those combined provide the best-in-class experience to our customers across consumer electronics and internet of things. Many of our engineers take pride in publications, filing A-grade patents and build robust products and services.

Position Summary:

As a Staff Software Engineer you will primarily focus on building unified Audience platform by working directly with Product Managers, Lab leaders, researchers, Big data/AI/ML engineers, brainstorm different ideas and also build POCs and propose projects that cater to the broader business needs. If there is evinced interest to invest on those projects, you could lead them to fruition. You will help design data pipelines, maintain large scale distributed systems, help manage the modern data warehousing infrastructure, analyze key metrics for decision makers to provide visual insights that will change the company direction and benefit consumers. The ideal candidate will be someone who comes from a strong analytical background that has demonstrated experience in the following areas:

Responsibilities:
Build and maintain large scale distributed systems to support the whole pipeline from data collection and training to deployment and real-time serving
Write efficient implementations of ML algorithms over CPUs & GPUs
Integrate our in-house systems with open source technologies like Kubernetes and Tensorflow
Build abstractions to automate various steps in different ML workflows
Build tools to debug, visualize and inspect various features and models
Work with the engineers who use the platform, and help them be more impactful by improving the platform
Minimum Qualifications:
Strong knowledge of Computer Science fundamentals including object-oriented design, data structures, operating system, computer networks.
(5+ years) Software development experience, ideally in Python, Scala or Java
(5+ years) Experience with MySQL, Postgres, Cassandra, Redis, Redshift, OracleDB or MongoDB
(3+ years) Microservice-oriented architectures and related OSS technologies (e.g. Kubernetes, Kafka, Celery/RabbitMQ, nginx, Redis, Airflow, etc)
(3+ years) Experience working in distributed and streaming environment, preferably using Spark, Kafka, Flink etc
(3+ years) Experience with AWS in an enterprise environment
(3+ years) CI/CD and test automation frameworks (Cypress.io, Jenkins, Appium, UIAutomation, Bazel, etc)
Preferred Qualifications:
BS, MS or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering or a related technical field
Strong communication and inter-personal skills
Experience with leading large-scale multi-engineer projects
Samsung is an EEO/Veterans/Disabled/LGBT employer. We welcome and encourage diversity as we strive to create an inclusive workplace.",3.7,Samsung Research America,"Mountain View, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,32,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,CA,3390,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,1,0,0
15,15,Senior Data Scientist,$57k-$102k,"Our success depends on our ability to create a diverse, equitable and inclusive environment. We're committed to attracting, developing, retaining and promoting a diverse workforce. By ensuring that every Demandbase employee is able to bring a diversity of talents to work, we're increasingly capable of living out our mission and providing real insight from our products to support our customers. We encourage people from underrepresented backgrounds and all walks of life to apply. Come grow with us at Demandbase!

The world's largest and fastest-growing companies such as Accenture, Adobe, DocuSign, and Salesforce rely on Demandbase to drive their Account-Based Marketing strategy and maximize their B2B marketing performance. We pioneered the ABM category nearly a decade ago, and today we lead the category as an indispensable part of the B2B MarTech stack. Our achievements and innovation would not be possible without the driven and collaborative teams here at Demandbase. As a company, we're as committed to growing careers as we are to building world-class technology. We invest heavily in people, our culture, and the community around us, and have continuously been recognized as one of the best places to work in the Bay Area.

Here's What Data Scientists do at Demandbase:

You will be a member of Demandbase's Central Data Science team that drives product innovation and is responsible for all ML/AI initiatives and projects. We build and apply ML models at every stage of the B2B buyer's journey. Starting from the top of the funnel, Data Scientists build account rank models to score tens of millions of companies and also recommend companies that aren't yet in their CRM. Our Data Scientists apply cutting edge natural language processing algorithms and deep learning models to predict whether a company is interested in our clients product even before they visit their site. Once ML generated account lists are built, we launch campaigns to generate awareness and traffic to target sites.

Our Data Scientists build pacing, pricing, click-through rate, and engagement models using tens of billions of auctions daily to optimize campaign performance. When potential prospects click on ads/banners, they build reinforcement learning algorithms to optimize the user experience.

After potential prospects share their contact information, our Data Scientists build real-time intent using time series analysis to trigger an alert for sales to contact the prospects when there's intent surge. ML models are a significant differentiator for each of our offerings in the ABM platform, Targeting, Conversion, and Intent products. Our Data Scientists not only build ML models, but are also substantially involved in productizing the models, and working closely and cross-functionally with data engineering, application, product, and UX design teams to deliver the world's best account-based marketing and advertising product.

The Data Science team is currently looking for a Senior Data Scientist to develop ground-breaking insights from our data sets and creating robust machine learning models. As a Data Scientist at Demandbase, you will be responsible for discovering insights, identifying opportunities, solving complex problems using simple, pragmatic, and state-of-the-art solutions, and aggressively pushing your projects independently and cross-functionally. Some of our projects include Natural Language Processing/Understanding, Entity Extraction, Deep Learning, Graph, and Optimization.

Please note that due to the COVID-19 pandemic, the Demandbase offices will be closed for the foreseeable future and all positions are remote until further notice.

What you'll be doing:
Develop Machine Learning algorithms that optimize and make an immediate business impact on Targeting KPIs.
Build, test, and deploy custom ML/AI models and algorithms on large datasets, and develop processes for monitoring and analyzing their performance on production environments.
Communicate algorithms, complex data science methods, and statistical results with technical and non-technical audiences.
Stay current with the latest technology/research and drive innovation.
What we're looking for:
4-6 years of data science experience
Background in Statistics, Computer Science, Machine Learning, Mathematics, Computational Psychology, Operational Research, Physics or relevant field
Driven more than one greenfield project from concept to production release
Demonstrated experience leading teams and projects
Demonstrated ability to write clean and performant code in Python
Experience working with AI/ML technologies like TensorFlow, scikit-learn, Spark MLlib, Bigquery Machine Learning, and large-scale data sets and generating unique models and algorithms
Proficiency with analytical and database tools (e.g. Jupyter notebooks, Hive, SQL, No-SQL)
Strong background in classical machine learning and deep knowledge in a variety of techniques in feature selection, regression, classification, and clustering, and their real-world advantages and drawbacks
Experience with Google Cloud and AWS is a plus
Prior experience in Martech/Adtech space is a plus
Knowledge or experience with continuous delivery for machine learning (CD2ML) framework is a plus
Other important qualities:
You enjoy working in a fast-paced and dynamic environment
You are a driver, a learner, and a doer
You do what you say you will do
You are highly self-motivated and able to operate with significant autonomy
You are able to break down complex problems and come up with simple innovative solutions
You are able to dig deep into problems yet being able to focus on the goals and don't get lost in the details
Data is your thing, you love metrics and use metrics to drive projects
You are willing to build end-to-end and own the machine learning products you build or help build
Benefits:

Our benefits include 100% paid for Medical, Dental and Vision for you and your entire family, short-term/long-term disability, life insurance, flexible vacation policy and 401K. Due to the COVID pandemic the Demandbase offices are closed for the foreseeable future. When the office reopens, we also offer commuter benefits, free snacks, catered lunch every Friday, chair massages, weekly yoga and much more!

About Demandbase:

Demandbase is the leader in Account-Based Marketing (ABM) and an indispensable part of the B2B tech stack. The company offers the only end-to-end ABM platform that helps B2B marketers identify, win and grow the accounts that matter most. The biggest and fastest growing companies in the world, such as Accenture, Adobe, DocuSign, GE, Salesforce and others rely on Demandbase to drive their ABM strategy and maximize their marketing performance. The company has been named to the JMP Securities list ""The Hot 100: The Best Privately Held Software Companies,"" the Deloitte Fast 500 and named a Gartner Cool Vendor for Tech Go-To Market. In 2019, Demandbase executives authored the definitive book on ABM, Account-Based Marketing: How to Target and Engage the Companies That Will Grow Your Revenue. For more information, please visit www.demandbase.com or follow the company on Twitter @Demandbase.",4.6,Demandbase,Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,14,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,Remote,7184,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,0
16,16,Principal Data Scientist,$57k-$102k,"About Us :
Infosys Consulting is a global management consulting firm helping some of the world’s most recognizable brands transform and innovate. Our consultants are industry experts that lead complex change agendas driven by disruptive technology. With offices in 20 countries and backed by the power of the global Infosys brand, our teams help the C-suite navigate today’s digital landscape to win market share and create shareholder value for lasting competitive advantage. To see our ideas in action, or to join a new type of consulting firm, visit us at www.InfosysConsultingInsights.com

About the Role

As a Principal Consultant, you will be the key delivery resource and manage parts of delivery of engagements aimed at designing and executing business strategies for our clients, being responsible for quality, budget and staffing, working closely with senior client stakeholders. You will contribute to the firm’s development by guiding and mentoring teams and sharing knowledge. You will be recognized as an expert in your respective domain and contribute to advancing Infosys Consulting’s thought leadership in the industry. You need to have strong skills in at least one of the following areas: AI, Automation, Computer Vision, NLP, Data Science.

Consulting Delivery

Lead the design and delivery of client advisory, solution delivery and organizational transformation engagements in standalone projects or as part of wider client programs.
Advise clients on strategy and detailed use cases by leveraging insights from industry best practices.
Lead and manage a team of consultants to develop concise and practical strategies, roadmap and/or re-engineering program recommendations with a clear implementation path.
Direct teams of global consulting, IT professionals & subject matter experts in establishing comprehensive business and functional requirements, then translating those requirements into actionable project initiatives with associated metrics.
Play a key liaison and coordinator between the business, product, technology, senior management, vendor teams and other members of the change programs

Practice Development

Provide insights on new and emerging best practices in consumer products and retail, contribute to the development of service offerings
Work with other practice members to support Infosys Consulting thought leadership activities and develop innovative assets, including differentiated points of view and methodologies
Develop the intellectual capital of the practice by publication of domain-relevant white papers and points of view
Contribute to practice growth and vitality through roles such as recruitment, training and retention
Business Development

Lead small, medium sized sales pursuits and business development activities ranging from creation of client proposals to formulating commercial constructs / contracts .
Successful business development experience including exposure to each of the various aspects of a typical sales cycle, and experience building relationships at senior management and CXO levels .
Basic Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree or foreign equivalent required.
Minimum 3-8 years of relevant experience with at least 2-3 years of management consulting experience at a top-tier consulting firm
A demonstrated ability to translate business objectives into operational and technology requirements with the commercial acumen to create supporting business cases.
Strong background of leading teams, comprising both client stakeholders, operations, business and technology specialists
Proven ability to grow a client footprint through client relationships, LOB outreach, and becoming a trusted advisor to our clients
Excellent ability to effectively communicate complex information to both technical and non-technical audiences
Must be willing and able to travel up to 80%, (weekly travel) depending on client requirements
U.S. citizens and those authorized to work in the U.S. are encouraged to apply. We are unable to sponsor at this time
Live within a 2 hour drive time or be willing to relocate to one of the following Infosys hub offices - Portland, Oregon; Dallas, TX; New York City, NY; Atlanta, GA
Preferred Qualifications

Experience managing the 2+ full lifecycles of model deployment from problem definition to continued support
Experience with Automation or Artificial Intelligence Center of Excellences for a large Fortune 500 organizations
3+ years of experience in statistical analysis, data mining, machine learning algorithms and their application in various industries
Experience in core Python tools including: Pandas, Numpy, Scikit-Learn, Tensorflow, Pytorch, or other machine learning platforms
Familiarity with the latest RPA tooling (UIPath, Blue Prism, etc.) and Intelligent Automation methodologies
Experience certifications in cloud platforms such as GCP ML, AWS, Azure ML
Familiar with one of the following databases: SQL Server, Oracle, Netezza, Teradata, MySQL
Experience with one of the Big Data platforms (Hadoop, Splunk, Cloudera, BigInsights, MapR, HortonWorks)
Experience in NLP (Natural Language Processing) and/or Computer Vision
Experience in a combination of the following modeling methods: Linear Regression / Partial Least Square Regression / Logistics Regression / Survival analysis / Repeated measures analysis /Principle component analysis / Decision tree / Support Vector Machine / k-means clustering / Neural Networks

This job description may not cover or contain a comprehensive listing of all activities, duties and responsibilities that are required of the employee
EOE: Minorities / female / disability / veteran / sexual orientation / gender identity / national origin",3.2,Infosys Limited,"Basking Ridge, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,39,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,NJ,5688,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
18,18,Data Scientist,$57k-$102k,"Data Scientist


JOB DESCRIPTION

Looking for an exceptional Data Scientist to join our team developing a disruptive enterprise-grade cloud-native software platform to industrialize building machine learning models. Through the platform, everyone, with or without a deep understanding of machine learning, will be able to deliver high-quality production-level models through a few mouse clicks within minutes. You will be able to learn about cloud-native software development, keep up to date with the latest data science technologies, research and build customized machine learning models, and add significant value to our product and customers.

MUST HAVE QUALIFICATIONS:
Excellent understanding of statistics, machine learning, and deep learning algorithms.
Excellent python programmer.
Familiar with available data science libraries/packages/APIs (e.g. NumPy, scikit-learn, PyTorch, TensorFlow, Theano, etc.).
BSc (MSs recommended) with GPA >= 3.5 in Computer Science, Mathematics, or related fields.
Bonus! having an engineering degree/background and/or cloud/AWS experience or knowledge.
Able to understand various data structures and common methods in data transformation.
A skilled and creative team player also able to work independently in a dynamic environment.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Add new machine learning or data transformation capabilities to our cloud-native product.
Collaborate with product management and engineering department to understand the requirements.
Research and develop customized machine learning models for specific problems.
Communicate results and ideas to key decision-makers and customers.
TECHNOLOGIES WE LOVE
Python, JavaScript, GitHub, Slack, Jira, MySQL, MongoDB, AWS Lambda, Node.js, React, MATLAB, Spotfire.
Recommended: share your GitHub profile with us and/or share a demo of recent project work.
WHAT WE VALUE
You are excited to work with others in complex and dynamic systems environments.
You have a constant desire to grow and develop, to learn the cutting edge of new technology.
You thrive in a fast-paced environment.
You care about great design, in your code and technical architecture.
You are comfortable with both large-scale and iterative development styles.
You enjoy working with others but are also an independent programmer.",3.9,Quantum Reservoir Impact,"Houston, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,13,Company - Private,other_industries,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,TX,2280,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
20,20,Data Scientist,$57k-$102k,"Overview


JM&A Group is one of the largest independent providers of finance and insurance (F&I) products in the automotive industry. For nearly 40 years, the company has helped automobile dealers achieve unsurpassed levels of performance. JM&A Group provides more than 3,800 dealerships with a variety of products and services, such as new and used vehicle protection plans, pre-paid maintenance plans and GAP protection programs. Among JM&A Group’s competitive advantages is its robust training and consulting services for F&I professionals, and the company is actively evolving to meet consumer preferences to remain a market leader and a partner of choice.

Job Description


JM&A, a division of JM Family Enterprises, Inc., is looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join its Customer Services Admin team. The Data Scientist will partner with stakeholders from various business functions to identify data science opportunities, have the knowledge, experience and technical skills to leverage internal and external data, and apply the right machine learning/big data technologies to turn such data into valuable insights and solutions for the company. The candidate will be tasked with gathering and integrating large volumes of data to develop complex predictive / machine learning models to drive actionable results and insights especially in the areas of fraud / anomaly detection, claims automation / self service and general efficiency opportunities. his is a highly visible and impactful role where the Data Scientist will interact with the senior and executive level management and have the opportunity to influence what we do and how we do it through data science.

Responsibilities:
Create a collaborative and effective working relationship with functional leaders to understand business problems, identify opportunities / use cases to improve the performance of our businesses
Lead / Contribute to the development of actionable solutions. This includes all aspects of the solution development including problem and goal definition, defining a plan for:
Sampling of the data and conducting experiments
Data extraction
Ingestion and processing (outlier and missing data handling)
Exploratory data analysis
Feature engineering (weight of evidence, label encoding, label count encoding, target encoding, time-series, polynomial interactions, binning, outlier handling)
Feature selection (forward, backwards, information value)
Hyperparameter optimization of machine learning models
Experiment tracking for A/B testing and reproducibility, model evaluation, model interpretability, results communication and deployment
Contribute to the adoption and better understanding across the company of data science best practices and tools and stay up to date regarding new knowledge and developments in this domain
#LI-JD1

Job Requirements
Core skills in Computer Science: Data Structures, Algorithms, Programming Paradigms and Relational Databases
Deep working experience applying statistics and machine learning techniques to real-world problems and data and deploying models to production
Hands-on experience with SQL and tools to access databases
Expertise in Python and R
Expertise with open source data mining/machine learning/big data programming libraries, models and frameworks (e.g. Pandas, Scikit-Learn, H2O, TSFresh, FeatureTools, MLflow, Shap, Microsoft Interpret, Tensorflow, Statsmodels, Pandas-Profiling, Seaborn, Plotly, Spark, Koalas)
Working experience with cloud computing services such as Amazon AWS, Microsoft Azure or Google Cloud Platform
Excellent presentation skills to non-technical Associates communicating complex concepts in terms the audience can understand through understandable language, tables and visualizations
When evaluating the candidate, special attention will be paid to the following competencies:
Intellectual Curiosity and Critical Thinking, necessary to analyze a problem from multiple perspectives and examine the interrelationships between data that may appear superficially unrelated
Autonomous, to own projects end-to-end; ability to work on the entire stack without being dependent on other team members
Focus, to design and test a technique over days and weeks, find it doesn’t work, learn from the failure, and try again
Creativity, to invent and try new approaches to solving a problem
Attention to Detail, in order to maintain rigor and to detect and avoid over-reliance on intuition when examining data
Clear and concise written and oral communication, in order to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear and precise manner
Interpersonal skills, necessary to build good working relationships and work as part of a team
PhD or Masters in Computer Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Math or a related discipline or equivalent skill set",4.0,JM&A Group,"Deerfield Beach, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,42,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,FL,4813,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,1,0,1
23,23,Data Scientist,$57k-$102k,"We have an opportunity for a Data Scientist to join our talented Data Analytics team. The successful candidate will work with customers and the engagement team to support the project management, project data analysis, process improvement, data conversion, and integration needs of our federal customer.

Typical responsibilities include
Collecting large sets of structured and unstructured data from disparate sources.
Cleaning and validating data to ensure accuracy, completeness, and uniformity.
Analyzing data to identify patterns and trends.
Developing solutions and integrating, extending, and contributing to Open Source software
Devising and applying models and algorithms to mine the stores of big data.
Interpreting data to discover solutions and opportunities.
Requirements
Active Secret Clearance
Strong client engagement skills
Experience with languages such as Python, R, SAS, and SQL
Experience with version control systems, including Github or Gitlab
Experience with designing, developing, and deploying analytic software and algorithms
BS degree in Physics, Computer Science, Mathematics, or another quantitative discipline
Desired skills
Experience with open source Big Data tools including Apache Spark or Apache NiFi
Experience with entity resolution
Experience with Natural Language Processing using modern deep learning techniques
Benefits

Perks of working at NetImpact Strategies:
Your health comes first – we offer comprehensive medical, dental, & vision insurance that starts the first of the month after you join the team
Invest in your future – 401(k) Plan – Immediately vested employer contributions; no matching required
Work hard, play hard – we offer a generous Paid Time Off (PTO) policy and observe ALL ten (10) federal holidays
Pawsitively pawesome – Pet Insurance (because our little critters are part of our families, too!)
Invest in your education – Tuition reimbursement, internal training programs, & company-sponsored industry certifications
Be part of a dynamic and collaborative work environment recently ranked by The Washington Post as a Top Work Place in 2019!
Have fun and celebrate and give back – Team building activities, community volunteering, quarterly HQ days, & an offsite annual awards banquet
ABOUT US

NetImpact Strategies specializes in Strategy and Business Transformation, IT Modernization, Data-Driven Intelligence, Cloud Services, and Cybersecurity. We are a team of skilled Consultants who listen to our clients’ needs. We design and implement comprehensive, tailored solutions that are both mindful of the client's culture and organizational dynamics. As mission needs change, new priorities emerge, technologies advance, and methodologies evolve; NetImpact stands out as a trusted advisor that can solve the challenges of today while looking for the opportunities of tomorrow. Our professionals stay abreast of these changes to provide agile, outcome-focused results for federal agency strategic and tactical needs. Approaching engagements as a partner, we provide solutions that empower our clients to achieve results that align with their mission and strategic vision.

ACCESSIBILITY NOTE

NetImpact Strategies is committed to complying with all applicable provisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act, as amended (“ADA”), and applicable state and local laws. It is NetImpact’s policy not to discriminate against any qualified person or applicant with regard to any terms or conditions of employment on the basis of such individual’s disability. Consistent with this policy of non-discrimination, NetImpact will provide reasonable accommodations to an individual with a disability, as defined in the ADA or applicable law, who has made NetImpact aware of his/her disability, unless doing so would cause undue hardship to NetImpact. If you are an applicant and need a reasonable accommodation when applying for job opportunities within NetImpact, or request a reasonable accommodation to utilize NetImpact’s online employment application, please contact careers@netimpactstrategies.com.

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER

NetImpact is committed to the development of a creative, diverse, and inclusive work environment. In order to provide equal employment and advancement opportunities to all individuals, employment decisions at NetImpact will be based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. NetImpact does not discriminate against any person because of race, color, creed, religion, sex (including gender identity, sexual orientation, and pregnancy), marital status, national origin, disability, age, veteran status, genetic information or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, and local laws (referred to as ""protected status"").",4.1,NetImpact Strategies,"Vienna, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,11,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,VA,4715,0,data scientist,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
24,24,Data Engineer (Remote),$57k-$102k,"IZEA was built to connect the worlds top brands with influential content creators and publishers to enable influencer marketing and content production at scale. With over 500,000 Creators reaching over 3 billion fans and followers around the globe, IZEA is unmatched in its industry experience, network diversity, and technology ecosystem. A career at IZEA offers countless ways to make an impact in a fast-growing organization!

IZEA is looking for a Data Engineer to join our Core Technology group.

This team member may be located in the Orlando area or remote.

You will use the latest tools and technology to build and support IZEA's industry-leading data initiatives. Whether contributing to our data pipelines that ingest millions of records per hour, distilling vast amounts of data into meaningful insights, or operating the services that surface those insights, you will help define what the future of Influencer and Content Marketing looks like.

You will have direct access to end-users and stakeholders, and you are encouraged to build and leverage these relationships in your work. You will write and test your code, and work with our QA team to get it deployed to production. With the help of a homegrown, bot-driven CI/CD pipeline, your code will be delivered to users daily. This cross-functional team leverages Amazon Web Services for everything from ECS for containerized virtualization and hosting, to S3 for durable object storage, RDS and DynamoDB for persistence, EMR for the batch processing of billions of records, and Lambda for distributed workloads and stream consumption.

Aside from the day to day, we can offer you incredible benefits including an annual continuing education budget, a trust-focused development process, a flexible and collaborative work environment where balance matters, stock ownership, and an annual company retreat.

The team strives to be ego-free and motivated only by building amazing software for our users. We seek to understand the ""why"" behind the ""what"". We regularly break out into small teams to tackle problems, learn new technologies, or just share what we know with others. We test our code and invest in the health of our systems. We push each other, learn from each other, and strive to continually grow.

Primary Responsibilities

You will...
Work with stakeholders to define the solutions to development problems and business requirements
Develop and maintain the features and capabilities of our data ingestion pipelines
Extract actionable and impactful insights from vast amounts of data
Develop and maintain the services that surface those insights and make them available for consumption in a performant manner
Create unit and integration tests for your code
Reproduce and fix bugs reported by internal and external users
Set goals and communicate often about your progress toward them
Contribute to the ongoing improvement of the engineering organization and our software
What Were Looking For

A problem solver at heart
Much of our work revolves around problems that have no existing off-the-shelf solution or consensus on best practices. You'll often need to break down large problems into smaller more manageable tasks and utilize critical thinking to come up with novel ideas.
3+ years of engineering experience
Things move quickly in the data group. Youll need to be comfortable and familiar with delivering highly scalable cloud based applications.
Professional experience with frameworks like Hadoop, Spark, or similar
This will be a significant component of your responsibilities. You will be working with large data sets in a distributed environment on a daily basis. Familiarity w/ the Hadoop/Spark ecosystem is a must.
Professional experience with Python data tools
Our data team uses PySpark and Jupyter notebooks extensively. Familiarity with these technologies will also serve you well.
Direct experience with relational and NoSQL databases technologies
We use the best tool for the job around here. When it comes to storing and accessing data, we recognize that the technology decisions we make directly impact our ability to provide a performant customer experience, and our own costs.
Experience designing and building JSON based RESTful APIs
Because we are building our application with a front end framework, we carefully design and document the APIs to power it. To help us, we follow the JSON API spec, but any experience in building a RESTful API will be useful. Remember, the API is your contract with the consumers of your data!
Understanding of monolithic and micro-service based architectures
IZEAx still has some legacy monolithic characteristics. We move more and more of our technology to a distributed set of services, there are new challenges to overcome. Understanding the differences between these two models will help you take those challenges head on.
Basic Linux skills
In order to develop our data pipelines and services, you need to run it on your laptop. This means opening up some terminal windows, running some commands, and keeping the log output open. Additionally, some of our technology stack is better accessed through CLIs. Examples include the Ember CLI, the Rails CLI/console, Docker commands, Gradle, and our own CLIs. We'll walk you through it, but you should be comfy in a terminal.
Ability to multitask and prioritize multiple incoming requests
IZEA's Engineering team strives to provide a great experience and great service to our users. In order to do that, you may need to context switch into a support issue or drop what you are doing to start work on something else. This is part of what Agile means to us.
Excellent verbal and written communications skills
Regular and timely communication is the key to a trust based development process. You should be able to simply and concisely ask for feedback and direction in terms that your audience understands, and relay requested information in a timely fashion to your leaders. You should prioritize documentation of processes and code.
Demonstrated experience with the following will be highly valued

Data Science Background
While not required, a fundamental understanding of statistics and modeling would be a great asset. Practical experience with Machine Learning and/or complex data pipelines would also be welcome.
Front End development experience
From time to time you may need to build visualization, or (lite) user facing experiences. Familiarity with modern web frameworks like Angular, React, Ember, or Vue would be helpful. Extra bonus points if you have familiarity w/ Javascript based visualization libraries like d3.js or Highcharts.
Amazon Web Services, or other cloud providers
IZEA's software is hosted on AWS, and you will need to acquire some familiarity with it. Previous experience in using a cloud provider, even if just for developer tooling, shows that you understand some of the nuances involved in working in the cloud. Familiarity with Amazons EMR would also be an asset.
Continuous Integration & Deployment
IZEA needs to get features and fixes out to customers as soon as we possibly can with as much confidence as possible. To facilitate this, we have developed a CI/CD pipeline (using 3rd party services). An understanding of what CI/CD is will help you understand how this pipeline works and how to make it even better.
GitHub
All of IZEA's code is source controlled on Github. We leverage Github Pull Requests for code reviews, Github integrations manage parts of our CI/CD pipeline, and Github releases define the code tags that ultimately get deployed. Much of our process documentation exists on Github pages. Familiarity with navigating Github's features will help you ramp up in our SDLC faster.
JIRA
IZEA uses JIRA to manage projects and report on progress to stakeholders inside and outside the company. While we strive to automate as much of JIRA as possible with bots, webhooks and reports, understanding how JIRA issues, links, attachments, and workflows work will help you understand our SDLC faster.
About IZEA:

We are IZEA: The Creator Marketplace. Our cloud-based technologies connect Brands and Publishers with content Creators who blog, tweet, pin, and post on their behalf.

Our driving belief is that the only way to thrive in our rapidly changing world is to change ahead of it. IZEA is in a constant state of evolution and reinvention. While we may have invented the industry, we still operate like an entrepreneurial, scrappy start-up. Your time here will be exciting, educational, and at times, a bit crazy.

With IZEA, you have the opportunity to join a non-traditional corporate culture, where creativity and productivity are valued over a suit and tie. We call it ""The IZEA Way.""

Why would you want to work here?

Our developers use the latest tools and technology to build the applications and services that make up the IZEA Exchange platform. We write in whatever language we need to get the job done including Ruby, Java, Python, PHP, Swift, and Javascript. We leverage the latest frameworks, such as Rails, Symphony2, and Drop Wizard for iterating quickly on our technology.

Our code is deployed and operated by the people who write it, with the help of Amazon Web Services. We leverage everything from EC2 for virtualization and hosting, to Amazon EMR and Machine Learning for advanced analytics.

Aside from the day to day, we offer incredible benefits including an annual continuing education budget, a flexible trust-focused development process, and an open collaborative work environment.

Our team is ego-free and motivated to build great software. We regularly break out into small teams to tackle problems, learn new technologies, or just share what we know with others. We test our code and invest in the health of our systems. We push each other, learn from each other, and strive to continually grow as a team.

California residents, please follow this link to view the types of information we may gather from California residents who are applicants, employees, or contractors of IZEA, and how we use such information.

Powered by JazzHR",4.1,"IZEA, Inc","Orlando, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,14,Company - Public,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,FL,10093,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
25,25,Data Scientist,$57k-$102k,"OUR AGENCY

Making a Difference

SWIB is a trusted and skilled global investment organization managing the assets of the Wisconsin Retirement System (WRS) and other separately managed funds. With about $129 billion in total assets under management, SWIB has been recognized by the investment industry for its teamwork and innovation that helps make it a premier asset manager. Sophisticated investment management strategies, forward-looking technologies, and strong internal asset management make SWIB a leading investment organization.

For public employees in Wisconsin, SWIB is a unique and valuable partner. Investing for the financial security of more than 635,000 individuals and for the 1,500 Wisconsin employers who contribute on behalf of their employees SWIBs strong management of the WRS has helped fuel one of only a few fully funded public pension funds in the country. SWIBs long-term investment returns meet the challenges of a constantly evolving investment landscape while helping grow and protect the assets of the WRS, the 8th largest public pension fund in the U.S. and 25th largest public or private pension fund in the world.

We are a mission driven organization and the participants we serve are our mission. By bringing a disciplined, prudent and innovative approach to market opportunities, SWIB has been successful in generating respectable returns and maintaining the trust of the beneficiaries and stakeholders of the funds we oversee.

Join HIGHER PERFORMERS

Home to Top Talent

SWIB has long been recognized as an investment leader because of its success in maintaining the WRS and for the highly-qualified staff overseeing the retirement trust funds. SWIBs internal team invests a majority of its assets under management. This means SWIB is committed to investing in professionals that will keep the organization at the forefront of the investment industry. As an innovative organization, SWIB offers professional development opportunities that enable staff to grow and develop. Approximately 61 percent of SWIBs investment professionals are Chartered Financial Analyst (CFA) charterholders.

About the Team

Partner with, build, maintain, enhance and manage the data and technology for the Asset and Risk Allocation (ARA) division which is responsible for the overall investment structure of the Core and Variable Trust Funds. ARA recommends and implements the asset allocation for the policy portfolio, recommends and implements the active risk budget, and is responsible for overall risk monitoring and management. The Analytics, Data Science, & Development department primarily partners with the Asset & Risk Allocation team as well as work with other internal divisions. There will be opportunities to apply skills in both technology and finance.

This role offers a unique opportunity to learn and contribute to the technology and the business through technology.

Essential activities:
Creating reporting, decisioning systems or outputs, performing rapid analysis on data issues, and instrumenting the system with data quality rules to proactively catch and prevent issues, creating enriched and enhanced datasets with advanced data manipulation and modeling skills, use of primarily Oracle, SQL Server, Snowflake, Python, delivering risk, return, cost metrics and partner with various internal departments to improve the overall state of technology and operations, architecting, developing, testing, documenting and supporting software and technical solutions for the SWIB ARA team as well as other teams, assess and revisit inventory business logic, calculations and reporting, leveraging SQL, Python and communication skills in various avenues, instrument data quality rules and metrics in the system.

Technical Skills:
Oracle SQL, SQL Server
Snowflake (or some equivalent datastore tool)
Python experience
JIRA and Confluence
Alteryx (or some equivalent ETL tool such as Informatica)
PowerBI (or some equivalent BI tool such as Tableau)
Data Skills:
SQL development
ETL (Extract Transform load) exposure
Python experience
Financial Knowledge recommended but candidates in other industries highly recommended to apply:
Understanding of multi-asset products is desirable
Comprehensions of risk, return and cost metrics in industry is desirable
Exposure to the investment management lifecycle is desirable
The ideal candidate:
5-10 years experience in data analytics, data science, or related fields
Bachelor's degree or advanced degree in finance, quantitative finance, or another related field
Ability to take various questions gathered from the business leveraging existing data as well as improving upon that data to deliver complete, consistent and precise answers
Experience in working with/understanding the various lifecycles of data management, extraction, loading, transformation to its applications in analysis, research and solving problems
Extensive knowledge in composing Oracle SQL, SQL Server queries, data modeling, and having a SQL and analytics background
Experience in identifying use cases for the business, contributing to analysis and understanding of existing data models with iterative recommendations on improvement resulting in some improvement in risk, return or cost for the organization
Extensive knowledge of data extraction, transformation and loading
Experience refactoring SQL queries, use of Python
Experience working with large structured and financial data sets
Ability to follow rigor in creating/updating documentation, maintain process (i.e. JIRA tickets) and following technology and business best practices
Ability to present and communicate well and connect business and technology
Ability to tactically understand results in context (i.e. when does something look wrong), and strategically how to resolve those issues via data quality and rule-based instrumentation
Interest in newer data technologies, Snowflake programming, i.e. Python
Interest or experience in investment management, quantitative finance and technology
Background in Agile methodologies and their applications
SWIB Offers:
Competitive McLagan-base salary
Meaningful performance-based incentive compensation
A comprehensive benefit package
Educational and training opportunities
Tuition reimbursement
Challenging work in a professional environment
The position requires U.S. work authorization and residency in, or willingness to relocate to the Madison, Wisconsin area. SWIB is prepared to offer relocation assistance as needed.",3.0,State of Wisconsin Investment Board,"Madison, WI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,69,Government,financial_related,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,WI,6484,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
26,26,Data Engineer,$57k-$102k,"Lucid Perspectives, and E/3 Sentinel Company, provides proven problem solvers to our customers and their diverse needs. We help them achieve success by offering comprehensive management and technical solutions with a clear focus on their mission

The successful candidate will manipulate data and data flows for both existing and new systems performing ETL, analytical support and maintenance of critical data.

The data engineer will provide support in the areas of data extraction, transformation and load (ETL), data mapping, analytical support, operational support, database support, and maintenance support of data and associated systems.
As a member of the team, the data engineer will research, design, develop and/or modify enterprise-wide systems and/or application software.
The data engineer will research emerging technologies to determine impact on application execution. Troubleshoot complex problems and provide support for the ETL process. Prepare reports on analyses, findings and project progress

Ability to develop complex data flows, or make significant enhancement to existing pipelines
Experience building and maintaining data flows in NiFi or Pentaho
Experience with the following languages: Java/J2EE, C, C++, SQL, XML, XQuery, XPath, Ruby on Rails, HTML/XHTML, CSS, Python, Shell Scripting, JSON
Knowledge of servers operating systems; Windows, Linux, Distributed Computing, Blade Centers, and cloud infrastructure
Strong problem solving skills
Ability to comprehend database methodologies

Lucid Perspectives, an E/3 Sentinel Company, understands that our people are what make us great. We believe in a work/life balance while supporting the customers and mission we love. Our benefits are as follows: 7 weeks PTO (10 Federal Holidays along w/ 25 Vacation days), 10% 401K Contribution (100% vested on Day 1), 100% paid premiums Medical/Dental/Vision for the family, Life/Disability Insurance, Generous Tuition Reimbursement, Monthly Internet & Cell phone allowance, Technology Allowance, and Referral/Growth Incentive Bonus.
During the COVID19 pandemic we are actively taking measures to protect and support our employees. This includes support to our workforce that has returned to work on-site, those working remotely, and those employees supporting in a ready state or isolating at home.

Lucid Perspectives, E3/Sentinel Company, is an equal opportunity employer and Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (VEVRAA) federal contractor. All qualified applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, or status as a qualified individual with a disability. Lucid Perspectives, an E3/Sentinel Company, hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.",4.4,E3 Federal Solutions,"Chantilly, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,16,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,VA,2870,0,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
27,27,Head of Real-World Data Science,$57k-$102k,"Genesis Research is an international healthcare consultancy providing end-to-end value evidence strategy, development, and communication services to Life Sciences companies. We are looking for an individual with demonstrated leadership, biopharma industry experience, and strong methodological skills to lead a growing team epidemiologists and RWE scientists. Our RWE-S team has seen exceptional growth and success in providing holistic and comprehensive support to Life Science organizations. The professional leading this team must possess and demonstrate a passion for innovative research, maintain accountability for all RWE deliverables, develop RWE scientists and research teams. This person must understand the needs of clients’ internal and external stakeholders and leverage this understanding to suggest and design value-added, fit-for-purpose research approaches. This role reports to the Chief Scientific Officer. Location: Hoboken, NJ, USA, although remote locations may be considered. Local and international travel of up to 20% is required.


Accountabilities within this role:
• Be the Genesis Research Authority on study design, methodology, and result interpretation for all RWE Deliverables
• Lead, manage, and ensure maximum utilization of a team of epidemiologists and health services researchers charged with designing, implementing, and managing a wide range of studies assess the distribution, patterns and determinants of health and disease conditions and examine access to and the use, costs, quality, delivery, organization, and outcomes of health care.
• Create, update, and maintain Methodological and Scientific Standard Operating Procedures (SOP) that RWE teams will follow
• Support Client Managers with execution and delivery of high-priority and highvisibility studies as a Client-facing subject matter expert
• Provide training, oversight, and guidance for new and current members of the Epidemiology team
• Ensure that the Epidemiology team members are aware of and understand RWD data sources, their strengths and limitations, and statistical software when designing studies
• Manage team capacity in concert with Client Management needs
• Motivate teams during periods of high demand

Qualifications:
▪ Master’s degree, MD or PhD within a relevant discipline (Epidemiology, Public Health, Statistics)
▪ 10+ years of consulting, industry, or academic experience
▪ Experience generating and interpreting real-world and observational research required
▪ Excellent verbal and written communication skills
▪ Proficiency in relevant software such as MS office (Word, Excel and PowerPoint) and statistical packages
▪ Exceptional organizational skills and attention to detail
▪ Enthusiasm to learn and motivation to develop oneself and others within Genesis Research
▪ Flexibility to adapt to client project needs in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial workplace

Compensation:
Competitive salary
Performance-related bonus C
ompany-matched 401k plan
Medical/dental benefits

Genesis Research is an equal opportunity employer.",4.6,Genesis Research,"Hoboken, NJ",-1,1 to 50 Employees,11,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,NJ,3049,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
30,30,Data Analyst/Data Scientist,$57k-$102k,"Sr. Software Engineer – (Discovery Module)
About Privacera
Founded in 2016 by the creators of Apache Ranger™ and Apache Atlas™, Privacera’s mission is to empower enterprises building data platforms in the cloud to balance data governance and security with data access, discovery, and analytics. Often described as “Apache Ranger in the Cloud”, Privacera provides centralized access control that extends Ranger’s capabilities beyond traditional Big Data environments to cloud-native services and leading analytics platforms such as AWS, Azure, GCP and Databricks. Privacera enables IT and data platform teams to make as much data as possible available to the business for analytics while ensuring it is used ethically and in compliance with privacy regulations. Privacera offices are located in Fremont, California and Mumbai. To learn more, visit www.privacera.com
If you are a Data Scientist with a passion for solving major problems with Machine Learning and Big Data Analytics, this is a great opportunity to work with one of the industry’s leading security architects.
Principal Responsibilities:
· Development and implementation of Machine Learning algorithms in Big Data environment
· Work with Data Analysis Engineers, R&D and Product Management to solve complex customer problems and highlight opportunities
· Develop and communicate descriptive, diagnostic, predictive and prescriptive insights/algorithms
· Use machine learning and statistical modeling techniques
Minimum Requirements:
· Master or equivalent degree in a computational science
· 4+ years experience with Machine Learning
· Experience with traditional as well as modern statistical techniques, including Regression, Support Vector Machines, Regularization, Boosting, Random Forests and other ensemble methods
· Strong Analytical skills
· Proficiency in SQL and one or more of JAVA, Python and Scale
· In depth knowledge of statistical methods, data analysis and data mining
· Tuning PID loops for controllers a plus.",4.7,Privacera,"Fremont, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,79.5,CA,1991,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
32,32,Data Scientist,$95k-$118k,"Data Scientist
In this role, you will be set on a constant “treasure hunt” for new data sources to apply the latest techniques for modeling and data analysis. You will be part of a team driving the profit and customer growth of this growing insurance agency.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities
Working with internal and external data to understand and accurately predict:
Shopping behavior;
Retention behavior;
Quote and conversion rates;
Retention and lifetime customer value;
Contribution to overall margin;
Customer satisfaction; and
Other drivers of success you identify worthy of analysis.
Qualifications and Education
Knowledge of new and innovative modeling and statistical techniques – a relevant specialty is preferred.
Detail orientation – attention and desire to work on large data “crunching” projects.
Strong written and oral communication skills and a proven ability to communicate technical concepts to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Creative thinker with the ability to synthesize information from various sources and apply that information to concrete business problems.
Ability to work with and understanding of the merits of various data structures.
Proficiency with the latest modeling software and techniques, such as SAS, R, Python or Tableau.
Ability to understand the need to balance predictive power, interpretability, and ease of implementation.

Education:
An advanced degree in mathematics, machine learning, economics, statistics or a related field.
About the Company
The Plymouth Rock Company and its affiliated group of companies write and manage over $1.4 billion in personal and commercial auto and homeowner’s insurance throughout the Northeast and mid-Atlantic, where we have built an unparalleled reputation for service. We continuously invest in technology, our employees thrive in our empowering environment, and our customers are among the most loyal in the industry. The Plymouth Rock group of companies employs more than 1,800 people and is headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts. Plymouth Rock Assurance Corporation holds an A.M. Best rating of “A-/Excellent”.",3.5,Plymouth Rock Assurance,"Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,38,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,MA,2121,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
33,33,Data Scientist,$95k-$118k,"Position Description


CGI Federal is seeking Data Scientists to assist with new work within a data science division. Our candidates truly need a hybrid skill set to successfully contribute in data science projects. In addition to data analysis, we need people that also have strong IT technical skills, predictive modeling skills, specialized modeling and research methods backgrounds, and given our frequent work on client business processes, optimization and simulation skills.
Your future duties and responsibilities


• Experience translating high-level project requirements into technical tasks.
• Data manipulation and data engineering experience involving structured and unstructured data.
• Data manipulation expertise involving data extractions, data matching between multiple systems, transformations, cleansing, and loading.
• Experience with big data and cloud platforms and toolset.
• Ability to engineer and create complex research datasets by manipulating typically large volume transactional data for use by operations research analysts, economists and statisticians in advanced analytical research and studies.
• Experience in developing predictive, prescriptive, optimization, and forecasting models, including the use of contemporary techniques such as support vector machines, neural networks, and gradient boosting.
• Experience in interpreting results from statistical and mathematical models.
• Experience in advance data visualizations and interpretation.

Required qualifications to be successful in this role


• Bachelor's degree and 7+ years of experience OR Master's degree and 3+ years of experience
• Required: ***Strong Natural Language Processing (NLP) experience***
• Required: SQL (preferable in distributed environment, e.g. Greenplum, Apache Hawq).
• Required: Experience in SAS (preferred), R or Python for complex data manipulation, statistical analysis, and machine learning.
• Required: Experience with data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Bokeh, D3) or elastic stack (Kibana).
• Experience with modern machine learning libraries, including Keras, TensorFlow, PyTorch, MXNet, or MADlib.
• Experience using peer-collaboration tools, e.g., Confluence.
• Experience using GIT or other version control systems.

#CGIFederalJob

Skills

SAS
SQL
Python
Data Modeling
Data Analysis
Data Cleansing

What you can expect from us


Build your career with us.

It is an extraordinary time to be in business. As digital transformation continues to accelerate, CGI is at the center of this changesupporting our clients' digital journeys and offering our professionals exciting career opportunities.

At CGI, our success comes from the talent and commitment of our professionals. As one team, we share the challenges and rewards that come from growing our company, which reinforces our culture of ownership. All of our professionals benefit from the value we collectively create.

Be part of building one of the largest independent technology and business services firms in the world.

Learn more about CGI atwww.cgi.com.

No unsolicited agency referrals please.

CGI is an equal opportunity employer.

Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, ethnicity, ancestry, color, sex, religion, creed, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability, medical condition, military and veteran status, marital status, sexual orientation or perceived sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, and gender expression, familial status, political affiliation, genetic information, or any other legally protected status or characteristics.

CGI provides reasonable accommodations to qualified individuals with disabilities. If you need an accommodation to apply for a job in the U.S., please email the CGI U.S. Employment Compliance mailbox atUS_Employment_Compliance@cgi.com. You will need to reference the requisition number of the position in which you are interested. Your message will be routed to the appropriate recruiter who will assist you.Please note, this email address is only to be used for those individuals who need an accommodation to apply for a job. Emails for any other reason or those that do not include a requisition number will not be returned.

We make it easy to translate military experience and skills! Clickhere to be directed to our site that is dedicated to veterans and transitioning service members.

All CGI offers of employment in the U.S. are contingent upon the ability to successfully complete a background investigation. Background investigation components can vary dependent upon specific assignment and/or level of US government security clearance held.

CGI will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with CGI's legal duty to furnish information.",3.5,CGI,"Baltimore, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,44,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,MD,5417,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,1
35,35,Data Scientist,$95k-$118k,"Job Description


Oversight is a leading provider of cloud-based artificial intelligence solutions automating and analyzing financial payment transactions to identify fraud, non-compliant purchases, and wasteful spending. Oversight analyzes over $2 trillion in expenditures annually at Fortune 5000 companies and government agencies worldwide.

In this position as a Data Scientist, you will be working with a team of skilled and motivated data scientists and machine learning engineers designing and building AI solutions to expand our product line.

Responsibilities


Our team is at the fore front of building, operating and supporting business systems with machine learning at their core.

As a Data Scientist you will be incorporating machine learning into our products in order to transform how companies find and manage spend risk throughout their organization. You will collaborate with cross functional teams on complex data science problems and be responsible for solution design, data preparation, model building, and model management.

Ultimately, we’re looking for people who are excited by machine learning, data and technology, love to solve problems, constantly challenge themselves to provide the best user experience, can work well alone, have a wide range of skills and are able and willing to constantly learn.

Skills


Technical Skills/Requirements
3+ years real world experience in a data science or equivalent role
Extensive experience designing and maintaining a machine Learning pipeline – ETL, feature engineering, modeling, predicting, explaining, deploying and ongoing diagnostics
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Experience communicating complex models and designing
Strong experience with data processing and data analytics
Experience analyzing a wide variety of structured and unstructured data
Strong communication and data presentation skills
Experience in both R&D and commercial software product development environment is a plus
Technologies
Expertise in python, scikit-learn, and pandas
Experience with Deep learning frameworks (FastAI , Keras, PyTorch etc.) preferred
SQL
Linux

Interested and qualified candidates should submit a resume with salary requirements to recruiter@oversightsystems.com.

About Oversight

The world’s largest companies and government agencies trust Oversight to identify enterprise spend risk no matter where it resides in their organization. Oversight’s AI-powered platform drives financial transformation by reducing audit effort and eliminating data silos to monitor and analyze 100% of spend transactions with unparalleled accuracy. With full visibility into spend, Oversight customers find and prioritize employee-initiated and third-party spend risk that would otherwise go undetected by in-house processes. By identifying process breakdowns and making corrections early, Oversight helps optimize budgets, reduce out-of-policy spending by 70% while maximizing audit efficiency and eliminating cash leakage.

Oversight is an equal opportunity employer.

Job Applicant Privacy Notice",4.7,Oversight Systems,"Atlanta, GA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,17,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,GA,3081,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
37,37,Senior Risk Adjustment Data Engineer,$95k-$118k,"Overview


The Senior Risk Adjustment Data Engineer position supports, compiles and reports key information created, enhances and maintains for regulatory submissions, reporting, budget or financial models, or benchmarks for an Affordable Care Act or Medicare Risk Adjustment as prescribed by Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services, Department of Health, Health and Human Services or other State and Federal Regulatory Agencies. This position will function in conducting and manage outcome of various data points that may include, analyzing, reviewing, forecasting, and trending of data to support health plan Risk Adjustment Financial Strategy. The position will contribute to the development of business requirements, functional requirements, solution design, process flow and other related documentation for supporting the Regulatory Submissions. The position will take ownership of business processes and develop procedures to mitigate audit risks. The Senior Risk Adjustment Data Engineer position will ensure that the appropriate development standards are met.

Responsibilities
Enable Risk Adjustment Program Analytics by developing a data reconciliation model that compares submitted claims and return files to drive RAF improvement.
Correlate the differences in Risk Scores to Claims Acceptance Rate and empower the Encounter Data Submissions team to drive towards the desired outcomes.
Enable the Operational processes to address and resolve the rejected claims in a timely manner.
Develop Analytical Modeling to value the claims accepted versus claims rejected / outstanding.
Develop discipline around data management and data integrity to mitigate data (member diagnosis) leakage.
Develop processes to ingest the return files from the regulatory agencies for different lines of business.
Contribute to the development of business requirements, functional requirements, solution design, process flow and other related documentation for supporting the Regulatory Submissions.
Develop the Financial Accrual Model and Risk Transfer Model to correlate Member Comorbidity with Premium.
Support strategies for effective monitoring and auditing to identify risks, improve quality and reduce risk stemming from CMS RADV audits.
Assume ownership of business processes and develop procedures to mitigate audit risks.
Develop and implement programs that will enhance provider training and education of the HCC Risk Adjustment Process, Proper Medical Record Documentation and Diagnosis Accuracy.
Drive towards the integration of prospective programs into care management processes and promote the use of risk adjustment programs to help facilitate care management.
Provides guidance to junior-level analysts on data management, data analysis techniques, communication with non-technical stakeholders, project management, and healthcare industry knowledge.
Other duties as assigned
Corporate Compliance Responsibility - As an essential function, responsible for complying with Neighborhood’s Corporate Compliance Program, Standards of Business Conduct, applicable contracts, laws, rules and regulations, policies and procedures as it applies to individual job duties, the department, and the Company. This position must exercise due diligence to prevent, detect and report unlawful and/or unethical conduct by fellow co-workers, professional affiliates and/or agents
Qualifications


Required:
Bachelor Degree in Information Technology, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Business or Finance
5 years of progressive industry experience in data analysis and tools.
2-3 years’ experience in Health Plan Operations to include Risk Adjustment Activities
Experience and strong participation within a Risk Adjustment Team as the primary point of contact for Encounter Data Submissions Team.
Experience translating business and design requirements into technical requirements for Risk Adjustment as outlined by CMS or other State Regulatory Requirements.
Previous experience in risk adjustment activities in a Medicare, Affordable Care Act or provider organization to including submission of RAPs, and EDPS, EDGE Server files submission, responses and reconciliation per CMS and other State and Federal Guidelines.
Experience with business and technical requirements of all inbound and outbound data associated with a strong Risk Adjustment Business Unit.
Experience in critical analysis on information from multiple sources, identify issues and break down high-level information into detailed workable plan.
Serve as a resource between Risk Adjustment Team and all Operational Business Units to include Encounter Data Submissions, Finance and other departments that may need understanding of the overall Technical aspect of the Risk Adjustment submission and reporting process.
Knowledge of claims coding and payment methodology, associated with a Health Plan domain.
Advanced analytical problem solving skills.
Advanced skills with Microsoft Office (Project, Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook)
Demonstrated experience in Data Analysis using various analysis tools (SQL, SAS, etc.) and a strong understanding of database concepts.
Demonstrated experience in collaboration, teamwork, and cross-functional communication.
High level organizational and project management skills in order to effectively handle concurrent assignments.
Preferred:
Advanced Degree or Certifications in related field
Strong knowledge base of data points associated with the end to end process of plan payment.
Strong background in CPT, HCPCS, and related Hierarchical Condition Coding (HCC) Methodologies.
Core Company-Wide Competencies:
Communicate Effectively
Respect Others & Value Diversity
Analyze Issues & Solve Problems
Drive for Customer Success
Manage Performance, Productivity & Results
Develop Flexibility & Achieve Change
Job Specific Competencies:
Collaborate & Foster Teamwork
Create & Innovate
Exercise Sound Judgement & Decision Making
Achieve Professional Growth
FDR Oversight: N/A

Flexible Work Arrangement:
Yes
Telecommuting Arrangement:
Yes, 2 days a week
Travel Expectations:
Some travel locally between locations is required
Neighborhood Health Plan of Rhode Island is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status.

If you would like to contact us regarding the accessibility of our Website or need assistance completing the application process, please contact us at recruiting@nhpri.org",3.2,Neighborhood Health Plan of RI,"Smithfield, RI",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,26,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,RI,6568,1,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
39,39,Lead Data Scientist,$95k-$118k,"At the intersection of technology, science, business and sports, Strivr offers an end-to-end, VR-based immersive learning platform that changes the way people around the world train, learn and perform. With a mission to elevate performance through immersive experience, we are redefining an industry in real time and shaping the future of learning.

Strivr was founded in 2015 out of Stanford University’s Virtual Human Interaction Lab, using the football field as our proving ground. Since then, we have quickly expanded from the athlete to the enterprise, partnering with leading Fortune 500 companies including Walmart, Verizon and Fidelity to innovate and elevate employee development.

More than just content inside a headset, immersive learning provides realistic, high-impact experiences driven by L&D experts, instructional designers, data scientists, and immersive content specialists. Strivr offers the only end-to-end solution available today, bringing together the software, hardware, content and services needed to deliver effective training at scale.

Recognized by Fast Company’s Most Innovative Companies of 2019 and 2020, we take pride in our passion for innovation and we use that energy to fuel our work. Our culture thrives on teamwork, grit, transparency and impact, and celebrates every win. It’s an exciting time to join our fast growing team!

At Strivr, our Data Science team develops cutting-edge techniques to improve people’s performance in the real world based on their experiences in the virtual world. As a Data Scientist at Strivr, you will be at the forefront of defining approaches to Immersive Data Science and will be evaluating and optimizing user experience in the virtual world.

Your responsibilities:
Develop innovative approaches to measuring user behavior and evaluating performance in the virtual environment
Collaborate with partners such as Engineering and Solutions teams to instrument the data collection process and build ETL pipelines to obtain data required for your analyses
Implement approaches and communicate insights in a compelling narrative
Incorporate your research outcomes into the data product offering
Minimum Qualifications:
5+ years of industry experience as a Data Scientist
An advanced degree in a quantitative field (e.g Economics, Statistics, Sciences, Engineering)
Experience developing and implementing in-depth approaches, including statistical and econometric analyses and/or ML models
Experience building ETL pipelines
Proficiency with Python (or R), and SQL
Strong communication skills
Passion for using data to improve immersive experiences",4.5,Strivr,"Palo Alto, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,5,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,CA,2616,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
40,40,Data Scientist,$95k-$118k,"Data Scientist

Language: English

Location: Memphis, TN

Travel: <10>

Buckman is a privately held, global specialty chemical company with headquarters in Memphis, TN, USA, committed to safeguarding the environment, maintaining safety in the workplace, and promoting sustainable development. Buckman delivers exceptional service and innovative solutions to our customers globally in the pulp and paper, leather, and water treatment sectors to help boost productivity, reduce risk, improve product quality, and provide a measurable return on investment. Buckman is in the middle of a digital transformation of its businesses and focused on building the capabilities and tools in support of this.

Position Summary
Buckman is seeking an experienced Data Scientist to lead the development of a Data Science program at our Memphis facility. You will work closely with Buckman stakeholders to derive deep industry knowledge across paper, water, leather, and performance chemical industries. You will help develop a data strategy for the company including collection of the right data, creation of the data science project portfolio, partnering with external providers, and augmenting capabilities with additional internal hires. A large part of the job is communicating and developing relationship with key stakeholders and subject matter experts to tee up proofs of concept projects to demonstrate how data science can be used to solve old problems in unique and novel ways. You will not have a large internal team to rely on, at least initially, so individual expertise, breadth of data science knowledge, and ability to partner with external companies will be essential for success. In addition to the pure data science problems, you will be working closely with a multi-disciplinary team consisting of sensor scientists, software engineers, network engineers, mechanical/electrical engineers, and chemical engineers in the development, and deployment of IoT solutions. If you like working for an entrepreneurial company with a Sustainability mission and digital ambitions at the core of its strategy, Buckman is the place for you.

Competencies Needed for Success
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative field such as Data Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics, Engineering, or Computer Science
5+ years of relevant working experience in an analytical role involving data extraction, analysis, and visualization
Expertise in one or more programming languages R, Python, MATLAB, JMP, Minitab, Java, C++, Scala
Key libraries such as Sklearn, XgBoost, GLMNet, Dplyr, ggplot, Rshiny
Experience and knowledge of data mining algorithms including supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques areas such as Gradient Boosting, Decision Trees, Multivariate Regressions, Logistic regressions, Neural Network, Random Forest, Support Vector Machine, Naive Bayes, Time Series, Optimization
Microsoft IoT/data science toolkit: Azure Machine Learning, Datalake, Datalake analytics, Workbench, IoT Hub, Stream Analytics, CosmosDB, Time Series Insights, PowerBI
Data querying languages (e.g. SQL, Hadoop/Hive) and Preferred Qualifications
A demonstrated record of success with a verifiable portfolio of problems tackled
Preferred Qualifications
Master’s or PhD degree in a quantitative field such as Data Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics, Engineering, or Computer Science
Experience in the specialty chemicals sector or similar industry
Background in engineering, especially Chemical Engineering
Experience starting up a data science program
Experience working with global stakeholders
Experience working in a start-up environment, preferably in an IoT company
Knowledge in quantitative modeling tools and statistical analysis",3.5,Buckman,"Memphis, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,75,Company - Private,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,TN,3744,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
42,42,Data Scientist,$95k-$118k,"Publishers Clearing House (PCH), located in Jericho, NY is looking for a strongData Scientist who is passionate about using the power of algorithms to drive customer engagement and monetization. As a part of our Analytics team, you will be utilizing enormous volumes of data on customers, PCH products, channels, and developing advanced statistical algorithms to solve unique business problems. This is an exciting opportunity to work with big data to build data products backed by algorithms to delight customers and to drive significant advances in PCH Commerce (online and Direct Mail), Search, Online Gaming, and Digital Advertising business.

Responsibilities include but are not limited to:
Work comfortably with multi-terabyte, and billion+ rows data to extract insights and building predictive models to maximize profit
Utilize large-scale data mining and machine learning techniques to discover actionable patterns in the data
Perform rigorous model development, evaluation, design hypothesis tests, oversee test execution and result evaluation
Communicate complex analyses in a clear and actionable manner
Desired skills, experience& qualifications:
Masters degree required in Machine Learning, Applied Math, Computer Science, Economics, Statistics, or a related quantitative field
2 to 5 years’ experience in building predictive models using SAS Enterprise Guide (EG) , SAS Enterprise Miner or/and Python
Solid understanding of advanced statistical concepts, especially related to modelling is a must
Experience with publishers and or ad tech companies, experience in media, advertising and marketing vertical is a plus
Knowledge of programmatic advertising and digital acquisition. Experience in building optimization models /algorithms for media spends and maximize CPM
Experience working with enterprise-level digital analytics platform such as Google Analytics is a plus
Experience with cloud platforms AWS or Google Could Platforms (preferred)
Experience with ETL and building data pipelines and familiarity with distributed storage and big data computing technology is a plus
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Publishers Clearing House (PCH), headquartered in Jericho, NY, and with offices in NYC, Portland, ME and Boston, MA, is a leading direct-to-consumer company offering a broad range of products, digital entertainment services to consumers as well as customized solutions for advertisers. Our continued success in today’s new digital publishing environment is built on PCH’s unique, free-to-play, chance-to-win value proposition, which enables individually personalized offers based on the trusted first-party relationship we maintain with millions of consumers and is fueled by the excitement of the Publishers Clearing House brand.

Join our winning team and apply today!

This position is located in Jericho, NY. Candidates must reside in the NY tri-state area

PCH is an Equal Opportunity Employer",3.3,Publishers Clearing House,"Jericho, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,67,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,NY,2939,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
43,43,Data Scientist in Artificial Intelligence Early Career,$95k-$118k,"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311096

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing & Analytics

Group: Data Sciences & Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and deep learning research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to geo-spatial analytics, AI assurance, adversarial machine learning, human language technologies, computer vision, disaster response and recovery, health security, and other related fields.

The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as geospatial intelligence, natural language processing, few-shot learning, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery.
*Minimum Qualifications**
Bachelor's with 0-1 years of experience or a Master's degree with 0 years of experience is required.
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-20_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-10-19_",3.8,PNNL,"Seattle, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,55,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,WA,4798,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,1
44,44,Principal Data Scientist,$95k-$118k,"Principal Data Scientist, Oncology
The Machine Learning and AI team in AstraZenecas Oncology Data Science group is where we develop and apply sophisticated algorithms and techniques to solve the hardest problems in oncology drug discovery and development. The team uses their scientific, quantitative, and problem-solving skills to work on a broad range of challenges across the whole oncology portfolio, working collaboratively with other scientists across a range of disciplines to scope, define, and deliver projects that both advance the state of the art in data science and accelerate the delivery of innovative medicines to patients.

NOTE: This position can be filled in either GAITHERSBURG MARYLAND OR WALTHAM, MASSACHUSETTS

As a Principal Data Scientist, you will play a key role on the front line in this rapidly growing team working to extract insight from complex biomedical data. You will develop your leadership skills and apply and develop your expertise in rigorous quantitative data science to provide solutions to a variety of data science problems, researching, recommending and delivering novel methodologies to solve the problems that matter to the oncology pipeline.

Examples of projects the team works on include developing machine learning models for digital biomarkers, patient risk stratification for clinical trials, new algorithms for survival analysis, approaches to quantitatively analyse wearable data, linking of medical imaging data with omics and longitudinal outcomes to identify and/or validate new drug targets, and much more!

Day-to-Day:
Developing novel data science and machine learning solutions where off-the-shelf methodologies do not fit.
Leading small (2-3 person) data science projects of defined scope.
Coaching/mentoring junior data scientists and others to drive the development of data science as an AZ capability.
What You'll Need:

Essential:
MSc degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering)
Extensive hands-on experience applying data science tools in practice.
Practical software development skills in standard data science tools (such as R or python)
Extensive knowledge of mathematical modelling and statistical modelling techniques and drive to continue to learn and develop these skills
Outstanding communication, business analysis and consultancy
Desirable:
PhD degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering).
Experience within the pharmaceutical industry.
In-depth experience of working in a global organization with complex/geographical context",4.0,AstraZeneca,"Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,107,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,MD,2602,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
45,45,Data Scientist,$95k-$118k,"Company Description

MMIT is growing from the leading drug coverage data business into a comprehensive, integrated market access company serving pharmaceutical manufacturers, health insurers, PBMs and healthcare IT companies. Their suite of applications is designed to manage an ever-changing proprietary set of pharmacy and medical benefit information and to provide a structured view of complex market access information. By embedding their data and SaaS applications across healthcare, they help ensure transparency, consistency and informed prescription decisions across the MMIT Network. They partner with hundreds of payers and pharma manufacturers ensuring that their products continually capture and analyze coverage and restriction criteria for more than 98% covered lives.

Team Overview

The MMIT Product Management Team is charged with developing, growing and maintaining the MMIT product portfolio that smooth access to lifechanging therapies. This entails managing products through all phases of the product lifecycle, from concept to sunset. The product management team embraces a market-backed perspective, champions unmet client needs, and is committed to a highly accountable and collaborative Product Management approach.

Job Description

MMIT is seeking experienced Data Scientists to meaningful contributes to the growth and development of the MMIT product portfolio. Ideal candidates are comfortable working with large, complex data sets to help inform, simplify and actualize key product capabilities. They will have comfort collaborating with various stakeholders and navigating ambiguity with limited direction. They will dedicate themselves to understanding the MMIT product portfolio (both current capabilities and future product roadmaps) and key data dependencies to inform data models, architecture, and new product development.

To succeed in this role, you will apply your skillset to

· Inform, create and/or maintain master data hierarchy, attributes and structure.

· Bridge claims data and coverage data – Refine existing rules and create and continually improve new methods for accurately assigning pharmacy and medical claims volumes to MMIT controller entities

· Apply data science to the creation of short and long form geographic market and controller entity descriptive narratives (NLP / NLG)

· Translate product management strategy into actionable data science deliverables, guiding development of data models, business rules and other advanced analytical capabilities

· Excel at communicating across a broad set of cross-functional stakeholders.

· Work collaboratively with MMIT product and data teams to develop and/or commercialize analytics use cases that may include market access, coverage / lives, and RWE data

· Effectively partner with external organizations including clients and vendors to develop meaning and projectable analytics about trends in market access dynamics across payers, geographies, indications, drugs, etc.

· Identify and evaluate additional data sources that could be integrated in value enhancing ways.

· Build reports, dashboards and/or other analyses as needed and/or as specific initiatives arise.

· Support various commercial or commercialization efforts as needed.

· Take a leading role in developing data science as a discipline across product management, development and data operations.

Qualifications

Relevant Skills and Experiences

· Postgraduate degree or higher involving machine learning, statistics, or computer science

· Experience of statistical / machine learning projects in academia or commercial sector end to end with proven delivery capability including capturing requirements, designing analysis plans, interfacing with clients and report / manuscript writing

· Experience in applying Natural Language Processing and related AI capabilities.

· Experience working with large and complex healthcare datasets, preferably patient-level longitudinal data and experience with studies of treatment effectiveness/outcomes, disease progression, adherence, healthcare utilization, patient journey, sales targeting, prescription/procedure volumes/shares, provider networks and prescribing/treatment patterns, etc

· Strong related programming skills including experience with good coding practices and a thorough understanding of the data science package landscape. Familiarity with Tableau and PowerBI a plus.

· Familiarity with agile software development practices

· Excellent written and spoken communication skills, including ability to present technical concepts to lay audiences, write analysis plans for projects, contribute to proposals / grant applications, pitch ideas effectively and persuasively to clients / internal stakeholders, etc.

· Demonstrated ability to work both collaboratively to solve complex problems and individually to research/advance areas of interest and exploration

· Proven ability to develop meaningful/valuable analytic insights from multiple data sources and support value through commercialization

Preferred candidates may also have

· Experience supporting or launching Data and Analytics or SaaS-based enterprise product

· Experience in managed markets and pharma market access ecosystem

· Experience in the commercial health insurance industry

· Knowledge of payer marketing, drug development lifecycle and drug launch process

Additional Information

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.

Position will be based in Livingston NJ or Yardley PA

(highly qualified remote applicants will be considered)

Travel Requirements:

Approximately <10>",3.8,MMIT,"Yardley, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,26,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,PA,5630,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
46,46,Data Engineer,$95k-$118k,"Cadent powers the evolution of TV brand advertising. We provide marketers, agencies, operators, and media owners with data-driven solutions for buying and selling TV advertising. By connecting brands with opportunities across national inventory sourcescable, broadcast, and digital mediaour technology improves efficiencies and boosts the results of linear, addressable, and cross-screen campaigns.

Right now we are looking for a self motivated Data Engineer to join the team responsible for ingesting, processing, and distributing the data used by Cadent's data-driven business systems. This position will work directly with our Data Science, Business Intelligence and Software Development teams to produce these systems.

About you:
You have a strong aptitude for querying data sets from heterogeneous sourcesboth structured and unstructured
You have commercial experience with both distributed systems, e.g. Hadoop and Spark, cloud ecosystems like AWS and Azure, and traditional relational database systems
You have a conceptual understanding of advanced numerical programming and will be able to verbalize the story of the data in business terms.
You can easily work with a diverse team to achieve a common goal
What you will do:
Process unstructured data into a form suitable for data consumers
Create data pipelines from various data sources through the different data lake zones to make data available for query and reporting
Collaborate with data scientists on data selection, preprocessing and formatting for analysis
Collaborate with software development teams to productize analytical tool prototypes
Collaborate with business stakeholders and third parties to improve external data sources
Support business decisions with ad hoc data analysis as needed
Actively participate in architecting Cadent's Data Lake solution.
Your education and experience:
B.S. or higher in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or related field
3 years of commercial development of efficient and robust ETL and data processing workflows
2 years of commercial experience with AWS or Azure ecosystem and Spark programming
Experience with AWS S3, Glue, Athena, Lambda, EC2 desirable
3 years of commercial experience programming in a functional programming language such as Scala and/or an object-oriented programming language such as Java/C#/Python
Commercial experience with relational database management systems and SQL queries
Demonstrable analytical and quantitative numerical programming experience
Good presentation and communication skillsvisual and verbal
Experience working in both Unix/Linux and Windows environments is a plus.


If the leading edge of media technology is the place you want to be, please contact us today and let's start the conversation!

/CADENT/ is an EOE M/F/D/V. We do not work with 3rd Party Staffing Agencies.

]]>",3.0,Cadent,"Philadelphia, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,other_industries,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,PA,2840,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
47,47,Data Scientist,$95k-$118k,"About Known

Known is a modern marketing company engineered for the unprecedented challenges and opportunities facing marketers today. Known pairs PhD data scientists with award-winning creatives, expert research teams and strategists. Known is anchored by two decades of groundbreaking market research and data science capabilities, which uniquely empower our marketing strategy and acclaimed creative groups, who produce some of the most innovative, cutting-edge creative work in culture. The result? Marketing that is predisposed to succeed and be persistently optimized, directly impacting clients' bottom lines. Our clients span the leading brands in finance, technology, media, CPG, real estate and many other categories. Known has over 200 employees in 6 US cities including Seattle, San Francisco, Los Angeles, Austin, Boston and New York. Our teams have won multiple Emmys, Clios, Effies, Cannes Lions Awards and ProMax Agency of the Year three times.

Known's Media Science team uses advanced analytics, machine learning, statistics, and algorithms to plan and optimize advertising dollars. We partner with our clients to translate their business goals into meaningful metrics, and buy media across all channels to drive those target outcomes. We are looking for a Data Scientist to join the team and work alongside other data analysts, data scientists, and software engineers.

The ideal candidate will have:
Fluency in Spanish
A Masters or PhD from a well-regarded college or university. STEM degrees are preferred.
3+ years of hands-on experience doing quantitative analysis, modeling, optimization and/or statistics. Experience utilizing Python (or similar language) and SQL.
Superb communication and presentation skills
A desire to work on advertising challenges that require flexibility in approach -- everything from on-the-fly analytics to statistics, big data, machine learning, and mathematical algorithms
An ability to translate business challenges into quantitative problems, and solve them by whatever means necessary, which may not always be strict machine learning
A willingness to learn foundational knowledge and skills rapidly
An ability to think strategically, analytically, and proactively about diverse business problems
A commitment to managing the quality & accuracy of analytics, ensuring high standards with your and others' work
Experience in advertising or advertising technology is a plus
Experience multi-tasking in a fast-paced environment is a plus
Experience working directly with clients is a plus
Experience working on a tech team is a plus, with experience in cloud technologies, version control, etc.
Your responsibilities would include:
Driving performance for our media campaigns and amazing our clients
Day-to-day management of advertising spend you're responsible for, including ideation on quantitative approaches for driving value, monitoring metrics, and troubleshooting issues
Developing new techniques (e.g., ML models, optimization algorithms, and automation) to optimize KPIs and improve Known IP
Building analyses, stories and slides for client reports
Interfacing directly with clients to communicate results
Productionalizing workflows and contributing your code to our Known repos
Operating existing software infrastructure to traffic, evaluate performance, and analyze media
#LI-AM1",3.0,Known,"New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,16,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,NY,3344,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,1,0,1
48,48,Data Scientist,$95k-$118k,"Research and Sciences

Qualifications:

Are you interested in expanding your career through experience and exposure, all while supporting a mission that seeks to ensure the security of our nation and its allies? If so, then Northrop Grumman is the place for you. As a leading global security company, we provide innovative systems, products and solutions to our customers worldwide. We are comprised of diverse professionals that bring different perspectives and ideas, understanding that the more experiences we bring to our work the more innovative we can be. As we continue to build our workforce we look for people that exemplify our core values, leadership characteristics, and approach to innovation.

We are seeking a Data Scientist to support our customer in Raleigh, NC. This is an on-site position with no telecommute possibilities. In today's economy, our customer must respond faster than ever before; and we have to base that response on insights from data analytics modeling instead of ""years of experience"" or historical reporting. The Data Science and Exploration group will provide the organization with future-oriented analyses that can be used to help drive changes and improvements in business practices. By employing analytical techniques, applied to research data, which go beyond simply describing the data we will be able to explore the hidden relationships and patterns within the data.

The selected candidate will have experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods and tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms, and creating/running simulations. The ideal candidate will be adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. They must have an ability to drive business results with their data-based insights. The candidate should be highly analytical with a knack for analysis, math and statistics, with demonstrated critical thinking and problem-solving skills. Passion for machine-learning and research are also highly coveted.

Roles and Responsibilities include but not limited to:
• Data exploration - Explore large data sets using a variety of tools to build model ready data products and provide any requirements to ETL developers to productize.
• Model Building - Description: Leverage analytics tools like SAS to build complex statistical and machine learning models to build predictive and prescriptive strategies.
• Adhoc Insight Generation - Description: Quickly explore data and apply descriptive statistics to provide rapid insights for the business customer.
• Create data mining architectures/models/protocols, statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies to identify trends in large data sets. Analysis may have many applications such as to address a business issue or provide a competitive advantage for the organization
• Utilizes strong statistical and data visualization skills
• Uses and applies technical principles, theories, and concepts
• Demonstrates the skill and ability to perform professional tasks
• Develops recommended solutions to technical problems as assigned
• Submits work for review of soundness of technical judgment, quality, and accuracy
• Contributes to the completion of assigned technical tasks",3.8,Northrop Grumman,"Raleigh, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,81,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,NC,3334,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
49,49,Senior Data Scientist,$95k-$118k,"The world's first customer platform helping internet businesses accelerate growth


Intercom builds a suite of products that provide modern internet businesses a new and better way to acquire, engage and retain customers. Today more than 25,000 businesses, including New Relic, Sotheby's, and Shopify, use Intercom to connect with a billion unique people worldwide.

Intercom is a deeply creative company with the confidence to believe it can fundamentally change the future of internet business. Our people are incredibly ambitious, yet humble. Warm, accepting, and positive. Whether you build, market, sell, or support product, we want you to make your mark with us.

What's the opportunity?


At Intercom, Analytics & Data Science teammates partner with every function in the organization in order to help teams make data-informed decisions and take data-informed actions. We're highly quantitative individuals who love to turn data into insights and communicate our findings fearlessly, and we're looking for people with a similar mindset who are constantly curious, driven to understand our business better, and committed to creating value.

In this role, you will partner with go-to-market teams across Intercom (including Marketing, BizOps, Finance, Growth R&D, and Sales) to measure new initiatives and make data-driven recommendations around go-to-market strategy. In addition to being experienced analytically, we're looking for someone who can proactively surface recommendations and insights, who's comfortable prioritizing work across multiple stakeholders, and who can work across the analytics and data stack in order to solve problems. If this sounds like you, we would love to hear from you!

To give you a sense of some specific projects you might work on, here are a few of our recent workstreams: understanding how users respond to new pricing & packaging, understanding and modeling drivers of expansion, analyzing the customer signup experience, measuring the performance of paid advertising campaigns, prioritizing the leads our sales team should reach out to, and many more.

What will I be doing?
Evaluating the performance of our go-to-market strategies and initiatives by analyzing customer funnels and metrics (new business, retention, CAC, LTV, churn, etc.)
Partnering with go-to-market teams at Intercom to help them better understand their functional areas, build understanding and use of our data, and set a high bar for analytics across the organization
Building data science models to accelerate the business by providing deeper insights into prospect and customer behaviors
Creating dashboards that allow internal consumers to gain insight into the performance of their functional areas
Constructing reusable data pipelines for company-wide use
Monitoring the state of the business on a regular basis and generating data-driven hypotheses and action items in order drive business impact
What skills do I need?
4+ years of work experience in analytics/data science or a directly related field – some of which should be in a technology business
A proven track record of initiating and delivering actionable analyses/recommendations in order to drive business impact
An understanding of SaaS business models and key metrics
Some experience building data science models to provide deeper insights
Excellent communication skills (technical and non-technical) and comfort working with high-level stakeholders
Ability to work autonomously in a dynamic environment
Excellent SQL skills, fluency with BI/visualization tools, and deep knowledge of Excel, R, Python, or other analysis tools
Strong critical reasoning skills, including understanding of common pitfalls of data analysis
Benefits


We are a well-treated bunch, with awesome benefits! If there's something important to you that's not on this list, talk to us! :)
Competitive salary and meaningful equity
Catered lunch every weekday, plus a variety of snack foods and a fully stocked kitchen
Fully funded comprehensive medical, dental, and vision coverage
Open vacation policy and 10 corporate holidays
Paid Parental Leave Program
401k plan
In-office bicycle storage
Fun events for Intercomrades, friends, and family!
*Proof of eligibility to work in the United States is required.

Intercom values diversity and is committed to a policy of Equal Employment Opportunity. Intercom will not discriminate against an applicant or employee on the basis of race, color, religion, creed, national origin, ancestry, sex, gender, age, physical or mental disability, veteran or military status, genetic information, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, marital status, or any other legally recognized protected basis under federal, state, or local law.",3.7,Intercom,"San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,9,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,CA,4747,1,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
50,50,Senior Data Engineer,$95k-$118k,"Brain Corp is a San Diego-based AI company creating transformative core technology for the robotics industry. Our diverse engineering teams in Software, Hardware Design, and Embedded Systems are creating comprehensive solutions to support the builders of today's autonomous machines in successfully producing, deploying, and supporting commercial robots across industries and applications. Brain Corp is funded by the SoftBank Vision Fund and Qualcomm Ventures. For more information please visit: https://www.braincorp.com/

Position Summary:

As a member of the Software Engineering team, the Senior Data Engineer owns the definition, execution, and delivery of technical architecture for Brain Corporation's Product Analytics team. Your work will improve the quality, reliability, accuracy, and consistency of our data. You will help build project-specific data pipelines and validation tools. You will have a hands-on role with product specialists and be responsible for working with them to understand data requirements and then implement those requirements in software.

Duties and Responsibilities:
Fully own critical portions of Brain Corporation's product analytics data model.
Collaborate with stakeholders to understand needs, model tables using data warehouse best practices, and develop data pipelines to ensure the timely delivery of high-quality data.
Work with technical and product stakeholders to understand data-oriented project requirements.
Write code that is understandable, simple, and easy to maintain.
Design, implement and ensure the accuracy of validation and related services for data models.
Think and work agile, including automated testing, continuous integration and deployment.
Manage numerous requests concurrently and strategically, prioritizing when necessary.
What you need:
Bachelor's in Computer Science or other related field.
5-8+ years software development experience.
Passionate about data quality and delivering effective data to impact the business.
Experience with sourcing and modeling data from application REST-like APIs.
MPP/Cloud data warehouse solutions (Snowflake, etc).
Proficiency in SQL, experience writing ETLs.
Proficiency in JavaScript/Node.js, Python, or willingness to translate experience in equivalent language.
Things that make a difference:
Master's in Computer Science or other related field.
Experience with Kafka, AMQP or other message bus.
OpenAPI/Swagger.
Express.js, NestJS.
SAML, OKTA.
Azure experience is a plus.
Being comfortable outside of your comfort zone - explore new tech, make your own tool, or find a new way to address an old problem.
Physical Demands:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Essential functions may require maintaining the physical condition necessary for sitting, walking or standing for periods of time; operating a computer and keyboard; talk and hear at normal room levels; using hands to finger, grasp, and feel; repetitive motion; close visual acuity to prepare and analyze data and figures; transcribing; viewing a computer terminal; extensive reading; lift, push, carry, or pull up to 10 pounds.

Work Environment:

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. The noise level in the work environment is usually quiet to moderate. Employee is exposed to the typical office environment with computers, printers and telephones.",3.5,Brain Corp,"San Diego, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,11,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,CA,3677,1,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
51,51,(Sr.) Data Scientist -,$95k-$118k,"Thursday, June 11, 2020

Merrick Bank is a top-25 credit card issuer and merchant acquirer in the VISA/MasterCard networks, and a major recreational vehicle lender.
The Bank is a Utah Financial Institution and a member of the FDIC.

At Merrick Bank, we specialize in credit programs that assist people looking to build or rebuild their credit. We are FDIC insured and recognized as a top-20 issuer of Visa® cards. In total, we proudly serve over 2.4 million cardholders and have extended over $5.3 billion in credit.

Our Mission is to make a positive difference in the lives of our customers, our employees, and our community. We work hard to create a work environment that empowers our associates to grow, learn, and reach their potential.

This position is a member (or, a senior member, depending upon qualifications) of the Data Science and Modeling team, and will support and work with other members of the team to produce the models, reports, and analysis as required for the bank. Data science, machine learning and statistical programming are the core competencies of the position, but in addition, the applicant should work well with others, have a desire to learn, be self-motivated, and have excellent communication and presentation skills.

REQUIRED SKILLS, ABILITIES, KNOWLEDGE, AND EXPERIENCE:
Master's degree in a relevant quantitative field, or a bachelor’s degree with a significant amount of relevant work experience.
Firm knowledge of statistical theory, data science, or machine learning algorithms is a requirement.
Expertise with R or Python is required.
Experience with any of the following computer languages is also desirable: CUDA, FORTRAN or C/C++, SAS, SQL, Unix shell scripting, or LaTeX.
Experience with HPC (High Performance Computing), or Parallel Computing would be a plus. Experience with SLURM would be outstanding.
Experience in the banking industry, specifically in credit cards, is not necessary, but would be desirable.


PRIMARY DUTIES:
Statistical programming, model development and implementation.
Communicating results, both verbally and in writing.
Work both individually and in a collaborative manner with a team.
Designing, validating, and improving data driven decision making processes and strategies.
Building key metrics and modeling reports for communication with executives.
Compliant with Laws & Regulations.

What’s in it for you:

Competitive salary (DOE)

Benefits package -Medical, Dental and Vision (plus much more)

401(k) Plan with Company Match

Short & Long Term Disability

Group Life and AD&D Insurance

Paid Vacation, Holidays, and Personal Days

Employee Events, including Employee Appreciation Day, Holiday Party, etc.

Tuition Reimbursement Program
Candidates must have unrestricted authority to work in the
United States without sponsorship.

Merrick Bank is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants
without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability,
veteran status, and other legally protected characteristic. The EEO is the
Law poster is available here: http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/poster.cfm

Please go to our website www.merrickbank.com to apply and learn more about our company

We are an equal opportunity employer. Merrick Bank will do a thorough background check for all hires. This includes a review of your personal credit history, drug testing, background check, and employment/personal references. A good credit history is important.

Other details
Job Family
Account Acquisition & Data Science
Pay Type
Salary",3.5,Merrick Bank,Utah,-1,201 to 500 Employees,23,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,UT,3542,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
54,54,Data Engineer,$95k-$118k,"Group O is seeking a strong candidate with advanced analytics experience to fill an exciting Data Engineer role for an AI partner to Fortune 500 companies. In this role, you will be a valuable in managing large amounts of data and implement loading disparate data sets while managing the technical communication between the team and client.

Implementation including loading from disparate data sets, preprocessing using Hive and Pig.
Manage the technical communication between the team and client
Work with big data team to deliver cutting edge solutions

2-5 years of demonstrable experience designing technological solutions to complex data problems, developing & testing modular, reusable, efficient and scalable code to implement those solutions.
Ideally, this would include work on the following technologies:
Proficiency in at least one of the following: R, C++ or Python (preferred). Scala knowledge a strong advantage.
Strong understanding and experience in distributed computing frameworks, particularly Apache Hadoop 2.0 (YARN; MR & HDFS) and associated technologies -- one or more of Hive, Sqoop, Avro, Flume, Oozie, Zookeeper, etc..
Hands-on experience with Apache Spark and its components (Streaming, SQL, MLLib) is a strong advantage.
Operating knowledge of cloud computing platforms (AWS, especially EMR, EC2, S3, SWF services and the AWS CLI)
Experience working within a Linux computing environment, and use of command line tools including knowledge of shell/Python scripting for automating common tasks
In addition, the ideal candidate would have great problem-solving skills, and the ability & confidence to hack their way out of tight corners.
Education:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related technical degree",3.1,Group O,"San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,46,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,TX,1740,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
55,55,Senior Data Scientist,$95k-$118k,"Summary

We’re looking for a senior data scientist to drive our data science and analytics group forward! You’ll be joining a group of curious, smart, technically minded yet business savvy data scientists and analysts looking to make a difference to the company by designing and building out our data decisioning capabilities from the ground up!

As a senior data scientist, you’ll work collaboratively with our business, operations, analytics, and IT teams. You’ll be responsible for conceptualizing, designing and building out decision making products for our business in the spaces of marketing / lead gen, business operations, and customer retention.
Our ideal candidate is excited to join our fast-paced culture and is excited to contribute to our growing data science practice!

What we do:
We achieve competitive advantage through data-driven marketing and full management of the customer experience. We’re constantly refining our technology and our strategies, that’s why we’re the industry leader in delivering the best results to the top insurance brands in America.

That’s not just lip service either, we’re consistently awarded partner of the year from brands like AFLAC, Humana, and more. Our work has also been featured on The Dr. Oz Show, Forbes, and Vox -- to name a few.

What you’ll do:
Find new and improved ways for us to use data in our products, operations, and business strategies
Lead new projects and initiatives starting from understanding business to carrying out projects and presenting to stakeholders.
Design and execute data products in marketing, business operations, and customer retention spaces
Act as a subject matter expert with all things data
Work to build out the data science team as we grow

What we’re looking for:
We want people who fit within our Be Real culture. We want a diversity of programmers and writers and designers and data scientists and strategists and more. We’re made up of introverts and extroverts, suits and rebels, corporate types and anti-corporate types. We’re an environment where every person feels their full potential is only limited by their ability to conceive of it and make it happen. Our company grew from entrepreneurial roots but has big company resources to get amazing things done.
5 years of experience in a data science role, building predictive algorithms and data products ideally related to marketing, business operations, or customer retention
Ability to execute projects from problem formulation to influencing stakeholders.
Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms such as decision forests, logistic regression, k-means clustering, etc.
Ability to communicate findings clearly and deep understanding of your current business
Proficiency with Python, SQL, Excel, and data visualization tools (Tableau, Power BI, etc.)
Experience with big data platform (i.e. Hadoop)
Intensely curious – always asking questions and not being OK with the status quo. Obsessed with making things better and more efficient.
A lifelong learner that is excited to learn new data science technologies and apply those to technologies to our business
Ability to be objective and follow the facts, cut through noise and create a story with data.
Strong organizational skills including time and project management
Thrives in a fast-paced environment that is constantly changing
BS/MS in a quantitative field (Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, etc.)

EOE, including disability/vets",3.5,TRANZACT,"Fort Lee, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,31,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,NJ,3489,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
57,57,Data Engineer,$95k-$118k,"Data Engineer Northern, VA

Data Engineer

NuWave Solutions is seeking Data Engineers to design and implement distributed, cloud-native data pipelines, storage systems, and query support. These capabilities will support next-generation defense and intelligence operations with a focus on enabling machine learning and automation. Teams will be working in an Agile development environment and expected to identify and mitigate risks and bottlenecks associated with big data environments. Other responsibilities include:
Architect, design, and implement updates and enhancements to data repositories and indices to support data ingest, enrichment, analysis, visualization, and dissemination
Perform database engineering and management activities associated with designing, developing, maintaining, and enhancing Big Data analytic systems using an Agile DevSecOps model
Integrate data from multiple sources in batches and real-time
Review, design, and develop data quality management processes and automated procedures intended to produce high levels of data integrity
Research and recommend solutions to complex problems
Oversee code reviews and delivering feedback regarding designs/code
Perform research and development and provide technical support to identify and integrate new and emerging technologies into the data environment
Design and implement storage and indexing strategies to provide efficient storage and retrieval to support visualizations such as graph-based and geospatial indices
Support design and development of data access APIs that allow enterprise access (as appropriate) to data
Develop or provide input to engineering artifacts associated with the data repositories
Requirements
Active Top-Secret clearance required
Minimum (positions are available at multiple levels of seniority) of a bachelor’s degree and 3 years of experience in a science or engineering field
Experience with SQL databases
Data transformation experience with scripting (Python, Java, Perl, PL/SQL) or platforms such as Spark, Talend, Knime, or Pentaho
Strong problem-solving skills
Good written and oral communications skills
Preferred Skills
Familiarity with no-SQL databases like Neo4j, ElasticSearch, or Cassandra
Familiarity with SQL query engines, preferably PrestoDB or SparkSQL
Familiarity with distributed platforms (i.e. HBase, Kafka, Spark, NiFi) and the cloud (i.e. AWS, GCP, Azure), preferably Amazon Web Services
Experience integrating open API based data access and processing
DOD8570 IAT Level 1 or 2 certified (A+, Security+, etc. certification)
About NuWave Solutions

NuWave Solutions is a recognized leader in providing anticipatory intelligence and advanced data analytics to the defense, intelligence, and private sectors for over 20 years. Leveraging artificial intelligence and machine learning methodologies, NuWave Solutions streamlines the Data-to-Decision lifecycle faster than traditional practices allowing clients to take action with confidence.

For more information on how NuWave Solutions supports its clients and builds upon success, please visit https://www.nuwavesolutions.com

Position Details

Locations of Positions: Reston, McLean, or Herndon, VA; Joint Base Andrews-Bolling, DC; Suitland, MD

Travel Required (CONUS/OCONUS): CONUS

If Travel is required, how much? 5%

Work Schedule: Day Shift

Authorization to work in US is required

8570 Requirements: N/A

NuWave Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Tagged as: Data Engineer",4.4,NuWave Solutions,Virginia,-1,51 to 200 Employees,21,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,VA,3490,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
58,58,Data Scientist,$95k-$118k,"At Varen, our performance is measured by the success of our clients, and our reputation for service, superior quality, objectivity, integrity and results. Our reputation is everything to us as we are committed to being a trusted advisor to our nations decision makers in a day in age that demands acute attention to detail in a fast-paced environment. Varen is seeking to add the sharpest technical professionals who share our passion for ensuring the mission success of our customers at all times.

We are looking for Data Scientists with various years of experience. In these positions you will work closely with the client to review and respond to data science requirements. These positions will involve analyzing both structured and unstructured data using data analytics, natural language processing, and artificial intelligence/machine learning techniques.

Experience with training and optimizing machine learning models and coordinating with data engineering components to deploy trained models to work on production data at scale is desired.

EDUCATION:


BS degree in technical field and 3+ years of experience

CLEARANCE REQUIREMENT:

TS/SCI w/poly clearance
Varen Technologies, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer and applicants receive lawful consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, gender, age, national origin, disability, or veteran status.",4.2,Varen Technologies,"McLean, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,15,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,VA,1388,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
59,59,Senior Data Scientist,$95k-$118k,"Klaviyo is looking for Senior Data Scientists to join our team which is still in its early days. You'll have a big impact on our direction and how we operate. You'll be central to upfront research and shipping products that help our customers learn and grow from their data.

The ideal candidate has a background in data science, statistics and machine learning and has done work ranging from exploratory analysis to training and deploying models. We use a wide variety of data mining and machine learning algorithms. The right candidate will have both a solid fundamental understanding and deep practical experience with at least a few modeling and machine learning techniques.

You should have experience building models that are used by people to make better decisions. We're focused on shipping early and often. We prefer iterative solutions that are incrementally better to the perfect solution.

How you will make a difference:


Analyze large data sets (we're collecting billions of individual actions every month).
Build models and ship products that enable businesses to grow faster and communicate with their customers.
Democratize and open up that technology to everyone (Our background as a team is building these models for the Fortune 50).
Match the right assumptions and models to the right problem.
Measure and know what impact your models had on the decisions people made -- e.g. did they outperform the previous best model or a human decision maker?

Who You Are:


Bachelor's or advanced degree in statistics, applied mathematics, computer science or other relevant quantitative discipline, or equivalent industry experience.
Have worked in a data science role for 5+ years professionally or academically and can talk about your projects and the techniques you used.
Have a strong fundamental understanding and deep experience with at least a few machine learning algorithms (e.g. regressions, decision trees, k-means clustering, neural networks).
Understand Bayesian modeling techniques.
Are capable of analyzing data and making rigorous statements about what can or cannot be concluded.
Have experience designing and implementing model performance/validation assessments.
Have a background in statistics and understand different distributions and the conditions under which they're valid.
Know how code and have used data science tools and packages.
Have demonstrated a measurable impact based on the models you've created. It's not always easy getting a model correct and we love talking about places we got stuck and working as a team to think through ideas that could unblock us.
Have a desire to ship features powered by data science (in other words, you're excited by both upfront research and actually getting models into production at cloud scale).

Get to know Klaviyo

Klaviyo is the world's leading owned marketing platform known for accelerating revenue for online businesses using the channels they own like email, web, and mobile. Enabling companies to leverage these owned marketing channels, Klaviyo makes it easy to store, access, analyze and use transactional and behavioral data to power highly-targeted customer and prospect communications. And unlike other marketing platforms, Klaviyo doesn't force companies to compromise between advanced functionality or ease of use - so companies of all sizes are able to maximize their sales quickly. That's why over 45,000+ innovative companies like Unilever, Custom Ink and Eventbrite sell more with Klaviyo.",4.8,Klaviyo,"Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,8,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,MA,3490,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
61,61,Data Scientist,$95k-$118k,"Zynga is a leading developer of the world’s most popular social games that are played by people around the world every single day. To-date, more than 1 billion people have played our games across Web and mobile, including Words With Friends, FarmVille, Zynga Poker, Merge Dragons, Empires & Puzzles, Hit it Rich! Slots and CSR.

Zynga’s Marketing Data Science and Analytics team uses our outstanding and expansive data to deliver fundamental insights on who our audience is, how they engage with our games, and what are the best ways to acquire them. We strive for a better understanding of our players which translates into challenges and features that delight them.

Here’s where you would come in: identify and formalize problems related to campaign optimization. Design and develop systems and services to optimize campaigns at scale. Be innovative, be creative, use every bit of that key commodity – data. Millions of people play Zynga games every day, so our data is tremendously rich, and we have a lot of it!

We will rely on you to communicate your findings to your peers – both technical and non-technical. Your solutions to difficult problems will need to be demonstrably impactful, visual and maintainable. You will collaborate with engineering teams to build proof-of-concept and MVPs of campaign bidders and optimizers. You will collaborate with User Acquisition Managers, Product Managers, and Engineers to deliver business impact.

Responsibilities:
Design and implement scalable systems and models to experiment with campaigns and creatives across channels and acquire users at scale
Work with large amounts of data to find and realize opportunities to acquire and re-target users profitably delivering unambiguous business metric impact
Craft effective campaign strategies to acquire users across a multitude of user acquisition channels
Drive and empower user acquisition team to make quantitatively informed, evidence based decisions - through custom visualizations, and ETLs to augment user data
Design, test, verify and implement machine learning models with Zynga’s games that impact millions of users. Models may include but not limited to LTV modelling, campaign bid recommendations, budget allocation, clustering/segmentation, forecasting, fraud detection, and / or reinforcement learning
Build prototypes and MVPs of services and applications that improve effectiveness of campaigns, creatives, ad networks and/or user segments.
Required Skills and Experience:
B.S. or B.A. in Math, Statistics, Comp Sci, Engineering, or other quantitative field required; Masters, MBA or PhD preferred
5+ years of relevant work experience in data science or analytics role in a Marketing Analytics or a User Acquisition Analytics Team
Familiar with mobile performance marketing and/or user acquisition landscape
Strong experience in SQL;
Proficient in Python; Proven fundamental programming skills (algorithms, data structures, OOP, OS, Networking, AWS Cloud); Ability to design distributed systems
Ability to build and maintain software services and systems at scale; experience in deploying services in at least one cloud provider (AWS, Google Cloud or Azure)
Proven experience with some of the following: machine learning, predictive modeling, deep learning
Experience in analyzing large datasets, preferably in a Hadoop or Spark environment, and deploying production ready systems at scale
Strong written and oral communication skills
Strong passion for gaming and performance marketing!
Zynga is an equal opportunity employer. We are proud of our broad community; we do not discriminate on the basis of race, sex, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, medical condition, disability, or any other class or characteristic protected by applicable law. We welcome job-seekers, players, employees, and partners from all backgrounds. Join us!

We will consider all qualified job-seekers with criminal histories in a manner consistent with applicable law.

Zynga is committed to providing reasonable accommodation to applicants with disabilities. If you need an accommodation during the interview process, please let us know.",4.1,Zynga,"Austin, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,13,Company - Public,Video Games,Media,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,TX,4195,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,1,0,1
62,62,"Real World Science, Data Scientist",$95k-$118k,"Title: Real World Science, Data Scientist
Location: Gaithersburg, MD

At AstraZeneca we turn ideas into life changing medicines. Working here means being entrepreneurial, thinking big and working together to make the impossible a reality.
Were focused on the potential of science to address the unmet needs of patients around the world. We commit to those areas where we think we can really change the course of medicine and bring big new ideas to life.

Job Description

The Real World Science & Digital team is a growing group within AstraZenecas global Evidence function which is driving the scientific use of Real World Data to accelerate the way patients access innovative medicines. The Real World Science and Digital team comprises of a core quantitative group, Digital Platform leads and Data Strategy experts providing AstraZeneca with an enterprise hub for Real World Science. AstraZeneca has a rich history in Real World Evidence, having developed a coherent strategy to develop and internalize data assets the group is now amplifying those investments through a dedicated Real World Data Science capability. Real World Data Scientists who are successful in this role will work on challenging problems, using innovative approaches to accelerate the delivery of Real World Insights and Evidence for key internal and external stakeholders.

The ideal candidate for this role will bring a proven track record of delivering value through the leverage of routinely collected data from healthcare settings to provide health analytics and insights in a range of contexts including Public Health, Pharmaceutical Research and Development and Commercial/ Payer.

They will collaborate with colleagues in Epidemiology, Statistics and Payer, giving scientific and technical guidance on study design, RW data selection and best practice in RW data utilization.

In addition, they will assist in advancing and shaping AZs Real World Science data strategy through the due diligence on new data providers/vendors, informatics support for data acquisitions in a range of Therapeutic Areas.

The role will promote best practice in Real World Data Science across multiple domains, and/or stakeholder groups.

Typical Accountabilities
Collaborate with Payer and Epidemiology teams to maximise the value derived from large observational research data
Deliver analyses of data from EMR, claims and primary observational data required by TA RWE strategies
Support the development of IVS strategies and selection of optimised contact models for prioritised markets through analysis of RWD
Provide scientific guidance on the application of Real World Evidence and observational research data to address issues across the Oncology and Biopharmaceuticals business units
Provide technical input, options and directions to strategic decisions made by AZ observational study teams on study design, data partner selection and best practices in RWE data utilization
Support technical teams to provide access to analytical tools and develop visual analytics to enable self-serving applications for end customers
Provide clear technical input, options, and direction to strategic decisions on RWE platform and capability build
Provide support for strategic decisions on AZ Medical Evidence and Observational Research external collaborations in the US and other markets
Assist in building a capability that becomes a source of sustained competitive advantage for AZ in identifying, acquiring, integrating and mining diverse RW data from multiple geographic and healthcare system sources to support evidence generation and real-world studies
Evaluate and assess strengths and weaknesses of external RW data sources, and potential partners for advancing the data strategy for specific therapeutic areas
Maintain a strong insight into the capabilities of potential external partners in RWE, especially for US and emerging markets.
Education, Qualifications, Skills and Experience

Key Relationships to reach solutions

Internal (to AZ or team)
Payer Evidence & Planning
Epidemiologists
Observational Research teams
Oncology and Biopharmaceuticals Medical Affairs Leads
Product and portfolio strategy
Medical Evidence Planning
Key experts in Data science /Analytics environments at AZ, and external partner organizations.
External (to AZ)
AZ RWS existing, prospective or potential partner organizations,
Key academic collaborators and thought leaders
Essential Requirements
PhD or MS in data science or other advanced degree in life sciences with post doctoral or other training/work in Medical/Health Informatics or related field
Experience in real-world evidence and familiarity with health economics/epidemiology, and quantitative science such as health outcome modelling
Expertise in EMR/Health IT, disease registries, and insurance claims databases
Expertise in clinical data standards, medical terminologies and controlled vocabularies used in healthcare data and ontologies (ICD9/10/ReadCode)
Experience in supporting pharmacoepidemiology studies with proven track record of advancing approaches with data science
Experience in Statistical Analysis Plan (SAP) generation and execution for observational studies
Expertise in methods development and application using statistical languages such as R/Matlab/SAS/SQL/Hadoop/Python
Experience in advanced visualisation and visual analytics of routinely collected healthcare data
Desirable
Expertise in data mining approaches within healthcare settings generating insight from routinely collected healthcare data
A history of patient care or equivalent background of working at a patient care setting that allows the candidate to bring medical perspective into real-world evidence generation and observational studies
Demonstrated ability to build long-term relationships with stakeholders at senior levels, understand relevant scientific/business challenges at a deep level and translate into a programme of informatics activities to deliver defined value
Ability to lead & manage multi-disciplinary data science projects
Strong track record of delivering large, cross functional projects
Experience working in a global organization and delivering global solutions
Use of Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence in the generation of hypotheses within Real World Data",4.0,AstraZeneca,"Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,107,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,106.5,MD,6295,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
64,64,Data Scientist,$83k-$135k,"Data Scientist

Language: English

Location: Memphis, TN

Travel: <10>

Buckman is a privately held, global specialty chemical company with headquarters in Memphis, TN, USA, committed to safeguarding the environment, maintaining safety in the workplace, and promoting sustainable development. Buckman delivers exceptional service and innovative solutions to our customers globally in the pulp and paper, leather, and water treatment sectors to help boost productivity, reduce risk, improve product quality, and provide a measurable return on investment. Buckman is in the middle of a digital transformation of its businesses and focused on building the capabilities and tools in support of this.

Position Summary
Buckman is seeking an experienced Data Scientist to lead the development of a Data Science program at our Memphis facility. You will work closely with Buckman stakeholders to derive deep industry knowledge across paper, water, leather, and performance chemical industries. You will help develop a data strategy for the company including collection of the right data, creation of the data science project portfolio, partnering with external providers, and augmenting capabilities with additional internal hires. A large part of the job is communicating and developing relationship with key stakeholders and subject matter experts to tee up proofs of concept projects to demonstrate how data science can be used to solve old problems in unique and novel ways. You will not have a large internal team to rely on, at least initially, so individual expertise, breadth of data science knowledge, and ability to partner with external companies will be essential for success. In addition to the pure data science problems, you will be working closely with a multi-disciplinary team consisting of sensor scientists, software engineers, network engineers, mechanical/electrical engineers, and chemical engineers in the development, and deployment of IoT solutions. If you like working for an entrepreneurial company with a Sustainability mission and digital ambitions at the core of its strategy, Buckman is the place for you.

Competencies Needed for Success
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative field such as Data Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics, Engineering, or Computer Science
5+ years of relevant working experience in an analytical role involving data extraction, analysis, and visualization
Expertise in one or more programming languages R, Python, MATLAB, JMP, Minitab, Java, C++, Scala
Key libraries such as Sklearn, XgBoost, GLMNet, Dplyr, ggplot, Rshiny
Experience and knowledge of data mining algorithms including supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques areas such as Gradient Boosting, Decision Trees, Multivariate Regressions, Logistic regressions, Neural Network, Random Forest, Support Vector Machine, Naive Bayes, Time Series, Optimization
Microsoft IoT/data science toolkit: Azure Machine Learning, Datalake, Datalake analytics, Workbench, IoT Hub, Stream Analytics, CosmosDB, Time Series Insights, PowerBI
Data querying languages (e.g. SQL, Hadoop/Hive) and Preferred Qualifications
A demonstrated record of success with a verifiable portfolio of problems tackled
Preferred Qualifications
Master’s or PhD degree in a quantitative field such as Data Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics, Engineering, or Computer Science
Experience in the specialty chemicals sector or similar industry
Background in engineering, especially Chemical Engineering
Experience starting up a data science program
Experience working with global stakeholders
Experience working in a start-up environment, preferably in an IoT company
Knowledge in quantitative modeling tools and statistical analysis",3.5,Buckman,"Memphis, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,75,Company - Private,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,TN,3744,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
65,65,Data Scientist- Analytics,$83k-$135k,"OkCupid is looking for an analyst to contribute to our data-driven organization. We enjoy working on a product that helps millions of people find love and get a great sense of satisfaction in seeing our hard work make a difference. If that’s the kind of thing that appeals to you, you’re probably a good fit for OkCupid

About the Team:
OkCupid’s Analytics function is a close knit team of 4, we sit embedded in various business functions, and we each bring our diverse and unique experience to the team. Our team handles all aspects of the analytics life cycle, including data modelling and warehousing, reporting, traditional analytics, and statistical modeling.

In this role, you will:
-Partner with Product Managers and Senior leadership to recommend appropriate actions
-Utilize statistical modelling techniques where appropriate to drive business decisions
-Own experimentation for your product team by designing and implementing AB tests and network effect tests
-Analyze company performance across Product, Marketing, Finance, and more as needed
-Prepare trend analysis and investigative reporting for product teams and senior management

We’re looking for:
-3+ YOE with at least one statistical programming language: Python, R, SAS, Julia (Python Preferred)
-3+ YOE using SQL with any database
-Strong analytical skills and the ability to turn unstructured problems into easily digestible analyses and conclusions
-Previous experience analyzing behavior at an internet company, preferably in a B2C environment
-Ability to operate independently and proactively, we don’t just want you generating reports, we want you helping drive the business forwards

Extra points for:
-Bachelor’s degree in Economics, Computer Science, Mathematics, or other related fields a plus
-Experience with at least one BI tool (Tableau, Looker, Periscope, etc)
-Basic familiarity with Machine Learning concepts
-Advanced statistical knowledge

What are some perks?
-Competitive salary and full benefits, including Medical, Dental, Vision, and 401k
-Workstation and tools of your choice
-Paid attendance to conferences
-Regularly catered lunch and a bomb shelter stockpile of snacks and drinks
-Company funded happy hours/events
-A sunny office full of incredibly curious and friendly people

OkCupid is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are deeply committed to fostering an inclusive environment for all employees.



What’s in it for you?
- Competitive salary and full benefits, including Medical, Dental, Vision, and 401k
- Workstation and tools of your choice
- Paid attendance to conferences
- Daily complimentary catered lunch from some of NYC’s top restaurants, and an endless supply of snacks & drinks
- Company funded happy hours/events
- Discounted membership to some amazing NYC facilities including Chelsea Piers Gym
- Generous maternity and/or paternity leave and contributions towards fertility preservation
- A sunny office full of incredibly curious and friendly people

OkCupid is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are deeply committed to fostering an inclusive environment for all employees.",4.2,OkCupid,"New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,17,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,NY,3143,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
67,67,Big Data Engineer,$83k-$135k,"The Big Data Engineer is responsible for engaging in the design, development and maintenance of the big data platform and solutions at Quicken Loans. This includes the platform host data sets that support various business operations and enable data-driven decisions as well as the analytical solutions that provide visibility and decision support using big data technologies. The Big Data Engineer is responsible for administering a Hadoop cluster, developing data integration solutions, resolving technical issues, and working with Data Scientists, Business Analysts, System Administrators and Data Architects to ensure the platform meets business demands. This team member also ensures that solutions are scalable, include necessary monitoring, and adhere to best practices and guidelines. The Big Data Engineer helps mentor new team members and continues to grow their knowledge of new technologies.

Responsibilities
Develop ELT processes from various data repositories and APIs across the enterprise, ensuring data quality and process efficiency
Develop data processing scripts using Spark
Develop relational and NoSQL data models to help conform data to meet users needs using Hive and HBase
Integrate platform into the existing enterprise data warehouse and various operational systems
Develop administration processes to monitor cluster performance, resource usage, backup and mirroring to ensure a highly available platform
Address performance and scalability issues in a large-scale data lake environment
Provide big data platform support and issue resolutions to Data Scientists and fellow engineers
Requirements
Master's degree in computer science, software engineering or a closely related field
2 years of experience with Hadoop distribution and ecosystem tools such as Hive, Spark, NiFi and Oozie
2 years of experience developing batch and streaming ETL processes
2 years of experience with relational and NoSQL databases, including modeling and writing complex queries
Proficiency in at least one programming language, such as Python or Java
Experience with Linux system administration, scripting and basic network skills
Excellent communication, analytical and problem-solving skills
Who We Are

Were Americas largest mortgage lender, closing loans in all 50 states. J.D. Power ranked Quicken Loans Highest in Customer Satisfaction in Primary Mortgage Origination for the past nine consecutive years, 2010 2018. The company was also ranked highest in the nation for client satisfaction among mortgage servicers by J.D. Power for five consecutive years, 2014 through 2018, each year the company was eligible. Theres a simple reason weve been so successful: We care about the people we work with.

If youre tired of stuffy, bureaucratic workplaces, then youll be delighted to find something different here. We strive to make a creative, fun and collaborative environment you simply wont find anywhere else. Quicken Loans was named #1 in ESSENCE Magazines first ever list of Best Places to Work for African Americans in 2015. We've been on Computerworld's ""Best Places to Work in IT"" list for 13 years running, hitting #1 the last five years. We were also ranked #14 in FORTUNE Magazines list of ""100 Best Companies to Work For"" in 2018, remaining in the top-30 for the past 15 years.",3.8,Quicken Loans,"Detroit, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,35,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,MI,3298,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,1
69,69,Data Scientist,$83k-$135k,"A trusted partner at nearly three million commercial customer locations, Ecolab (ECL) is the global leader in water, hygiene and infection prevention solutions and services. With annual sales of $13 billion and more than 45,000 associates, Ecolab delivers comprehensive solutions, data-driven insights and personalized service to advance food safety, maintain clean and safe environments, optimize water and energy use, and improve operational efficiencies and sustainability for customers in the food, healthcare, hospitality and industrial markets in more than 170 countries around the world.

Ecolabs Institutional division, serving the restaurant and hospitality market, is seeking a business focused Data Scientist to unlock the value in data assets while creating new and unique offerings for customers. As a data scientist in the Advanced Analytics organization, you will play a pivotal role in planning, executing and delivering machine learning-based projects. The bulk of the work will be in machine learning (ML) modelling, management and problem analysis, data exploration and preparation, data collection and integration, as well as operationalization. You will be a key interface between the advanced analytics team and the business unit and various other departments (such as IT). Candidates need to be very much self-driven, curious and creative.

In this role, we are looking for:
A problem-solving mindset with the ability to understand business challenges and how to apply your analytics expertise to solve them.
The unique person who can present complex mathematical solutions in a simple manner that most will understand including customers.
An individual excited by innovation and new technology and eager to finds ways to employ these innovations in practice.
A team mentality empowered by the ability to work with a diverse set of individuals.
Whats in it For You:
Opportunity to take on some of the worlds most meaningful challenges, helping customers achieve clean water, safe food, abundant energy and healthy environments.
Ability to make an impact and shape your career with a company that is passionate about growth.
Support of an organization that believes it is vital to include and engage diverse people, perspectives and ideas to achieve our best.
What you will do:
Problem Analysis and Project Management.
Inspire the organization about the business potential and strategy of artificial intelligence.
Collaborate across the business to understand IT and business constraints.
Manage data science projects and the corresponding key performance indicators (KPIs) for success.
Data Collection and Integration.
Understand new data sources and process pipelines and catalog/document them.
Acquire access to various databases and other sources systems such as SQL or graph databases.
Create data pipelines for more efficient and repeatable data science projects.
Data Exploration and Preparation.
Apply statistical analysis and visualization techniques to various data.
Generate hypotheses about the underlying mechanics of the business process.
Test hypotheses using various quantitative methods.
Display drive and curiosity to understand the business process to its core.
Network with domain experts to better understand the business mechanics that generated the data.
Machine Learning.
Apply various ML and advanced analytics techniques to perform classification or prediction tasks.
Acquire domain knowledge and integrate it into ML solutions, for example, from an understanding of financial risk, customer journey, quality prediction, sales, marketing.
Testing of ML models, such as cross-validation, A/B testing, bias and fairness.
Operationalization.
Collaborate with ML operations, data engineers, and IT to deploy ML solutions.
Follow established best practices around ML production infrastructure.
Network with internal and external partners.
Upskill yourself (through conferences, publications, courses, local academia and meetups).
Collaboration with other technical teams within the organization.
Encourage and leverage the reuse of artifacts.
Be encouraged and expected to innovate and be creative in your data analysis, problem solving and presentation of solutions.
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics with 3+ years related experience, or
Masters Degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics with 1+ years of related experience
Experience working with statistics/analytics/visualization tools, preferably in the Microsoft Azure Suite.
Preferred Qualifications:
Ph.D. degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics.
Experience working in Python/SQL/Jupyter.
Self-driven, curious and creative with a collaborative mindset.
Demonstrated ability to work in diverse, cross-functional teams in a dynamic business environment.
Strong communication and presentation skills.
Our Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion

At Ecolab, we believe the best teams are diverse and inclusive, and we are on a journey to create a workplace where every associate can grow and achieve their best. We are committed to fair and equal treatment of associates and applicants. We recruit, hire, promote, transfer and provide opportunities for advancement on the basis of individual qualifications and job performance. In all matters affecting employment, compensation, benefits, working conditions, and opportunities for advancement, we will not discriminate against any associate or applicant for employment because of race, religion, color, creed, national origin, citizenship status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expressions, genetic information, marital status, age, disability, or status as a covered veteran.

In addition, we are committed to furthering the principles of Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) through Affirmative Action (AA). Our goal is to fully utilize minority, female, disabled and covered veteran individuals at all levels of the workforce. Ecolab is a place where you can grow your career, own your future and impact what matters.

We will consider for employment all qualified applicants, including those with criminal histories, in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable state and local laws, including the City of Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance and the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance.",3.6,Ecolab,"Saint Paul, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,97,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,MN,6517,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
70,70,Lead Data Scientist,$83k-$135k,"Our mission is to make the best mental health tools radically accessible for everyone.

We are pioneers in building personalized digital mental health tools to help millions of people with mental health difficulties. We are building a suite of regulated, prescription only digital therapeutics as well as a sophisticated delivery platform capable of responding to the lived experience of our users.

Our tools are powered by the latest research in NLP and ML, use scientifically proven techniques from Cognitive Behavior Therapy, and are based on 10 years of intervention science at Stanford University. Our founder has an international reputation in Digital Mental Health intervention development. And our Chairman is Andrew Ng; and Dan Jurafsky is a member of our advisory board, both globally recognized leaders in AI/NLP.

There has never been a better time to use your data science skills for good. Given the recent acceleration in infrastructure to allow for the meaningful adoption of DTx, our strong product reputation and existing relationships within health systems, Woebot is in a period of explosive growth. We are looking for a product-minded data scientist to continue to create value for our users, customers, and execute on our IP strategy.

What you will do:

As a leader in the Product team, you will work cross-departmentally with clinical and engineering team members to build machine learning and AI algorithms that are the core of Woebot's intelligence. There are four areas we want you to own and drive:

Drive An Insights & Analytics Culture
You will help create data analysis and analytics pipelines that improve not only the underlying ML algorithms but also the product and the user's experience.
You will lead a team of Analysts and be responsible for good data driven hygiene, including the creation, redesign, and maintenance of analytics dashboards and BI tools such as BigQuery, Google Data Studio, or Tableau.
You will also advise on data labeling strategy so that Woebot's conversational engine is continuously improved and informs changes in features, content, and UX.
Improve User Personalization:
Woebot exchanges 4.7 M messages with our users every week. You will create & lead a data-driven personalization strategy for this audience.
We consider personalization to be key for developing a relationship over time while delivering precision interventions, that is; the right method to the right person at the right time.
Contribute To Evidence:
In the next 6 months, you'll help Woebot develop evidence & trends to demonstrate the value of our highest priority products.
You're helping answer the most pressing questions in the mental health field around engagement, dose, and treatment outcomes.
In partnership with our Clinical team and academic partners, we expect you to contribute to our pipeline of peer-reviewed published research.
In addition to some platform-related pieces, you will lead publication in Data Science and HCI research.
What Your First 90 Days Could Look Like
By Day 30 - Assess the lay of the landscape & team - and make suggestions around in house analytic tools, dashboard and strategies.
By Day 60 - understand the roadmap with our founder and reverse engineer our tailored interventions. Deliver a prioritized list of roadmap items.
By Day 90 - Submit your first publication. Execute on a plan for improving user outcomes with our analytics and ML.
Role Specific Competencies:
PhD in Data Analysis or ML/AI or computational field with 8-10+ years of applied experience
Knowledge of one or more modern ML/NLP frameworks, such as PyTorch, Tensorflow, or Keras
Track Record of publishing in peer reviewed academic literature
You've led and managed other analysts and data scientists.
Strong written and verbal communication skills
What you will add to our culture:
Strong work-ethic: Works hard to get a job done.
Proactive & flexible: Able to hit the ground running, takes responsibility for finding a way to get the job done.
Empathic: Place a high value on user-experience, are a team player motivated to help others be successful.
High standards: Applies high standards toward everything.
Humble: You want to learn and grow in the role, and are open to feedback on how to do that.
What we offer:
Competitive Salary
Stock Options
Flexible PTO
Health, Dental & Vision
Healthy Snacks & Meals
Woebot is an equal opportunity employer and we deeply value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",4.1,Woebot Health,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,3,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,CA,4608,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,0
71,71,Sr Data Scientist,$83k-$135k,"We are looking for a Senior Data Scientist to work with one of our US-based clients, which is one of the oldest and most trusted sources of global and financial news. In addition to print news, our client owns one of the most popular websites in the world and diversified its business across a range of media including information services, book publishing, and digital real estate services.

The team will be architecting a highly-scalable platform to power data acquisition, categorization, calculations, and visualization.
You are the one if you have:
At least five years of experience working in data analysis and data mining
Experience using R and Python
Knowledge in business intelligence
Proven experience regarding data and server security and manipulating large amounts of survey data
Strong communications skills
AdTech experience is a plus
Text Mining and Sentiment Analysis is a big plus
Our Engineers bring the vision and goals of our clients to life by bringing experience and passion to the software development process. Spark Digital Engineers take pride in elegant and robust solutions that bring peace of mind to those who rely on them.

Do you bring experience and passion to your work and team? Does seeing a software product take shape and come to life make you happy? If yes, you’d fit right in at Spark Digital and we’d love to talk about the Senior Data Scientist role we’re looking to fill.",4.5,Spark Digital,"New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,9,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,NY,1415,1,data scientist,1,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
72,72,Data Scientist for Detector Physics,$83k-$135k,"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311174

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Signature Science and Technology Division

Group: Detection Physics
*Job Description**
The Detection Physics Group within the National Security Directorate at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is seeking a research scientist who will focus on studies of radiation detection physics using Artificial Intelligence/ Machine Learning (AI/ML) techniques. The Detection Physics Group includes research ranging from low background and high energy fundamental particle physics to radiation detection related to non-proliferation and national security applications. This position will focus on the expanding role of AI/ML within the group. It will provide the opportunity to perform analysis of data from existing experimental setups, and to propose, develop, and demonstrate relevant techniques on new data sets for advanced applications.

Major duties and responsibilities: Contribute to the development of the analysis of a variety of types of radiation detectors and experiments. Perform, analyze, and interpret detector characterizations for detectors of interest, including semiconductor detectors, scintillators, proportional counters, silicon photomultipliers, and others. Develop a detector-physics-focused AI/ML strategy with an eye toward fostering new funding streams and research directions. Engage in research activities with the broader AI/ML community at PNNL.
*The hiring level will be determined based on the education, experience and skill set of the successful candidate based on the following:**
*Level 2:** Works on problems of moderate scope where analysis of situations or data requires a review of a variety of factors. Exercises judgment within defined procedures and practices to determine appropriate action. Builds productive internal/external working relationships. Works under general supervision. Follows established procedures. Infrequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts on routine matters.
*Level 3:** A seasoned, experienced professional with a full understanding of area of specialization; resolves a wide range of issues in creative ways. This job is the fully qualified, careeroriented, journey-level position. Independently determines and develops approach to solutions. Frequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 2 years of experience, or Masters degree with 0-2 years of experience, or PhD with 0 years of experience.

+ Programming capability with languages such as C/C++, Python, MatLab, and R.

+ Experience with ""standard"" and AI/ML data analysis techniques.

+ Experience with particle detection software and hardware.

+ Should these be moved down to Preferred Qualifications section to stay consistent with PLIs?
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with at least 5 years of well-aligned prior experience or a masters degree with 3 years of relevant experience or a PhD degree with at least 1 year of experience.

+ PhD in experimental nuclear or high energy particle physics, or related fields.

+ Experience with software tools such as PyTorch, Tensorflow, and Keras.

+ Experience with data analysis and simulation packages such as ROOT, Geant4, and MCNP.

+ Implementation experience with high-performance parallel codes and/or accelerators (FPGAs/GPUs).

+ High level of motivation and ability to work with, form, and lead collaborative research teams.

+ Adaptability to thrive in a rapidly evolving, multitasked, research environment.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Detection Physics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-09-09_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-12-08_",3.8,PNNL,"Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,55,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,WA,5718,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,1
73,73,Senior Data Scientist 4 Artificial Intelligence,$83k-$135k,"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311095

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing & Analytics

Group: Data Sciences & Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and artificial intelligence research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to AI assurance, remote sensing and geo-spatial analytics, human language technologies, computer vision, and other related fields.

+ The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as natural language processing, remote-sensing and geo-spatial intelligence, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery (e.g., publication in conferences such as NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred)

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 7 years of experience, Masters with 5 years of experience or PHD with 3 years of experience
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",3.8,Pacific Northwest National Laboratory,"Seattle, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,55,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,WA,5242,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,1
74,74,Senior Data Engineer,$83k-$135k,"WHO WE ARE

NCSOFT is a premiere digital entertainment company and global publisher with worldwide locations and more than 4,000 employees focused on bringing extraordinary games to life for millions of fans around the world. Established in 1997 and headquartered in Seoul, South Korea, we quickly became a key leader in online games. Best known for critically acclaimed franchises including Lineage, Aion, Guild Wars, and Blade & Soul, NCSOFT is also one of the world's top mobile developers with Lineage 2M occupying the #1 grossing revenue slot on Google Play. Our core goal is making people in this world happier by delivering games that entertain a globally connected audience has remained the same. Our culture is innovative, creative, collaborative and impactful, and we are passionate about creating the best gaming experiences for our players.

WHY JOIN THE BUSINESS INTELLIGENCE PLATFORM TEAM?
We are a passionate and positive team that is always working on new data engineering technology and exciting projects including new game launches.
We feel team members are most effective in working on what they are passionate about. We are all capable of working on any given project, and often shift tasks based on preference.
We own the data platform, contributing to the design, implementation, and maintenance of these data services so we aren't shy about experimenting with new tech. However, we take a measured approach in order to minimize introducing unnecessary technical debt.
We collaborate with Analytics, Game Development, Platform and Publishing teams. Our data platform supports all kinds of data in an efficient environment that helps with analysis, customer care and company wide data-driven decisions.
WHAT YOU'LL DO

As a Senior Data Engineer, you'll be responsible for gathering and collecting data, storing it, doing batch processing or real-time processing on it, and serving it to data scientists and data analysts to easily query.
Understanding data source (10%)
Develop data processes for construction, mining, and modeling that are delivered to the data analyst/science team (30%)
Create large data warehouses by running some ETL (Extract, Transform and Load) that is used for analysis by the analyst/scientists (30%)
Install continuous pipelines of huge pools of filtered information so that data analyst/scientists can pull relevant data sets for their analyses (20%)
Develop, construct, test and maintain architectures such as databases and large-scale data processing systems (10%)
WHAT YOU'LL NEED TO BE SUCCESSFUL
BS in Computer Science or equivalent experience
5+ years of day-to-day working experience as data engineer
Experience with object-oriented and functional programming languages: Python, Scala etc.
Experience with RDBMS (MS-SQL, MYSQL etc.) and NoSQL (MongoDB, DynamoDB etc.)
Experience with Big Data query and application knowledge: Hive, Impala, Fluentd, Spark, Sqoop, Pig etc.
Experience with ETL and data integration tool : Airflow, Informatica PowerCenter
Experience with AWS cloud services: EC2, S3, EMR, Glue, RedShift, Athena etc.
Proficiency in general database administration concepts and efficient query writing
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
An eagerness to continually improve their skills, learn new technologies and is willing to take initiative beyond basic responsibilities
This is a full time, on-site position at our office in Aliso Viejo, CA. A casual, friendly work environment, a comprehensive benefits package, a competitive salary, and more are all part of what makes NCSOFT West a great place to work.",3.0,NCSOFT,"Aliso Viejo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,23,Company - Public,Video Games,Media,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,CA,3593,1,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
75,75,Senior Data Scientist,$83k-$135k,"Are you a talented and passionate engineer? Do you love solving problems and making ideas come to life? Are you a lifelong learner who thrives in dynamic environments and enjoys the challenge of learning new technologies and techniques? Are you a team player and enjoy collaboration, but you are also self-directed and enjoy the autonomy to be able to manage your own schedule and workload? Do you appreciate the importance of good communication and know that teamwork takes practice, effort and a good attitude? If so, we want to speak with you.

The Senior Data Scientist is responsible for collaborating with the team to design and implement systems that focus on forecasting, allocating, delivering, and reporting of advertising on the internet, TV, and connected devices. The successful candidate will utilize advanced mathematical, optimization, machine-learning, software engineering, and programming skills to solve challenging problems.

Responsibilities
Develop innovative forecasts, models, algorithms, and solutions and build prototypes and production implementations
Dig deep into high volumes of data, engineer features for improved forecast performance
Work cross-functionally to gather feedback and requirements from end users
Be a key contributor to product innovation and company strategy
Communicate technical information clearly to both technical and non-technical people
Required Qualifications
Degree in Operations Research, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Industrial Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or related field; MS/PhD preferred
3+ years of relevant experience
Strong analytical, statistical, and math abilities; Exceptional problem-solving skills
Excellent communication skills
Extreme attention to detail
Ability to work as part of a team in a fast-paced environment
#LI-KR1

About Amobee
The world’s leading independent advertising platform, Amobee unifies all advertising channels—including TV, programmatic and social—across all formats and devices. We provide marketers with streamlined, advanced media planning capabilities powered by in-depth analytics and proprietary audience data. Our platform and technology, provides the most advanced advertising solutions for the convergence of digital and advanced TV— including linear TV, over the top, connected TV, and premium digital video. Enabling advertisers to plan and activate across more than 150 integrated partners, including Facebook, Instagram, Pinterest, Snapchat and Twitter.

Amobee has been named to Fortune’s Top 10 Best Workplaces in Advertising and Marketing. Amobee’s platforms have been widely recognized amongst our industry winning numerous awards in technology innovation, see all Amobee Awards. We are a wholly owned subsidiary of Singtel, one of the largest telco companies in the world, reaching over 700 million mobile subscribers in 21 countries. Amobee operates across North America, Europe, Middle East, Asia and Australia. For more information, visit amobee.com or follow @amobee

In addition to our great environment, we offer a competitive base salary, employee development programs and other comprehensive benefits. Please send a cover letter along with your resume when applying to the position of interest located at Amobee.com. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. No phone calls and no recruiting agencies, please.",3.7,Amobee,"Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,15,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,MD,3359,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
77,77,Data Scientist,$83k-$135k,"About Imperfect

Imperfect Foods was founded in 2015 with a mission to reduce food waste and build a better food system for everyone. We offer imperfect (yet delicious) produce, affordable pantry items, and quality meat and dairy. We deliver them conveniently to our customers’ doorsteps and pride ourselves on offering up to a 30% discount compared to grocery store prices. Our customers can get the healthy, seasonal produce they want alongside the grocery staples they rely on, without having to compromise their budget or values. We’re proving that doing the right thing for the planet doesn’t have to cost more, and that shopping for quality ingredients can support the people and resources that it takes to grow our favorite foods.

We're headquartered in San Francisco with operations all over the country. Check our website to see if there is an Imperfect near you!

We're looking for folks who are positive, motivated, and ready to change the world. If that sounds like you, drop us a line!

How we are protecting employees from COVID-19

At Imperfect Foods, employee health and safety is our top priority. We have implemented processes and precautions to prevent the spread of COVID-19 in our facilities. We provide gloves, masks, and hand sanitizer to all essential employees who must report to work. Before entering our warehouse, employees have their temperatures checked. In addition, we take great care to ensure frequently touched surfaces are sanitized throughout the day and all warehouses are fully sanitized weekly.

We have also implemented an Emergency Sick Leave policy providing full-time and part-time employees 2 additional weeks of paid time off and up to 26 weeks paid leave if they have a confirmed case of COVID-19.

About the Role:

Imperfect is looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join the Business Intelligence team. The role will develop and automate algorithms that integrate with various parts of the business to better our customer understanding, improve our customer experience, and drive operational efficiency. Our Data Scientist will collaborate with departments across the company, such as Marketing, Operations, and Engineering, for a wide and deep impact. Some example projects include demand forecasting to help with warehouse labor and inventory planning, optimizations to improve warehouse efficiency, personalization and recommendation algorithms to enable customers to discover relevant products, and product subscription cadence optimization. As an early member of the data science team, your role will influence the tech stack and frameworks we develop. This role requires a strong level of analytical horsepower and communication skills to effectively analyze and tell the story behind the data.

If you like the idea of swimming in data, fighting food waste, and working with a bunch of pleasant people, come join us!
Responsibilities:
Build production grade models on large-scale datasets by utilizing advanced statistical modeling, machine learning, or data mining techniques
Provide data-driven analyses and insights for strategic and business initiatives, while maintaining analytics roadmap to prioritize initiatives, communicate timelines, and ensure successful, timely completion of deliverables
Collaborate with the teams across the company to identify impactful business problems and translate them into structured analyses, actionable insights, and reports and dashboards
Assist with the development and deployment of analytical tools and develop custom models to track key metrics, uncover insights in the data, and automate analyses
Contribute to code reviews and software development best practices
Effectively communicate with initiative stakeholders, including technical and non-technical audiences. Tell the story behind the data
Skills and Qualifications:
3+ years of professional experience as a data scientist, including deploying and maintaining code in a production environment
Experience with machine learning techniques and advanced analytics (e.g. regression, classification, clustering, time series, econometrics, mathematical optimization)Advanced SQL and Python skills and running advanced analytics in a scripting language. Bonus: experience in R and other languages
A solid grasp of basic statistical applications and methods (experimentation, probabilities)
Experience working with large data sets and preparing them for analysis

About You:
You're able to clearly and effectively communicate the results of complex analyses and transform data into a story for different audiences and various stakeholders
You demonstrate intellectual curiosity, and a passion for translating information into actionable insights, with data big, small, structured, and messy
You have the insight to take ambiguous problems and solve them in a structured, hypothesis-driven, data-supported way
You're a self-starter with the ability to juggle multiple projects at once
You’re passionate about our mission to eliminate food waste and create a better food system for all
Details of the Position:
Full-time exempt position reporting to the Director of Business Intelligence
Candidate can be remotely located within the US
Salary and employee stock options commensurate with experienceCompetitive benefits package including health care, paid vacation, 401K, paid parental leave, and recurring credit towards your Imperfect account!
Physical Requirements:
Sedentary work; involves sitting most of the time
Occasional movement around the office may be necessary
Regular work with computers, including keyboards, mouses, and screens
Regular use of mobile devices, including smartphones and tablets
Individuals seeking employment at Imperfect Foods are considered without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, gender, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, or sexual orientation.

U.S. E-Verify Notice: Imperfect Foods participates in E-Verify in the United States. Imperfect will provide the U.S. Social Security Administration (SSA) and, if necessary, the U.S. Department of Homeland Security (DHS), with information from each new employee's Form I-9 to confirm work authorization.",3.4,Imperfect Foods,Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,5,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,Remote,6200,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
79,79,Data Scientist,$83k-$135k,"At White Ops, we are all about keeping it human. We are the global leader in bot mitigation. We protect more than 200 enterprises—including the largest internet platforms—from sophisticated bots by verifying the humanity of nearly one trillion online interactions every week. The most sophisticated bots look and act like humans when they click on ads, visit websites, fill out forms, take over accounts, and commit payment fraud. We stop them.

Founded in 2012 in a Brooklyn sci-fi bookstore, our Bot Mitigation Platform protects enterprises from the sophisticated bots that threaten them. It's an ongoing war that we fight passionately every day. Join our mission to stop bots, disrupt the economics of cyber crime, and keep it human.

The Data Science team at White Ops is building the algorithms that run behind the scenes and power our bot detection engine. We deploy state-of-the-art statistical and machine learning models at a massive scale that distinguish human activity from automated bots.

What you'll do:
Develop algorithms (i.e. rule based, statistical, machine learning) that automatically detect emerging threats
Evaluate and implement data analysis strategies to improve detection efficacy at internet-scale
Ad hoc investigations to respond to emerging threats with velocity and quality
Collaborate with product, engineering, customer success, to define and develop new product features that will delight our customers
Research for case studies and white papers on bot detection
Contribute to toolkits and platforms that scale detection analytics
Who you are:
You have a strong sense of ownership which drives you to find ways to do things better, faster, and cheaper
You look to find new and innovative ways to solve complex problems through rigorous experimentation, all by yourself
You are open, transparent and work in tight collaboration with anyone
You constantly drive for correctness and performance, in that order
You are a data scientist, analyst, engineer and have solved difficult problems to prove it
You have proficiency with SQL, Python
You have familiarity with tools, libraries and platforms such as Jupyter notebooks, Pandas, NumPy etc
Track record of independent, creative problem solving with large amounts of complex data
Knowledge of how the Internet works
Comfort with ad tech terminology
Background in data science for security is a plus
Knowledge of how web browsers work is a plus
Benefits and Perks
Unlimited vacation policy
Stock options, 401(k), and commuter benefits
Competitive salary and commission structure
Medical and dental insurance for all full-time employees
Fully paid parental leave
Professional development fund
Great coaching from senior leaders and challenging development opportunities
Life at White Ops:

Our HQ office is located in the heart of New York City. We are growing the company deliberately with a keen eye towards maintaining a culture that values diversity, lifestyle, and career growth. We are doing meaningful work and we need people to join our mighty team. We are proud of our overwhelmingly positive presence on Glassdoor and Built in NYC. We have offices located in NYC, DC, Victoria, and London.",3.8,White Ops,"New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,8,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,NY,3178,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
81,81,Senior Data Scientist,$83k-$135k,"At Recursion, our mission is to decode biology to radically improve lives. To accomplish this bold goal, we have already generated one of the largest biological datasets in existence in our own labs— tens of billions of images of cells under millions of different biological and chemical perturbations.

With treatments for hundreds of diseases in our sights, Recursion has constructed a world-class team of specialists in biology, drug discovery, automation, engineering, management, and data science that work side by side. Our data science team is no less diverse. We bring together domain expertise in computer science, physics, biology, mathematics, applied statistics, and more. Together, we analyze experimental results, develop best-practice analytical methods for a field that has none, and build the computational tooling required to fuel Recursion's drug-discovery engine.

HOW YOU'LL CONTRIBUTE:

You will help us accomplish all of this by applying your domain expertise, technical experience, and years working on a data science team to deliver scalable solutions that immediately impact decisions— in whatever area that expertise may be:
Biologists just generated a novel dataset and need help developing a new analytical approach.
Our Chemistry team needs a new tool to register and recommend molecules with specific properties from an X-million compound registry.
Our analysis toolkit needs to level-up to support the growing needs of the company.
A production ML model is underperforming on new data, and needs both a redesign and additional experimental data to support the desired objectives.
You will identify and then own projects that suit your expertise— meaning conception, planning, development, implementation, and delivery— with the support of whatever other data science and cross-team expertise is required.

THE EXPERIENCE YOU'LL NEED:
Minimum of 4 years in industry setting on a data science team
Experience working with production repositories and developing deployable data-science products.
High fluency with the Python data stack (pandas, sklearn, etc).
Professional experience in project leadership and team mentorship
Curiosity and the professional skill-set to excel in an open, highly collaborative environment.
A track record of outstanding past projects, publications, or presentations.
NICE TO HAVE:
Experience developing computational analysis for imaging-based biological datasets or bioinformatics for sequencing-based datasets.
Code you can share. Send a link along with your email.
THE BENEFITS/PERKS YOU'LL ENJOY
100% Coverage of health, vision, and dental insurance premiums
401(k) with generous matching (immediate vesting)
Stock option grants
Two one-week paid company closures (summer and winter)
Flexible vacation/sick leave
Onsite daycare facility*
Commuter benefit and vehicle parking to ease your commute*
Complimentary chef-prepared lunches and well-stocked snack bars*
Generous paid parental leave (including adoptive)
Fully-paid gym membership to Metro Fitness, located just feet away from our headquarters*
One-of-a-kind 100,000 square foot headquarters complete with a 70-foot climbing wall, showers, lockers, and bike parking*
*Subject to change during the COVID-19 pandemic

More About Us

Recursion is a digital biology company industrializing drug discovery. Recursion does this by combining automation, artificial intelligence, machine learning, in vivo validation capabilities and a highly cross-functional team to discover novel medicines that expand our collective understanding of biology. Recursion's rich, relatable database of over 4 petabytes of biological images generated in-house on the company's robotics platform enables advanced machine learning approaches to reveal drug candidates, mechanisms of action, novel chemistry, and potential toxicity, with the eventual goal of decoding biology and advancing new therapeutics that radically improve people's lives. Recursion is proudly headquartered in Salt Lake City.

Check out what it is like to work at Recursion here

Recursion is an equal opportunity employer and complies with all applicable federal, state, and local fair employment practices laws. Recursion strictly prohibits and does not tolerate discrimination against applicants because of race, color, religion, creed, national origin or ancestry, ethnicity, sex, pregnancy, gender (including gender nonconformity and status as a transgender individual), age, physical or mental disability, citizenship, past, current, or prospective service in the uniformed services, or any other characteristic protected under applicable federal, state, or local law.",4.6,Recursion Pharmaceuticals,"Salt Lake City, UT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,7,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,UT,4642,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
83,83,Data Scientist,$83k-$135k,"Who is Genesys?

Every year, Genesys® delivers more than 70 billion remarkable customer experiences for organizations in over 100 countries. Through the power of the cloud and AI, our technology connects every customer moment across marketing, sales and service on any channel, while also improving employee experiences. Genesys pioneered Experience as a ServiceSM so organizations of any size can provide true personalization at scale, interact with empathy, and foster customer trust and loyalty.

What you’ll do

The Data Scientist will be an integral member of the Customer Success Data & Analytics team within Genesys Customer Success organization. The Customer Success Operations team is chartered with defining and executing an enterprise Customer Success strategy. This includes reporting process and implementation, data optimization, and content access/distribution in a partnership with business and IT stakeholders.
Developing predictive models in some of these areas; cross-sell / up-sell strategies, market segmentation, price optimization, time to event, survival analysis and more.
Demonstrate strong analytical and storytelling skills and the ability to find relevant stories from piles of reports.
Engage with clients to understand business requirements and convert the same into technical/modeling problems for solution development.
Determine opportunities for improvement across process, tooling and data automation to optimize costs and decrease turnaround time for analytics consumers.
Who you are
You’ll have experience in programming in Python and R.
Familiarity with one of the following libraries;
Pandas
Numpy
SciPy
scikit-learn
Exposure to SQL programming.
Data Visualization with Tableau, PowerBI or QlikView.
Knowledge of Machine Learning models
Git/Github experience.
Proficient in MS Office Suite & advanced Excel
Benefits

Check out our benefits and open time off policy at http://mygenesysbenfits.com

Genesys is an equal opportunity employer committed to diversity in the workplace. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics.",4.4,Genesys,"Austin, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,30,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,TX,2181,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
84,84,Principal Data Scientist,$83k-$135k,"The Principal Data Scientist will be a data science subject matter expert and provide team leadership in their area of responsibility. The Technical Team Lead will lead selected projects or activities, as required, and will collaborate with other disciplines and teams.

Qualifications:
• MSc/PhD degree in in a quantitative field (such as Computer Science, Mathematics, Engineering) or BSc in a related discipline and 7 years of industry experience
• 5+ years of professional experience in data science, computer vision or related fields
• 3+ years of professional experience leading data science or related discipline teams
• Subject matter expert in the areas of Machine Learning/Artificial Intelligence
• Advanced quantitative and analytical skills around applied research, mathematical modelling, and statistical modeling
• Practical software development skills in one or more programming languages, such as Python, Scala/Java, C++, etc.
• Fluency with one or more machine learning frameworks (such as TensorFlow, Pytorch, Caffe)
• Experience leading and mentoring senior, mid-level, and junior data scientists
• A passion for AI/ML, overcoming difficult challenges, and accomplishing great things
Bonus:
• Proven experience developing and evolving novel/new DNN architectures
• Strong publication background (Company will support publication work)",4.5,Infinite Resource Solutions,Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,7,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,Remote,1353,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,0
86,86,Data Scientists with TS/SCI,$83k-$135k,"Veteran Owned Firm Seeking Data Scientists with TS/SCI to support a client in Springfield, VA

My name is Stephen Hrutka, and I am the owner of a Veteran-owned firm in Washington, DC focused on Supply Chain, Strategic Sourcing, and Technical/Cleared Recruiting.

HRUCKUS helps other Veteran Owned businesses recruit for positions across the SBA, HHS, DARPA, and other cutting-edge R&D related defense agencies.

We are looking to hire (2) data scientists to support NGA in Springfield, VA. The role is remote to start, no idea when traditional onsite will begin.

Please see below for the position description. If you’re interested, I'd be glad to provide more details about the role and further discuss your qualifications.

Thanks,

Stephen M Hrutka
Principal Consultant
www.hruckus.com

Position Tasks:
Develop Python or R code to read/categorize large amounts of unstructured data
Develop code to evaluate Intelligence Information Reports (IIRs) for metadata accuracy
Develop code that recognizes and extracts entities from IIRs w/ 90% accuracy
Visualize data derived from structuring of unstructured/semi-structured data
Brief results of code development to leadership to include methods, limitations, and assumptions
Position Deliverables:
Monthly reports
Code modules using Natural Language Processing to analyze multiple unstructured data files and database the information derived
Code modules using Entity Recognition to analyze multiple unstructured data files and identify all people, groups, and categories of objects
Code modules using Latent Semantic Indexing to analyze multiple unstructured data files and database the information derived
Develop code that can be stand-alone or incorporated into existing applications
Visualizations of large data sets, bringing forward unobscured data, and enabling personnel to understand the data quickly
Position Requirements:
Government Security Clearance
Minimum of (3) years of experience related to the following areas: parametric and non-parametric statistical methods; visualizing statistical effects in complex datasets; performing statistical data analysis in Python and/or R; providing and explaining clear analytical results in well-written reports
Ability to write and execute queries in SQL
Ability to visualize data with aid of data visualization tools such as Tableau
Bachelor’s degree in computer science or related field
Ability to work in distributed systems and to develop creative solutions to data problems
Experience with database tools
Preferred Qualifications:
Statistical Modeling: 10 years
Natural Language Processing: 5 years
Python and R: 3 years
Latent Semantic Indexing: 5 years
SQL: 3 years
Tableau: 1 year
Entity Recognition: 5 years",5.0,HRUCKUS,"Springfield, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,7,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,VA,2719,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
89,89,Director of Data Science,$83k-$135k,"Overview


Analysis Group is one of the largest international economics consulting firms, with more than 1,000 professionals across 14 offices in North America, Europe, and Asia. Since 1981, we have provided expertise in economics, finance, health care analytics, and strategy to top law firms, Fortune Global 500 companies, and government agencies worldwide. Our internal experts, together with our network of affiliated experts from academia, industry, and government, offer our clients exceptional breadth and depth of expertise.

Analysis Group provides economic, financial, and strategy consulting to law firms, corporations, and government agencies. At Analysis Group, Data Science is a center of excellence within a company that already has decades of experience focused on analysis involving data. Within Data Science, the Director of Data Science is charged with collaborating with leading internal and external academic experts to find creative solutions to some of the most challenging and high-value problems we face.

The Director of Data Science contributes to both client engagements and to the design and development of internal data science tools and infrastructure. The client work is diverse, utilizing a wide variety of complex and novel data sources, and supporting cases across industries including: finance, healthcare, antitrust, intellectual property, energy, and technology. The tool and infrastructure work assists the firm in developing cutting-edge data science and high-performance computing techniques for common business challenges.

The Director of Data Science helps Analysis Group in maintaining our leadership position in terms of advancing methodology and data computations, and works to increase Data Science knowledge within the firm, both through mentorship to more junior Data Science team members and via interactions with Consulting teams. The Director also is involved in recruiting, assisting in building out the team over time.

Essential Job Functions and Responsibilities:
Work with project teams to creatively address data science/computing challenges
Take initiative to identify opportunities for technology to enhance service offerings
Act as a resource and participate in client engagements and research as part of the project team
Maintain up-to-date knowledge of data science and computing tools, providing technical training and helping to grow the in-house knowledge base
Present research at selected conferences; serving as an expert
Maintain individual contributions while providing mentorship to other data scientists and analysts conducting work such as:
Optimize procedures for managing and accessing large databases (e.g., insurance claims, electronic health records, financial transactions)
Create interactive analytics portals and data visualizations (e.g., using R/Shiny, Python/Flask, D3)
Build and maintaining high performance computing (HPC) tools on grid and cloud computing environments
Develop and reviewing open source macros and packages in R, Python and other Object Oriented Languages
Establish optimized procedures for repetitive or computationally intensive tasks (C, C++, Cuda-C)
Use natural language processing methodologies to work with EMR data, social media data and other unstructured data
Contribute to team growth/development via assistance with advisorship and recruiting
Contribute to firm’s strategy for data science tools and infrastructure
Qualifications
Track record of using data to solve real-world problems
Experience applying multiple software tools and languages to provide data-driven analytical solutions to decision makers or research teams
Strong credentials and experience in database management and data visualization
PhD or advanced degree in computer science or data science-related field, with relevant experience. Other candidates with at least three years of relevant experience in the field will also be considered
Background in Statistics/Econometrics or Biostatistics
Extensive experience in programming languages like Python, C++, Java
Knowledge of R, Shiny and SQL
Familiar with online/cloud computing/storage (e.g., AWS)
Linux and basic system administration experience
Demonstrated experience working on project teams and collaborating with others
Strong communication skills
­
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.
Please view Equal Employment Opportunity Posters provided by OFCCP here.
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor's legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.7,Analysis Group,"Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,39,Private Practice / Firm,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,MA,5230,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,1,1,0,0
90,90,Senior Big Data Engineer,$83k-$135k,"Do you want to be part of the transformation that's pushing forward a truly data-driven company? Are you ready to collaborate and innovate with a team responsible for changing the customer experience using the latest technologies? As a Senior Big Data Engineer on the GEICO IT squad, you’ll thrive in a fast-paced innovative culture that turns data into information and uses that information to drive action. One focus is our Single View of the Customer (SVOC) initiative. As part of this team you will be designing, creating, and populating customer centric data stores necessary for deriving valuable insights in real time to provide tailored customer experiences. As a senior engineer you will have the opportunity to mentor more junior associates and help grow our team.
When you first join our SVOC team, you will have opportunity to come up to speed on the innovative technologies we use to develop SVOC!

Basic Qualifications:

o At least 2 years as a Big Data Engineer/Developer on the Hadoop Ecosystem, with experience in data profiling and transformations
o At least 2 years of experience using Spark core, or Spark SQL,
o Experience with core Java (and/or Scala, Python)
o Experience with NoSQL databases such as HBase, Cassandra, or MongoDB
o Proficient in designing efficient and robust ETL/ELT workflows, schedulers, and event-based triggers
o Strong critical thinking, decision making, and problem-solving skills
o Excellent verbal/written communication skills, including communicating technical issues to non-technical audiences
o A Bachelor's degree in a computer related field or equivalent professional experience is required

Preferred Skills:

o Exposure to Spark Streaming and Machine Learning
o Exposure to Data Mining, Data Engineering, and Data Modeling
o Exposure to Graph Databases
Note: The safety of our associates, both current and future, is GEICO’s highest priority. At this time, most of our associates are working remotely due to the current COVID-19 pandemic. Candidates who are selected for this position will be trained remotely and must be able to work from home in a designated work area. Once GEICO determines it is safe for associates to return to the office, candidates may be required to work in our Chevy Chase, MD office.

About GEICO

For more than 75 years, GEICO has stood out from the rest of the insurance industry! We are one of the nation's largest and fastest-growing auto insurers thanks to our low rates, outstanding service and clever marketing. We're an industry leader employing thousands of dedicated and hard-working associates. As a wholly owned subsidiary of Berkshire Hathaway, we offer associates training and career advancement in a financially stable and rewarding workplace.

Our associates' quality of life is important to us. Full-time GEICO associates are offered a comprehensive Total Rewards Program*, including:
401(k) and profit-sharing plans
Medical, dental, vision and life insurance
Paid vacation, holidays and leave programs
Tuition reimbursement
Associate assistance program
Flexible spending accounts
Business casual dress
Fitness and dining facilities (at most locations)
Associate clubs and sports teams
Volunteer opportunities
GEICO Federal Credit Union
Benefit offerings for positions other than full-time may vary.
GEICO is an equal opportunity employer. GEICO conducts drug screens and background checks on applicants who accept employment offers.

How to Apply

Click ""Apply for Job"" to complete your application. You will need an active email address and phone number. Please upload your resume, preferably as Word .doc files or PDF. Once you begin your application you can save it and access it later. Your application should include any work and/or internship experience from at least the past five years.

#DI-AT

#GDOORIT
#LI-AT1",3.4,GEICO,"Chevy Chase, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,84,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,MD,3821,1,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
91,91,Data Scientist in Artificial Intelligence - Intermediate,$83k-$135k,"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311093

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing and Analytics

Group: Data Sciences and Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and deep learning research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to geo-spatial analytics, AI assurance, adversarial machine learning, human language technologies, computer vision, disaster response and recovery, health security, and other related fields.

The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as geospatial intelligence, natural language processing, few-shot learning, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery.

+ Publication record in scientific conferences such as NIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelor's degree with 2 years of experience, a Masters degree with 0-2 years of experience, or a PhD with 0 years of experience is required.
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Computation and Information Sciences_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",3.8,Pacific Northwest National Laboratory,"Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,55,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,WA,5339,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,1
92,92,Data Scientist,$83k-$135k,"Responsibilities:
Bring Creativity to Data products.
Apply machine learning methods to a variety of finance and accounting problems.
Responsible for building and maintaining the machine learning systems, data, platform and processes.
Build, integrate and deploy machine learning solutions into the BlackLine application in collaboration with product management, cloud, engineering and data science teams.
Perform qualitative and quantitative data analysis.
Cleanse and transform raw data used in machine models.
Perform data munging, data mining, clustering & classification methods, pattern recognition.
Comfortable with statistics, calculus and multivariate analysis.
Participate in ML POCs, validate the results and develop production implementations.
Build and optimize scalable machine learning solutions in the public cloud.
Familiar with SQL, Python, R, SparkML, TensorFlow, GCP, AWS, SQL Server.
Develop production systems in Python.
Work independently to research and solve business and technical problems.
Plan their work individually and as part of a team.
Mentor and train other Data Scientists on the team.
Qualifications:
Strong practical experience with machine learning techniques in the industry, accounting and financial industries is a plus.
Extensive experience solving analytical problems using quantitative approaches.
Experience with machine learning algorithms for building ML models, their accuracy, cleanliness, reliability.
Experience with predictive and prescriptive analyses, modeling, and segmentation.
Have strong passion for empirical data research for practical applications.
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in clear, precise, and actionable
Comfortable with complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources.
Very comfortable with data engineering methods and pipelines.
Expert knowledge of analysis tools such as R, Matlab, or SAS
Experience with data warehousing, relational databases, ETL, BI, data mining.
Experience in SQL, R, Python languages.
Strong familiarity with GCP and AWS, SQL Server.
Practical experience with GIT version control.
Comfortable working with open source tools in a Unix/Linux environment.
Experience with and ownership of data-informed decision-making.
Experience translating business requirements into functional, and non-functional requirements.
Strong sense of product and data ownership.
Works independently without the need for supervision.
Strong written and verbal skills – able to explain the work in plain language.
MS/PhD in Computer Science or other quantitative disciplines",4.0,BlackLine,"Woodland Hills, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,19,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,CA,2587,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,1,0,0
94,94,Data Scientist,$83k-$135k,"At AES, we raise the quality of life around the world by changing the way energy works. Everyone makes an impact every day in our small, global teams. Apply here to start an extraordinary career today.

We are looking for data scientists to join our growing team of data wranglers that will help us uncover insights and drive key business decisions by leveraging data analytics and artificial intelligence. The data scientist will use data to find patterns, create algorithms and generally help AES’ business leaders make smarter decisions to deliver better products and solutions. The analytics will also serve as the foundation for machine learning use cases across several business applications. The primary use cases will be in applying data mining techniques, performing statistical analysis to improve asset reliability across our green generation portfolio, make our energy grids more resilient and able to cope with tomorrows renewable demands and drive operational efficiencies for our commercial teams. Help us accelerate our greener energy future using data and application of analytics!

Responsibilities

• Selecting features, building and optimizing classifiers using machine learning techniques
• Data mining using state-of-the-art methods
• Visualizing data to provide predictive insights and drive decision making
• Extending company’s data with third party sources of information when needed
• Enhancing data collection procedures to include information that is relevant for building analytic systems
• Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis
• Performing ad-hoc analyses and presenting results and business outcomes in a clear and compelling manner
• Creating automated anomaly detection systems and constant tracking of its performance
• Be an evangelist for the use and data and data driven decision making at all levels of the organization

Skills and Qualifications
• Bachelors in Engineering, Mathematics, Physics applicable real-world experience required, Masters or Phd. preferred.
• 3+ years’ experience in data analytics or data science or applicable research
• Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Forests, etc.
• Experience in the production of energy, commercial energy markets or energy industry preferred
• Experience with common data science toolkits, such as R, Python, SAS, NumPy, MatLab, etc. Deep experience in Python or R is highly desirable

• Experience using cloud platforms (Azure ML, GCP ML, AWS SageMaker) and deploying analytics in a production environment (Microsoft Preferred)

• Demonstrates natural curiosity, an ability and willingness to challenge assumptions and gain a deeper understanding of the problem leveraging contextual inquiry

• Takes ownership, promotes perspectives and insights in a way that gives others comfort about how they were derived and what the next natural questions might be

• Excellent communication and collaboration skills to ensure analytics projects are meeting the needs of the business users
• Proficiency in using query languages such as SQL, Hive, Pig

• Experience with NoSQL databases, such as MongoDB, Cassandra, HBase

• Strong applied analytics and statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression, etc.
• Demonstrated ability to develop and deploy scripts and programming skills
• Data-oriented personality

AES is an Equal Opportunity Employer who is committed to building strength and delivering long-term sustainability through diversity and inclusion. Respecting all backgrounds, differences and perspectives enables us to improve the lives of our people, customers, suppliers, contractors, and the communities in which we live and work. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity and/or expression, race, national origin, ethnicity, age, religion, marital status, physical or mental disability, pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical condition, military or veteran status, or any other characteristic protected under applicable law. E-Verify Notice: AES will provide the Social Security Administration (SSA) and if necessary, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) with information from each new employee's I-9 to confirm work authorization.",4.5,AES Corporation,"Indianapolis, IN",-1,10000+ Employees,39,Company - Public,other_industries,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,IN,4373,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,1,0,1
95,95,Data Engineer,$83k-$135k,"WHO WE ARE

NCSOFT is a premiere digital entertainment company and global publisher with worldwide locations and more than 4,000 employees focused on bringing extraordinary games to life for millions of fans around the world. Established in 1997 and headquartered in Seoul, South Korea, we quickly became a key leader in online games. Best known for critically acclaimed franchises including Lineage, Aion, Guild Wars, and Blade & Soul, NCSOFT is also one of the world's top mobile developers with Lineage 2M occupying the #1 grossing revenue slot on Google Play. Our core goal is making people in this world happier by delivering games that entertain a globally connected audience has remained the same. Our culture is innovative, creative, collaborative and impactful, and we are passionate about creating the best gaming experiences for our players.

WHY JOIN THE BUSINESS INTELLIGENCE PLATFORM TEAM?
We are a passionate and positive team that is always working on new data engineering technology and exciting projects including new game launches.
We feel team members are most effective in working on what they are passionate about. We are all capable of working on any given project, and often shift tasks based on preference.
We own the data platform, contributing to the design, implementation, and maintenance of these data services so we aren't shy about experimenting with new tech. However, we take a measured approach in order to minimize introducing unnecessary technical debt.
We collaborate with Analytics, Game Development, Platform and Publishing teams. Our data platform supports all kinds of data in an efficient environment that helps with analysis, customer care and company wide data-driven decisions.
WHAT YOU'LL DO

As a Data Engineer, you'll be responsible for gathering and collecting data, storing it, doing batch processing or real-time processing on it, and serving it to data scientists and data analysts to easily query.
Understanding data source (10%)
Develop data processes for construction, mining, and modeling that are delivered to the data analyst/science team (30%)
Create large data warehouses by running some ETL (Extract, Transform and Load) that is used for analysis by the analyst/scientists (30%)
Install continuous pipelines of huge pools of filtered information so that data analyst/scientists can pull relevant data sets for their analyses (20%)
Develop, construct, test and maintain architectures such as databases and large-scale data processing systems (10%)
WHAT YOU'LL NEED TO BE SUCCESSFUL
BS in Computer Science or equivalent experience
3+ years of day-to-day working experience as data engineer
Experience with object-oriented and functional programming languages: Python, Scala etc.
Experience with RDBMS (MS-SQL, MYSQL etc.) and NoSQL (MongoDB, DynamoDB etc.)
Experience with Big Data query and application knowledge: Hive, Impala, Fluentd, Spark, Sqoop, Pig etc.
Experience with ETL and data integration tool : Airflow, Informatica PowerCenter
Experience with AWS cloud services: EC2, S3, EMR, Glue, RedShift, Athena etc.
Proficiency in general database administration concepts and efficient query writing
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
An eagerness to continually improve your skills, learn new technologies a willingness to take initiative beyond basic responsibilities
This is a full time, on-site position at our office in Aliso Viejo, CA. A casual, friendly work environment, a comprehensive benefits package, a competitive salary, and more are all part of what makes NCSOFT West a great place to work.",3.0,NCSOFT,"Aliso Viejo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,23,Company - Public,Video Games,Media,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,109.0,CA,3584,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
96,96,Principal Data Scientist,$99k-$158k,"The Principal Data Scientist will be a data science subject matter expert and provide team leadership in their area of responsibility. The Technical Team Lead will lead selected projects or activities, as required, and will collaborate with other disciplines and teams.

Qualifications:
• MSc/PhD degree in in a quantitative field (such as Computer Science, Mathematics, Engineering) or BSc in a related discipline and 7 years of industry experience
• 5+ years of professional experience in data science, computer vision or related fields
• 3+ years of professional experience leading data science or related discipline teams
• Subject matter expert in the areas of Machine Learning/Artificial Intelligence
• Advanced quantitative and analytical skills around applied research, mathematical modelling, and statistical modeling
• Practical software development skills in one or more programming languages, such as Python, Scala/Java, C++, etc.
• Fluency with one or more machine learning frameworks (such as TensorFlow, Pytorch, Caffe)
• Experience leading and mentoring senior, mid-level, and junior data scientists
• A passion for AI/ML, overcoming difficult challenges, and accomplishing great things
Bonus:
• Proven experience developing and evolving novel/new DNN architectures
• Strong publication background (Company will support publication work)",4.5,Infinite Resource Solutions,Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,7,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,Remote,1353,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,0
97,97,Data Scientist #5967,$99k-$158k,"Company Overview

Fanatics is the global leader in licensed sports merchandise and changing the way fans purchase their favorite team apparel and jerseys. Through an innovative, tech-infused approach to making and selling fan gear in today's on-demand culture, Fanatics operates more than 300 online and offline stores, including the e-commerce business for all major professional sports leagues (NFL, MLB, NBA, NHL, NASCAR, MLS, PGA), major media brands (NBC Sports, CBS Sports, FOX Sports) and more than 200 collegiate and professional team properties, which include several of the biggest global soccer clubs (Manchester United, Real Madrid, Chelsea, Manchester City). Fanatics offers the largest collection of timeless and timely merchandise whether shopping online, on your phone, in stores, in stadiums or on-site at the world's biggest sporting events.

About the Team

Fanatics is first and foremost a technology company. We are powered by cutting-edge tech created by our small agile teams using the latest tools and technologies under our highly analytical, forward thinking, and open-minded leadership. As the global leader in licensed sports merchandise, we challenge ourselves by improving our new fully responsive NodeJS cloud commerce platform, Elasticsearch engine, and deep data science capabilities while building the best-in-class retail manufacturing and supply chain technologies. Our tech teams work together to revolutionize data science and engineering initiatives, provide highly scalable real-time and streaming platforms, and create secure e-commerce and in-stadium fan experience products. Our own e-commerce platform transacts in over 190 countries, 17 languages, and 14 currencies. Our motto is “#GSD”—get stuff done—and we do just that. If you want to be at the nexus of sports, commerce, and technology, come be a part of our industry-leading team here at Fanatics Tech.

About the Position

At Fanatics, we are passionate about leveraging data to drive growth and operational efficiencies. We firmly believe in putting data at the forefront of delivering an engaging experience for our sports fans!
Fanatics Inc. is looking for highly motivated individuals to join our Data Science and Engineering team. You will collaborate closely with engineering, PMs, cross functional business units to address challenging problems using techniques from applied statistics, machine learning and/or data mining fields.
What you'll be doing:
Build, deploy, and maintain predictive models in one or more of the following areas: 1) price and promotion optimization; 2) inventory optimization; 3) e-marketing optimization.
Dive into complex data sets to analyze trends and identify opportunities for improvement.
Support business stakeholders by providing ad-hoc analysis to help drive decision-making.
Collaborate cross-functionally with diverse teams (e.g. marketing operations, technology, merchandising, procurement, apparel design/production) to understand business objectives and design and implement data-driven solutions.
Effectively communicate analytical solutions to non-technical stakeholders and senior leadership
What we're looking for:
Minimum 3 years experience in the industry ( excluding internships/ co op/ academic projects).
Experience developing machine learning and statistical models for real-world problems.
Strong algorithmic thinking and passion for empirical research to answer hard questions.
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis, analytic approaches and findings in a clear, precise, and actionable manner.
Designing and evaluating A|B experiments and monitoring key product metrics, understanding root causes of changes in metrics.
Working knowledge of big data processing technologies such as Hadoop, Hive, Pig and Spark.
Ability to use SQL to perform data analysis.
Have a BS/MS/PhD in Statistics, Applied Math, Operational Research, Computer Science or related field.
Tryouts are open at Fanatics! Our team is passionate, talented, unified, and charged with creating the fan experience of tomorrow. The ball is in your court now.



NOTICE TO CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS/APPLICANTS: In connection with your application, we collect information that identifies, reasonably relates to or describes you (“Personal Information”). The categories of Personal Information that we collect include your name, government issued identification number(s), email address, mailing address, other contact information, emergency contact information, employment history, educational history, criminal record, and demographic information. We collect and use those categories of Personal Information about you for human resources and other business management purposes, including identifying and evaluating you as a candidate for potential or future employment or future contract positions, recordkeeping in relation to recruiting and hiring, conducting criminal background checks as permitted by law, conducting analytics, and ensuring compliance with applicable legal requirements and Company policies.",3.5,Fanatics,"San Mateo, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,24,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,CA,5043,0,data scientist,0,0,1,1,0,1,1,0,0
98,98,Data Scientist,$99k-$158k,"Date: Sep 8, 2020

Ericsson Inc. does not sponsor US work authorization for this job position including H-1B, O-1, L-1 and TN. Ericsson also does not hire F-1’s working on EAD for this position.

As the tech firm that created the mobile world, and with more than 54,000 patents to our name, we’ve made it our business to make a mark. When joining our team at Ericsson you are empowered to learn, lead and perform at your best, shaping the future of technology. This is a place where you're welcomed as your own perfectly unique self, and celebrated for the skills, talent, and perspective you bring to the team. Are you in?

Come, and be where it begins.

Our Exciting Opportunity!


— You get to work with an outstanding local and international team, while interacting closely with our customers

— You have the ability to influence and drive exciting, complicated projects

— You can remove barriers and address sophisticated situations with regards to technical challenges in applications development

You will


—Define how we instrument, prioritize, and store data that powers AI/ML solutions

—Design and implement scalable and durable data models for our data

—Evolve and optimize our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as, optimizing data flow and collection for multi-functional teams. You will also be responsible for integrating them with the architecture used across the company

— Support our Data Science teams, partners on data initiatives and ensure efficient data and model architecture is crafted and implemented optimally

—Develop the end-to-end automation of data pipelines, making datasets readily-consumable by the data science teams or downstream AI/ML applications

— Empower junior team members and lead by example

To be successful in the role you must have


— Have Advanced degree in Computer Science, Math, Statistics or a related discipline

— Have 2-3 years hands on experiences on building data pipeline, data models, data solutions from scratch, industry experience preferred

— Have expertise in Data Engineering and relevant technologies (e.g. Spark, Python, Kubernetes)

— Comfortable with complex SQL

— Balance the practical considerations on resources, efficiency, footprint requirement when designing a solution or architecture

— Have experience in batch and streaming data architectures like Kafka, Kinesis, Flink, Storm, Beam

— Have expertise in various types of data base structures (object storage, document or key-value stores, graph databases, column-family databases)

— Have excellent coding skills (python, Java, C++ or Scala)

— Ability to work in different time zones supporting cross geographical teams

— Understand the Data Lifecycle and concepts such as lineage, governance, privacy, retention, anonymity, etc

— Expertise in production support and troubleshooting

— Be self-directed and comfortable supporting the data engineering needs of multiple teams, systems and products.

— Excel at taking vague requirements and crystallizing them into scalable data solutions

What´s in it for you?


Here at Ericsson, our culture is built on over a century of courageous decisions. With us, you will no longer be dreaming of what the future holds – you will be redefining it. You won’t develop for the status quo, but will build what replaces it. Joining us is a way to move your career in any direction you want; with hundreds of career opportunities in locations all over the world, in a place where co-creation and collaboration are embedded into the walls. You will find yourself in a speak-up environment where empathy and humanness serve as cornerstones for how we work, and where work-life balance is a priority. Welcome to an inclusive, global company where your opportunity to make an impact is endless.

**LI-SP1


Do you believe that an organization fostering an environment of cooperation and collaboration to execute with speed creates better business value? Do you value a culture of humanness, where fact based decisions are important and our people are encouraged to speak up? Do you believe that diverse, inclusive teams drive performance and innovation? At Ericsson, we do.

DISCLAIMER: The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by employees assigned to this classification. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of employees assigned to this position. Therefore employees assigned may be required to perform additional job tasks required by the manager.

We are proud to be an EEO/AA employer M/F/Disabled/Veterans. We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse testing.

Ericsson provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, pregnancy, parental status, national origin, ethnic background, age, disability, political opinion, social status, protected veteran status, union membership or genetics information. Ericsson complies with applicable country, state and all local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location across the world in which the company has facilities. In addition, Ericsson supports the UN Guiding Principles for Business and Human Rights and the United Nations Global Compact.

This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, training and development.

Ericsson expressly prohibits any form of workplace harassment based on race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, pregnancy, parental status, national origin, ethnic background, age, disability, political opinion, social status, protected veteran status, union membership or genetic information.

Ericsson will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by Ericsson or (c) consistent with Ericssons legal duty to furnish information.

Employee Polygraph Protection Act Notice - Employers are generally prohibited from requiring or requesting any employee or job applicant to take a lie detector test, and from discharging, disciplining, or discriminating against an employee or prospective employee for refusing to take a test or for exercising other rights under the Act. For more information, visit https://www.dol.gov/whd/regs/compliance/posters/eppac.pdf.

Ericsson is an equal opportunity employer and is committed to providing reasonable accommodation for qualified disabled individuals during the application and hiring process. Ericsson will make modifications or adjustments to the job application or interview process that will enable a qualified applicant to be considered for a position. If you require an accommodation due to a disability, please contact Ericsson at hr.direct.dallas@ericsson.com or (866) 374-2272 (US) or (877) 338-9966 (Canada) for further assistance.

Primary country and city: United States (US) || || Santa Clara || ProdMgt",3.5,Ericsson-Worldwide,"Santa Clara, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,144,Company - Public,other_industries,Telecommunications,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,CA,7736,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
99,99,Data Engineer I/II,$99k-$158k,"The Data Engineer I/II is responsible for maintaining a stable data integration, delivery and storage solution for the organization.

Responsibilities:
Implementing overall system design, coding, testing and maintenance for the data warehouse and business intelligence platforms
Developing, constructing, testing and maintaining architectures
Aligning architecture with business requirements
Data acquisition
Developing data set processes
Using programming language and tools
Identifying ways to improve data reliability, efficiency and quality
Deploying sophisticated analytics programs, machine learning and statistical methods
Preparing data for predictive and prescriptive modeling
Using data to discover tasks that can be automated
Delivering updates to stakeholders based on analytics
Requirements:
Entry level
Bachelor of Science degree or equivalent years of relative experience
Knowledge of
SQL and relational databases, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases
Object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python, Java, C++, Scala, R , etc.
'Big Data' data pipelines, architectures and data sets
Root cause analysis on internal/external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement
Analytical skills related to working with unstructured data sets
Processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management
Message queuing, stream processing, and highly scalable 'big data' data stores
Cloud integration services
Ability to meet task timelines
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Ability to learn oil & gas operations
Preferred Experience:
2+ years of experience in SQL, Python, R, JSON or other programming languages
1+ years of experience in data integration tools (Informatica Cloud, Azure Data Factory)
Skills in Databricks, IOT, Logic apps, Spark, and/or Power BI
Knowledge of the following applications/formats for the purposes of database/file storage: Salesforce, SQL Server, Oracle, Azure Data Lake and/or Parquet
We are currently evaluating the potential for flexible and/or remote work arrangements for this opportunity, if relocation is not feasible.

Selected incumbent will be placed into the position that best suits their abilities and experience level.

EQT Corporation and its subsidiaries is an Equal Opportunity Employer – Disabilities/Veterans

#LIEQT",3.7,EQT Corporation,"Pittsburgh, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,132,Company - Public,other_industries,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,PA,2440,1,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
101,101,Data Scientist,$99k-$158k,"C3.ai is a leading enterprise AI software provider for accelerating digital transformation. The comprehensive and proven C3 AI Suite uses a model-driven abstraction layer to enable organizations to develop, deploy, and operate enterprise scale AI applications 40x to 100x faster than alternative approaches. www.c3.ai

As a Data Scientist, you will participate in the definition of new analytics capabilities able to provide our customers with the information they need to make proper decisions to support our customers in operating the internet of things (IoT). In addition, you will help find the appropriate machine learning / data mining algorithms to answer these questions. Finally, you will be responsible for implementing this into the product and making it available to our customers.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve similar results at large-scale.

Your Responsibilities:
Driving adoption of Deep Learning systems into next-generation of C3.ai products.
Designing and deploying Machine Learning algorithms for industrial applications such as fraud detection and predictive maintenance.
Collaborating with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields.
Applied Machine Learning experience (regression and classification, supervised, and unsupervised learning).
Strong mathematical background (linear algebra, calculus, probability and statistics).
Experience with scalable ML (MapReduce, streaming).
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team.
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference.
Excellent verbal and written communication.
Preferred
Experience with JavaScript and prototyping languages such as Python and R. Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
Knowledge in electrical engineering and cyber-physical systems is a plus.
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.) is a plus.
C3.ai provides a competitive compensation package and excellent benefits including:
Competitive salary, generous stock options, 401K, medical, dental, and vision benefits. At the office, we offer a fully stocked kitchen with catered breakfast and lunch, table tennis and pool table, free membership at our on-site gym, Friday evening social hours with food, drink and music and a fun team of great people.
C3.ai is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status.",4.5,C3.ai,"Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,11,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,CA,2849,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
102,102,Data Engineer,$99k-$158k,"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 200 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.
If you have proven experience in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you:
Git / SVN / TFS / VSTS
Jenkins / Travis / Bamboo / Go
Vagrant / Packer / Terraform
GitHub / Bamboo / GitLabs
Chef / Puppet / Ansible / SaltStack
Docker / Docker Swarm
Kubernetes / OpenShift
Power-Shell / Bash
AWS / Azure / GCP / OpenStack
Cloud Formation / Code Deploy
Spring Boot / Tomcat / WebLogic / JBoss
ELK Stack / Splunk
AMQP / RabbitMQ / Active MQ
New Relic / Dynatrace / AppDynamics / Sensu
JIRA / Rally / VersionOne
VMware / VirtualBox
F5 / Citrix / NGINX /Amazon ELB
Pipeline Design & Management
Application Lifecycle Management
Leading Cultural Change
Bonus experience:
Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes
What's in it for you?
Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success. sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology & social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,Solution Design Group,"Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,31,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,MN,1937,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
103,103,Data Engineer,$99k-$158k,"About Us


Interested in working for a human-centered technology company that prides itself on using modern tools and technologies? Want to be surrounded by intensely curious and innovative thinkers?

Seeking to solve complex technical challenges by building products that work for people, meet and exceed the needs of businesses, and work elegantly and efficiently?

Modeling ourselves after the 1904 World's Fair, which brought innovation to the region, 1904labs is seeking top technical talent in St. Louis to bring innovation and creativity to our clients.

Our clients consist of Fortune 500 and Global 2000 companies headquartered here in St. Louis. We partner with them on complex projects that range from reimagining and refactoring their existing applications, to helping to envision and build new applications or data streams to operationalize their existing data. Working in a team-based labs model, using our own flavor of #HCDAgile, we strive to work at the cutting edge of technology's capabilities while solving problems for our clients and their users.

The Role


As a Data Engineer you would be responsible for developing and deploying cutting edge distributed data solutions. Our engineers have a passion for open source technologies, strive to build cloud first applications, and are motivated by our desire to transform businesses into data driven enterprises. This team will focus on working with platforms such as Hadoop, Spark, Hive, Kafka, Elasticsearch, SQL and NoSQL/Graph databases as well as cloud-based data services.

Our teams at 1904labs are Agile, and we work in a highly collaborative environment. You would be a productive member of a fast paced group and have an opportunity to solve some very complex data problems.

Requirements


3+ years of progressive experience as a Data Engineer, BI Developer, Application Developer or related occupation.
Agile: Experience working in an agile team oriented environment
Attitude / Aptitude: A passion for everything data with a desire to be at the cutting edge of technology and consistently deliver working software while always keeping an eye on opportunities for innovation.
Technical Skills (You have experience with 2 or more of these bulletpoints):
Programming in Java (Or similar JVM language such as Scala, Groovy, etc) and/or Python
Architecting and integrating big data pipelines
Working with large data volumes; this includes processing, transforming and transporting large scale data using technologies such as: MR/TEZ, Hive SQL, Spark, etc.
Have a strong background in SQL / Data Warehousing (dimensional modeling)
Have a strong background working with and/or implementing architecture for RDBMS such as: Oracle, MySQL, Postgres and/or SQLServer.
Experience with traditional ETL tools such as SSIS, Informatica, Pentaho, Talend, etc.
Experience with NoSQL/Graph Data Modeling and are actively using Cassandra, HBase, DynamoDB, Neo4J, Titan, or DataStax Graph
Installing/configuring a distributed computing/storage platform, such as Apache Hadoop, Amazon EMR, Apache Spark, Apache Hive, and/or Presto
Working with one or more streaming platforms, such as Apache Kafka, Spark Streaming, Storm, or AWS Kinesis
Working knowledge of the Linux command line and shell scripting
Desired Skills
Analytics: Have working knowledge of analytics/reporting tools such as Tableau, Spotfire, Qlikview, etc.
Open Source: Are working with open source tools now and have a background in contributing to open source projects.
Perks
Standard Benefits Program (medical, dental, life insurance, 401(k), professional development and education assistance, PTO).
Innovation Hours - Ten percent (10%) of our work week is set aside to work on our own product ideas in a highly collaborative and supportive environment. The best part: The IP remains your own. We are a high-growth culture and we know that when we help people focus on personal and professional growth, collectively, we can achieve great things.
Dress Code - we don't have one
This job is located in St. Louis, MO. While we would prefer local candidates your current location is not the most important factor; please help us understand why you would like to call St. Louis home if you would be relocating.

]]>",4.7,1904labs,"Saint Louis, MO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,4,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,MO,4238,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
107,107,Data Engineer,$99k-$158k,"Overview

ID.me is a digital identity network and our mission is to make the world a more trusted place by facilitating transparent and efficient interactions between people and organizations.

We are looking for a Data Engineer to join our Product team to design and build a robust set of tools and pipelines to support data analytics efforts. You’ll manage and optimize our core infrastructure by creating and maintaining data pipelines. You will work with other engineers and analysts from the Product and Business teams to design, implement, and maintain a data ecosystem that delivers actionable insights to make key business decisions. You have technical chops but can also work independently to prioritize issues, work within ambiguity, and manage conflicting deadlines. You are creative, data-driven, results-oriented, and eager to help us solve data problems of varying complexities.

Responsibilities
Develop technical solutions using proven techniques in data and analytics processes
Develop, prototype, and build frameworks based on open source and commercially available tools
Orchestrate and maintain data pipelines that meet security standards and ensure the integrity and quality of data
Demonstrate a passion for serving the needs of internal and external customers by enabling them with self-service reporting tools and analytics capabilities
Drive the execution of data initiatives that provide key performance metrics
Understand the data related challenges, nuances, and requirements to identify and recommend the optimal technical approach
Train and educate team members as well as stakeholders about best practices in data engineering and governance
Collaborate closely with the engineering and devops team to implement DataOps, thus reducing our analytics development cycle
Research and improve our data platform to ingest, process, transform, and distribute insightful data to our audience ranging from executives, analysts, and engineers to customers, vendors, and partners
Evangelize data driven culture by breaking down silos and encouraging data sharing
Qualifications
3+ years of hands-on experience in data engineering for a SaaS company or a mature startup
Proven experience working with various tools but more importantly, familiarity with how to best assemble and deploy production ready data stack to any cloud environment
BS in a quantitative or scientific field such as computer science, computer engineering or equivalent experience
Experience in applying agile software development approach - Git, CI/CD, Jira, etc - to data engineering
Familiar with SQL and other popular programming languages (such as Ruby, Python, .NET, etc)
Exceptional fluency with SQL; you conquered the join venn diagram long ago and have moved on to explaining cost based optimization to your peers on the engineering team
Some level of experience working in the cloud - AWS, Azure, or GCP
Experience with ingesting, processing, and visualizing data sources of varying types - structured/relational and unstructured
Experience in developing, managing, and manipulating large, complex datasets
Data-driven, detail-oriented individual with excellent storytelling and problem-solving abilities
Ability to work independently and autonomously, as well as part of a team
Superb time management, prioritization of tasks and ability to meet deadlines with little supervision
Vision: To be the world's leading digital identity network empowering people to control their own information and to prove their credentials across all channels: online, call center, and in-person.

Mission: To make the world a more trusted place by delivering the highest level of security with the least amount of friction at the lowest possible cost.

People: We have an audacious mission. We aim to fix the identity layer of the internet. Billions of people will live better lives with more trust and convenience thanks to ID.me. We are like Special Forces. We take on the most difficult challenges with amazing teammates.

ID.me Core Values: *Don't be a jerk. *Always compete. *Ask questions like a 5-year old. *Inspire people with your passion. *Make something better every day. *Treat each customer like your favorite family member. *Own your mistakes so you can learn from them. *Details are everything. *Act like a scientist, not a talking head. *Be truthful (even when it's hard). *Reflect ID.me's values in your actions. *If the rule prevents the right outcome, then break the rule.

ID.me Career Site & Culture Deck: https://www.id.me/careers",3.4,Id.me,"McLean, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,9,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,VA,4534,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
108,108,Data Scientist,$99k-$158k,"E.W. Scripps is a company rich in media history focused on the future. We are one of the nation's largest independent TV station owners with 60 stations nationwide, and we are working to stay ahead of the ways in which people use technology to find news and information. Our commitment to the future means that discovery is commonplace, the status quo is challenged, iteration and collaboration are the norm and new ideas are welcome. Join a team of top performers and help shape the future of the most strategic and well positioned media company – E. W. Scripps. This position will be located in Cincinnati, OH or Washington, DC.

At Scripps, you’ll:
Have a complete modern data science/analytics software stack at your disposal.
Enjoy a broad scope of responsibility – with projects and questions from every part of the business and new businesses under consideration.
Know that your work will have an impact on key strategic decisions – changing and shaping the way we do business. This is why we are so selective in our hiring process.
Grow your talent with constant learning – with substantial investments in on-site and hands-on training and eLearning formats used to fill in the gaps.
Work on projects that are important and interesting to you – with focus on modern media and marketing strategies
Expand your horizons by attending and giving talks at conferences and professional networking opportunities with senior analytics professionals.
Become a leading expert in applied data science for media.
We are looking for someone who knows how to use the latest data analytics tools, will thrive in our fast-paced innovative environment, will deliver results and has the following experience and credentials.

Primary purpose:

The Data Scientist blends the skills of a business thinker with those of a data analyst: asking questions, turning data into knowledge, forming conclusions, and making recommendations that enable the company to innovate, differentiate itself from its competitors, work smarter, make better decisions, and enhance profitability. This individual will partner with the analytics team, analytics products and services director, business leaders and end users to be a change agent - teasing out the questions that are important to our business, and then use statistical analysis and data mining techniques to inform the answers and communicate conclusions both visually and in writing, along with recommendations and next steps. The Data Scientist will also participate in the creation and measurement of new business processes, tools, and products.

Key responsibilities:
Influence the course of the business as a trusted advisor to business leaders, users and clients, using data and analytics as a basis for better, more informed decision making
Creation of analytics and measurement roadmaps
Identify impactful choices or courses of action that drive value for the organization
Evaluate the big picture and solve business problems in addition to focusing on metrics
Influence the direction of the business by effectively communicating conclusions to cross-functional groups
Create automation applications to replace tasks for critical revenue generating teams decreasing time dedicated to non-revenue generating
Mine large amounts of data and perform data analysis to extract useful business insights for a wide range of topics including product development and performance, market dynamics, consumer and audience knowledge, internal operations, and external research
Initial study design, acquisition of data, prototyping and production roll out
Ongoing tracking, monitoring, and periodic follow-up studies
Support the design and implement of reporting dashboards that track key business metrics and provide actionable insights
Use software and other tools to develop analyses that identify patterns, influences, correlations, relationships, predictive factors, risk factors, and that provide better situational awareness
Creation of models, simulations, and optimization routines
Develop of data flows and acquisition strategies to facilitate the capture and sharing of data and analytics within the organization
Support the development of Scripps analytics products and services by providing input into product roadmaps
Be a positive force to cultivate a culture that is passionate about developing analytics as a business competency
Drive accountability for value recognition and business results
Create and contribute to a quality work environment that motivates team members to perform at their highest levels and positively affects employee and business partner relationships
Be a publicly visible presence, including creating communications and leading training sessions, advocating for the benefits of analytics in Scripps and the products/services of the analytics team
Education / work experience:
Bachelor's required, Masters preferred. Applied statistics, Computer Science, business analytics or a related field.
Minimum 3 years, 5+ years preferred, experience in solving analytical problems using quantitative approaches apply to this requirement.
Experience and demonstrated success presenting complex analyses and final recommendations to business leaders and external clients.
Statistical method experience:
Analysis techniques such as marketing mix modeling, scenario modeling, pattern detection, A/B testing, nearest neighbor, cluster analysis, sentiment analysis, decision trees, optimization, simulation, regression analysis, agent-based modeling, ensemble models, collaborative filtering and other types of analysis
Software Proficiency:
Python, RapidMiner, R
Database skills (Snowflake, MySQL) experience preferred
Tableau
About Scripps:

The E.W. Scripps Company (NASDAQ: SSP) advances understanding of the world through journalism. As the nation’s fourth-largest independent TV station owner, Scripps operates 60 television stations in 42 markets. Scripps empowers the next generation of news consumers with its multiplatform news network Newsy and reaches growing audiences through broadcast networks including Bounce and Court TV. Scripps runs an award-winning investigative reporting newsroom in Washington, D.C., and is the longtime steward of the Scripps National Spelling Bee. Founded in 1878, Scripps has held for decades to the motto, “Give light and the people will find their own way.”

As an equal employment opportunity employer, The E.W. Scripps Company and its affiliates do not discriminate in its employment decisions on the basis on race, sex, sexual orientation, gender, color, religion, age, genetic information, medical condition, disability, marital status, citizenship or national origin, and military membership or veteran status, or on any other basis which would be in violation of any applicable federal, state or local law. Furthermore, the company will make reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with known disabilities unless doing so would result in an undue hardship for the company.

If interested, please apply at www.scripps.com/careers.

#LI-CH1

#GD-CH1",3.5,The E.W. Scripps Company,"Cincinnati, OH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,142,Company - Public,other_industries,Media,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,OH,7061,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
109,109,Lead Data Scientist,$99k-$158k,"Summary
Tranzact is hiring a lead data scientist to assist our team in driving our data science and analytics group forward. You’ll be joining a group of curious, smart, technically minded yet business savvy data scientists looking to make a difference to the company by further designing and building out our data decisioning capabilities. We have been up and running for several years and our team must grow to meet the demands of our business partners—they see the value we have provided and want more.

The Lead Data Scientist is passionate about using data and insights to drive business strategy and develop data products. A successful candidate will manage data science projects including scoping, designing, and executing the vision with the help of more junior data scientists / analysts. They would also identify and prioritize initiatives to deliver value to our internal stakeholders. The ideal candidate would have experience managing data science projects, managing stakeholders, and working cross functionally. This person would have real world experience “in the data trenches” as a data scientist and be an all-star individual contributor. We expect this person to have a passion for driving projects for business outcomes, strong analytical skills, and a strong desire to make an impact in our growing data science practice!

What you’ll do:
Become the domain expert in multiple areas of the Tranzact business (i.e. retention, call center effectiveness, etc.) and contribute to the advancement of those area through thought leadership.
Lead new projects and initiatives through understanding business needs, executing, presenting and influencing stakeholders.
Be a technical leader on the team that can advise, mentor, and delegate tasks to more junior data scientists and analysts.
Facilitate data-driven decision making and prioritize initiatives.
Develop strong cross functional partnerships with business and technology stakeholders.
Act as a subject matter expert within the organization on all things data.
Find new and improved ways for us to use data in our products, operations, and business strategies.

What we do:
We achieve competitive advantage through data-driven marketing and full management of the customer experience. We’re constantly refining our technology and our strategies, that’s why we’re the industry leader in delivering the best results to the top insurance brands in America.

That’s not just lip service either, we’re consistently awarded partner of the year from brands like AFLAC, Humana, and more. Our work has also been featured on The Dr. Oz Show, Forbes, and Vox -- to name a few.

We want people who fit within our Be Real culture. We want a diversity of programmers and writers and designers and data scientists and strategists and more. We’re made up of introverts and extroverts, suits and rebels, corporate types and anti-corporate types. We’re an environment where every person feels their full potential is only limited by their ability to conceive of it and make it happen. Our company grew from entrepreneurial roots but has big company resources to get amazing things done.

What we’re looking for:
BA/BS in a quantitative field (Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, etc.)
5 years of experience in data science at a B2C or direct to consumer company (experience in marketing, business operations, or customer retention is a plus)
Experience implementing predictive and prescriptive models in production systems
Experience managing data science projects and mentoring data scientists / analysts
Proficiency with Python, SQL, Excel, and a data visualization tool (Tableau, Power BI, etc.)
Ability to manage multiple projects and deadlines
Experience communicating strategy and results to different audiences
Ability to work cross functionally and influence others
A lifelong learner that is excited to learn new data science technologies and apply those to technologies to our business
Ability to be objective, follow the facts, cut through noise and create a story with data
Thrives in a fast-paced environment that is constantly changing
What’s in it for you:
Medical, dental, vision, paid time off/holidays, 401(k), and bonus opportunity
Frequent office events and outings
Employee development programs, conference and training reimbursement
Work remote flexibility
Joining a growing and exciting team making a big impact on the business!
EOE, including disability/vets",3.5,TRANZACT,"Fort Lee, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,31,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,NJ,4454,1,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
110,110,Data Scientist,$99k-$158k,"Job Description:

Metron is seeking talented Data Scientists for a Data Science Support effort. You will be working directly with a government team to design, implement and analyze the results of data science solutions to the client’s machine learning and data mining problems. The ideal candidate will be a self-starter that enjoys working in teams and grappling with data problems from identifying data requirements to implementing analytics and machine learning solutions.

Required Qualifications:
BS or MS degree in Data Science, Data Analytics, Mathematics or related field
At least two years of industry experience is preferred
Experience in theoretical and practical background in statistical analysis, machine learning, predictive modeling, and/or optimization.
Generate hypotheses, design experiments, gather, review and transform data, and test the hypotheses using modern and statistically rigorous methodologies.
Experience developing in languages commonly used for data analysis such as Python, R, Julia, or SAS
Experience working with databases such as SQL or MongoDB.
Experience working with large-scale data sets.
Experience producing data visualizations.
Excellent verbal and written communications skills
US Citizenship required, successful candidates will be subject to a security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.

Position Location: Reston, VA

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or protected veteran status. Metron takes affirmative action in support of its policy to employ and advance in employment individuals who are minorities, women, protected veterans, and individuals with disabilities.

VEVRAA Federal Contractor",3.0,"Metron, Inc.","Reston, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,VA,1886,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
112,112,Senior Data Scientist,$99k-$158k,"Company Overview

Imagine if we could match patients with the treatments that prove the most effective for them . . .
GNS Healthcare applies a powerful form of AI called causal machine learning to predict which treatments and care management programs will work for which patients, improving individual patient outcomes and the health of populations while reducing the total cost of care.

Headquartered in the biotechnology and health IT center of Cambridge, MA, our patented REFS technology is based on recent breakthroughs in causal machine learning and AI that transforms massive quantities of patient data into computer models of disease at molecular, patient, and health system levels. These computer models power up solutions, products, and services that health plans, biopharmaceutical companies, health systems, and patient foundations utilize to slow disease progression, reduce adverse events and hospitalization, and improve therapeutic effectiveness. Our platforms and solutions have been validated across more than 45 diseases including oncology, cardiovascular and metabolic disease, autoimmune diseases, neurology, etc. and have appeared in over 50 peer-reviewed publications.

Position Summary

The Senior Data Scientist will join a dynamic team responsible for start-to-finish work on the analysis and interpretation of real-world datasets using GNS's powerful cloud-based analytics platform. We are looking for someone who thrives working in a fast-paced, exciting, and collaborative environment in one of the most cutting-edge industries where big data analytics meets healthcare. You will help manage real world data, as well as create and interpret data-frames for modeling and analysis. You will collaborate with our research scientists to carry out analysis projects using our proprietary, supercomputer-powered Bayesian network modeling and simulation platform, and will synthesize these results into meaningful reports for clients and product development.

Responsibilities
Collaborate with internal research teams and clients to evaluate study design, define research questions, design data frames, write statistical analysis plans/study protocols, conduct analyses, and participate in the full research process, including client presentation and publication
Communicate highly technical results and methods clearly to clients, discuss how to incorporate information into their processes, and achieve high client satisfaction
Troubleshoot with clients and internal stakeholders to refine and optimize models
Provide scientific communications to peer-reviewed journals and publications
Develop data frames of high complexity while adhering to a project-based timeline
Perform data manipulations and develop algorithms on multi-data sets that create the analytic files necessary to support analyses.
Consult on how to use data to perform predictive and causal modeling using both proprietary and off-the-shelf tools.
Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications:
Master's Degree in a quantitative discipline or equivalent practical experience
3-5 years of experience working with advanced ML techniques, probability theory, Bayesian analysis, or causal inference methods
Experience working with biomedical data/ population health data, EHR or claims data
Demonstrated experience working with programming languages R and SQL
Strong written and verbal communication; an ability to communicate technical material to non-technical audiences simply and clearly and collaborate well on a team
Strong drive for problem solving, especially around data frame construction and interpretation
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience working with large, complex, or unstructured data requiring post-processing to use effectively
Familiarity with the UNIX and cluster computing environment
Company Culture

Our philosophy at GNS is simple: we cannot transform healthcare with anything less than an all-star team. We are seeking smart, driven people who are experts in their field, have a track record of success and a passion for creating change. We believe that strong teams supercharge the performance of individuals, create a fun and dynamic workplace and great results for our clients and the people they serve.

We are passionate about our work and believe in the ability of our technology to change the world. Our core values of integrity, collaboration, value, diversity, and game-changing guide our behaviors with each other and our clients.

GNS offers competitive salaries, stock options, unlimited vacation, health, dental and vision insurance, life insurance, long-term disability, 401(k), generous parental leave, tuition reimbursement, professional development, subsidized parking and gym membership, tasty food, volunteering opportunities, social gatherings, and more.

Equal Employment Opportunity

GNS Healthcare provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, veteran status, disability, pregnancy or conditions related to pregnancy, or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, GNS Healthcare complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities.",3.0,GNS Healthcare,"Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,20,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,MA,5326,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
114,114,Data Scientist,$99k-$158k,"As a part of the Data Science team, you will run the development of next-generation platforms for customers micro-segmentation, clusterization, behavior analysis, and prediction as well as building up new improved recommendation systems for the customers.

You will use your expertise to design data science models and frameworks, data processing pipelines, and lead efforts of the ML models productization.

You will use project management skills to manage the deliverables and ensure all stakeholder work is complete on time. You will also manage stakeholder communications and present your project across a wide spectrum of management levels.

The position requires excellent communication skills and experience working directly with technical teams as well as with business stakeholders. Being able to present findings in a meaningful and clear way is a must.

Responsibilities:
Work with a team of skilled data scientists
Plan the R&D process to fit sprint goals as well as the project milestones.
Drive the collection, cleaning, processing, and analysis of new and existing data sources.
Lead ML models development using Python/Tensorflow/Keras/Spark stack.
Communicate with business stakeholders to clarify their requirements and present the teamwork results.
Requirements:
Bachelors or Masters Degree in Computer Science or relevant field and with 3+ years’ experience in related data science and software engineering roles.
Experience with look-alike modeling and sequential-input models, RNNs (LSTM, GRU, etc.)
Strong working experience in Python, SQL and NoSQL DBs.
Practical skills in usage of big data technologies and tools including Hadoop, MapReduce, Hive, Spark.
Fluency in such technologies like Scikit-learn, Pandas,Tensorflow, keras, gensim, stanfordNLP, PySpark.
Great communication and presentation skills. Proven ability to present progress made by the team to senior business management and the project stakeholders.
Familiarity with Container Development (using dockers)
Familiarity with cloud ML Platforms (Google AI Platform, Amazon Sagemaker, MS Azure AI Platform) is a plus.
We offer:
Opportunity to work on bleeding-edge projects
Work with a highly motivated and dedicated team
Very competitive salary
Flexible schedule
Medical insurance
Benefits program
Corporate social events
Professional development opportunities
NB:

Placement and Staffing Agencies need not apply. We do not work with C2C at this time. At this moment, we are not able to process H1B transfers. Applicants with CPT and OPT visas are welcome to apply.

About Us:

Grid Dynamics is the engineering services company known for transformative, mission-critical cloud solutions for retail, finance and technology sectors.

We architected some of the busiest e-commerce services on the Internet and have never had an outage during the peak season.

Founded in 2006 and headquartered in San Ramon, California with offices throughout the US and Eastern Europe, we focus on big data analytics, omnichannel services, DevOps, and cloud enablement.",3.9,Grid Dynamics,"Plano, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,14,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,TX,3037,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,1
115,115,Data Scientist/Machine Learning Expert,$99k-$158k,"26-Aug-2020

Job ID
301660BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""ONE Global Discovery Chemistry Community working across 7 disease areas at the Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research (NIBR) is seeking a hardworking and motivated Data Scientist to join our Computer-Aided Drug Discovery (CADD) Department in Cambridge, MA. The successful candidate will join an energizing and collaborative research organization, working alongside colleagues who are dedicated to improving human health through the discovery of transformative medicines.

We are seeking an outstanding data scientist with the skills, experience and passion to extract new knowledge and ground-breaking insights from the expanded body of data collected by one of the world’s leading pharmaceutical companies. You will be a member of our global CADD group, an interdisciplinary team of expert molecular modelers, cheminformaticians, and data scientists. Teamed up with domain specialists from biology, chemistry and translational medicine, this is a unique opportunity to develop and apply cutting-edge machine learning technologies to uncover insights to real-world drug discovery problems and innovate paths to transformative medicines.

What you'll do:
Develop and implement approaches for extracting patterns and correlations from both internal and external data sources using machine learning toolkits
Develop workflows for conducting comparative analysis among Novartis’ diverse data sources as well as generalizing approaches crafted in-house or externally.
Enable open-source solutions for internal use and implement cutting-edge published scientific methods.
Develop customized machine learning solutions including data querying and knowledge extraction.
Interact and be part of matrixed project teams to drive effective decision-making by mining and developing predictive models
Develop skills in the area of cheminformatics and drug discovery and improve those to accelerate development of novel machine learning algorithms
Know the latest breakthroughs in scientific literature and interact with scientists to integrate data science technologies
Posting Title
Data Scientist/Machine Learning Expert",4.0,Novartis,"Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,24,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,MA,2191,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
116,116,Junior Data Scientist,$99k-$158k,"What Great Looks Like In This Role

Our ideal teammate is someone who is a continuous learner who can adapt and thrive in complex, uncertain and changing situations. Someone who enjoys tackling complex tasks in a collaborative environment is well-suited to a position on our team. Self-motivated individuals comfortable working in a challenging, fast paced, technical environment are highly encouraged to apply!

You Are Able To Demonstrate This Through

A track record of thinking outside the box, taking initiative, and promoting innovation and change-making Ownership, commitment and follow-through in achieving results in school or work projects
Managing priorities effectively and adapting quickly to achieve goals
Pursuing opportunities for continuous learning to develop new skills and perspectives

About the Data Science Development Program

The Data Science Development Program (DSDP) trains junior team members to become well-rounded data scientists within three years. The development program includes high impact project work, mentorship from senior data scientists, in-house training and workshops, and sponsorship for graduate level coursework at the University of Massachusetts Amherst.

Data Science Development Program Highlights:
High-impact project work: Junior data scientists work together with MassMutuals data scientists to solve challenging problems in finance,

operations, marketing, digital initiatives, security, and product development.

Interdisciplinary learning: In the DSDP, junior data scientists are exposed to multiple fields within and adjacent to data science such as data visualization, software engineering, and enterprise architecture.

Mentorship: Peer mentors and senior mentors across data science domains are paired with each member of the DSDP
Training & Development: In-house workshops, tech-talks, seminars, and team-wide learning challenges such as our annual Month of Code

are available to all development program members.

Academic coursework: Members of the DSDP engage in graduate-level courses at the University of Massachusetts Amherst in computer science and statistics according to an individually tailored development plan.

Volunteer & Community Opportunities: Team members have many opportunities to volunteer throughout the year. Junior data scientists volunteer at hackathons throughout the state, attend community data events, speak at external talks, and participate in community data for good efforts annually..

About Us

The MassMutual Data Labs in downtown Amherst consists of a dynamic team that is actively engaged in dozens of high-impact projects across the enterprise, frequently working remotely with teams based in Springfield, MA, New York, and Boston. Our environment and workspace reflects our dedication to innovation and learning, and has a collaborative, start-up vibe. We hold weekly training meetings to present technical ideas, new models, or interesting code libraries.

Junior Data Scientist Duties Include
Statistical analysis
Programming in R and Python
Data ingestion and data cleaning
Model building, testing, deployment, and maintenance Building visualizations
Presenting and explaining output
Executive presentations and discussions
Adherence to internal standards in data science Collaboration across functions and business units

Application Instructions
To finalize your application for consideration, all applicants must submit a portfolio. For instructions, visit https://datascience.massmutual.com/dsdp/apply

We accept applications from early career professionals and graduating students from undergraduate and graduate programs.

Minimum qualifications

Bachelors degree

Academic study or independent training in computational, quantitative, or technical fields, such as computer science, math, physics, or statistics

Working knowledge of Python, R, and SQL
Quantitative and technical skills in math and computer science Community engagement, involvement, and volunteerism Demonstrated leadership and change-making
Strong communication skills

Preferred qualifications

Enthusiastic about pursuing an interdisciplinary career in data science, analytics, and technology Research and/or practical experience in related fields
Demonstrated work experience through part time employment, internships, or professional endeavors

Committed to Diversity and Inclusion

Our employees are the embodiment of the idea that we all are stronger and better through our support for one another. By valuing people for who they are, how they think, and what they bring to the table, weve become a stronger, more innovative company. We continue to receive external recognition for our policies and programs that seek to create a diverse and inclusive environment.

Americas Best Employer for Diversity Forbes (2019)
Score of 100 on the Human Rights Campaign Corporate Equality Index (2019)
National Association for Female Executives Top Company for Executive Women (2018) Disability Equality Index (DEI) Best Place to Work for Disability Inclusion (2019) Diversity Best Practices Inclusion Index Company (2018)",3.7,MassMutual,"Amherst, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,169,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,MA,5095,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0
117,117,"Data Scientist, Health Economics & Advanced Analytics",$99k-$158k,"Overview


Avalere Health is seeking a Data Scientist to join our Health Economics & Advanced Analytics (HEAA) Practice. The HEAA practice works with life sciences companies and other healthcare sectors to quantify and communicate the real-world value of healthcare interventions and to align our clients’ business strategies with the evidentiary demands of an increasingly value-driven marketplace. We are driven by deep subject matter expertise, differentiated and proprietary real-world data assets, and an emphasis on sound business strategy coupled with rigorous research and advanced analytic capabilities. The data scientist will serve at the Research Scientist II level and lead and participate in the conceptualization, execution, and delivery of analyses in health economics, comparative effectiveness, performance measure development and testing, outcomes research, and epidemiology.

Responsibilities

Principal Duties and Responsibilities:


Lend deep statistical, epidemiological, and/or econometric expertise to the development of proposals, statements of work, and study protocols/statistical analysis plans
Perform descriptive and advanced statistical analyses using large patient and/or claims databases in support of data mining, predictive modeling, and health outcomes research projects
Develop and author study reports, scientific publications, conference abstracts, and posters
Independently manage workflow and make direct contributions to the research process
Collaborate with cross-functional project teams (project leads, project managers, programmers, research assistants, etc.) to support exceptional execution for clients
Support the growth and development of junior staff focused on related areas
Qualifications

Skills, Experience, and Other Job Related Requirements:


Minimum Requirements:
MA/MS or PhD in epidemiology, data science, health economics, health policy, pharmacy administration, public health, statistics, or related discipline
5+ years of consulting, healthcare, or pharmaceutical/device industry experience
Broad technical knowledge of computational science, including applied statistics, econometrics, predictive modeling, and/or AI/machine learning theory and methods
Proficiency designing and executing observational/outcomes research studies using large administrative medical and pharmacy claims, EMR, and other data derived from various public and private databases
5+ years of experience using statistical software packages such as SAS, R, Python, and/or STATA
3+ years of SQL programming experience
Knowledge of advanced analytics, AI/machine learning theory and methods, and/or econometrics
Experience presenting research results at scientific conferences and/or a record of peer-reviewed publications
Additional Skills and Competencies:
Consulting background preferred
Excellent writing, project management, communication, and presentation skills
Ability to independently manage multiple work streams with limited supervision
Demonstrated problem solving, analytical reasoning, and decision-making skills and strong commitment to meeting goals and deadlines
Excellent teamwork skills and ability to work in a fast-paced, multi-disciplinary environment
Self-motivated with a positive, flexible attitude",3.2,Avalere Health,"Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,20,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,DC,3260,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
118,118,Data Scientist,$99k-$158k,"Job Description


Avlino Inc. is seeking experienced data scientists to join our growing team
of AI engineers, analysts, and quantitative developers. The role involves
model construction, information extraction, prediction and finding solutions
to large-scale problems for mission critical applications using large
derived from a broad spectrum of domains for industry specific sectors. The
ideal candidate will have comprehensive expertise in machine learning,
time-series analysis modeling, statistical data analysis, and deep neural
networks. Experience with dynamic programming and reinforcement learning is
a plus.

Demonstrate your experience in creating real-world artificial intelligence
applications using pulsing customer data sets!

This is a great opportunity for an experienced Data Scientist with 4+ years
of relevant experience to work in a fast-paced environment where they can
share their passion for numbers and AI.

Responsibilities
Develop, implement, and use a broad set of machine-learning models and
quantitative techniques for prediction and classification for mission
critical applications.
To find problems in industrial and service sector applications.
Strong background in numerical techniques, optimization, and gradient
methods.
Development of new machine learning algorithms and/or substantial
modification of pre-existing techniques.
Analysis of high-volume, noisy, heterogeneous real-time data.
Collaborate with business analysts to transform customer needs into
actionable insights.
Design custom end user reports that are easy to read and interpret for
multiple business unit audiences.
Architect the next generation analytical platform.
Capable of de novo implementation of mathematical models, or to avail
widely used open source programming platforms and libraries (Scala, R,
python, TensorFlow).

Requirements
MUST: Solid 5 years of experience in machine learning, statistical
modeling, data mining, time-series forecasting, and neural networks.
MUST: Solid 5 years of experience working with big data technologies
distributed computing such as Hadoop/Spark, Map/Reduce, TensorFlow.
MUST: Solid 5 years of experience in multiple programming languages –
C#/.NET, C++, C, Scala, Python, R, Java.
Experience in developing or implementing enterprise class Data Analytics
and BI solutions.
Extremely analytical and able to solve problems independently.
Assesses customer requirements and translate them to appropriate
deliverables.
MUST: Have an analytical mind, and on point with detailed specifics.
MUST: Education: MS/Ph.D. (Preferred) in Computer Science, Physics, or a
related discipline.
PLUS: Experience in the logistics or transportation industry.",4.6,Avlino,New Jersey,-1,1 to 50 Employees,7,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,NJ,2689,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,0
120,120,Senior Principal Data Scientist (Python/R),$99k-$158k,"Roche Diagnostics has built a new strategic area – Diagnostics Information Solutions (DIS) - charged with creating a modern portfolio of decision support software products that change the way patients are cared for. Our challenge is to bring together complex diagnostic and treatment data from medical devices and IT systems within a hospital and intelligently process and present this data to clinicians, researchers, and caregivers to improve research outcomes and patient care.

As a Senior Principal Data Scientist within the Data Science & Services (DSS) team at DIS, you are responsible for conceptualizing, planning and executing advanced analytics projects to discover key insights improving NAVIFY product portfolio leading to better and more efficient patient care. In close cooperation with other more Scientists you will design and execute advanced analytics projects building on a wide range of commercial and research datasets containing deep medical information.

As a Senior Principal Data Scientist, you will also ensure that design, execution, and presentation of analytical results are adhering to industry standards and potentially improve and redefine current industry standards. You will rely on your oncology expertise, advanced analytical skills, and your ability to interact with cross-functional experts such as biostatisticians, clinical scientists and oncologists, to discover novel insights demonstrating impact of various treatment decisions, and uncover key elements leading to best outcomes for patients. In addition, you will maintain and expand knowledge of available healthcare data sources and applicable state-of-the- art analytical methodologies, large scale data processing and visualization, and languages and tools (R, Python, (no-)SQL, Hadoop, Spark, etc.).

Responsibilities Include:
Drive data science and analytical software development teams; develop solutions to support insight generation facilitating successful development, verification and commercialization of diagnostics services and products.
Contribute to broad product support initiatives, lead and deliver on complex projects, and interact with external partners without supervision.
Maintain and expand knowledge and access to available and meaningful data sources within/outside Roche, and their application to NAVIFY customer needs.
Perform high quality, timely and accurate analyses using most relevant state-of-the-art methodologies, tools and resources.
Committed to offering innovation, finding opportunities to enhance ways of working (including processes, methods, technology etc.) and sharing new techniques and lessons learned pro-actively with peers.
Use and continue to foster strong working relationships with global colleagues and customers and builds a strong network in order to jointly explore vendor relationships, data assets, analytical methodologies and toolsets.
Build and maintain partnerships with other data scientists and analysts, biostatistics, medical and business leaders, and other key functional experts.
Responsible for planning and timely delivery of assigned projects.
Drive creation of best practices to other team members. Proactively share learnings/experience with colleagues both internal and external to the function.
Act as a positive role model for peers and help coach colleagues to improve in their role with both technical and interpersonal skills.
Influence as thought leader in your industry and an influential subject matter expert to your team members and the businesses you support.
Leverage strategic organizational awareness and systems mindset to implement sustainable, science based practices.
Who you are:
Data savvy creative thinker, problem solver and mentor.
Reliable team player, strong collaborator with ability to influence and a thought partner/leader. Organizationally savvy, systems thinker.
Excellent communication skills, effective stakeholder management ability. Life learner, constructive at giving and receiving feedback.
Strong solution finding, resiliency and a sense of ownership; Effective prioritization skills, attention to detail and accuracy; Adaptable, embraces and endorses change.
Minimum Skills and Experience:
Master’s degree (PhD strongly preferred) in a Data Science or related field (e.g. Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Bioinformatics, etc.) required plus 16 years of experience; or PhD and 12 years of experience.
Graduate training or experience in biological/medical field is highly preferred.
Strong background in Oncology, either by education or professional experience.
Strong Programming experience with R, Python, and/or other quantitative software.
Strong experience in applying statistical modeling, machine learning, exploratory, and confirmatory data analysis in mid to large volume biomedical data sets.
Experience using big data platforms such as Hadoop (Spark is a plus).
In-depth knowledge of relational database principles and corresponding query language skills (e.g. SQL) is of interest.
Familiarity with regulatory framework and guidelines for pharma/diagnostics products is a plus.
Good knowledge of English in a business environment.
Excellent communication skills with an ability to negotiate successfully; strong influencing skills; self-contained and outgoing approach.
Strong solution finding, prioritization and attention to details skills while embracing/endorsing change.
Roche is an equal opportunity employer.

Research & Development, Research & Development > Modelling & Simulation",4.1,Roche,"Santa Clara, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,124,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,CA,5518,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,1,0,1
123,123,Sr Data Engineer/Data Architect,$99k-$158k,"As a Sr. Data
Engineer/Architect, you will develop and build AI/ML model ready data ponds
using Azure Databricks Delta lake. Looking for a candidate with ETL background
and ERP (Sales, Inventory, AP and AR) (or) Industrial manufacturing domain
knowledge that enables them to think strategically and add value to related
AI/ML product development.

Key
Responsibilities
Improve upon the data ingestion models, ETL jobs, and
alarming to maintain data integrity and data availability.
Continuously explore the advances in master data
management and big data technologies and advocate the related innovations
across the digital organization
Partner with AI/ML product teams proactively identify
the data needs for rapid experimentation and stable production deployment
and ensure the required data availability by collaborating with strategic
partners.
Manage weekly business reports via dashboards and
paper the analyses of daily, weekly, and monthly reporting of performance
via Key Performance Indicators
Partner with the AI/ML product teams on innovative
solutions to constantly changing business requirements.
Accountable to solve the problems that require
extensive use of ETL techniques
Qualifications
Bachelor’s Degree in STEM or Computer Science
5 Years’ hands on experience in data engineering
Experience working with Databricks or Apache
Spark/PySpark
Experience with cloud-based data services, including
data pipeline orchestration tooling (i.e. Azure Data Factory).
Proficiency with sophisticated SQL development
Experience in modern DevOps practices (including Git,
CI/CD)
About us:

Here at PPG we
make it happen, and we seek candidates of the highest integrity and
professionalism who share our values, with the commitment and drive to strive
today to do better than yesterday – everyday.

PPG: WE
PROTECT AND BEAUTIFY THE WORLD™

Through
leadership in innovation, sustainability and color, PPG helps customers in
industrial, transportation, consumer products, and construction markets and
aftermarkets to enhance more surfaces in more ways than does any other
company.. To learn more, visit www.ppg.com and follow @ PPG on Twitter.
The PPG Way

Every single
day at PPG:

We partner
with customers to create mutual value.

We are
insightful, dedicated and proactive. We have intimate knowledge of the market
and our customers. We focus on practical solutions that make a difference.

We are “One
PPG” to the world.

We are better
and stronger together. We leverage our scale to reach new markets and introduce
innovative technologies as we differentiate and disrupt our markets.

We trust our
people every day, in every way.

We enable and
empower our people to make the right decisions. We are inclusive, transparent
and respectful. Our feedback is clear and actionable.

We make it
happen.

We have a
passion for winning. We achieve. We deliver with discipline and integrity. We
bring our best energy to our work. We decide and act intelligently and quickly.

We run it
like we own it.

We respect one
another by being responsible and accountable. We always act in the best
interest of our company, customers, shareholders and our communities.

We do better
today than yesterday – everyday.

We continuously
learn. We develop our people to grow our businesses.

PPG Way:
(Click here to learn more about the PPG Way)

PPG vision:
http://corporate.ppg.com/Our-Company/PPG-Vision.aspx

We are One
PPG: http://one.ppg.com/

PPG provides
equal opportunity to all candidates and employees. We offer an opportunity to
grow and develop your career in an environment that provides a fulfilling
workplace for employees, creates an environment for continuous learning, and
embraces the ideas and diversity of others. All qualified applicants will
receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, pregnancy, race,
color, creed, religion, national origin, age, disability status, marital
status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression. If you need
assistance to complete your application due to a disability, please email
recruiting@ppg.com.

PPG values your
feedback on our recruiting process. We encourage you to visit Glassdoor.com and
provide feedback on the process, so that we can do better today than yesterday.

Benefits will
be discussed with you by your recruiter during the hiring process.",3.1,PPG,"Pittsburgh, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,137,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,PA,4323,1,data engineer,0,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
124,124,Senior Data Scientist,$99k-$158k,"The ultimate source for official answers about a business online should be the business itself. However, when consumers ask questions on company websites, too often they are left in the dark with wrong answers. Yext (NYSE: YEXT), the Search Experience Cloud, solves this problem by organizing a business's facts so it can provide official answers to consumer questions — wherever people search. Starting with the company website, then extending across search engines and voice assistants, businesses around the world, like Taco Bell, Marriott, and Jaguar Land Rover—as well as organizations like the U.S. State Department—trust Yext to radically improve the search experience on their websites and across the entire search ecosystem.

As a Senior Data Scientist you will shape how data is collected, transformed, and leveraged to develop essential new capabilities and features for Yext's products. We manage large amounts of structured master data on behalf of some of the world's largest companies and collect transactional data through end-user-facing applications we host directly for these clients. Our mission revolves around deeply understanding user intent so we can deliver relevant and accurate answers to questions, everywhere people search.

Yext clients cover a tremendous breadth of industries. We are seeking data scientists excited to discover opportunities in data across a wide variety of business domains. You will work collaboratively with cross-team partners in software engineering, product management, and strategy. This approach will allow you to participate fully in the product development lifecycle and make pragmatic decisions about the design, training, and deployment of machine learning models driving key product features.

What You'll Do
Partner with product management and engineering teams throughout the product development lifecycle
Solve ""full stack"" Data Science problems – Implement solutions to a data science problem in a production environment, coping with all the challenges (such as data cleanliness, performance, unexpected feedback loops, and concept drift) that arise
Articulate Data Science and machine learning concepts to a variety of audiences (product managers, software engineers, executives, sales partners)
Mentor junior team members, provide technical leadership and execution guidance
Dive deep into the details when called for while demonstrating good judgement about when to simplify and prioritize
What You Have
Advanced degree in a quantitative discipline, e.g., computer science, mathematics, business analytics, statistics, applied mathematics, economics, or operations research, or similar college level education
5+ years of work experience working in a technical role
Autodidactic, Self directed – You are able to dive into a new unfamiliar problem domain and start learning about it – You are comfortable with uncertainty and project evolution
Effective communicator, a good writer, and know effective means of visually displaying quantitative information
Experience leading cross-functional agile work streams and scaling data-driven initiatives
Fluency with data analysis software and tools such as Python and SQL
Exceptional multi-tasking, project management, and leadership skills
Bonus Points
Experience with JVM languages (Java, Scala) a plus. GoLang or C++ also great!
Experience with AWS, Linux and Mac environments
Excellent ability to cope with ""glue"" problems - shell scripting, debugging python environment problems, fixing broken packages
Knowledge of Python or R, and the machine learning, data processing and visualization packages (e.g. Pandas, Numpy, scikit-learn, Matplotlib)
Knowledge of SQL and databases like MySQL, Postgres, Presto and Hive.
Knowledge of neural network packages (TensorFlow, PyTorch) and state-of-the-art transformer/NLP models and techniques (e.g. FastText, BERT, et al.)
Knowledge of statistics and good experimental practices (e.g. how to run a powerful A/B test and test for significance)
Knowledge of techniques in unsupervised machine learning and information retrieval and mining (e.g. DBSCAN, k-Means, indexes)
Yext is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ethnicity, religion, creed, national origin, ancestry, genetics, sex, pregnancy or childbirth, sexual orientation, gender (including gender identity or nonbinary or nonconformity and/or status as a trans individual), age, physical or mental disability, citizenship, marital, parental and/or familial status, past, current or prospective service in the uniformed services, or any characteristic protected under applicable law. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.

#LI-JP1",4.2,Yext,"New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,14,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,128.5,NY,4886,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,1
129,129,Data Scientist Lead - Buyer risk,$103k-$169k,"Company Description

Wish is a mobile e-commerce platform that flips traditional shopping on its head. We connect hundreds of millions of people with the widest selection of delightful, surprising, and—most importantly—affordable products delivered directly to their doors. Each day on Wish, millions of customers in more than 160 countries around the world discover new products. For our over 1 million merchant partners, anyone with a good idea and a mobile phone can instantly tap into a global market.

We're fueled by creating unique products and experiences that give people access to a new type of commerce, where all are welcome. If you’ve been searching for a supportive environment to chase your curiosity and use data to investigate the questions that matter most to you, this is the place.

Job Description

The Risk Data Scientist lead will be leading a team of world-class data scientists, data analysts and data engineers in building the next generation of detection systems. You will partner with engineering, product management and Risk operations to create industry leading solutions to protect the security and integrity of the business and its eco-system. The ideal candidate has hands-on experience building machine learning models in a production environment, with a strong business sense and domain expertise in fraud and risk.

What you'll be doing:
Provide inspirational leadership for a team of diverse data skill sets including Data Scientists, Business Analysts and Data Engineers
Staff, mentor, manage and retain world-class analytics and data science staff
Work with product and engineering on data analytics and machine learning road maps
Solve mission-critical business problems with appropriate statistical rigor
Partner with product leaders and provide deep strategic insights
Serve as the data point of contact for the buyer risk team
Build out a world class anti-fraud system from the ground up for one of the largest e-commerce sites.
Qualifications
Required: SQL, Python, Linux shell scripting
Graduate (PhD preferred) degree in Statistics, Computer Science or equivalent experience
5+ years experience in Data Science, Business Analytics, Deep Learning, Statistical Research or a related field
2+ years of leadership and people management experience
Hands on experience building machine learning models for anti-fraud, abuse or risk management end-to-end
Strong SQL skills. Ability to code in Python/RExperience with
ETL
Experience with large scale data processing software and tools (Hadoop, Spark, or MapReduce etc)
Strong communication and visualization skills
#LI-PT1

Additional Information

Wish values diversity and is committed to creating an inclusive work environment. We provide equal employment opportunity for all applicants and employees. We do not discriminate based on any legally-protected class or characteristic. Employment decisions are made based on qualifications, merit, and business needs. If you need assistance or accommodation due to a disability, please let your recruiter know. For job positions in San Francisco, CA, and other locations where required, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Individuals applying for positions at Wish, including California residents, can see our privacy policy here.",3.5,Wish,"San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,9,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,136.0,CA,3320,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,1,0,0
132,132,Data Scientist II,$103k-$169k,"Nolij Consulting LLC is a certified Women-Owned Small Business (WOSB) that provides information technology services in test and evaluation (T&E), enterprise architecture (EA), electronic health record (EHR) modernization, infrastructure operations and maintenance (O&M), data analytics and visualization, and agile transformation. Our mission is to understand the challenges and goals of our clients, address them with innovative solutions, and work together to achieve project success. Were eager to hear from candidates like you that can join and contribute to our team.

Nolij Consulting has an opening for a Data Scientist II to join our team based in Vienna, VA.

Responsibilities:
Must be able to design, modify, develop, write and implement software programming applications.
Must be able to support and/or install software applications/operating systems.
Must be able to participate in the testing process through test reviews and analysis, test witnessing and certification of software.
Must be able to design, plan, and coordinate work teams.
Must be able to provides technical support to project team members.
Must be familiar with a variety of the field concepts, practices, and procedures.
Must be able to rely on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
Must be able to perform a variety of tasks.
Must be able to lead and direct the work of others.
Must exhibit a wide degree of creativity and latitude.
Must typically be able to report to a head of a unit/department
Requirements:
Required a bachelor's degree in science or a related area.
Required 6-8 years of experience in the field.
Note: Since this position is for a Federal Project, a candidate must possess US Citizenship to obtain Clearance.
Do you like the idea of being a driver on a team of distinction? If so, we want to hear from you. To apply, go to https://www.nolijconsulting.com/careers/

Nolij is an EEO/Affirmative Action employer and encourages all qualified applicants to apply.",4.1,Nolij Consulting,"Vienna, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,8,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,136.0,VA,1978,1,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
133,133,Data Scientist,$103k-$169k,"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking a skilled Data Scientist to support a fast paced, innovative project supporting our client in the field of data science and Machine Learning.

Basic Qualifications:
Experience with python, specifically with conda environments
Knowledgeable with NLP techniques
Familiarity with fastai and the training of ULMFit models
Comfortable with usage of AWS and a ubuntu CLI environment
Familiarity with jupyter notebooks
3+ years of relevant experience as a Data Scientist, Data Architect, or Data Analyst
3+ years experience providing expertise related to individual, organizational, technological, or transnational issues of national security concern
3+ years experience and ability to articulate analytic methods and methodological tools in at least one of the following areas:
Applied mathematics (e.g. probability and statistics, multivariable calculus, linear algebra, ordinary and partial differential equations, stochastic processes, graph theory)
Computing programming (e.g. scripting, data parsing/ETL, artificial intelligence, machine learning, math/statistics packages, natural language processing, software versioning, distributed computing)
Visualization (e,g, dashboard creation, network analysis, GIS/geospatial analysis, telemetry analysis
3+ years of experience with the IC and methodological experience in some of the following areas:
Relationships and discovery (correlating, enriching, and prioritizing data about activity among actors, devices or facilities to enable the discovery of structure, roles, key relationships and targets)
Situational awareness (unifying data into a single context, allowing the current situation to be accurately and quickly understood)
Systems modeling (building a computational analog of a real-world system political, military, economic, social or technical to understand how it operates, what it is capable of, and how it may react to shocks)
Desired Skills:
Experience using Python or one of the following software/tools: SQL, R, Hadoop, Spark, Java, C/C++, Git, Bash, Tableau, ArcGIS, Unix commands
Working knowledge of research designs and collection methods, capabilities, and tasking process
Intellectual curiosity; creativity and innovation to go beyond current tools to deliver the best solution to complex problems
Ability to leverage multiple data management tools to organize relevant information and make decisions
Ability to translate complex, technical findings into an easily understood narrative (i.e. tell a story with the data) in graphical, verbal or written form
Ability to multitask and change focus quickly as demand changes
Ability to work collaboratively and effectively in a team environment
Security Clearance:
Active Secret in JPAS
Must be willing to undergo polygraph examination
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.

For more details, or to submit a referral: bit.ly/NovettaReferrals

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,Novetta,"Herndon, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,8,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,136.0,VA,4533,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
138,138,Principal Data Scientist - R&D Oncology,$103k-$169k,"Job Description / Capsule

The Machine Learning and AI team in AstraZenecas Oncology Data Science & Analytics group is where we develop and apply sophisticated algorithms and techniques to solve the hardest problems in oncology drug discovery and development. The team uses their scientific, quantitative, and problem-solving skills to work on a broad range of challenges across the whole oncology portfolio, working collaboratively with other scientists across a range of disciplines to scope, define, and deliver projects that both advance the state of the art in data science and accelerate the delivery of innovative medicines to patients.

As a Principal Data Scientist you will play a key role on the front line in this rapidly growing team working to extract insight from complex biomedical data. You will apply and develop your leadership skills and your expertise in rigorous quantitative data science to provide solutions to a variety of data science problems, researching, recommending and delivering novel methodologies to solve the problems that matter to the oncology pipeline.

Examples of projects the team works on include machine learning models for developing digital biomarkers, patient risk stratification for clinical trials, new algorithms for survival analysis, approaches to quantitatively analyse wearable data, linking of medical imaging data with omics and longitudinal outcomes to identify and/or validate new drug targets, and much more!

Typical Accountabilities
Provides advanced quantitative expertise to AstraZeneca projects and researches and recommends appropriate data science solutions, appropriately communicating with a range of stakeholders.
Develops novel data science solutions where off-the-shelf methodologies do not fit.
Leads small (2-3 person) data science projects of defined scope.
Independently keeps own knowledge up to date and learns from senior team members, proposing appropriate training courses for personal development.
Coaches/mentors junior data scientists and others to drive the development of data science as an AZ capability.
Works within established frameworks to deliver a variety of tasks that support projects in meeting their objectives.
Reviews working practices and ensures non-compliant processes are escalated.
Ensures own work is compliant within Clinical Development.
Collaborate in a multidisciplinary environment with world leading clinicians, data scientists, biological experts, statisticians and IT professionals.
Education, Qualifications, Skills and Experience

Essential
MSc degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering)
Extensive hands-on experience applying data science tools in practice.
Practical software development skills in standard data science tools (such as R or python)
Extensive knowledge of mathematical modelling and statistical modelling techniques, and drive to continue to learn and develop these skills.
Communication, business analysis, and consultancy.
Minimum 5+ years of work experience
Desirable
PhD degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering).
Experience within the pharmaceutical industry.
In-depth experience of working in a global organization with complex/geographical context",4.0,AstraZeneca,"New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,107,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,136.0,NY,3286,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
139,139,Data Scientist,$103k-$169k,"As Data Scientist in the Pricing Analytics team you will shape HPs future of how we set prices. We are a very dynamic, highly skilled and diverse global team consisting of economists, statisticians, engineers, scientists or even musicians, who are pushing the innovation frontier in pricing. Working with us you will combine your economic thinking, statistical modeling, experimentation and optimization methods to build complex pricing algorithms for most popular Printers and PCs in the market.

About you:
You have deep interests in customer and market behavior and methods to measure and anticipate it
You are passionate about unveiling answers to most difficult questions using data and models
You feel accomplished seeing your pricing recommendations being implemented while shopping for yourself
You cant stop thinking about learning something new every day and enjoy being surrounded by highly talented people
Key responsibilities:
Develop and apply statistical methods and experimentation to analyze the effect of pricing and sales decisions on business performance
Collaborate with internal stakeholders to design and deploy pricing initiatives based upon analytical findings
Present results and recommendations to relevant stakeholders, including senior leadership
Requirements:

Must-haves:
At least 3 years working experience in data science, ideally in a consumer-focused setting
Experience in designing, deploying, and analyzing in-market experiments and/or AB tests
Ability to think creatively and invent original solutions to business and modelling challenges
Proficiency with R and/or Python is required
Proficiency in Microsoft Excel and Microsoft PowerPoint
Excellent written and verbal communication skills with an ability to influence key decision makers
Master's or PhD degree in Quantitative Marketing, Business, Statistics, Economics, Psychology, or other relevant quantitative discipline
Bonus points for:
Interest in pricing, economics, and consumer behavior
Experience in deploying data science in a retail environment
Understanding of CRM and customer segmentation
Knowledge of price optimization approaches, price discrimination models and a general knowledge of main concepts from the industrial organization literature
Basic understanding of finance and product economics
Experience in project and/or product management
Reinventing since 1939. We are one of the leading Print and Personal Systems technology companies in the world and our vision is to create technology that makes life better for everyone, everywhere. Joining HP is joining an adventure to reinvent the tech world and reinvent yourself every day!

#LI-post",4.1,HP Inc.,"San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,81,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,136.0,CA,2655,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
140,140,Data Engineer,$103k-$169k,"Alignment Healthcare is a data and technology driven healthcare company focused partnering with health systems, health plans and provider groups to provide care delivery that is preventive, convenient, coordinated, and that results in improved clinical outcomes for seniors.

We are experiencing rapid growth (backed by top private equity firms), our Data Services and BI team is looking for the best and brightest leaders. Data drives the way we make decisions. We love our customers and understanding them better makes it possible to provide the best clinical outcome and care experience.

This position will play a key role in building and operating a cloud-based data platform and its pipelines using big data technologies.

As a Data Engineer, you will develop a new data engineering platform that leverage a new cloud architecture and will extend or migrate our existing data pipelines to this architecture as needed. You will also be assisting with integrating the SQL data warehouse platform as our primary processing platform to create the curated enterprise data model for the company to leverage. You will be part of a team building the next generation data platform and to drive the adoption of new technologies and new practices in existing implementations. You will be responsible for designing and implementing the complex ETL pipelines in cloud data platform and other solutions to support the rapidly growing and dynamic business demand for data, and use it to deliver the data as service which will have an immediate influence on day-to-day decision making.
Interfacing with business customers, gathering requirements and developing new datasets in data platform
Building and migrating the complex ETL pipelines from on premise system to cloud and Spark to make the system grow elastically
Identifying the data quality issues to address them immediately to provide great user experience
Extracting and combining data from various heterogeneous data sources
Designing, implementing and supporting a platform that can provide ad-hoc access to large datasets
Modelling data and metadata to support machine learning and AI
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelors or Masters in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, or related field
3+ years relevant experience in cloud based data engineering.
Demonstrated ability in data modeling, ETL development, and data warehousing.
Data Warehousing Experience with SQL Server, Oracle, Redshift, Teradata, etc.
Experience with Big Data Technologies (NoSQL databases, Hadoop, Hive, Hbase, Pig, Spark, Elasticsearch etc.)
Experience in using Python, Java and/or other data engineering languages
Knowledge and experience of SQL Sever and SSIS.
Excellent communication, analytical and collaborative problem-solving skills
Preferred Qualifications:
Healthcare domain and data experience
Healthcare EDI experience is a plus
Industry experience as a Data Engineer or related specialty (e.g., Software Engineer, Business Intelligence Engineer, Data Scientist) with a track record of manipulating, processing, and extracting value from large datasets.
Experience building/operating highly available, distributed systems of data extraction, ingestion, and processing of large data sets
Experience building data products incrementally and integrating and managing datasets from multiple sources
Experience leading large-scale data warehousing and analytics projects, including using Azure or AWS technologies – SQL Server, Redshift, S3, EC2, Data-pipeline, Data Lake, Data Factory and other big data technologies
Experience providing technical leadership and mentor other engineers for the best practices on the data engineering space
Linux/UNIX including to process large data sets.
Experience with Azure, AWS or GCP is a plus
Microsoft Azure Certification is a plus
Demonstrable track record dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in an agile, dynamic startup environment
Problem solving skills and Ability to meet deadlines are a must
Microsoft Azure Certification is a plus
Essential Physical Functions:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform

the essential functions.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear. The employee regularly is required to stand, walk, sit, use hand to finger, handle or feel objects, tools, or controls; and reach with hands and arms.
The employee frequently lifts and/or moves up to 10 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision and the ability to adjust focus.
Alignment Healthcare, LLC is proud to practice Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action. We are looking for diversity in qualified candidates for employment: Minority/Female/Disable/Protected Veteran.
If you require any reasonable accommodation under the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) in completing the online application, interviewing, completing any pre-employment testing or otherwise participating in the employee selection process, please contact careers@ahcusa.com.
(function() { var ac = document.createElement('script'); ac.type = 'text/javascript'; ac.src = ('https:' == document.location.protocol ? 'https://' : 'http://') + 'click.appcast.io/pixels/grpeople1-1573.js?ent=8&t=' + new Date().getTime(); var s = document.getElementsByTagName('script')[0]; s.parentNode.insertBefore(ac, s); })();",3.5,Alignment Healthcare,"Orange, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,7,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,136.0,CA,5593,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
141,141,Senior Data Engineer II,$103k-$169k,"Auth0 is a unicorn that just closed a $120M Series F round of funding, with total capital raised to date of $330M and valuation of nearly $2B. We are growing rapidly and looking for exceptional new team members to add to our exceptional talent pool - and who will help take us to the next level of success. One team, one score.

Our vision is to provide people with secure access to any application in one click or less. And our promise is to make identity work for everyone—whether you’re a developer looking to innovate, or a security professional looking to mitigate. We are looking for curious, excited, boundary-pushing team members. So, if you’re a big thinker who is nimble and adaptable, Auth0 may be an ideal place for you to shine.

The Data engineer will help build, scale and maintain the entire data platform. The ideal candidate will have a deep technical understanding, hands-on experience in distributed computing, big data, ETL, dimensional modeling , columnar databases and data visualization. The candidate should feed on challenges and love to be hands on with recent technologies. This job plays a key role in data infrastructure, analytics projects, and systems design and development. You should be passionate for continuous learning, experimenting, applying and contributing towards cutting edge open source Data technologies and software paradigms.
What you will do:
Contributing at a senior-level to the data platform design by implementing a solid, robust, extensible design that supports key business flows.
Performing all of the necessary data transformations to populate data lake.
Establishing efficient design and programming patterns that beat SLAs and help easily manage the data platform.
Designing, integrating and documenting technical components for seamless data extraction and analysis.
Adopting best practices in our data systems and shared across teams.
Contributing to innovations and data insights that fuel Auth0’s mission.
Working in a team environment, interacting with multiple groups on a daily basis (very strong communication skills).+ BA/BS in Computer Science, related technical field or equivalent practical experience.
At least 3 years of relevant work experienceAbility to write, analyze, and debug SQL queries.
Exceptional Problem solving and analytical skills.
Experience with Data Warehouse design, ETL (Extraction, Transformation & Load), architecting efficient software designs for DW platform.
Hands-on experience in Python, R, Apache Spark in production environments.
Strong skills in Apache Airflow, Luigi or similar tools.
Experience in Tableau, Apache SuperSet, Looker or similar BI tools.
Knowledge of AWS Redshift, Snowflake or similar databases
Auth0 safeguards more than 4.5 billion login transactions each month and its top priorities are availability and security.

We like to think that we are helping make the internet safer. Our team is spread across more than 35 countries and we are proud to continually be recognized as a great place to work. Culture is critical to us, and we are transparent about our vision and principles.

Auth0 is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. Auth0 conducts all employment-related activities without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, age, sex, marital status, sexual orientation, disability, citizenship status, genetics, or status as a Vietnam-era special disabled and other covered veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Auth0 participates in E-Verify and will confirm work authorization for candidates residing in the United States.",4.8,Auth0,Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,6,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,136.0,Remote,3587,1,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
143,143,Senior Data Scientist 3 Artificial Intelligence,$103k-$169k,"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311094

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing & Analytics

Group: Data Sciences & Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and artificial intelligence research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to AI assurance, remote sensing and geo-spatial analytics, human language technologies, computer vision, and other related fields.

+ The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as geospatial intelligence, natural language processing, few-shot learning, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery (e.g., publication in conferences such as NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred)

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 5 years of experience, Masters with 3 years of experience or PHD with 1 year of experience
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",3.8,Pacific Northwest National Laboratory,"Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,55,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,136.0,WA,5240,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,1
145,145,Data Engineer - RPA,$103k-$169k,"BRMi Technology is seeking a Data Engineer - ETL/PEGA to support a large client in the Northern Virginia area. This data engineer will be responsible for supporting Information System Division and the enterprise to deliver a personalized member experience, unify inbound and outbound member marketing, orchestrating experiences across channels, and make our clients marketers & ISD more efficient. The PEGA implementation will help streamline disjointed and manual campaign development processes.

The Data Engineer will support the ETL development for feeding Pega cloud application with 700+ member and account data elements.

Required:

• Extensive experience in engineering and designing data integration and delivery solutions using Informatica Power Center, SQL, and Unix /Shell scripts.
• Experience with SSIS in Azure Cloud is a huge plus.
• Experience with Azure Data Factory.
• Experience with Azure Data Factory and Data Bricks.
• Excellent written and oral communication skills
• Hands-on experience creating automated data integration applications using data models, data mappings and business rules specifications, to load data warehouses, operational data stores, data marts, and data lakes while programmatically handling exceptions including late arriving, missing, or erroneous data.
Desired:

• Experience using Informatica PowerExchange CDC
• Ability to interpret complex mainframe copybooks, XML data feeds
• Experience configuring and using APIs
• Proficient in the data ingestion pipeline process, exception handling, and metadata management on Hadoop platforms.
• Advanced degree in MIS, computer science, statistics, marketing, management, finance or related field
• Experience providing technical and data leadership to the application development terms, IT and the enterprise.
• Prior experience in the Financial Industries and large banks
** BRMi will not sponsor applicants for work visas for this position.**
**This is a W2 opportunity only**
EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disabled
We are an equal opportunity employer that values diversity and commitment at all levels. All individuals, regardless of personal characteristics, are encouraged to apply. Employment policies and decisions on employment and promotion are based on merit, qualifications, performance, and business needs. The decisions and criteria governing the employment relationship with all employees are made in a nondiscriminatory manner, without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, marital status, physical or mental disability, medical condition, veteran status, or any other factor determined to be unlawful by federal, state, or local statutes.",4.3,BRMi,"Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,16,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,136.0,VA,2668,0,data engineer,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
150,150,Data Scientist,$103k-$169k,"Overview


We are looking for a great Data Analyst for our Quickbooks Online (QBO) business. Quickbooks is used by over 5MM SMBs globally to run their businesses and we are the team responsible for using our data to answer the most critical questions facing the QBO Product Managers and Marketers. Everything from understanding the trends in our subscriber growth to shaping our product strategy through A/B testing and more happens within our team and we need top data scientists to help the business deliver the best possible product to our SMB customers. We are growing rapidly and need great people to support our analytical efforts in both Product and Marketing.

What does it take to thrive on our team? You need to be a top-notch problem solver and problem identifier. Its also a good idea to know the standard suite of analytical tools - SQL, R/Python, some sort of data visualization tool but were more interested in your ability to quickly learn new tools as the set of tools available is constantly evolving. Last, knowing that in most cases done is better than perfect is important - getting the current problem right to the sixth decimal place is almost always less impactful than getting to the next problem.

If this role sounds interesting go check out the product (https://quickbooks.intuit.com/) and if you find this exciting, then we look forward to hearing from you!
What you'll bring
5+ years of experience in generating and sharing insights from product/marketing data
Technical experience including SQL, some form of coding (Python, Scala, etc), and ETL/scheduling such tools as Airflow
Experience with data visualization tools such as Tableau, Superset, etc.
Experience working with SaaS-based subscription metrics including conversion, retention and product usage is preferred
Entrepreneurial spirit and passionate about data
Undergrad Degree in Quantitative Field (Masters preferred)

How you will lead
Solve marketing and product analytics problems by doing work such as developing data structures, pipelines, and data visualizations that enable us to find insights and take action by working with click data, product-generated data, user provided data, third party data, and more
Perform analyses that inform decisions on everything from retention strategy to product experience using predictive and descriptive analytical techniques
Apply predictive modeling and ML techniques to problems such as predicting conversion and retention as well as customizing communications with customers
Communicate findings from analyses in a way that enables business leaders to make better decisions
Design and execute product and marketing experiments through A/B testing",4.4,Intuit - Data,"Mountain View, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,37,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,136.0,CA,2686,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,1,1
151,151,"Senior Data Scientist, Growth Analytics",$103k-$169k,"The Opportunity


Come work for a data-driven innovator that's transforming the healthcare industry. In your role as a Data Scientist for Growth Analytics, you'll work closely with marketing teams driving enrollment and retention to create scalable analytics that directly drive Livongo's business forward.

This role will leverage your technical skills and business acumen as you deliver insights that inform Livongo's most important business decisions. You'll collaborate closely with leaders to support growth, helping us increase our reach and impact a greater number of people living with chronic and behavioral conditions. Your efforts will improve the value of Livongo services to our Members, increased engagement and member retention.

This high-profile, high-impact opportunity on the Data Science team has huge advancement potential, as well as the opportunity to leverage data in ways that truly make a difference in people's lives.

Responsibilities
Perform detailed analyses to distill key insights and drivers for Livongo's rapidly growing customer base
Support analysis, modeling, and experimentation for mission-critical functions within the marketing teams driving member enrollment and usage
Generate and maintain dashboards on our reporting platform to enable stakeholders to keep a pulse on the performance of our campaigns, experiments and growth
Collaborate closely with stakeholders, solve problems they face and help decision-makers on the team form educated, practical strategies and recommendations
Proactively discover important trends in key metrics impacting our business and drive meaningful actions
Candidate Profile


Our successful candidate will have:
4+ years' experience in Data Science, Marketing and Growth Analytics or a related field in SaaS or consumer companies
Strong SQL skills, ability to code in and analyze data with Python (or R), practical experience with BI tools like Tableau
Firm understanding of basic statistical and machine learning concepts, experience with experimentation
Strong critical thinking and active listening skills to infer business needs, grasp underlying context, and translate loose direction on analytical projects
Compelling storytelling through analytics and visualization, getting your point across and keeping your audience engaged
A strong grasp of key marketing metrics and drivers
The flexibility to respond to changing priorities and business environments
A Master's degree or higher in computer science, statistics, information systems, engineering or a related field
Why Join Livongo?


The Transformative Name in Healthcare: The transformative industry forces in Community, Content and Commerce are now household names. As Amazon is to Commerce, Livongo is to Healthcare. With our Applied Health Signals engine, AI+AI, we've transformed how care is delivered.

Our Work Truly Matters: Livongo's proprietary, consumer-first technology is revolutionizing the experience of living with a chronic health condition. Our data-driven digital health engine enables our Members to seamlessly manage multiple health conditions on one empowering platform. We use smart, connected devices, personalized digital guidance, and 24x7x365 access to health professionals to make it easier for people to stay healthier.

Make an Impact: Do you want to accomplish something meaningful? To create results that matter? Livongo's innovative solution produces industry-leading member satisfaction, measurable clinical outcomes and proven healthcare costs savings. Here you can truly improve lives.

The Largest Digital Health IPO in History: We are at a milestone period in our history. On July 25, 2019 we took our company public, in order to elevate and expand the way the industry views us, thus ushering us into a whole new set of mission-critical conversations that will help us accomplish the work still to be done. As we reach new levels of achievement, we accelerate our ability to deliver life-changing services.

Focus on PEOPLE: Livongo has been voted one of the Best Places to Work in healthcare, by Fortune Magazine and Best Place to Work! Talented, passionate individuals make the difference, in this fast-moving, collaborative and inspiring environment.

Diversity and Inclusion: At Livongo we believe that personal and professional diversity is the key to innovation. We hire based solely on your strengths and qualifications, and the way in which those strengths can directly contribute to your success in your new position.

Growth and Innovation: We've already made healthcare history, yet we remain on the threshold of very big things. Leading the industry with our Applied Health Signals category, we have cracked the code to transforming healthcare. Come grow with us and support our mission to make a tangible difference in the lives of our Members.

See photos, watch videos and learn more about Livongo: follow us on Glassdoor.

#LivongoIPO #appliedhealthsignals

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we never have and never will discriminate against any job candidate or employee due to age, race, religion, color, ethnicity, national origin, gender, gender identity/expression, sexual orientation, membership in an employee organization, medical condition, family history, genetic information, veteran status, marital status, parental status or pregnancy (including breastfeeding we have a mother's room in both our offices). In our innovative and inclusive workplace, we prohibit discrimination and harassment of any kind.",4.7,Livongo,"Mountain View, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,6,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,136.0,CA,5507,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
152,152,Data Scientist,$103k-$169k,"Required Skills:

• Ph.D. (or MS with 4+ years of post MS experience) in Statistics, Mathematics, or closely related field

• 2 years of experience in using statistical or machine learning methodologies to solve research problems

• Proficiency in R and/or Python or in another high-level programming language

• Experience in developing statistical, and machine learning models

• Experience analyzing and presenting complex data and proven problem-solving abilities

• Strong publication record in leading scientific journals

• Strong organizational, interpersonal, and written communication skills

Desired Skills:

• Experience working with time-series data and forecasting is highly desired

• Experience with building data and analytics pipeline and automation is highly desired

• Drive for translating business problems into research initiatives that deliver business value

• Creativity in defining challenging exploratory projects",4.5,Envision LLC,"Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,26,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,136.0,MO,941,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
154,154,"Data Scientist II, Product Analytics",$103k-$169k,"The Opportunity


At Livongo, data is at the heart of our culture of innovation. We're looking for a Data Science analytics team member to collaborate with Product Management and Marketing as we work toward optimizing our UX and messaging.

As a Data Scientist, Product Analytics your main focus will be to measure member experience and guide product decisions, ultimately making Livongo's products more valuable, delightful and intuitive to our Members. We're looking for someone with at least 2 years of experience in Data Analytics. In addition to technical data science skills, core competencies such as collaboration, decision-making, communication and flexibility will be key to your success.

This role offers the challenge and excitement of converting data analysis into real-life benefits. Come help us break new ground, while measurably improving lives and saving millions in healthcare costs.

Responsibilities
Provide insights about our products and member experience to inform Product teams for roadmap and feature decisions
Conduct exploratory analysis and develop statistical models to answer key product usage and engagement questions
Help Product and Marketing teams use experimentation (A/B testing) and cohorting to test assumptions and launch new marketing campaigns, features and product releases
Partner with Product teams to define and benchmark metrics for new features launches and initiatives and help create a culture of measurement
Candidate Profile
2+ years of work experience in product/data analytics or a related discipline
Data science experience (SQL, Python, R) and familiarity with managing large data sets
A general knowledge of machine learning approaches is a plus.
The ability to collaborate and communicate with Product Managers and help them craft hypotheses, and define and measure KPIs
Confidence working with ambiguity, unknown variables, and missing context (and the ability to find ways to bridge those gaps when necessary)
A self-starter approach, with strong motivation and drive for excellence
BS degree in Engineering, Computer Science or a related filed in lieu of degree, relevant work experience and/or trade school
Why Join Livongo?


The Transformative Name in Healthcare: The transformative industry forces in Community, Content and Commerce are now household names. As Amazon is to Commerce, Livongo is to Healthcare. With our Applied Health Signals engine, AI+AI, we've transformed how care is delivered.

Our Work Truly Matters: Livongo's proprietary, consumer-first technology is revolutionizing the experience of living with a chronic health condition. Our data-driven digital health engine enables our Members to seamlessly manage multiple health conditions on one empowering platform. We use smart, connected devices, personalized digital guidance, and 24x7x365 access to health professionals to make it easier for people to stay healthier.

Make an Impact: Do you want to accomplish something meaningful? To create results that matter? Livongo's innovative solution produces industry-leading member satisfaction, measurable clinical outcomes and proven healthcare costs savings. Here you can truly improve lives.

The Largest Digital Health IPO in History: We are at a milestone period in our history. On July 25, 2019 we took our company public, in order to elevate and expand the way the industry views us, thus ushering us into a whole new set of mission-critical conversations that will help us accomplish the work still to be done. As we reach new levels of achievement, we accelerate our ability to deliver life-changing services.

Focus on PEOPLE: Livongo has been voted one of the Best Places to Work in healthcare, by Fortune Magazine and Best Place to Work! Talented, passionate individuals make the difference, in this fast-moving, collaborative and inspiring environment.

Diversity and Inclusion: At Livongo we believe that personal and professional diversity is the key to innovation. We hire based solely on your strengths and qualifications, and the way in which those strengths can directly contribute to your success in your new position.

Growth and Innovation: We've already made healthcare history, yet we remain on the threshold of very big things. Leading the industry with our Applied Health Signals category, we have cracked the code to transforming healthcare. Come grow with us and support our mission to make a tangible difference in the lives of our Members.

See photos, watch videos and learn more about Livongo: follow us on Glassdoor.

#LivongoIPO #appliedhealthsignals

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we never have and never will discriminate against any job candidate or employee due to age, race, religion, color, ethnicity, national origin, gender, gender identity/expression, sexual orientation, membership in an employee organization, medical condition, family history, genetic information, veteran status, marital status, parental status or pregnancy (including breastfeeding we have a mother's room in both our offices). In our innovative and inclusive workplace, we prohibit discrimination and harassment of any kind.",4.7,Livongo,"Mountain View, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,6,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,136.0,CA,5127,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
155,155,Senior Data Engineer,$103k-$169k,"Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in computer science, information technology, or a related field or equivalent experience
Preferred Qualifications
3 years of experience working with database tools
3 years of programming experience using Python and C#
3 years of experience working with SQL server integration services or ETL tools
3 years of experience working with data integration tools
Proficiency in the Microsoft Office suite
Experience working with ETL tools
Knowledge of data integration tools
Knowledge of software programming languages, such as Python and C#
Job Summary

The Senior Data Engineer works with database engineers to design, develop and maintain the infrastructure of data within the data warehouse, including setting the ETL (extract, transform, load) processes, bringing in new data sources, modifying existing data sources, making sure data is clean, complete and consumable, as well as designing data models within the data warehouse.

The Senior Data Engineer works as part of one or more project teams and is responsible for designing and building mechanisms to move, integrate, cleanse and publish large volume datasets. This is a developer role with a specialty in data and requires deep knowledge of a variety of programming languages and design patterns.

Responsibilities
Design and support the new and evolving sources of data being brought into the data warehouse
Work closely with data architects and follow best practices for data management consumption
Work closely with business analysts to work through business requirements and develop processes to provide the needed data visibility via the data warehouse and reporting platform
Assist with application layer and metadata design
Assist with the design and create automated applications and reporting solutions
Work closely with front-end developers to ensure data is being brought in and data integrity is being maintained
Monitor and troubleshoot performance issues on the data warehouse servers
Research and promote new tools and techniques to shape the future of the data environment
Mentor and train other data engineers
Who We Are

We're America's largest mortgage lender, closing loans in all 50 states. J.D. Power ranked Quicken Loans ""Highest in Customer Satisfaction in Primary Mortgage Origination"" for the past 10 consecutive years, 2010 - 2019. The company was also ranked highest in the nation for client satisfaction among mortgage servicers by J.D. Power for 6 consecutive years, 2014 through 2019, each year the company was eligible. There's a simple reason we've been so successful: We care about the people we work with.

If you're tired of stuffy, bureaucratic workplaces, then you'll be delighted to find something different here. We strive to make a creative, fun and collaborative environment you simply won't find anywhere else. Quicken Loans was named #1 in ESSENCE Magazine's first ever list of ""Best Places to Work for African Americans"" in 2015. We've been on Computerworld's ""Best Places to Work in IT"" list for 13 years running, hitting #1 the last 5 years. We were also ranked #14 in FORTUNE Magazine's list of ""100 Best Companies to Work For"" in 2018, remaining in the top 30 for the past 15 years.

Disclaimer

This is an outline of the primary responsibilities of this position. As with everything in life, things change. The tasks and responsibilities can be changed, added to, removed, amended, deleted and modified at any time by the leadership group.",3.8,Quicken Loans,"Detroit, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,35,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,136.0,MI,3487,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
156,156,Data Scientist,$103k-$169k,"Description

SAIC is seeking a Data Scientist to help advance the mission of NGA’s Office of Special Programs performing duties including algorithm and tool design, creation, and maintenance, technology transition, algorithm verification and validation, and software test.
Design, test, and modify data processing algorithms using real and/or surrogate data
Design, test, and modify geospatial big-data processing algorithms and enable implementation in either Python or Java suitable for a cloud-based architecture using Spark, Elastic Search and/or Hadoop
Engage with users to understand needs an analytic strength/weakness of developed algorithms
Perform data analysis to identify algorithms technical limitations or defects, document findings and suggest solutions
Process/manipulate geospatial data and provide recommendations to provide additional utility beyond manual exploitation
Interact professionally with senior-level executives and other personnel prioritizing and accomplishing assigned tasks in a fast-paced environment with deadlines
Qualifications
MA/MS programing, computer science disciplines plus work experience (8+ years)
Must currently possess an active Top Secret/SCI Clearance and IC Polygraph
Working knowledge of Oracle, Java, C++, Linux, HTML, Python and/or parallel processing algorithm
Experience in GEOINT, SOM (NGA), data science, imagery science, GIS domains
Familiarity with systems integration, software test and V&V activities",3.8,SAIC,"Springfield, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,7,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,136.0,VA,1463,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
158,158,Data Scientist,$103k-$169k,"Entefy’s Senior Data Scientist is a highly visible position both internally and externally. Join the intelligence revolution, where we can push the state-of-the-art boundaries of data science. This is where deep experience and multi-dimensional insights intersect with an amazing opportunity to shape the future of productivity for people everywhere.

Skills and Experience:

We’re not looking for “good.” Entefy is on a mission to find exceptional talent. The success of our mission depends on our team’s ability to be creatively analytical, insatiably curious, and absolutely fearless in tackling big challenges.
Requirements
Master's degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, or a compatible field. PhD is preferred.
3+ years of applicable work experience.
Demonstrable proficiency in Python, Scala, SQL, or R.
Strong data visualization and reporting skills.
Proven track record delivering high-value, advanced analytics.
Experience leading the work of other data scientists or analysts is preferred.
World-class ability to extract and communicate insights from real-world datasets.
Startup agility and versatility.
Visit www.entefy.com and www.blog.entefy.com.",4.3,Entefy,"Palo Alto, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,8,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,136.0,CA,1188,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
160,160,Data Scientist for Detector Physics,$56k-$97k,"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311174

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Signature Science and Technology Division

Group: Detection Physics
*Job Description**
The Detection Physics Group within the National Security Directorate at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is seeking a research scientist who will focus on studies of radiation detection physics using Artificial Intelligence/ Machine Learning (AI/ML) techniques. The Detection Physics Group includes research ranging from low background and high energy fundamental particle physics to radiation detection related to non-proliferation and national security applications. This position will focus on the expanding role of AI/ML within the group. It will provide the opportunity to perform analysis of data from existing experimental setups, and to propose, develop, and demonstrate relevant techniques on new data sets for advanced applications.

Major duties and responsibilities: Contribute to the development of the analysis of a variety of types of radiation detectors and experiments. Perform, analyze, and interpret detector characterizations for detectors of interest, including semiconductor detectors, scintillators, proportional counters, silicon photomultipliers, and others. Develop a detector-physics-focused AI/ML strategy with an eye toward fostering new funding streams and research directions. Engage in research activities with the broader AI/ML community at PNNL.
*The hiring level will be determined based on the education, experience and skill set of the successful candidate based on the following:**
*Level 2:** Works on problems of moderate scope where analysis of situations or data requires a review of a variety of factors. Exercises judgment within defined procedures and practices to determine appropriate action. Builds productive internal/external working relationships. Works under general supervision. Follows established procedures. Infrequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts on routine matters.
*Level 3:** A seasoned, experienced professional with a full understanding of area of specialization; resolves a wide range of issues in creative ways. This job is the fully qualified, careeroriented, journey-level position. Independently determines and develops approach to solutions. Frequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 2 years of experience, or Masters degree with 0-2 years of experience, or PhD with 0 years of experience.

+ Programming capability with languages such as C/C++, Python, MatLab, and R.

+ Experience with ""standard"" and AI/ML data analysis techniques.

+ Experience with particle detection software and hardware.

+ Should these be moved down to Preferred Qualifications section to stay consistent with PLIs?
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with at least 5 years of well-aligned prior experience or a masters degree with 3 years of relevant experience or a PhD degree with at least 1 year of experience.

+ PhD in experimental nuclear or high energy particle physics, or related fields.

+ Experience with software tools such as PyTorch, Tensorflow, and Keras.

+ Experience with data analysis and simulation packages such as ROOT, Geant4, and MCNP.

+ Implementation experience with high-performance parallel codes and/or accelerators (FPGAs/GPUs).

+ High level of motivation and ability to work with, form, and lead collaborative research teams.

+ Adaptability to thrive in a rapidly evolving, multitasked, research environment.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Detection Physics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-09-09_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-12-08_",3.8,PNNL,"Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,55,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.5,WA,5718,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,1
161,161,Junior Data Scientist Data Science Development Program,$56k-$97k,"Description
Junior Data Scientist | Data Science Development Program
Amherst, MA

Deadline to apply: October 15, 2020
Start date: Mid-June, 2021

To finalize application, you must also submit a portfolio of project work. See below for more information.

What Great Looks Like In This Role

Our ideal teammate is someone who is a continuous learner who can adapt and thrive in complex, uncertain and changing situations. Someone who enjoys tackling complex tasks in a collaborative environment is well-suited to a position on our team. Self-motivated individuals comfortable working in a challenging, fast paced, technical environment are highly encouraged to apply!

You Are Able To Demonstrate This Through

A track record of thinking outside the box, taking initiative, and promoting innovation and change-making Ownership, commitment and follow-through in achieving results in school or work projects
Managing priorities effectively and adapting quickly to achieve goals
Pursuing opportunities for continuous learning to develop new skills and perspectives

About the Data Science Development Program

The Data Science Development Program (DSDP) trains junior team members to become well-rounded data scientists within three years. The development program includes high impact project work, mentorship from senior data scientists, in-house training and workshops, and sponsorship for graduate level coursework at the University of Massachusetts Amherst.

Data Science Development Program Highlights:
High-impact project work: Junior data scientists work together with MassMutuals data scientists to solve challenging problems in finance,

operations, marketing, digital initiatives, security, and product development.

Interdisciplinary learning: In the DSDP, junior data scientists are exposed to multiple fields within and adjacent to data science such as data visualization, software engineering, and enterprise architecture.

Mentorship: Peer mentors and senior mentors across data science domains are paired with each member of the DSDP
Training & Development: In-house workshops, tech-talks, seminars, and team-wide learning challenges such as our annual Month of Code

are available to all development program members.

Academic coursework: Members of the DSDP engage in graduate-level courses at the University of Massachusetts Amherst in computer science and statistics according to an individually tailored development plan.

Volunteer & Community Opportunities: Team members have many opportunities to volunteer throughout the year. Junior data scientists volunteer at hackathons throughout the state, attend community data events, speak at external talks, and participate in community data for good efforts annually..

About Us

The MassMutual Data Labs in downtown Amherst consists of a dynamic team that is actively engaged in dozens of high-impact projects across the enterprise, frequently working remotely with teams based in Springfield, MA, New York, and Boston. Our environment and workspace reflects our dedication to innovation and learning, and has a collaborative, start-up vibe. We hold weekly training meetings to present technical ideas, new models, or interesting code libraries.

Junior Data Scientist Duties Include
Statistical analysis
Programming in R and Python
Data ingestion and data cleaning
Model building, testing, deployment, and maintenance Building visualizations
Presenting and explaining output
Executive presentations and discussions
Adherence to internal standards in data science Collaboration across functions and business units

Application Instructions
To finalize your application for consideration, all applicants must submit a portfolio. For instructions, visit https://datascience.massmutual.com

/dsdp/apply

We accept applications from early career professionals and graduating students from undergraduate and graduate programs.

Minimum qualifications

Bachelors degree

Academic study or independent training in computational, quantitative, or technical fields, such as computer science, math, physics, or statistics

Working knowledge of Python, R, and SQL
Quantitative and technical skills in math and computer science Community engagement, involvement, and volunteerism Demonstrated leadership and change-making
Strong communication skills

Applications are accepted on a rolling basis through 2020, with priority consideration for applications received by Friday, October 23rd

*Ability to work in U.S. without sponsorship now or in the future

Preferred qualifications

Enthusiastic about pursuing an interdisciplinary career in data science, analytics, and technology Research and/or practical experience in related fields
Demonstrated work experience through part time employment, internships, or professional endeavors

Committed to Diversity and Inclusion

Our employees are the embodiment of the idea that we all are stronger and better through our support for one another. By valuing people for who they are, how they think, and what they bring to the table, weve become a stronger, more innovative company. We continue to receive external recognition for our policies and programs that seek to create a diverse and inclusive environment.

Americas Best Employer for Diversity Forbes (2019)
Score of 100 on the Human Rights Campaign Corporate Equality Index (2019)
National Association for Female Executives Top Company for Executive Women (2018) Disability Equality Index (DEI) Best Place to Work for Disability Inclusion (2019) Diversity Best Practices Inclusion Index Company (2018)",3.7,MassMutual,"Amherst, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,169,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.5,MA,5556,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0
162,162,Data Scientist l,$56k-$97k,"Data Scientist l

Job Details
Level
Experienced
Job Location
New York - New York, NY
Position Type
Full Time
Education Level
4 Year Degree
Salary Range
Undisclosed
Travel Percentage
None
Job Shift
Undisclosed
Job Category
Information Technology
Description
Greater New York Mutual Insurance Company (""GNY"") is an A+ rated, financially stable and growing property casualty insurance company with locations throughout the Northeast.

We are currently looking for a dynamic and highly motivated Data Scientist for our New York office.

Responsibilities:
Provide innovative solutions on big data by utilizing machine learning techniques
Develop, implement, and maintain predictive and machine learning models
Utilizing machine learning techniques on pricing refinement, claims insights, and business decisions
Provide visualization solutions for portfolio management
Present business solutions based on machine learning models to senior management
Qualifications
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree obtained from an accredited institution preferably in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Actuarial, or a related field
3-5 years of professional experience specialized in machine learning
Strong background in data science, machine learning, and visualization
Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms including classification, clustering, regression, decision tree, random forest, neural networks, deep learning etc.
Proficient in R, Python, SQL, VBA, Tableau
Excellent oral and written communication skills",3.8,GNY Insurance Companies,"New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,106,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.5,NY,1533,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
164,164,Data Scientist (Journeyman),$56k-$97k,"Job Description BAE Systems is seeking to hire a Mid-Level Data Scientist to support counterterrorism intelligence integration on a multifaceted U.S. Government program. The ideal Mid-Level Data Scientist will be responsible for improving analyst workflow by developing tools and capabilities that enhance the ability to use and produce identity intelligence data.

The Mid-Level Data Scientist are responsible for analyzing, interpreting, and extracting data using IT techniques to support decision-making. This role works with customers to understand changing requirements and recommends solutions based on quantitative analysis. Responsibilities include working independently and collaboratively on a team to develop data models and solutions. This role compiles and reviews data, often disparate and inconsistent, to address complex intelligence issues or problems for the customers. This role requires constructing and performing complex statistical, mathematical, and data analysis independently or in partnership with other data scientists or analysts. This role provides recommendations for the development of tools and applications that improve process effectiveness and efficiency.

PF1
Required Skills and Education
Degree : BA/BS or MA/MS in a technical field such as mathematics, engineering, or computer science (6 years of work experience may be substituted for a Bachelor's degree)
Experience supporting complex data science and analytic projects
Experience/knowledge of computer science concepts including programming, statistics, data architecture, and data analytics
Experience with quantitative and qualitative content analytics
Excellent reading comprehension skills
Detail-oriented with a proficiency for researching, analyzing, and prioritizing intelligence reports and cables
Ability to work with IC tools and databases
Strong problem-solving, analytic, and written and oral communication skills
Excellent attention to detail and ability to accurately follow SOPs
Ability to work shift work/extended hours
Strong interpersonal skills and the ability to work well both independently and in a team environment
Preferred Skills and Education
Experience in modern machine learning, AI, biometrics, social network analysis, or geospatial analysis
Experience/knowledge of link analysis tools (e.g. Palantir, i2 Analyst's Notebook)
Experience with cloud architectures including AWS
Experience with distributed computing and storage technologies
About BAE Systems Intelligence & Security BAE Systems Intelligence & Security, based in McLean, Virginia, designs and delivers advanced defense, intelligence, and security solutions that support the important missions of our customers. Our pride and dedication shows in everything we dofrom intelligence analysis, cyber operations and IT expertise to systems development, systems integration, and operations and maintenance services. Knowing that our work enables the U.S. military and government to recognize, manage and defeat threats inspires us to push ourselves and our technologies to new levels. Thats BAE Systems. Thats Inspired Work. Equal Opportunity Employer/Females/Minorities/Veterans/Disabled/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/Gender Expression. To see Inspired Work in action, visit www.baesystems.com and follow us on Facebook: www.facebook.com/baesystemsintel.",3.7,BAE Systems USA,"McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,21,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.5,VA,3340,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
169,169,"Scientist/Machine Learning Engineer, Applied Science",$56k-$97k,"The Scientist/Senior Scientist/Lead Scientist - (Machine Learning Engineers) will work with the rest of the team to research, invent, and implement the next generation prediction, optimization, and analytics technology. You are a brilliant, motivated self-starter and an extremely fast learner with top notch problem solving, and analytical skills. You have a deep sense of curiosity and innate desire to dig deep into terabytes of data and love to play with the innards of complex algorithms, mathematical constructs and code.

Responsibilities
Research, design and/or implement solutions to challenging problems in real-time bidding domain, such as all kinds of optimization problems, audience understanding, etc.
Research and improve features and machine learning models for production pipeline.
Provide insights and suggestions on customer campaign optimization problems and product/platform optimization problems through statistical data analysis when needed.
Drive innovation by identifying and formulating new problems, publishing papers, filing patents, etc.
Required Qualifications
PhD degree in a closely related field (e.g.: computer science/engineering, optimization) with publications in the area is strongly preferred
Or Masters with significant experience in advertising and Machine Learning
Experience in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, data mining, statistical modeling, optimization, algorithms, big-data, game theory
Proficiency with one or more programming languages - ability to write/debug production code.
Excellent communication skills – ability to present and communicate complex ideas in simple terms
Strong statistical/math/analytical abilities; Exceptional problem solving skills
Desired Qualifications
Previous experience in the advertising industry
Strong programming experience with Java, C/C++, Python and/or Scala
Excellent knowledge in algorithms and data structures
#LI-KM1

About Amobee
The world’s leading independent advertising platform, Amobee unifies all advertising channels—including TV, programmatic and social—across all formats and devices. We provide marketers with streamlined, advanced media planning capabilities powered by in-depth analytics and proprietary audience data. Our platform and technology, provides the most advanced advertising solutions for the convergence of digital and advanced TV— including linear TV, over the top, connected TV, and premium digital video. Enabling advertisers to plan and activate across more than 150 integrated partners, including Facebook, Instagram, Pinterest, Snapchat and Twitter.

Amobee has been named to Fortune’s Top 10 Best Workplaces in Advertising and Marketing. Amobee’s platforms have been widely recognized amongst our industry winning numerous awards in technology innovation, see all Amobee Awards. We are a wholly owned subsidiary of Singtel, one of the largest telco companies in the world, reaching over 700 million mobile subscribers in 21 countries. Amobee operates across North America, Europe, Middle East, Asia and Australia. For more information, visit amobee.com or follow @amobee

In addition to our great environment, we offer a competitive base salary, employee development programs and other comprehensive benefits. Please send a cover letter along with your resume when applying to the position of interest located at Amobee.com. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. No phone calls and no recruiting agencies, please.",3.7,Amobee,"Redwood City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,15,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.5,CA,3460,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
171,171,Senior Data Scientist / Associate Principle Data Scientist,$56k-$97k,"Do you want to join us and apply machine learning to tackle difficult problems in biotechnology drug development? As an AI Scientist, you can play a pivotal role in a rapidly growing team analyzing and manipulating various types of biomedical datasets and generating the insights from our complex data that brings innovative medicines to patients.

About AstraZeneca in Gaithersburg, MD:

Our Gaithersburg, Maryland facility creates life-changing medicines for people around the world. This campus employs more than 3,500 experts in our field and is only a short drive from Washington, DC. This modern and vibrant scientific campus is the home of R&D and Oncology in the US. Here, we play host to some of the most cutting-edge technology and lab spaces, all designed to inspire collaboration and cross-functional science. We believe employees benefit from being challenged and inspired at work. We are dedicated to creating a culture of inclusion and collaboration.

The Gaithersburg site offers a variety of amenities to help boost productivity and help keep our employees happy and healthy. This includes a fitness center, employee healthcare clinic, electric vehicle charging stations, dry cleaning, full-service cafeteria and copy center. This is where youll find newly-designed, activity-based work spaces to suit a range of working styles while increasing collaboration between teams.

Summary of the group:

The Data Science and Modeling team within AstraZenecas Biopharmaceutical Development (BPD) group applies sophisticated algorithms and techniques to solve some of the hardest problems in the development of biological medicinal products. The team uses a blend of scientific, problem solving, and quantitative skills to develop and deliver ground breaking methods addressing critical problems in bioproduct development.

Our team of data scientists work right next to biotechnology scientists and operational teams, allowing them direct influence on the questions, the design of the corresponding studies and real time access to the resulting data. Biopharmaceutical Development has more than 20 years of experience with biotherapeutics, has brought more than 100 molecules to the clinic and has launched 6 new therapies. Together we seek to:
Improve our understanding of disease and uncovering new targets
Transform R&D processes
Speed the design and delivery of new medicines for patients
Main Duties & Responsibilities:
Develop, implement and support modelling solutions for the AI ecosystem for bioprocess optimization including integrating data from multiple different sources and modalities, as well as the application of classification, regression, clustering, image analysis, or graph theory and other specialist techniques
Researching and developing predictive models and computational methods to guide decision-making within project parameters and established approaches
Translate unstructured, business problems into the appropriate data problem, model and analytical solutions
Perform AI research, including establishment of hypotheses that can be approached using computational methods and tools. May present or publish findings for conferences and in peer reviewed journals
Build effective relationships with established range of stakeholders to ensure utilization and value of information resources and services. Clearly and objectively communicate results, as well as their associated uncertainties and limitations within agreed frameworks
Develop, maintain and apply ongoing knowledge and awareness in trends, standard methodology and new developments in analytics and data science
Education & Experience Requirements:

Senior Data Scientist - Graduate Degree in mathematics, computer science, physics, statistics, engineering, or a related quantitative discipline.

Associate Principle Data Scientist - Graduate Degree in mathematics, computer science, physics, statistics, engineering, or a related quantitative discipline AND 4+ years of related industry experience.

Required Skills:
Knowledge of modern data science approaches, including unsupervised and supervised classification and regression algorithms. May also have expertise in advanced statistical modelling, or broader aspects of applied mathematics such as dynamical systems or optimization.
Algorithm design, development, optimization, scaling and applications
Data modeling experience with sequential data such as signals, sequences, and time series.
Predictive modeling: Classification and Regression
R, Python/Julia Programming experience, SQL Querying
Stakeholder management and effective communication of the results and models
Desired Skills:
Understanding and familiarity with deep learning algorithms for RNN, CNN, or reinforcement learning for sequential data modeling
Recommendation systems
CNN for Image analysis and processing
AWS storage and services
Excellent problem solving, written and verbal communication, business analysis, and consultancy skills
Why AstraZeneca?

At AstraZeneca when we see an opportunity for change, we seize it and make it happen, because any opportunity no matter how small, can be the start of something big. Delivering life-changing medicines is about being entrepreneurial - finding those moments and recognising their potential. Join us on our journey of building a new kind of organisation to reset expectations of what a bio-pharmaceutical company can be. This means were opening new ways to work, pioneering cutting edge methods and bringing unexpected teams together. Interested? Come and join our journey.

So, whats next!

Are you ready to bring new ideas and fresh thinking to the table? Brilliant! We have one seat available and we hope its yours.

Where can I find out more?

Check out our landing page for more information on our BPD group https://careers.astrazeneca.com/bpd

Our Social Media, Follow AstraZeneca on LinkedIn https://www.linkedin.com/company/1603/

Follow AstraZeneca on Facebook https://www.facebook.com/astrazenecacareers/

Follow AstraZeneca on Instagram https://www.instagram.com/astrazeneca_careers/?hl=en",4.0,AstraZeneca,"Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,107,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.5,MD,6077,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
172,172,Cloud Data Engineer,$56k-$97k,"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 400 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.

If you have proven experience working with one or more Public Cloud Providers such as AWS and Microsoft Azure in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you.
Design and development of relational and non-relational databases, data warehouses and data lakes
RDS, Azure SQL DB, Azure DB for MySQL, Azure DB for PostgresSQL
AWS DynamoDB, AWS SimpleDB, Azure Cosmos DB
Amazon Redshift, Azure Data Lake Storage, Azure Synapse Analytics
AWS DB Migration Service, Azure DB Migration Service
Development, monitoring and maintenance of data integration and processing tools and pipelines
AWS Glue, AWS Data Pipeline, Azure Data Factory
AWS Data Pipeline, AWS Glue
Design and testing of machine learning and data science tools, including the building and deployment of data models
Amazon EMR, Azure Databricks, Azure HDInsight
Implementation of high-capacity, real-time data streaming technologies
AWS Kinesis Analytics, Azure Stream Analytics, Azure Data Lake Analytics, AWS Lambda
Data analysis and visualization tools
AWS QuickSight, Azure PowerBI
Amazon Athena, Azure Data Lake Analytics
Leveraging non-database data storage alternatives to maximize performance, costs and data quality
AWS S3, Azure Blob Storage
AWS ElastiCache, Azure Cache for Redis
AWS CloudSearch, Azure Search
Familiarity with security and security policies within AWS and Azure
Nice to have
Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Azure or AWS Certification
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes
bonus experience

Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes

what's in it for you?

Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success as sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology and social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,Solution Design Group,"Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,31,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.5,MN,3065,0,data engineer,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
173,173,Data Engineer,$56k-$97k,"Job Description

Why consider OPI, and why do people dig working here?
Variety of consulting; new technologies, projects, and people on a regular basis.
Stability; we’ve been around since 1996 and have a diverse mix of clients and technologies to keep us busy, very busy. And we keep a bench. If you’re not on a project, you’re writing software for our internal business functions or you’re learning new technologies. It’s in our benefit to make our consultants as marketable as possible. That’s good for your career.
No politics or management; we don’t get in the way. Why sit in meetings all day when you can code and be productive?
Awesome benefits; free healthcare for your entire family (yes, free), 24 days of PTO + 10 days of sick time, quarterly profit sharing bonuses, you get paid OT, company trips (to Mexico), 3 company lake cabins/homes, various quarterly company events, new Macbook Pro’s, free beer/soda, chips, candy, and so much more.
You work with the best. Do an Object Partners search on LinkedIn and see the types of talent we hire. You truly get to work with intelligent, passionate engineers that share the same goal of building great software the right way.
Low company overhead. It all means more money back into our consultants pockets (profit sharing) or company trips and events to share in the financial success.

Qualifications

Architecture and design of highly available/scalable distributed systems.
Design and development of streaming data platforms using Kafka Streams, Spark, Flink, Storm, Beam or Cloud Dataflow.
Experience with functional/event-driven programming.
NoSQL technologies such as ElasticSearch or Cassandra.
Messaging technologies such as RabbitMQ, Kafka or Kinesis.
SQL on Hadoop technologies such as Hive, Impala or Presto.
Cloud services such as AWS, Azure, GCP or OpenStack.
JVM languages such as Java, Groovy, Kotlin or Scala.
Service frameworks such as Spring Boot, Ratpack, Vert.x, or Play.
Knowledge of data analytics, visualization and governance.
Knowledge of operating big data production solutions at scale.
Knowledge of CI/CD pipelines and DevOps culture.
Passion for software development. Someone that loves what they do, that aren’t just in it for a paycheck. Do you have dev projects going on at home at all times?
New projects, new teams, new technologies means having to adjust and learn all the time. You might get thrown on a DevOps project as well, so having the ability to jump in and get your feet wet without hesitation is important. If you don’t want to grow and learn, we’re not a fit.
Positive, can-do attitude. We can teach the technology, but we can’t teach how to approach client challenges with a positive, helpful demeanor. The best consultants aren’t the most technical (although that sure helps), it’s the consultant that will do whatever it takes to see a client be successful, no matter what they throw at you.",4.8,Object Partners,"Des Moines, IA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,24,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.5,IA,2896,0,data engineer,0,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
177,177,AWS Data Engineer,$56k-$97k,"AWS Data Engineer Northern, VA

AWS Data Engineer


Minimum Requirements
Active SECRET clearance preferred; Clearable US Citizen with NAIC (National background check) may also apply
5 years Data Engineering experience AND a BA Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Math, Sciences, or equivalent; 4 years of additional relevant experience may be substituted for education.
Working knowledge of agile software development, DevSecOps, and AWS native solutions including API Gateway, S3, and Lambda is required.
Preferred Experience
Knowledge of several of the following areas is desirable: DevSecOps, Active Server Pages, JavaScript, Python, HTML, and AWS native applications including S3, WAF, API Gateway, Lambda, CloudFront, DynamoDB, Transcribe, Athena, Simple Queue Service, QuikSight, CloudWatch, CloudTrail, KMS, and Cognito.
Job Duties
Provide development support to the Scrum Master in an agile software development environment in AWS.
Works as a key member of an AWS native solution software development team and works to identify risks and bottlenecks associated with big data environments.
About NuWave Solutions

NuWave Solutions is a recognized leader in providing anticipatory intelligence and advanced data analytics to the defense, intelligence, and private sectors for over 20 years. Leveraging artificial intelligence and machine learning methodologies, NuWave Solutions streamlines the Data-to-Decision lifecycle faster than traditional practices allowing clients to take action with confidence.

For more information on how NuWave Solutions supports its clients and builds upon success, please visit https://www.nuwavesolutions.com

Position Details
Location – Arlington, Virginia
Travel Required – N/A
If travel is required, how much? 0%
Work Schedule (Shift etc.): Day Shift
Authorization to work in US required
8570 Requirements: N/A
NuWave Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled
Tagged as: AWS Data Engineer",4.4,NuWave Solutions,Virginia,-1,51 to 200 Employees,21,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.5,VA,1954,0,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
178,178,Data Scientist - Telecommute,$56k-$97k,"Optum Payment Integrity Analytics is looking to expand and is seeking a Data Scientist to join our team and help us reach our goals of accurate and effortless payments of claims through advanced analytics and machine learning. You should be an exceptional disciplined and self-motivated Data Scientist with predictive modeling and advanced analytics experience and a passion for working with healthcare data, experience using various computational approaches, and a portfolio of projects you can show and talk about.

Youll enjoy the flexibility to telecommute* from anywhere within the U.S. as you take on some tough challenges.

Primary Responsibilities:
Deliver value to our UHC partners through analytics
Work alongside other data scientists, engineers, and project managers to design and implement models and experiments from end to end, including data ingestion and preparation, feature engineering, analysis and modeling, model deployment, performance tracking and documentation
Conduct hands-on data analysis and predictive analytics on large datasets
Effectively communicate complex technical results to business partners
Youll be rewarded and recognized for your performance in an environment that will challenge you and give you clear direction on what it takes to succeed in your role as well as provide development for other roles you may be interested in.

Required Qualifications:
Bachelors degree or higher in Applied Mathematics, Physics, Computer Science, Statistics or related technical field
2+ years of hands-on experience in in developing analytics with machine learning, deep learning, NLP, and/or other related modeling techniques (this experience can be academic based)
Proficiency in advanced data science tools such as R, Python, SQL, Spark and H2O
Experience applying computational algorithms and statistical methods to complex datasets
Experience combining analytic methods with advanced data visualizations using, for example, Tableau, Shiny or D3
Strong ability to breakdown and clearly define problems
Strong ability to communicate highly technical results to a diverse audience
Careers with Optum. Here's the idea. We built an entire organization around one giant objective; make the health system work better for everyone. So when it comes to how we use the world's large accumulation of health-related information, or guide health and lifestyle choices or manage pharmacy benefits for millions, our first goal is to leap beyond the status quo and uncover new ways to serve. Optum, part of the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, brings together some of the greatest minds and most advanced ideas on where health care has to go in order to reach its fullest potential. For you, that means working on high performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter. Optum, incredible ideas in one incredible company and a singular opportunity to do your life's best work.SM

*All Telecommuters will be required to adhere to UnitedHealth Groups Telecommuter Policy.

Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: UnitedHealth Group is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.

UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.

Job Keywords: Data Scientist, Telecommuter, Telecommute, Remote",3.4,Unitedhealth Group,"San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,43,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.5,CA,3633,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
179,179,Staff Data Scientist,$56k-$97k,"At Plenty, we're on a mission to give people in local communities everywhere access to the freshest, most amazing tasting produce possible. And to do so in a way that's better for the planet.

About Role


We are looking for a Staff-level Data Scientist to support analyzing full farm processes and system behavior from the top down in order to help create the most efficient farms that the world has ever seen. In this role, using data mining and statistical techniques, you will be analyzing and visualizing data to help improve operational efficiency, minimize farm losses, increase plant yield, and to find patterns amidst chaos. These combined goals will give Plenty's produce global reach at an accessible price, leading to increased produce consumption and raising the quality of living around the world. You will be part of a passionate and dynamic team that is developing new technology from the ground up.

Type of Role


Full-Time

What You'll Do
Understand data needs and construct data pipelines that addresses gaps and provide new information about farm processes and performance
Implement applications, dashboards, and statistical techniques to monitor process control tied to farm health
Define correlations between process parametrics and outcomes that help move plant yield and quality outcomes and improve overall process
Identify metrology gaps in both process parametrics and plant outcomes across farm to enable sensor hardware, firmware and data pipeline development for farm metrology
Own and drive computational modeling (i.e. machine-learning models of farm behavior, image processing for plant phenotypes, predictive models for yield, farm operational, market sizing and demand planning models, etc.)
Own communication and report outs of all analyses
What We're Looking For
BS / MS or Ph.D in Computer Science, Data Science, Statistics, Math or related degree with relevant experience)
Experience in machine vision
5-7+ years of expertise in using SQL to query messy datasets and to create data pipelines
5-7+ years of experience in R or Python (scripting languages) etc. for analyzing data
5-7+ years of experience of creating informative & interactive data visualizations
Systematic thinker who can balance multiple priorities and master new datasets quickly
Background in computational modeling, data science and analysis, ideally in farm systems, semiconductor or automotive manufacturing, plant breeding or agriculture-oriented industries
Well versed in statistical analysis, SPC, DOE, ANOVA, regressions etc. and able to draw conclusions on the relationships between variables
Exceptional collaborator with strong communication, adaptability, and leadership skills
Strong documenter of code, methods, and results
About Plenty


Plenty is here to change the way people eat, making extraordinary flavor and nutrition more available in a way that's better for people and the planet. We build farms that can put craveable flavor first while delivering exceptional yields. And our produce is always pesticide-free and grown using less than 1% of the land and 5% of the water of outdoor farming.",4.5,Plenty,"South San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,7,Company - Private,other_industries,Agriculture & Forestry,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.5,CA,3122,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
180,180,Data Scientist,$56k-$97k,"Strength in Trust


Our goal at OneTrust is to bring the power of trust to companies all over the world. Using cutting-edge technology and a real-world approach to ethics, compliance, privacy, security, and third-party risk, we've created a no-nonsense platform to help supercharge the global push for trust.

The Challenge


We are a looking for a Researcher/Data Scientist to drive the OneTrust research team. This person will be responsible for designing and developing various statistical models and simulations to power Athena's decisions to optimize our customer's privacy and security programs.

Your Mission
Develop working models that can be integrated into OneTrust application and leveraged by customers at scale
Functionally work across engineering teams to take problems the team has and convert/drive solutions for predictive analytics, AI intelligence to the problem in a practical way
Articulate the model and drive the patent portfolio of patenting designs and algorithms for use of the technology
Set the vision for developing complex analytics, data classification and NLP technologies
You Are
Someone who can design, code, build working prototypes to validate ideas and concepts
Someone who has strong math/statistic skills for how to analyze data sets
Someone who has a strong foundation of engineering skills to pick up and understand any technology, system, etc.
Able to understand the different types of trained and untraded AI models and when to appropriately use different techniques based on use case
Self-learning and a self-starter - you have a drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques
Your Experience Includes
PhD or Master's Degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g. statistics, mathematics, financial engineering)
5+ years of relevant experience in designing quantitative models to assess business risks and/or data classification modeling
Experience using statistical computer languages: R, Python, SQL, etc.
Knowledge and/or experience with several languages: Java, JavaScript, etc.
Experience with Azure, AWS or similar cloud computing environment
Expertise with machine learning, data mining, and (robust) statistics
An inclination to solve problems systematically via infrastructure and automation
Strong understanding of data classification, sensitivity, PII, and personal data modeling techniques
Experience in designing data pipelines and products for real world applications
Experience with modern/emerging scalable computing platforms and languages (e.g. Spark)
Extra Awesome
Any modeling work related to Privacy, Security, Compliance that is relevant to the OneTrust market (e.g. NLP work on privacy policies or consent models, risk modeling for ISO compliance)
Our Commitment to You


When you join OneTrust you are stepping onto a launching pad — the countdown has begun. The destination? A career without boundaries working alongside a diverse and inclusive crew who is passionate about doing meaningful work. As a pioneer, your voice and expertise will help chart the direction of an entirely new industry — Trust. Our commitment to putting people first starts with you. Your growth is part of the mission. Our goal is to give you the power to embark on the next phase of your uniquely, unique career

OneTrust provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.",2.8,OneTrust,"Atlanta, GA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,4,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.5,GA,3662,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,1,0,1
181,181,Data Scientist / Quantitative Research,$56k-$97k,"Overview

PicnicHealth is all about making medical records easy to access and using data to power the next frontier of medical research. We work directly with patients to give them the only tool anywhere that truly provides all of their medical records from any doctor or healthcare system in the USin an easy-to-use, secure online dashboard. Not only that, but patients can choose to contribute their incredibly important data to scientific research, which helps researchers accelerate breakthroughs in care. To date we've helped tens of thousands of patients, partnered with some of the world's largest biopharma companies, and raised more than $35M from Felicis Ventures, Amplify Partners, Foresite Capital, Refactor Capital, and Y Combinator.

The Opportunity

At PicnicHealth, Data Scientists on the Quantitative Research team are responsible for translating, assessing, and augmenting our Real World Data (RWD) to develop actionable insights and evidence for our life science partners. We're seeking an experienced data scientist to join the team to deliver bespoke analytics, create internal and customer tools, and develop predictive models to improve our research data product.

As a Data Scientist on the Quantitative Science team you will:
Use PicnicHealth's large, multi-disease multi-modal real-world dataset to answer critical clinical questions;
Become a subject matter expert on our data and its capabilities. Lead technical initiatives that further our understanding of RWD and methods to generate real-world evidence;
Transform real-world clinical data into actionable insights using data analytics, robust statistical methods, and compelling data visualizations accessible to a wide range of end-users;
Work with a cross-functional team to define and clarify analytic requirements, develop analysis plans, ensure data quality standards, and create publication-ready methods and results;
Conduct research to assess our data quality, identifying gaps and proposing solutions.
Develop and manage relationships with external partners (including life science companies, regulatory agencies, academic institutions, and health technology assessment bodies) to advance the integration of our analytic products, including through peer reviewed scientific publications.
Help continue to build a world-class Data Science team, by helping attract, interview, and onboard your future team members during this exciting time of growth.
Must haves:
You hold a degree in a quantitative discipline, such as biostatistics, epidemiology, applied statistics, health economics, or a related discipline
2+ years of industry experience in a quantitative/statistical position minimum (ie. data scientist, quantitative researcher, or analyst)
Passion for working with data and experience exploring it with a critical and thoughtful eye
Proficiency in R (tidyverse)
Familiarity with command line tools
You are self-motivated, flexible, proactive, and professional
Ability to work independently, and experience leading the development of analytical features
You enjoy coming up with elegant and innovative solutions to challenging problems
Excellent communication skills (both verbal and written) and can effectively adapt your tone, content, and approach to diverse audiences
You know how to balance attention to detail with execution against tight timelines. You are passionate about our patient-centric mission to improve healthcare for all
You'd be an amazing candidate if you have some/any of the following:
You have working/consulting experience in the life sciences industry
Experience working with medical data, longitudinal EMR data, and/or data ontologies (OMOP, etc)
More than 4 years of work experience as a data scientist, quantitative researcher, or analyst
You're an advanced R user, or have built an R package before
You've built an interactive data visualization app using the shiny package
Advanced experience with with SQL
Strong experience in statistics or biostatistical methods
Have a track record of producing scientific publications
Why join PicnicHealth?

At PicnicHealth you get to solve real problems with real solutions, great tech, and great people.

You also get:
Competitive salary
Comprehensive benefits including Health, Dental, Vision
Flexible time off
401k plan
Parental leave
Free PicnicHealth account
Equipment and internet funds while we're working remotely during COVID-19
Due to COVID-19, currently all roles are remote until at least until January 2021.

Equal Opportunity Statement

PicnicHealth is committed to promoting an inclusive work environment free of discrimination and harassment. We value a diverse and balanced team where everyone can belong.",4.8,PicnicHealth,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,6,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.5,CA,4687,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
182,182,Principal Data Engineer,$56k-$97k,"As Principal Data Engineer, you will be a founding member of the newly emerging Data Intelligence team at Absolute Software, responsible for building out and maintaining the data architecture subsuming the intelligence and data science function of the organization. Your colleagues are engineers, developers, and data scientists with backgrounds in computer science, statistics, and other related quantitative disciplines.

Working closely with engineering, data product, and business groups, your job is to build out scalable data pipelines and infrastructure to service the broader data intelligence team, as well as any stakeholders in the business who may benefit from a centralized, well-maintained, and well-organized data architecture toolset. We work to satisfy our internal stakeholders and our external customers. Your role will blend knowledge of big data pipelines and large table staging to develop containerized services and automations in cloud environments. Absolute Software operates on a cross-functional team model, and you will interface closely with everyone from full stack engineers and statistical modelers to data intelligence and business analysts.

Responsibilities will include:
Designing, developing, and maintaining a big data pipeline and cloud computing architecture and tool set
Harvesting, transforming, and staging large data tables for consumption by other data intelligence, data science, and business intelligence resources
Taking the lead on various big data projects
Guiding the integration of custom data solutions into more broadly automated production processes as necessary
Assisting with the recruitment and hiring of new Data Engineers (as resourcing and business growth allows)
Communicating team progress and milestones with product and business units in an effective and consistent way
Skills and Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree (Master’s preferred) in computer science or related discipline and superlative technical skills
4-6 years of direct experience working on a team of Software Engineers, Data Engineers, and/or Data Scientists
Experience working with big data pipelines, large data sets, and cloud computing resources, such as AWS or Google Cloud
Hive, Spark, and/or Scala experience preferred
Experience developing and running containerized services, using messaging queues and/or other components of message-oriented middleware
Strong Python programming",3.9,Absolute,"Denver, CO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,27,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.5,CO,2415,1,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,1
185,185,Clinical Data Scientist,$56k-$97k,"You will conduct analyses using various disparate types of healthcare data (e.g., clinical trial data, insurance claims data, Electronic Health Record (EHR) data, etc.). You will explore these data with a critical eye and transform these data into meaningful insights, creating outputs that may be used for publication, regulatory submissions, internal decision-making, market tracking, or other uses. Working closely with the other members of the Clinical Computational Sciences team, you will be encouraged to use new and emerging data sources and technologies to drive innovation and to conduct analyses at scale.
The Impact You Will Have
Our mission is to make innovative drugs affordable and accessible. You will be instrumental in making that vision a reality. We are working to build a truly modern and efficient clinical development organization, with data at the core of what we do. You will play a key role in analyzing this data in support of our development programs.
Who You Are
You hold a Masters or PhD in biostatistics, epidemiology, health economics, public health, computational biology or another quantitative scientific discipline, with 1-3 years of work experience
You are problem focused, creative, and practical in how you apply data to problems
You love working with data and live for the “aha!” moments where you use it to answer meaningful questions
You have experience applying observational and statistical methods to conduct rigorous scientific analyses
You’re energized by the prospect of rolling up your sleeves to tackle important problems in drug development and reimbursement
You can program fluently in a modern statistical programming software (e.g., R) and want to develop your skills further.
You’ve worked with data scientists and software engineers to put code into production – you think about scalable ways to improve the reach of your work.
You want to build a career in clinical data analysis (biostatistics, health economics, RWE, etc.)
Bonus points if you have experience in genomic data analysis or oncology data experience
You are an excellent communicator – you can use data to tell a clear and compelling story and can communicate complex analyses to many types of stakeholders
You have a curious mind and are excited to learn new skills, tools, and about novel types and uses of data.
EQRx is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",5.0,EQRx,"Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.5,MA,2635,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
186,186,"Principal Data Scientist, Bioinformatics",$56k-$97k,"At Roche Sequencing Solutions, we are driven to transform healthcare with next-generation sequencing (NGS) technologies and applications.

We are seeking a self-motivated Principal Data Scientist, Bioinformatics to join our Nanopore Sequencer Data Science group, where we collaborate with experimentalists and algorithm developers to build the Roche single-molecule DNA sequencer. If you enjoy working in cross-functional teams, applying data analysis skills to develop creative solutions, and driving bioinformatics deliverables for product development, we want to hear from you!

Responsibilities:
Collaborate with scientists and other engineering groups, understand their data-science and bioinformatics requirement and propose solutions and lead them to completion.
Help design, analyze, and interpret single-molecule sequencing experiments using custom and standard analysis tools.
Develop and improve algorithms for next-generation sequencing based diagnostics products. Develop and modify analyses that depend on standard next-generation sequencing analysis tools.
Write clean, maintainable, documented code using best engineering practices in the industry (design patterns, TDD, peer review, CI, automated testing etc.).
Prepare documentation and participate in design reviews.
Define in-depth statistical error profiles and their impact on secondary and tertiary analysis.
Document analysis procedures and results and present findings in meetings.
Utilize knowledge of bioinformatics, including machine learning, statistical modeling, and data visualization to help analyze and develop sequencing technology.
Requirements:
PhD in Bioinformatics, Biostatistics, Computation Biology, Computer Science or related technical/scientific field with a minimum of 2 years of direct related professional experience.
Experience in the use of high-level programming languages such as Python (preferred), Java and R for complex data analysis.
Experience with data visualization and report generation.
Experience with next generation sequencing a plus.
Roche is an equal opportunity employer.

Research & Development, Research & Development > Modelling & Simulation",4.1,Roche,"Santa Clara, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,124,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.5,CA,2160,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
189,189,"Director, Data Scientist – Visualization, Novartis AI Innovation Lab",$56k-$97k,"04-Sep-2020

Job ID
279466BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""Two companies and one incredible alliance.

Novartis and Microsoft have formed alliance to leverage data & Artificial Intelligence (AI) to develop transformative medicines faster and more cost-effectively for patients worldwide.

We are seeking a thought leader and team builder to join the Novartis Innovation AI Lab to advance the field of Life Science and healthcare analytics.

In this newly formed alliance with Microsoft, you will lead Visualization analysis for Novartis .

In this newly created role, you will:
• Conduct end-to-end Visualization analysis of large scale healthcare data sets
• Take a hands-on role and deliver on highly visible multiple projects
• Serve as an ambassador for Novartis Data Science by presenting and publishing articles at conferences, business meetings and academic institutions
• Facilitate design and creation of knowledge repositories
• Collaborate with the digital and DSAI teams
• Keep ahead of latest development in the field and mentor associates
• Inspire others on culture change

Why consider Novartis?

799 million. That’s how many lives our products touch. And while we’re proud of that fact, in this world of digital and technological transformation, we must also ask ourselves this: how can we continue to improve and extend even more people’s lives?

We believe the answers are found when curious, courageous and collaborative people like you are brought together in an inspiring environment. Where you’re given opportunities to explore the power of digital and data. Where you’re empowered to risk failure by taking smart risks, and where you’re surrounded by people who share your determination to tackle the world’s toughest medical challenges.

We are Novartis. Join us and help us reimagine medicine.

Posting Title
Director, Data Scientist – Visualization, Novartis AI Innovation Lab",4.0,Novartis,"Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,24,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.5,MA,1922,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
190,190,"Senior Data Scientist, Product Analytics",$56k-$97k,"As Scale’s first Product Data Scientist, you will lead the charge on building our product analytical infrastructure and driving insights that lead to step-function improvements in how we operate. We handle millions of tasks for businesses looking to scale their ML development, and we’re looking for a talented product data scientist to help us understand it all in the service of building better products. In this role, you will apply statistical models, design and interpret experiments, build mission-critical dashboards, and help structure and order our data in the pursuit of transparency over how we operate and how we can improve.
You will:
Own end-to-end product analytics workflow including formulating success metrics, socializing them across the organization, and creating dashboards/reports.
Ensure product areas are performing in line with our high expectations and be able to identify, diagnose, and recommend projects to improve our performance.
Influence product teams through presentation of data-based recommendations.
Identify operational efficiencies to the business that will enable Scale to continue growing sustainably.
Design, run, and analyze experiments.
Apply statistical models to identify root causes and predict the future performance of tasks, users, and products.
Conduct statistical and trend analysis to identify opportunities, highlight strengths, and provide recommended corrective actions.
Ideally you'd have:
4-6+ years of industry experience in product data science broadly
Strong proficiency in writing complex SQL queries
Mastery with data science tools such as R, and/or Python
Experience with statistical modeling and experimental design
A detail-oriented and analytical mindset, with emphasis on accuracy
About Us:
At Scale, our mission is to accelerate the development of Machine Learning and AI applications across multiple markets. Our first product is a suite of APIs that allow AI teams to generate high-quality ground truth data. Our customers include OpenAI, Zoox, Lyft, Pinterest, Airbnb, nuTonomy, and many more.

Scale AI is an equal opportunity employer. We aim for every person at Scale to feel like they matter, belong, and can be their authentic selves so they can do their best work. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

Scale AI is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with physical and mental disabilities. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation in the application or recruiting process due to a disability, please contact us at accommodations@scale.com. Please see the United States Department of Labor's EEO poster and EEO poster supplement for additional information.",3.2,Scale AI,"San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,4,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.5,CA,2822,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
191,191,Data Engineer –,$56k-$97k,"Data Engineer – Sunnyvale, CA

Sunnyvale, CA
JOB DESCRIPTION

As a Data Engineer with Tredence, you will demonstrate ability to transform business requirements to code, specific analytical reports and tools. You will also provide business insights, while leveraging internal tools and systems, databases and industry data.
THE IDEAL CANDIDATE WILL

Very Strong engineering skills. Should have an analytical approach and have good programming skills.
Provide business insights, while leveraging internal tools and systems, databases and industry data
Minimum of 5+ years’ experience. Experience in retail business will be a plus.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for varied audiences on engineering subject matter
Ability to document requirements, data lineage, subject matter in both business and technical terminology.
Guide and learn from other team members.
Demonstrated ability to transform business requirements to code, specific analytical reports and tools
This role will involve coding, analytical modeling, root cause analysis, investigation, debugging, testing and collaboration with the business partners, product managers other engineering team.
Must Have
Strong analytical background
Self-starter
Must be able to reach out to others and thrive in a fast-paced environment.
Strong background in transforming big data into business insights
ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA

Technical Requirements
Knowledge/experience on Teradata Physical Design and Implementation, Teradata SQL Performance Optimization
Experience with Teradata Tools and Utilities (FastLoad, MultiLoad, BTEQ, FastExport)
Advanced SQL (preferably Teradata)
Experience working with large data sets, experience working with distributed computing (MapReduce, Hadoop, Hive, Pig, Apache Spark, etc.).
Strong Hadoop scripting skills to process petabytes of data
Experience in Unix/Linux shell scripting or similar programming/scripting knowledge
Experience in ETL/ processes
Real time data ingestion (Kafka)
Nice to Have
Development experience with Java, Scala, Flume, Python
Cassandra
Automic scheduler
R/R studio, SAS experience a plus
Presto
Hbase
Tableau or similar reporting/dash boarding tool
Modeling and Data Science background
Retail industry background
Education

BS degree in specific technical fields like computer science, math, statistics preferred
Send your CV to careers@tredence.com",3.4,Tredence,"Sunnyvale, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,7,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.5,CA,2377,0,data engineer,1,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
192,192,Cleared Data Scientist,$77k-$124k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

As an experienced Data Scientist, you might be wondering what makes MITRE different than other government contractors and consulting firms. Many of our recent hires answered YES to at least one of the questions below:
Do you want to partner with Defense Intelligence professionals to solve problems?
Are you interested in developing, automating and improving capabilities to address technical issues of national importance and making a direct mission impact?
Are you interested in contributing to technical projects that you can feel passionate about?
Are you interested in working for a company where a 40-hour week is the norm and not the exception?
Do you want exceptional benefits, including tuition reimbursement for coursework towards an advance degree in a technical discipline?
In the Defense Intelligence Department, you can apply and expand software development and data skills to recommend solutions to large-scale data challenges. Join our team to develop automated methods to ingest and analyze large datasets; conduct data analysis and data modeling; and develop prototype capabilities. The candidate will be expected to work independently, with Analysts, and with Data Scientists to develop new workflows and approaches to answer questions of national significance. Our department works to identify and bring solutions to the Defense Intelligence Community and work in the public interest. We also actively conduct independent research in areas that further the knowledge of our government partners.

To be successful you will:
Be passionate about applying data analytics to real world problems.
Have an innate curiosity and interest in developing research questions and testing hypotheses with open ended tasking.
Work with Defense Intelligence government sponsors to gain understanding of their challenges, evaluate possible solutions and conduct insightful, actionable analyses.
Support the development and application of a variety of analytical models to sponsor challenges, with a willingness to adapt and learn.
Present results in an intuitive, actionable manner that can be understood by all sponsor audiences, regardless of technical expertise.
Provide relevant day-to-day tasking for one or more junior staff.
Lead projects throughout their life cycle, including conceptualization, requirements definition, data procurement, development, integration, and socialization
Minimum Qualifications :
BS and 8 years related experience
Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or applicants who are eligible for security clearances.
Required Qualifications:
Prior experience working with the Department of Defense and/or Intelligence Community.
Significant academic background in a quantitative field such as Computer Science, Engineering, Operations Research, Mathematics, or Statistics.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Demonstrated ability to manipulate large datasets and perform calculations with at least two modern programming language like Python (scikit-learn, pandas, tensorflow), C++, R, or Java or a business intelligence platform like Tableau.
Ability to apply, modify and formulate algorithms and processes to solve challenging problems.
Familiarity with AWS tools.
Demonstrated experience leading customer facing engagements emphasizing data analytics.
Possess and maintain an Active TS/SCI level security clearance with the ability to successfully obtain a CI Poly level clearance.


Preferred Qualifications:
Prior experience working with databases (e.g., PostgreSQL, Oracle, MySQL, MongoDB, Neo4j).Experience visualizing multi-dimensional data using tools like Tableau, ggplot2, Plotly, matplotlib, seaborn, or D3.js.
Experience leading or conducting research.
Experience designing data science tasking and/or leading a team of data scientists.
Experience applying various machine learning approaches (e.g., random forest, neural networks, support vector machines).
Experience using version control (e.g., Git, Mercurial, SVN) to support collaborative development.
Prior experience developing interactive data visualizations using open source web technologies (Angular, Vue, React, D3.js) or other frameworks (Shiny, Jupyter Notebooks).
Prior experience developing data-intensive full stack web applications using Node.js, Flask, Django, or other technologies.
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.2,MITRE,"Charlottesville, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,VA,6269,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
193,193,"Data Scientist, Sr.- CPlex/Gurobi",$77k-$124k,"Data Scientist- St. Louis, MO

No c2c or sponsorship

PhD in Operations Research, Industrial Engineering, Computer Science or any related area. Must have experience with Cplex/Gurobi.

Experience in solving scheduling, vehicle routing and allocation problems using operations research techniques and heuristics (+5 years)

CPLEX/Gurobi experience (+5 years)

Java experience (+4 years)

Database knowledge (+5 years)

Ability to work in fast paced environment

Preferred skill set:

Experience in solving large scale scheduling and routing problems using operations research (column generation, B&P, etc)

Experience in IBM DOC

Experience in working with data API’s, Teradata, Oracle

Knowledge in Python or R (+3 years)The candidate will be working on developing regional and global resource allocation, scheduling, and vehicle routing models to make recommendations for field (planting, detasseling, harvest) and facility operations. The recommendations should result in operations efficiency. The candidate has to work closely with business partners to gather assumptions and scope the problem, then independently formulate, code and execute the problem. Finally, models need to be validated with and approved by the business user and technical documentation needs to be developed.",4.5,Envision LLC,"Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,26,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,MO,1285,1,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0
194,194,Data Engineer,$77k-$124k,"Analytics
Data Engineer - QuantumBlack

Chicago

Apply Now

Qualifications

Degree educated in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, or equivalent experience
Previous commercial experience in a data-driven role
Ability to write clean, maintainable, and robust code in Python, Scala, Java or similar languages
Knowledge of software engineering concepts and best practices
Familiarity with the latest OSS, cloud, container, query and database technologies as well as query languages
Confirmed experience building data pipelines in production and ability to work across structured, semi-structured and unstructured data
Experience preparing data for analytics and following a data science workflow
Commercial client-facing or senior stakeholders management experience

Who You'll Work With


You will be part of a global Data Engineering community and you will work in cross-functional and Agile project teams alongside Project Managers, Data Scientists, Machine Learning Engineers, other Data Engineers, and industry experts.

You will work hands in hands with our clients, from data owners and users to C-level executives.

Who you are

You are a highly collaborative individual and enjoy solving problems that focus on adding business value. You have a sense of ownership and enjoy hands-on technical work. Our values resonate with yours.

What You'll Do


As a Data Engineer in Chicago, you will...
Partner with our clients, from data owners and users to C-level executives, to understand their needs and build impactful analytics solutions
Design and build data pipelines to support data science projects following software engineering best practices
Use state of the art technologies to acquire, ingest and transform big datasets
Map data fields to hypothesis, curate, wrangle and prepare data to be used in advanced analytics models
Create and manage data environments in the cloud or on premise
Ensure information security standards are maintained at all time
Contribute to cross-functional problem-solving sessions with your team and deliver presentations to colleagues and clients
Be flexible to travel to our clients' offices to deliver presentations, gather information or share knowledge
Have the opportunity to contribute to R&D and internal asset development projects
Our tech stack

While we advocate for using the right tech for the right task, we often leverage the following technologies: Python, PySpark, SQL, Airflow, Databricks, our own OSS called Kedro, container technologies such as Docker and Kubernetes, cloud solutions such as AWS, GCP or Azure, and more!

What you'll benefit from
Real-World Impact– No project is ever the same. We work with top-tier clients across multiple sectors, providing unique learning and development opportunities internationally.
Fusing Tech & Leadership– We work with the latest technologies and methodologies and offer first class learning programmes at all levels.
Multidisciplinary Teamwork- Our teams include data scientists, engineers, project managers, UX and visual designers who work collaboratively to enhance performance.
Innovative Work Culture– Creativity, insight and passion come from being balanced. We cultivate a modern work environment through an emphasis on wellness, insightful talks and training sessions.
Striving for Diversity– With colleagues from over 40 nationalities, we recognise the benefits of working with people from all walks of life.
Visit our Careers site to watch our video and read about our interview processes and benefits.

Industries
Healthcare Systems & Services
Oil & Gas
Telecommunications
Travel, Transport & Logistics
Automotive & Assembly


+ 4 More

Apply Now
FOR U.S. APPLICANTS: McKinsey & Company is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender
identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected Veteran
status, age, or any other characteristic protected by applicable law.

FOR NON-U.S. APPLICANTS: McKinsey & Company is an Equal Opportunity employer. For additional details
regarding our global EEO policy and diversity initiatives, please visit our
McKinsey Careers and
Diversity & Inclusion sites.",5.0,QuantumBlack,"Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,11,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,IL,4255,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
196,196,Data Scientist/Business Intelligence Engineer,$77k-$124k,"Homesite Insurance was founded in 1997 and was one of the first companies to enable customers to purchase home insurance directly online, during a single visit. Since then, we've continued to innovate rapidly to meet the needs of our customers and their changing expectations.

One thing that's stayed the same since our founding: our commitment to our customers, partners and employees.

Join us on our journey as we continue to grow into a powerful contender in the field of insurance.

Homesite Insurance Company is seeking an experienced, passionate and motivated, Data Scientist/ Business Intelligence Engineer, to provide strategic leadership in the areas of Insurance Operations. The ideal candidate must be able to make an immediate impact by working with stakeholders throughout the organization to plan and execute change to impact the bottom line. Their skill set will support the growth of the Commercial line of business by utilizing data to drive decisions that optimize operational results.

This role is part of our Operations Department, which is responsible for managing post sales processing and servicing activities to meet/exceed operational service level agreements in a cost effective manner. This department has business responsibility for policy processing, billing, claims processing, in-sourced and outsourced back office operations, service platform, and business ownership of call center technology platform and operations-based IT initiatives. The Operations Department drives continuous improvement in servicing capabilities through process and IT changes and partner with Underwriting, Finance, Claims, and IT.

The Data Scientist/Business Intelligence Engineer is a highly quantitative problem solver who loves to dig into different kinds of data and can confidently and successfully communicate their findings to stakeholders in different departments. They will act as a strategic change agent to drive the change management and adoption of key initiatives to support the growth of Homesite by leveraging enterprise data to model outcomes and create anomaly detection capabilities. The incumbent will work closely with Customer Service, Billing, Claims, Policy Operations, IT, KTC, Training and external vendors, developing solutions that optimize all areas of operations.

Responsibilities:

-Mine and analyze data from internal and external databases to drive optimization of operations, financial outcomes, customer experience and retention.

-Use statistical and machine learning/deep learning to build supervised, semi-supervised and unsupervised models per business needs.

-Ensure data quality throughout all stages of acquisition and processing, including areas such as data sourcing/collection, ground truth generation, normalization and transformation.

-Communicate proposals and results in a clear manner backed by data and coupled with actionable conclusions to drive business decisions.

-Work with other analysts and team members to translate models into business solutions and collaborate with other departments in the company when necessary.

-Interface with stakeholders and develop innovative approaches to communicate the value add of the models being built.

-Participate in the transfer of knowledge of methodologies and best practices to peers and colleagues through collaboration, mentoring, and formal presentation and consulting.

Required skills:

-Master’s degree or higher in Statistics, Machine Learning, Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Physics or other quantitative discipline.

-Three to five years business experience in statistical modeling, data mining, machine learning, artificial intelligence, and applying data base queries.

-Proficiency in programming in Python, R and SQL.

-Ability to extract and clean data from a variety of structured and unstructured sources.

-Ability to drive both individual and team projects to completion.

-Demonstrated ability to work with executives, such as CEO, CFO, and CIO on strategic direction setting and decision making.

-Demonstrated ability to build relationships and accomplish goals across a highly matrixed organization.

-Clearly communicate complex findings to colleagues and external customers.

-Monitor the results of statistical models through the use of dashboards and ad hoc analyses.

#LI-TD1",3.3,Homesite Group,"Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,23,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,MA,4327,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
199,199,Data Engineering Lead,$77k-$124k,"Overview


The Data Engineering Lead manages the design and build of modern analytics environments that comprise of raw data stores (data lakes) and cleansed data repositories by batch or streaming data pipelines. The Data Engineering Lead creates a robust, sustainable and flexible design and leads the technical delivery using Agile delivery frameworks like Scrum or Kanban. Should be a proven leader and mentor skilled at enabling and serving the development team.

Responsibilities
Developing and managing data processes to ensure that data is available and usable
Creation and automation of data pipelines and platforms
Managing and monitoring data quality via automated testing frameworks (Data Driven Testing, TDD, etc.)
Working closely with Architects, Data Scientists, and DevOps to design, build, test, deliver, and maintain sustainable and highly scalable data solutions
Researching data acquisition and evaluating suitability
Integration of data management solutions into client environment
Actively managing risks to data and ensuring there is a data recovery plan
Qualifications
7+ years relevant professional work experience.
Minimum of 5 years of hands on development experience in a technical role.
Explaining technical concepts in a business value context.
Technically savvy, entrepreneurial spirit who thrives in environments that reward self-initiative and resourcefulness.
Experience and expertise in the following:
Creating robust and extensible data pipelines for production systems
Use of cloud platforms, preferably AWS
Creating secure, performant, and well-modeled data stores
Common analytical platform architectural patterns (Star Schema, data integration patterns, ABAC, data quality frameworks etc.)
Data lake design patterns and technology options (schema on read, metadata capture, search framework)
Use of scripting languages, preferably Python
Source code version control management using git
Experience using NoSQL (e.g. Mongo, Neo4j) databases and data structures.
Excellent communication skills to be able to interact directly with non-technical client stakeholders and act in a business-to-technical translation role.
Experience working in an onsite client technical consulting environment preferred.
Experience working within Agile Frameworks, such as Scrum or Kanban.
About Excella


Excella is a leading provider of Agile software development and data and analytics solutions to clients in the federal, commercial and non-profit sectors. We believe that great work leads to great things –- our experts measure success by the positive impact we make on our clients, community, and colleagues. We are growing fast and need passionate, innovative people who love working with technology and are ready to make an impact.

Here's what you can expect from us:
You'll work with great people who love what they do: our team includes published authors, certified trainers, and internationally renowned speakers.
We have a ""bring your own device"" workplace and will share the cost of a new computer of your choice -- Mac or PC. It's up to you.
We'll invest in your career by providing 3 days of paid professional development every year, including travel and registration fees to attend classes and conferences, in addition to tuition assistance for degrees and certifications.
Starting day one, every employee is bonus eligible and receives 15 days of paid vacation, 6 federal holidays, and 4 floating holidays.
You can bike, drive, or metro to work -- our commute reimbursement plan has you covered.
You'll have fun! We hold monthly social events all year long, including a summer event for you and your family.
Excella is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.2,Excella Consulting,"Arlington, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,18,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,VA,3960,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
200,200,Biological Data Scientist,$77k-$124k,"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311168

Directorate: Earth and Biological Sciences Directorate

Division: Biological Sciences

Group: Biological Systems Science
*Job Description**
The new Computational Biology Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is seeking a senior data scientist to join our team to execute on existing projects as well as lead in the development of new research proposals. Expertise in statistics, analysis of omic data, biomarker discovery, software development, proposal development and working in multidisciplinary teams are highly relevant.

The data scientist will contribute to diverse fundamental science research programs studying human health problems such as cancer and infectious diseases as well as microbial communities and environmental microbiology. The candidate will be responsible for data analysis from various high-throughput omics platforms, such as DNA/RNA sequence data, proteomics and metabolomics. The position involves technical work with complex multi-omics data from ongoing studies, focusing on application of methods for analysis, data integration, and machine learning. The incumbent will define and carry out the application of existing methodologies, as well as perform original research in the field of computational biology as needed to extract meaning from complex biological data. In addition to technical research, this position expects participation in publishing, project leadership, and business development.

The ideal candidate should have a strong statistics and programming skills with knowledge of fundamental basic biology. The candidate should have good communication skills with a demonstrated capability to perform multi-disciplinary, collaborative research. The candidate should also have an interest in applying new approaches and knowledge to science problems associated with human health, bioenergy, and carbon cycling. The candidate should be highly proficient in at least on programming language (Python, R, e.g.) and have experience in software development practices (version control, unit testing, etc.).
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ BS/BA with 5 years of experience, MS/MA with 3 years of experience, or PhD with 1 years of experience
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ MS/MA or PhD in statistics, biostatistics, bioinformatics or a closely related field.

+ Significant experience with software development tools (GitHub) and Python or R development experience

+ Demonstrated ability to collaborate within and across institutions
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Closing Statement**
+ U.S. Citizenship

_Directorate:_ _Earth & Biological Sciences_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Biological Systems Science_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-09-04_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-09-24_",3.8,PNNL,"Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,55,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,WA,3715,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
202,202,Data Engineer,$77k-$124k,"The Data Engineer


COLLABORATE | OPTIMIZE | EVOLVE

As a Data Engineer at A Cloud Guru, you will ensure the data platform infrastructure and architecture supports the evolving requirements of the Data Engineering and Data Analytics teams as well as other parts of our business! You will work closely with the Director of Data Engineering to develop a strategy for our long term Data Platform architecture to identify gaps in the data processes and drive improvements while mentoring and coaching other team members. Thanks to your contributions, our data platform will continue to optimize and revolutionize. This role reports to the Director, Data Engineering.

Hello, we're A Cloud Guru


Our friends call us ACG.

We're on a mission to teach the WORLD to cloud. A Cloud Guru is the largest online cloud school on the planet. Our training feels more like logging into Netflix or Spotify - it's entertaining and playful. The people are the #1 reason employees say they stay at ACG. We're a quirky, tight-knit crew that cares about our customers and each other. No egos here. Our leaders encourage thoughtfulness, compassion, being humble, and we have a bit of fun along the way.

It's an exciting time to join the team, because we're in a really unique space. We have an amazing product that people want, and we're in an industry that's tripling in size overnight.

What makes the Product & Engineering team awesome...


Learning to cloud means unlocking a world of possibilities for our students. Using the latest tech, we design the tools to teach people cloud faster and better. The team is talented (and a little quirky), and we're all in it together.
Cutting edge tech. We've built a cloud-first Serverless Architecture with tools like Lambda, API Gateway, GraphQL, and ReactJS
Founded by engineers. Having a CEO that is also an engineer is nice, because he knows the effort it takes to make things awesome.
We're friendly. We're down-to-earth and collaborative. There's no high-performing jerks, there's no heroes, there's just great teams.
We're hungry, and humble. We are dedicated to learning all the things to create the best product possible.
If you're down to earth and enjoy a laugh while also working hard you'll love it here. - Joanna, Avocado to Guac Ratio Guru (and Product Manager)

As a Data Engineer at ACG, you'll get to:
Be an essential part of designing and building ACG's new data platform, as we evolve the existing databases into a cutting-edge solution to meet the needs of our 2021 data plans and beyond
Explore and contribute to discussions around technologies under consideration, such as Snowflake, Kappa/Lambda architecture, Delta Lakes and Data Vault
Develop, test and maintain existing architecture, including databases, data pipelines and large-scale processing systems
Collaborate with the Analytics team on transformation processes to populate data models
Recommend ways to improve data reliability, efficiency and quality of the data platform and optimise for performance, scalability and cost
Discover opportunities for data acquisition and explore new ways of using existing data
Identify gaps in data processes and drive improvements
Coach and mentor other team members
What you bring to the table


We focus on hiring values aligned people, because we believe the right person can learn all the things to be successful in their role. Self-confidence plays a big part in what you apply for. We encourage all job applicants to apply even if they are nervous to do so. College degrees aren't required for any roles, and career gaps or switches are totally welcome.

Essential
2+ years of Data Engineering, Data Warehousing, or related experience
2+ years of development experience with Python or similar scripting language
2+ years of SQL experience, including experience with schema design and dimensional data modelling
Experience working with AWS services such as DynamoDB, Glue, Lambda, Step Functions, S3, CloudFormation or Redshift
Experience with ETL development, metadata management, and data quality
Desirable
Knowledge of software engineering best practices with experience with implementing CI/CD, monitoring & alerting for production systems
Experience with complex data structures and No-SQL databases
Experience with open source orchestration platforms (e.g. Airflow)
We want the people who care about doing a good job. The ones who have the humility and hunger to learn. - Sam Kroonenburg, Co-Founder and CEO

More than a job


Where you work isn't just a career decision -- it's a life decision. We get it. That's why we want all of our Gurus to feel a sense of belonging that comes from feeling supported in all areas of their lives. Everyone has family, friends and interests outside of their careers, so we offer perks and benefits to make work, work better for you.
4 weeks PTO, plus 10 sick days, and holidays. Whether it's hiking to a waterfall in Costa Rica or bonding with your couch, we all need downtime. All Gurus get four weeks paid time off, 10 sick days, and enough holiday to make a banker blush.
Let's get lunch. Lunches are catered three times per week, and our kitchen stays stocked with a smorgasbord of the team's most requested snacks and drinks.
Parking is on us. We have your Downtown parking covered. We offer paid garage parking nearby the office. We also have perks for going green by walking and taking public transit.
We've got you covered. We offer insurance plans that pay for 100% of your medical, dental, and vision, and 80% for your family/dependents.
Gender-neutral paid parental leave. Expanding your family? We offer 12 weeks of gender-neutral paid parental leave, and reimburse up to $10,000 for eligible adoption expenses.
$1,000 continuing education budget. All Gurus get $250 a quarter to spend on personal development, and 2 hours each week reserved for learning something new.
What's the interview process like at ACG?


Applying for a job can feel intimidating and like a full-time job of its own. You shouldn't have to burn through a week of sick time or all your best out-of-office excuses just to put feelers out for a new career opportunity. We want to be as transparent about the process as possible to help ease your mind. It's our goal to provide you a fair, efficient interviewing experience that respects you and your time and to do it all with a sidecar of delight.

Once you submit an application, we'll review it. If you're a good fit, you'll have an initial chat with a recruiter over the phone. A phone interview with a manager typically follows. Depending on your role, you might then be asked to do a little homework (but nothing too time consuming). Then we'll schedule a Zoom call to meet other members of the team, answer any questions you have, and give you a feel for what it's really like to work at ACG. If you're on the fence, just give it a try.

Keep being awesome, Cloud Gurus.",4.6,A Cloud Guru,"Austin, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,5,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,TX,6904,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
203,203,Data Science Development Program- Junior Data Scientist,$77k-$124k,"Junior Data Scientist | Data Science Development Program
Amherst, MA

Deadline to apply: October 15, 2020
Start date: Mid-June, 2021

To finalize application, you must also submit a portfolio of project work. See below for more information.

What Great Looks Like In This Role

Our ideal teammate is someone who is a continuous learner who can adapt and thrive in complex, uncertain and changing situations. Someone who enjoys tackling complex tasks in a collaborative environment is well-suited to a position on our team. Self-motivated individuals comfortable working in a challenging, fast paced, technical environment are highly encouraged to apply!

You Are Able To Demonstrate This Through

A track record of thinking outside the box, taking initiative, and promoting innovation and change-making Ownership, commitment and follow-through in achieving results in school or work projects
Managing priorities effectively and adapting quickly to achieve goals
Pursuing opportunities for continuous learning to develop new skills and perspectives

About the Data Science Development Program

The Data Science Development Program (DSDP) trains junior team members to become well-rounded data scientists within three years. The development program includes high impact project work, mentorship from senior data scientists, in-house training and workshops, and sponsorship for graduate level coursework at the University of Massachusetts Amherst.

Data Science Development Program Highlights:
High-impact project work: Junior data scientists work together with MassMutuals data scientists to solve challenging problems in finance,

operations, marketing, digital initiatives, security, and product development.

Interdisciplinary learning: In the DSDP, junior data scientists are exposed to multiple fields within and adjacent to data science such as data visualization, software engineering, and enterprise architecture.

Mentorship: Peer mentors and senior mentors across data science domains are paired with each member of the DSDP
Training & Development: In-house workshops, tech-talks, seminars, and team-wide learning challenges such as our annual Month of Code

are available to all development program members.

Academic coursework: Members of the DSDP engage in graduate-level courses at the University of Massachusetts Amherst in computer science and statistics according to an individually tailored development plan.

Volunteer & Community Opportunities: Team members have many opportunities to volunteer throughout the year. Junior data scientists volunteer at hackathons throughout the state, attend community data events, speak at external talks, and participate in community data for good efforts annually..

About Us

The MassMutual Data Labs in downtown Amherst consists of a dynamic team that is actively engaged in dozens of high-impact projects across the enterprise, frequently working remotely with teams based in Springfield, MA, New York, and Boston. Our environment and workspace reflects our dedication to innovation and learning, and has a collaborative, start-up vibe. We hold weekly training meetings to present technical ideas, new models, or interesting code libraries.

Junior Data Scientist Duties Include
Statistical analysis
Programming in R and Python
Data ingestion and data cleaning
Model building, testing, deployment, and maintenance Building visualizations
Presenting and explaining output
Executive presentations and discussions
Adherence to internal standards in data science Collaboration across functions and business units

Application Instructions
To finalize your application for consideration, all applicants must submit a portfolio. For instructions, visit https://datascience.massmutual.com

/dsdp/apply

We accept applications from early career professionals and graduating students from undergraduate and graduate programs.

Minimum qualifications

Bachelors degree

Academic study or independent training in computational, quantitative, or technical fields, such as computer science, math, physics, or statistics

Working knowledge of Python, R, and SQL
Quantitative and technical skills in math and computer science Community engagement, involvement, and volunteerism Demonstrated leadership and change-making
Strong communication skills

Applications are accepted on a rolling basis through 2020, with priority consideration for applications received by Friday, October 23rd

*Ability to work in U.S. without sponsorship now or in the future

Preferred qualifications

Enthusiastic about pursuing an interdisciplinary career in data science, analytics, and technology Research and/or practical experience in related fields
Demonstrated work experience through part time employment, internships, or professional endeavors

Committed to Diversity and Inclusion

Our employees are the embodiment of the idea that we all are stronger and better through our support for one another. By valuing people for who they are, how they think, and what they bring to the table, weve become a stronger, more innovative company. We continue to receive external recognition for our policies and programs that seek to create a diverse and inclusive environment.

Americas Best Employer for Diversity Forbes (2019)
Score of 100 on the Human Rights Campaign Corporate Equality Index (2019)
National Association for Female Executives Top Company for Executive Women (2018) Disability Equality Index (DEI) Best Place to Work for Disability Inclusion (2019) Diversity Best Practices Inclusion Index Company (2018)",3.7,MassMutual,"Amherst, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,169,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,MA,5544,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0
204,204,"Senior Data Engineer-Remote, anywhere in the US",$77k-$124k,"Company Description

At Optiv, we’re on a mission to help our clients make their businesses more secure. We’re one of the fastest growing companies in a truly essential industry.

In your role at Optiv, you’ll be inspired by a team of the brightest business and technical minds in cyber security. We are passionate champions for our clients, and know from experience that the best solutions for our clients’ needs come from working hard together. As part of our team, your voice matters, and you will do important work that has impact, on people, businesses and nations. Our industry and our company move fast, and you can be sure that you will always have room to learn and grow. We’re proud of our team and the important work we do to build confidence for a more connected world.

Job Description

Responsibilities and skills include:
Build data pipelines to automate batch and real-time data delivery through StreamSets’ streaming data platform to data lakes, warehouses, analytical and machine learning applications
Develop applications from ground up using a modern technology stack including Python, Spark, Scala, RDS, NoSQL, Graph databases, ElasticSearch, Splunk
Integrate and ship code into AWS and Azure cloud Production environments
Build and utilize APIs and data delivery services that support critical operational and analytical applications for customers
Transform complex analytical models into scalable, production-ready solutions
Customer facing role – Walk thru to white boarding of architecture and implementation planning to stakeholders
Qualifications

Qualifications
College degree or/equivalent and 5 years' related work experience, required
At least 3 years of experience in Python, Scala, or Java
At least 3 years of experience building data pipelines in StreamSets
At least 3 years of experience utilizing SQL in data solutions
2-3 years’ experience with AWS, Azure, and/or GCP
5+ years of experience delivering data solutions using open-source components
5+ years of experience utilizing SQL in data solutions
3+ years of experience utilizing Gremlin or SPARQL in graph database solutions
Experience taking technical ownership over projects
Experience with the following technologies is highly desirable: Redshift (w/Spectrum), Hadoop, Apache NiFi, Airflow, Apache Kafka, Apache Superset, Flask, Node.js, Express, AWS EMR, Scala, Tableau, Looker, Dremio
Experience with service-oriented architecture for cloud-based services.
Experience and exposure to threat modeling and design reviews to assess security implications and requirements for introduction of new technologies.
Experience representing technical viewpoints to diverse audiences and in making timely and prudent technical risk decisions.
Experience with enterprise architecture and working as part of a cross-functional team to implement solutions.
Strong interpersonal and communication skills; ability to work in a team environment
Ability to work independently with minimal direction; self-starter/self-motivated
Technical writing experience
Additional Information

Why you’ll love it here:

If you are seeking a culture that supports growth, fosters success and moves the industry forward, find your place at Optiv! As a market-leading provider of cyber security solutions, Optiv has the most comprehensive ecosystem of security products and partners to deliver unparalleled services. Our rich and successful history with our clients is based on trust, serving more than 12,000 clients of varying sizes and industries, including commercial, government and education. We have the proven expertise to plan, build, and run successful security programs across Risk Management, Cyber Digital Transformation, Threat Management, Security Operations – Managed Services and Identity and Data Management. Optiv remains committed to championing Diversity, Equality and Inclusion within our organization and throughout the industry.

With Optiv you can expect:
Work/life balance. We offer “Recharge” a flexible, time-off program that encourages eligible employees to take the time they need to recharge
Professional training resources, including tuition reimbursement
Creative problem-solving and the ability to tackle unique, complex projects
Volunteer Opportunities. “Optiv Chips In” encourages employees to volunteer and engage with their teams and communities.
The ability and technology necessary to productively work remote/from home (where applicable)
Optiv is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants for employment will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, status as an individual with a disability, veteran status, or any other basis protected by federal, state, or local law.

#LI-PS1",2.7,Optiv,"Columbia, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,5,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,MD,4769,1,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
206,206,Sr Data Engineer,$77k-$124k,"Group O is seeking a strong candidate in the job of Senior Data Engineer for a Group O partner in San Antonio, TX. In this role, you will be a valuable expert in data coding and ETL and will lead the development of data models, structures, and data wrangling.

Responsibilities
Implementation including loading from disparate data sets, pre-processing using Hive and Pig
Scope and deliver various Big Data solutions
Design solutions based on high-level architecture
Manage technical communications between clients (technical and non-technical) and internal teams
Building a cloud-based platform that allows easy development of new applications
Collaborate with developers, subject matter experts, and business users in gathering and documenting requirements for data extraction and transformation
Perform code reviews, analyze execution plans, improve ETL jobs efficiencies, correct ETL defects and respond quickly to fixes and enhancement requests
Follow design standards for ETL and ELT processes
Analyze, assess and implement changes to existing solutions in response to business changes
Perform data research and analysis to find insights
Analyze data models to identify variances and discrepancies
Design, update, and maintain data sets
Work with geographically distributed team structure in a fast paced and challenging environment; multi-task and work under pressure
Communicate results with internal and external stakeholders

Qualifications:
An ideal candidate will have experience leading data quality assessment, will be a strong problem-solver and will have excellent interpersonal and communications skills.
Over 5 years of demonstrable experience designing technological solutions to complex data problems, developing & testing modular, reusable, efficient and scalable code to implement those solutions.
Strong understanding and experience in distributed computing frameworks, particularly Apache Hadoop 2.0 (YARN; MR & HDFS) and associated technologies -- one or more of Hive, Sqoop, Avro, Flume, Oozie, Zookeeper, etc.
Strong background with ETL Design and coding for Data loading, Data cleansing, Data Validation
Proficiency in SQL, SAS, R and Python – with preference to SQL
Previous experience designing custom deliverables based on user requirements
Excellent written and verbal communication skills – must be able to communicate fluently in English both verbally and in writing
Strong analytical and statistical analysis skills to extract insights and recommendations
Strong problem-solving skills, and the ability & confidence to hack their way out of tight corners
Insurance domain experience is preferred",3.1,Group O,"San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,46,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,TX,2629,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
208,208,Senior Data Engineer,$77k-$124k,"About Us

Kiva (kiva.org) is an international nonprofit with a mission to expand financial access to help underserved communities thrive. We run a global marketplace platform to crowdfund microloans for financially excluded entrepreneurs, farmers and students around the world. Our organization combines the culture and technological passion of an internet start-up with the compassion and empathy of a non-profit to create impact and opportunity at global scale. Since 2005, we have raised more than $1.4 billion in loan capital for 3.6 million borrowers in 95 countries. Our lenders fund over $13 million in loans every month. With offices in San Francisco, Portland, New York, Nairobi, and Bangkok, Kiva's team includes 100+ employees and 400+ volunteers worldwide. Our team is growing as we pursue exciting new opportunities to create a financially inclusive world.

About Data Science @Kiva

The Data Science team at Kiva creates impact by using data to solve problems around financial inclusion. This translates to a host of exciting and challenging technical problems spanning analytics, machine learning, data engineering, and infrastructure. The team is currently building out a new analytics stack, algorithms to power personalization on kiva.org, and is looking to scale analytics & data science for other kinds of problems. Our current ecosystem of infrastructure, tools, and skillsets include AWS, GCP, Kubernetes, Snowflake, Fivetran, Looker, DBT, Google Cloud Composer (Airflow), Snowplow, Python, Kotlin, and PHP.

About the Role

The team is looking for a strong engineer to help architect, design, build, maintain, and evolve our analytics platform. This is an opportunity to be an early influencer and a significant contributor to the direction and growth of the team. As a Senior Data Engineer, you will:
Own an analytics platform that will influence the experience of millions of lenders and borrowers around the world.
Work with internal stakeholders to identify their analytics needs, and drive the analytics engineering roadmap.
Collaborate with analysts, data scientists & engineers to write data transforms/pipelines to generate reliable insights, and build data-driven products.
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Work with various parts of the organization (Analytics, Engineering, Product, Operations, etc.) to support self-service analytics.
Help foster a spirit of innovation and collaboration both within the engineering team and across the organization.
Work to create impactful and sustainable solutions to complex problems by taking bold and measured risks.
Balance your technical excellence with a high E.Q., showing up with a sense of empathy, awareness, and responsibility.
Share the knowledge you gain generously with your peers to perpetuate a culture of engineering excellence.
This role will be based in San Francisco or Portland and will report to the Director of Data Science based in San Francisco. At this time, we can only consider applicants with authorization to work in the United States on a permanent, full-time basis; unfortunately, we cannot provide visa sponsorship.

About You
You have a BS in a quantitative discipline (computer science, engineering, physics, mathematics, or a related field) or comparable work experience.
You have built data platforms to enable analytics and data-driven products using agile software development principles.
You have 5+ years of data warehousing experience (data modeling, ETL/ELT, data cleansing, systems & database administration) on a modern data warehouse (like Redshift / Snowflake / etc.).
You have experience working with modern analytics tools (like Looker / Tableau / Metabase, etc.) to design user-facing analytics.
You have strong coding (SQL & Python) and report design skills.
You have worked with various internal stakeholders to gather business requirements and translate them into technical solutions.
You can communicate findings and recommendations to technical and non-technical audiences.
You are willing to learn, take initiative, and wear multiple hats as required.
What We Offer:
An opportunity to improve real lives, solve hard problems, and change the world
Friendly, supportive, and adventurous environment with a team of engaged colleagues
A comprehensive, industry-leading benefits package
Opportunities to connect with and learn from colleagues and partners around the world
A diverse and inclusive workplace where we learn from each other is an integral part of Kiva's culture. We actively welcome people of different backgrounds, experiences, abilities and perspectives. We are an equal opportunity employer and a great place to work. Join us and help us achieve our mission!

We will only accept applications directly from candidates. Kiva will not be responsible for any recruiting agency fees, absent a formal agreement.",4.0,Kiva.org,"San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,15,Nonprofit Organization,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,CA,4988,1,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
211,211,"Extract, Transform, Load (ETL) Data Engineer, Senior Level (51-3)",$77k-$124k,"Category: ETL Developer

Title: Extract, Transform, Load (ETL) Data Engineer, Senior Level (51-3)

Location(s): Springfield, VA

Required Security Clearance: Active TS/SCI with appropriate agency Polygraph

**************** ACCEPTING APPLICANTS FOR A FUTURE POSITION ******************

Join Freedom – we re a team of IT professionals dedicated to our passion for tech and loving where we work. As a member of our team, how you want to spend your time and which projects you d like to work on is important to us – which is part of the reason we ve been selected as a Top Workplace for multiple years in a row. You ll be part of our friendly, flexible office environment, hands-off management, a variety of social events, and endless growth opportunities. Tell us what you need to do your best work, and we work the magic to make it happen.

We believe in striking that perfect balance between work and play, where you can pursue your creativity and excel in your career, and still have time for all your extracurricular activities. At Freedom, there is no shortage of growth opportunities and a successful career path for a bright, well-rounded professional like you. We have something for everyone – check out our most recent available position below!

What We're Looking For
NGA experience preferred.
Familiar with implementing Oracle Enterprise DB, Oracle Golden Gate, Postgres, Elasticsearch, Geoserver, PHP, PCF, hp fortify, gitlab, Jenkins, nexus, AWS, sonar, threadfix, OrientDB, ExifTool, Tensorflow, Tin Eye, IPTC
Ten (10) years of experience with ETL Development
Designs and supports ETL processes for data cleansing, data auditing, and data profiling
Ten (10) years of experience programming in Oracle PL/SQL
Ten (10) years of experience using computer-based COTS data modeling tool
Ten (10) years of experience with UNIX and/or LINUX operating systems, including basic monitoring of operating systems
Develops moderately complex ETL objects, according to the design
Monitors developed ETL processes in production, and trouble-shoots production problems when they occur
Recommends best practices, standards, and advanced techniques for designing and implementing ETL objects to the development team
Designs and implements complex solutions focused on data extraction, transformation, and loading of data
Analyzes source system data, defines database schema, and defines ETL strategy for loading data into the schema
Leads migration of existing ETL loads and database structures to new database platform
Writes technical documentation (design specifications, data model diagrams, Configuration Management, and Production Support documents)
Required Qualifications and Technical Knowledge
Designs, implements, and supportsETLprocesses
Collaborates and implements ETL best practices
Master s degree and eight (8) years of experience, or bachelor s degree and ten (10) years of ETL experience in programs and contracts of similar scope, type, and complexity is required
Degree in Computer Science or related discipline from an accredited college or university is required. Four (4) years of additional ETL Development experience may be substituted for a bachelor s degree.
What s in It for You?
Flexible work environment
A team mentality – work with friendly, like-minded professionals
Work with innovative, cutting edge technologies
Enjoy extremely competitive compensation and benefits
A work-life balance you can count on
Opportunities to grow and advance your career on our dime
The Benefits You Get with Freedom
Amazing benefits including matching 401k, profit sharing, fully paid medical, and more
Generous paid time off – including paid site closure days
Competitive salary offerings
Paid training and tuition reimbursement
Referral bonuses
Fully paid life and disability
Annual logo wear allowance
Company sponsored events (game nights, holiday party, summer party, happy hours)
Interested in learning more about Freedom and our culture? Contact us today! We re constantly hosting hiring events in our office and elsewhere, to help you get a sense of what life is like at Freedom before joining the team.

Required Security Clearance: Active TS/SCI with an appropriate agency Polygraph is required

U.S. Citizenship is required

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, age, marital status, disability or veteran status

Applicant Federal & E-Verify Postings

VEVRAA Federal Contractor",4.4,FREEDOM CONSULTING GROUP,"Springfield, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,16,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,VA,4460,1,data engineer,0,0,0,0,1,1,0,0,1
212,212,Data Scientist,$77k-$124k,"Learn and work on meaningful initiatives with some of the best and brightest in the market research industry. The NPD Group provides the world’s most successful brands with leading market research, combining consumer and retail point-of-sale data with analytic solutions to interpret today’s market trends while anticipating tomorrow’s. In addition, we offer a career filled with innovation and growth to the forward-thinking problem solvers who join our team. Position Overview NPD group is looking for a data scientist with significant statistical modeling and programming experience. This position exists within the Methodology team, a core function in Research Science that is responsible for building models and code that help achieve quality outcomes. Sampling of issues we might tackle: Differential non response Selection bias Differential use of scales Differential recruitment Data imputation Ecological inference Quantifying uncertainty Choosing between alternate methodologies Identifying spurious drivers / sources of bias Sampling of techniques we might use: Multilevel regression and post stratification (MRP) Multilevel modeling / hierarchical modeling Propensity-adjustments Matching Raking Post-stratification Causal modeling Generative models Optimization Artificial intelligence Although modeling expertise is central to this role, candidates will also benefit from experience modifying model-based approaches to be used at production scale. Also helpful is experience triangulating estimates from disparate data sources with different sample frames, levels of measurement, and frequency of collection. The ideal candidate will be an experienced statistical programmer using R who also has experience working with survey and sales data, refining and developing methodological improvements, and familiarity with or willingness to learn Agile or Lean approaches to developing new product improvements. Responsibilities: Use various modeling approaches to design enhancements to NPD methodologies Quantify improvements to data due to modeling Carry out tests of alternative implementations of these enhancements Making sure code to implement models on an ongoing basis is robust by creating unit tests Investigating unexpected results and brainstorming alternative methodological solutions. Provide peer mentoring of other team members via code reviews, pair programming, unit test/acceptance test reviews, and brainstorming sessions. Adopt and continue to improve usage of development practices and patterns, such as test-driven development, version control, and use of agile management tools. Conduct original research-on-research (e.g., through simulations and/or evaluations of historical data) to improve methodologies, processes, and data integrity for both survey and scanner (point-of-sale) data. Promote consistency in implementation of designed enhancements across different businesses Maintain relationships with Research Science client teams to understand what is working well with NPD methodology and what could be improved Listen to internal customers and build an understanding of their needs before building solutions Communicate results and procedures in a concise and polished manner to diverse internal stakeholders Back up assertions with facts, and design experiments to quantify or reduce uncertainty when dealing with the unknown Qualifications: Degree in statistics, quantitative social science, computer science, mathematics, or related fields is required. Graduate-level experience preferred. 6+ years of work experience, with solid breadth and depth of knowledge of statistical and analytic techniques. Excellent time management and creative problem solving skills. Experience with data analysis in R is required. Experience with additional languages and/or more extensive proficiency in R preferred. Excellent written and oral communication skills, with the ability to communicate effectively to both technical and non-technical audiences. Experience with one or more development methodologies (Agile, Lean, Scrum) is preferred. Experience with tools for managing software development is preferred (tools such as JIRA, Confluence, Github/Gitlab issue tracker, Trello, Team Foundation Server/DevOps Server, etc). Location: We would prefer to find a candidate who can work from either our corporate headquarters in Port Washington, NY, or one of our other largest offices, in Rosemont, IL. However, we are committed to finding the right candidate across all US locations. We have offices in many US cities, including: Chicago, IL; New York, NY; Los Angeles, CA; San Diego, CA; Cincinnati, OH; Boulder, CO; Bentonville, AR; Greensboro, NC; Houston, TX. The NPD Group, Inc. is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.",3.8,NPD,"Port Washington, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,54,Company - Private,other_industries,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,NY,5019,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
214,214,Sr. Data Engineer (Data Warehouse),$77k-$124k,"The Opportunity

We are looking for cloud Sr. Data Engineer to join our Enterprise Data Engineering team. Today, the team primarily develops and supports a legacy SQL BI/DW platform today but is embarking on a 2020 roadmap to modernize our data architecture in the public cloud. This is a unique greenfield opportunity to influence a major transformational initiative and implement a modern big data reference architecture that will drive enterprise analytics. The cloud Sr. Data Engineer will be part of a team supporting data pipeline development and management built primarily on the Google Cloud Platform and BigQuery.

Responsibilities:
Define and develop data pipeline solutions– architect end to end design, mapping, and hands-on development - for GCP, following integration, security and development best practices.
Work with Enterprise Architecture, Data Management, DevOps, QA, Release Management, Change Management teams through the lifecycle of the project and agile sprints for promoting continuous data pipeline releases.
Manage integration of data from various data sources, both internal and external
SME on GCP, BQ, Dataflow, Pub Sub, cloud functions, Dataproc
Follow Incident and Problem Management processes in providing production support, utilizing organizational ITIL processes.
Work with internal business and technical partners to collect and document the functional and non-functional requirements in JIRA stories for business projects and technical enhancements.
Collaborate with internal developers and internal stakeholders from e-Commerce, ERP, Salesforce, business team and product development teams in evolving the Enterprise BI Center for Excellence.
Qualifications:
7+ years of experience implementing data warehousing solutions including public cloud big data platforms.
A well-grounded data engineer, technically skilled in modern big data principles and technologies.
Experience with GCP Big Data platform is strongly preferred (BigTable, BigQuery, Data Fusion)
Prefer experience in data pipeline development in SQL, Python, Spark, DataProc, and event-streaming
Working knowledge and experience in Google Cloud Data Fusion, Cask, Airflow
Excellent Python coding and SQL skills
Familiarity with pub/sub event streaming platforms (e.g. Kafka) is beneficial
Prior experience developing ETL/ELT solutions for enterprise analytics
Strong understanding of modern big data technologies
Good understanding of various data file formats
Familiar with Confluence, JIRA. Should be comfortable working in Field Mappings between Source, Target Systems, creating Design Documents and following Agile Sprints methodology.
Support new launch hyper-care and be well-versed with Integration Cutover & Go-Live activities.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with excellent verbal and oral communication is mandatory
Strong organizational skills with the ability to multi-task, prioritize and execute on assigned deliverables
Able to work with ambiguity and the ability to troubleshoot and problem solve with minimal supervision and guidance.
Able to handle fast-paced environment supporting Operations and Engineering activities simultaneously.
Ability to communicate effectively to all layers with business, technology, peers, and management.
The Company

Rodan + Fields was founded in 2000 by Stanford-trained dermatologists Dr. Katie Rodan and Dr. Kathy Fields with a passion for giving people the best skin of their lives — and the confidence that comes with it. With effective products, a unique business model and a powerful community of Independent Consultants, Rodan + Fields has disrupted the skincare category to become a leading skincare brand in North America. The company has grown its innovative line of products and expanded into Canada, Australia and Japan. Headquartered in San Francisco, CA, R+F now employs 500+ people, has more than 300,000 enrolled Independent Consultants and over two million Preferred Customers.

At Rodan + Fields, you will be challenged to make an impact, inspired to do more, and rewarded for your contributions. We are transforming skincare, and we welcome your big ideas to fuel our ambitious growth plans! If you are looking for a life-changing career opportunity, we've got your prescription. You’ll become part of a positive, passionate movement that celebrates greatness and encourages employees to be catalysts for change. We provide a creative, vibrant workplace outfitted with all of the technology, tools and training you'll need to learn, grow and thrive! We create life-changing impact in our communities through our non-profit, Prescription for Change®, the heart of Rodan + Fields. By funding empowerment programs for students, we teach them how to use their skills to make life-changing differences in their lives and the lives of others. Join us and share your talents as we develop innovative solutions for your skin and empower entrepreneurs. In addition to working arm-in-arm with industry leaders, employees at Rodan + Fields enjoy rich benefits plans and perks.

Rodan + Fields is an equal opportunity employer that champions diversity, inclusion and equality for all. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, marital status, military/veteran status, or disability status.

We welcome employees to be their true, authentic selves, without exception and believe individual differences add value to our team. Join our team; we know it will be a life- changing experience!

Regarding COVID-19
With the spread of COVID-19 globally, our Bay Area offices will remain closed until further notice with the exception of phase 1 employees that require access to hardware and lab equipment.

Our primary concern is for the health and well-being of our employees as well as candidates. We have transitioned all interviews and new hire onboarding to be conducted virtually via Zoom video conferencing.",2.5,"Rodan and Fields, LLC","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,18,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,CA,5988,1,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
215,215,Data Engineer,$77k-$124k,"Kingfisher Systems, Inc. specializes in providing a full range of Information Technology, Cybersecurity, Intelligence, and support services to the U.S. Government. Kingfisher Systems core competency is technology-enabled services, with a specific focus on national security. Since 2005, Kingfisher has established itself as a recognized and trusted mission partner whose mission is safeguarding sensitive information, operations, and programs for our Federal customers and warfighters.

Responsibilities:

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is seeking a Data Engineer to provide data flows and transformations to automate, script, visualize, and modeling subnational wealth. Day to day technical tasks include meeting with the customer to understand and refine the requirements. The candidate will use Nifi and Python to create data flows and transformations and understand the workflow of the project. They will work with the customer to implement any requested updates, move data storage to RDS, and work with security to ensure the entire system is compliant. They will compile security controls and artifacts and contribute to the Standard Operating Procedures and other related documents.

Skills Requirements:
The successful candidate should have experience with scripting in Python and using Nifi. Some knowledge of geospatial software such as ArcGIS, QGIS is preferred or willingness to learn.
Knowledge of best practices for data standards, data management, data quality.
Experience with SQL, PostGreSQL/PostGIS. Ability to communicate analysis to experts and lay persons alike.
Years of Experience: Minimum of 3 years experience.

Degree Requirement: Bachelor's degree in computer science, geography, or related field.

Minimum Clearance Requirement: Minimum Top Secret clearance with SCI Eligibility. Applicants selected will be subject to an additional security investigation and thus may have additional eligibility requirements to meet.

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, among other things, or status as a qualified individual with a disability.",4.5,Kingfisher Systems,"Falls Church, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,15,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,VA,2236,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
216,216,Future Opportunity: Data Engineer,$77k-$124k,"Country:
United States

Cities:
Atlanta, Charlotte, Nashville, Raleigh, Tampa, Washington DC

Area of expertise:
Analytics

Job Description

Why Avanade:
14-time winner of Microsoft Partner of the Year
24,000+ certifications in Microsoft technology
90+ Microsoft partner awards
17 Gold Competencies
3,500 analytics professionals worldwide
1,000 data engineers
Implemented analytics systems for more than 550 clients
400 AI practitioners
300 cognitive service experts

How we support you:
We believe in gender equity and an inclusive community. We offer a comprehensive benefits package: generous vacation allowance disability coverage, retirement plans, paid maternity and paternity leave, life insurance, hotel and travel discounts, extended benefits to cover items that support your well-being, health, dental and vision insurance, professional development and paid Microsoft certification opportunities.

About you:
You design data solutions that enable clients to see the whole picture and provide insightful and accurate analysis that helps to build successful businesses.

About the job:
As a Manager, Data Engineering, you use modern data engineering techniques and Advanced Analytics methods to give your clients the information they need. You collect, aggregate, store and reconcile data from various sources, helping to design and build data pipelines, streams, reporting tools, data generators and a whole range of tools to provide information and insight. You know how to read the patterns and trends that influence business outcomes.

Day-to-day, you will:
Give colleagues and clients the tools to find and use data for routine and non-routine analysis
Use your sound eye for business to translate business requirements into technical solutions
Analyze current business practices, processes and procedures to spot future opportunities
Assess client needs to build bespoke data design services
Build the building blocks for transforming enterprise data solutions
Design and build modern data pipelines, data streams, and data service Application Programming Interfaces (APIs)
Craft the architectures, data warehouses and databases that support access and Advanced Analytics, and bring them to life through modern visualization tools
Implement effective metrics and monitoring
Be comfortable to make your own decisions and guide your colleagues
Travel as needed to various client locations
Your skills and experience likely include:
Transforming business needs into technical solutions
Mapping data and analytics
Data profiling, cataloguing and mapping to enable the design and build of technical data flows
Use proven methods to solve business problems using Azure Data and Analytics services in combination with building data pipelines, data streams and system integration
Knowledge of multiple Azure data applications including Azure Databricks
Experience in preparing data for and building pipelines and architecture
You probably have a Bachelors or Master’s degree in a quantitative field such as computer science, applied mathematics, statistics or machine learning – or an equivalent combination of education and experience. You’re likely to be a Microsoft Certified Solutions Associate, Microsoft Certified Solutions Expert, and/or Database Administrator already, and you have been in a similar professional position for around five to seven years.

Important Note about this Future Opportunity:
We are actively recruiting and interviewing for this ‘Future Opportunity’ position, however will not be extending offers at the present time.

The outbreak and spread of COVID-19 has created uncertainty for many, and during this period Avanade is focused on the personal safety and well-being of our employees and candidates. The good news is that Avanade is a 38,000-person organization that depends on new ways of working every day and we’ve been relying on our workplace experience to empower our employees – wherever they’re working – for 20 years now. Thanks to our workplace platforms – the likes of Office 365, Microsoft Teams, SharePoint and more – we’ve been able to continue delivering work seamlessly and connecting with talent to explore opportunities for tomorrow.

What does that mean for you? It means you can apply and interview virtually, via video, for a future career opportunity without pressure to make a decision. It means that you will have the chance to connect with leaders and hiring managers at your own pace.

We encourage you to speak candidly with your recruiter about your career aspirations and expectations throughout this recruiting process. In return, we are committed to being transparent with you about our intent and goals around this position.

Apply now",3.9,AVANADE,"Raleigh, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,20,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,NC,4708,0,data engineer,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
217,217,Data Engineer,$77k-$124k,"ABOUT BITFOCUS, INC.

Founded in 2003, Bitfocus, Inc. is changing the way communities nationwide integrate software, systems, data, and policy to innovate and strengthen the nation's social safety net. We develop software and administer data systems that affect and change lives, connecting our most vulnerable populations to the most effective resources available in their communities. Our products empower organizations and communities to better leverage their resources, helping them to become data-driven in their efforts in all areas of health, human, and social services.

Our diverse and inclusive culture has played a key role in our success at Bitfocus. Qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran status, or disability.

About our Data Services Team:

Our Data Services team's mission is to promote a data driven decision-making culture to solve homelessness. We do this by combining a team of experts in data modeling, analytics, and integration with social services experience. From one-time data migrations into Clarity Human Services, to real-time dashboarding, the Data Services team plays an integral role is supporting communities to make data driven decisions.

Success/Impact Statement:

The Data Services Engineer will help maintain all aspects of our analytics platform, provide troubleshooting support, identifying opportunities for refinement. They will assist in building out next generation analytics tools for dashboarding, data science, and data integration. They will work primarily with internal Bitfocus staff. A passion for data and concern for data integrity is key to a candidate's success.

As a Data Engineer, you will:
Build and refine our analytics platform.
Develop automated unit-testing processes.
Build automated data cleansing tools.
Assist in helping individuals and communities transform their data into actionable insights.
Contribute to the implementation of HUD policies and procedures as they pertain to data structure and implement best practices in regard to HMIS data analysis.
Design and build actionable dashboards for all aspects of homeless services.
Act as a subject matter expert and liaison with other areas within Clarity Human Services on data integration topics.
Complete ad-hoc projects as assigned.
You will love this position if:
You want to make an impact. You thrive on helping others and want your work to make a difference.
You love data and use it to make decisions.
You want to be part of a world class, dedicated, supportive team.
Required experience that drives success in this role:
5 years' experience in a data modeling or business intelligence environment.
Strong SQL skills, including the ability to write queries and stored procedures.
Experience with data analytics tools such as Looker, Tableau, or Qlik.
Experience with scripting languages such as Python or R.
Solid understanding of data systems, including data relationships and data modeling with the ability to learn and understand various data environments.
Sound planning and organizational skills with strong attention to detail.
Demonstrated ability to handle multiple concurrent projects and priorities in a fast-paced, evolving environment.
Work independently and with others; self-directed and results-oriented.
Excellent interpersonal skills.
Willingness to learn new technologies to best solve data-related issues.
Effective written and oral communication skills in English.
What makes you stand out:
Experience working in a completely remote company.
A college degree (a major in information systems, computer science, mathematics, finance, accounting, statistics or related field is preferred).
MariaDB/ MySQL experience preferred.
Data Analytics tools such as Looker or Tableau preferred
Strong preference for experience in social services and/or HMIS experience.
How we'll support you:
Work in a fully remote/virtual environment
A unique, friendly and caring culture! Hear more from our employees on Glassdoor.
Medical, dental, vision insurance
401K Retirement Plan
Paid parental leave
Paid time off
Paid volunteer time off
Bitfocus primarily uses Apple computers; all new employees receive either an iMac or MacBook Pro to use in their role at Bitfocus
Opportunities for professional growth and development",4.9,Bitfocus,Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,17,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,Remote,4386,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
218,218,Data Engineer,$77k-$124k,"The Data Engineer will work with the data Analyst and project managers to determine logical and physical database designs for new analytics models. The Data Engineer will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for cross functional teams. The Data Engineer will support database architects, data analysts and data scientists on data initiatives and will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout analytics ongoing projects.

Build the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture
Assemble large, complex data sets that meet business requirements
Build analytics tools that utilize the data pipeline to provide actionable insights into operational efficiency, financial reports and other key business performance metrics
Work with stakeholders including the Engineering and Analytic teams to assist with data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs
Create data tools to support business informational technology process
Work with the data analytics team to strive for greater functionality in our data systems
Perform other related duties as required and assigned
Demonstrate behaviors which are aligned with the organization’s desired culture and values

Moderate experience working with relational databases, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases.
Moderate knowledge of AWS cloud services: EC2, EMR, RDS, Redshift
Experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python, Java, C++
Experience building and optimizing AWS data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
Strong project management and organizational skills.
Moderate skill in business intelligence tools such as Tableau or Qlik
Moderate skills with MS Office, including Excel & PowerPoint
Must be a team player with strong attention to detail and able to work independently
Proven track record at delivering timely and accurate information in a fast-paced environment
Excellent critical thinking, problem solving, and mathematical skills, and sound judgment
Strong business acumen and ability to interface with executive management",3.9,PennyMac,"Agoura Hills, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,12,Company - Public,financial_related,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,CA,2501,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
219,219,"Data Scientist (Palo Alto, CA or Remote US)",$77k-$124k,"The Opportunity

Eversight is the recognized leader in AI-powered price and promotions. Eversight's proprietary cloud-based SaaS solution brings AI and continuous experimentation to consumer brands and retailers. Our software acts as a coach, enabling market leaders to transform pricing and promotion strategy for the $3.4 trillion spent in consumer goods retail using intelligent, real-time data and insights.

Reporting directly to the Head of Data Science, you will be at the center of what determines Eversight's success as a company. You will analyze the data and develop production code using the newest Data Science and Machine Learning techniques to determine the optimal prices and promotions for major product manufacturers and retailers that sell these products.

Responsibilities
Research, implement and modify modern Data Science techniques. More specifically:
Build Statistical and Machine Learning models that describe the impact of prices and promotions on shopper behavior, including behavioral pricing effects. You'll need to find middle ground between using flexible modern AI methods and proven classical methods.
Develop Optimization and Experiment Design systems, which determine the best prices to set for each product in each store each week. Finding a good balance on the exploration-exploitation tradeoff will be important.
Design and run pricing experiments across hundreds of stores and tens of thousands of products
Create model validation methods to make sure that our models are accurate and to quantify the impact of our solutions on the clients' bottom line
Work with Product Management to generate ideas and quickly turn them into efficient, well-tested, functioning code (we mostly use Python)
Partner with the Engineering team to create highly scalable solutions
Serve as Data Science expert both within Eversight and for our clients
Lead custom analyses and connect them to actionable Business and Product insights
Help prioritize new feature development by assessing potential impact
Be a go-to resource for science-related questions about the product
Behavioral Profile
Analytical, framework thinker
Comfortable in a fast-paced environment
Highly collaborative
Strong at translating Data Science concepts to non-technical audiences
Business focused; measures work in its contributions to business outcomes and prioritizes effort against deliverables accordingly
Minimum Qualifications
2+ years of relevant experience in Data Science and/or Machine Learning with direct impact on business value
B.S., M.S., or PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Operations Research, Machine Learning, Engineering, Economics, Computer Science or relevant quantitative field
Strong understanding of Generalized Linear Models
Ability to write efficient code in Python
Experience with Hypothesis Testing and Maximum Likelihood Estimation
Preferred Qualifications
Experience in A/B testing and Design of Experiments
Agile experience
Experience with NumPy and Pandas (or equivalent experience in R)
Strong in math and statistics: Linear Algebra, Bayesian Methods, Regressions, Calculus
Experience in Machine Learning methods: Neural Networks (Deep Learning, Embeddings, Sequence Modeling, CNN), Tree-based methods (GBDT, Random Forest), Regularization Methods (L1/L2 penalties, Feature Selection, Dimensionality Reduction)
Demand Modeling, Pricing, and Causal Inference experience
Location

Palo Alto, CA or Remote US

About the Company

Eversight is the recognized leader in AI-powered pricing and promotions. Global brands and retailers rely on the Eversight platform to optimize pricing in response to market conditions and to deliver higher ROI on promotional spend. Eversight's Pricing Suite and Offer Innovation Suite solutions are driving strong margin and sales volume improvements for leading companies such as Coca-Cola, General Mills, Raley's, and Rite Aid. Founded in 2013, Eversight is headquartered in Palo Alto, California, with offices in Chicago and New York.",4.2,Eversight,Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,7,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,Remote,3989,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,1,0,0
220,220,Data Engineer,$77k-$124k,"The Data Engineer joins a team of engineers, subject matter experts, and data scientists to jointly provide experienced, high-quality Information Technology (IT) engineering solutions. The Data Engineer will work with our clients on their hardest challenges – advancing and enhancing systems supporting the defense of our nation and its partners. Your efforts will be integral to the success of these initiatives. As an NT Concepts team member, you will be expected to be solutions-oriented, innovative, collaborative and agile. Performing as part of, or in support of a SCRUM team, you will be expected to thrive in organized chaos and immediately adopt agile team self-organizing methods and techniques.

Specifically, the Data Engineer has a passion for data, and creatively leverages expertise with data tools and programming languages to assess, transform, organize, optimize, and exploit systems and platform data. Further, you will be responsible for generating representative data sets for demonstrations, technology evaluation, systems development, and data science initiatives. You will be expected to help automate processes, and articulate methods to gain data management efficiencies, as well implementing and adopting of Data Engineering Best Practices to include mentoring projects and team members toward success.

Senior skill level
4+ years of data engineering, schema design, dimensional data modeling, and / or data management experience
Proficient with data management tools, such as Python, SQL, Java, and use of Git
Demonstrated experience with extracting, cleaning, managing, optimizing, and exploiting large and very complex data sets
Experience with best practices for compute, storage, and transfer optimization in processing large volumes of data
Active SECRET security clearance is required.
Preferred:
Experience with graph databases and event sourcing models
Familiarity with machine learning, artificial intelligence, and / or geospatial data analysis
Strong interpersonal skills combined with ability to multi-task and maintain flexibility and creativity in a variety of situations
#CJ
#JT",3.6,NT Concepts,"Fort Worth, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,22,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,TX,2122,0,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
222,222,Data Scientist (Remote/ Virtual),$77k-$124k,"We Are Hiring

This is a remote opportunity to join our growing and innovative Ascension Data Science Institute!

The Ascension Data Sciences Institute (ADSI) was created in July 2019 with the mission of supporting Ascension in achieving its Quadruple Aim with uniquely skilled, high-performing associates who develop analyses, models and applications to enable Ascension in providing higher value healthcare and making strategic decisions. ADSI is comprised of 6 domains addressing 1) Clinical quality and patient safety; 2) Health Economics and Clinical Outcomes; 3) Strategic Operations and Financial Analytics; 4) Actuarial and Managed Care Analytics; 5) Registry Abstraction Healthcare Solutions; and 6) Healthcare Data Intelligence. We recognize that the healthcare environment is a complex ecosystem of rapidly evolving clinical and economic practices that affect patient and provider experience and demands increasingly sophisticated and complex measurement. Our objective is for advanced analytics and data science to play a critical and foundational role in the transformation of care delivery, quality and financial outcomes to enable our organization’s competitive advantage. To meet these objectives, Ascension is investing in its analytics capabilities and the following positions have been opened to address this expansion.

Why Join Ascension?
Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, with special attention to persons living in poverty and those most vulnerable. In FY2019, Ascension provided $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.

Ascension includes more than 150,000 associates and 40,000 aligned providers. The national health system operates more than 2,600 sites of care – including 150 hospitals and more than 50 senior living facilities – in 20 states and the District of Columbia, while providing a variety of services including clinical and network services, venture capital investing, investment management, biomedical engineering, facilities management, risk management, and contracting through Ascension’s own group purchasing organization.

What You Will Do

As an Associate with Ascension, you will have the opportunity to develop predictive and prescriptive analytics models, creating efficient algorithms, and innovating use of data.

Responsibilities:
Integrates data from multiple sources and supports/performs complex statistical data analysis including multivariate statistical analysis, multilevel modeling, dyadic analysis and/or coarsened exact matching analysis.
Analyzes complex business and competitive issues and discerns the implications for systems support.
Identifies, defines, directs and performs project issue analysis to resolve issues, including analysis of technical and economic feasibility of proposed data solution.
Communicates highly technical information to numerous audiences, including senior management, the user community, and less experienced staff.
Presents data to drive business decisions.
Proposes and leads projects required to support the development of the organization's data infrastructure needs.
Parses, validates and scrubs data of widely differing formats.
Analyzes structured and unstructured data for business insight.
Interpret large amounts of data using advanced visualization techniques and tools.
What You Will Need

Education:

High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required
Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Analytics, Data Science, Engineering, Operations Research, Decision Sciences, Computer or Information Science, Physics, Behavioral and Social Sciences or other related technical or quantitative fields strongly preferred.
Master's level or higher is strongly preferred.
Preferred Skills:
Scripting language experience in Python, R and SQL
Knowledge of and some experience with Google Cloud Platform preferred
1-3 years experience with business intelligence and data visualization tools such as Tableau, Microsoft Power BI, QlikView, or Microstrategy
Knowledge of machine learning algorithms and techniques: Logistic Regression, Decision Trees, Random Forests, Gradient Boosting, SVMs, Time Series, KMeans, Clustering, NMF)
Advanced modeling and statistical knowledge one or more of the following areas: multivariate analysis, logistic regression, poisson and negative binomial regression, experimental design, structural equation modeling, principal component analysis, educational measurement, psychometrics, factor analysis, mathematical modeling, simulation, operations research, optimization
Experience writing the methodology sections of research publications in academic or industry settings strongly preferred
Experience with conducting research in human behavior, medical sciences, behavioral sciences, associate or patient experience, education, business, clinical operations, performance improvement, process optimization and/or healthcare preferred
Web and social media analytics
Sentiment analysis
Text mining and natural language processing knowledge strongly preferred
Consulting experience with external clients or internal stakeholders
Presentation and storytelling skills
Equal Employment Opportunity
Ascension is an EEO/AA employer: M/F/Disabled/Vet. For further information regarding your EEO rights, click on the following link to the “EEO is the Law” poster:
http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/eeoc_self_print_poster.pdf”
Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

Ascension participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify link below for more information.

E-Verify (link to E-verify site)",3.3,Ascension,Missouri,-1,10000+ Employees,21,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,MO,6146,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
223,223,Data Engineer (StudentTracker 3.0),$77k-$124k,"About the Role:


If you are a self-starter, thrive in a fast-paced environment, and get energized about driving new data driven services, then this job is for you!

The Clearinghouse is seeking a hands-on Engineer, Data with a solid background in Data Warehouse architectures, metadata management, data profiling, data modeling, data quality and a proven ability to learn quickly, effectively collaborate with others, and successfully design and implement solutions. Using their excellent communication and presentation skills, the Engineer socializes technical concepts and builds consensus with internal stakeholders.

The Engineer works with the business and development teams to design and implement the appropriate data solutions for Clearinghouse database-driven applications and services. The Engineer accomplishes this by performing data analysis of current and future systems and services, educating on industry best practices and policies, creating proposed database component designs and data models, and working with the architecture and development teams to refine and implement these designs.

How You Contribute:
Develop and maintain the PL/SQL Packages.
Develop and maintain ETL code.
Design Data Marts and create data models.
Work with Data owners to document and maintain Data Dictionary.
Develop scripts to maintain data quality and deploying data changes across different environments
Monitor, assess and optimize data processing performance.
Demonstrate NSC’s competencies, which align with our corporate values.
Core Competencies include: Customer Focus, Optimizes Work Processes, Collaborates, Communicates Effectively, and Be Open and Authentic.
Manager will provide more detail to candidates as needed.
Position may be required to perform other duties as required. These essential functions are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the job. Reasonable accommodations will be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform these essential functions.

What You Bring to the Table:
Bachelor’s degree required in Computer Science, Systems Engineering, or Information Systems, or some equivalent combination of education and experience, including through military service.
Proficient in:
PL/SQL programming typically acquired through 4-7 years of experience programming with this technology.
Developing scripts using Shell, Python or similar language.
Experience with:
Working on an Agile/Scrum development
Cloud and open source-based data management technologies like AWS Redshift, DynamoDB, Postgres, Glue and Kinesis
Version control tools such as SVN, GIT, AWS Code Commit
Proficient with:
Data Warehouse production maintenance.
ETL/ELT development.
OLTP and data warehouse design.
Metadata management.
Creating and implementing data models.
Database performance monitoring and SQL optimization.
Excellent communication skills.
Demonstrated ability to work independently and directly with the data owners to gather requirements and architect change.
Live within a commutable distance of Pittsburgh, PA.
Additional Desired Requirements:
Experience with Oracle technologies including Oracle database and ODI.
Physical Demands:

Use of a computer terminal and/or laptop computer for 8 or more hours a day.
Use of a copy machine, and telephone.
Frequently required to sit for 7 or more hours per day in close proximity to others in an open office environment.
Occasionally required to use hands and fingers to operate, handle, and reach.
Vision abilities include close vision and the ability to adjust focus.
Must be able to travel occasionally via car, train, and/or airplane as needed.",3.1,National Student Clearinghouse,"Pittsburgh, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,27,Nonprofit Organization,other_industries,Education,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.5,PA,3659,0,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
224,224,"Senior Data Scientist, Data Science Operations",$111k-$181k,"We’re looking for a Senior Data Scientist who is passionate about the engineering side of Data Science. You will be joining a new Data Science Operations team tasked with accelerating Data Science research and development through improved design and best practice adoption, as well as through tooling and processes.

You are a broad generalist. You enjoy collaborating with scientists to build software and to improve workflows. You appreciate all stages of data operations, from ingestion and transformation of data to use in statistical models and machine learning products. You will work primarily with data science teams to collaboratively build elegant, reusable domain-specific python libraries and services; and you will remove pain points and inefficiencies in development, feature creation, prototyping, and productionalization. You will also collaborate with Data Engineering and Data Platforms teams in pursuit of Data Science workflow improvements. You should excel in a culture of teaching and learning.

You will work in the Data Science department and report to the Manager of Data Science Operations in Squarespace’s New York offices.

RESPONSIBILITIES
Advise and enhance data science teams, focusing on software-related concern
Design, develop, refactor, package, harden, and deploy software products
Promote the use of internally built and externally sourced tools through presentation, documentation, and cross-team collaboration
Develop tools and automate workflows
Guide the Data Science Team's adoption of new software and frameworks
Translate unstructured inefficiencies and pain points into concrete business and technical requirements
Identify and implement development metrics and operational metrics; assist teams in setting and achieving goals to improve those metrics.
Build data pipelines to make key datasets available to both data scientists and business intelligence analysts throughout the company
QUALIFICATIONS
5 or more years of experience in a research software role, either as an engineer or a data scientist
Experience working in a data science team with a strong engineering culture
A deep love of python and of interfaces & boundaries
Experience developing, maintaining, and deploying python services and packages
Experience working with containerized services
Preferred: experience with Docker and Kubernetes
Preferred: experience working with cloud service providers such as AWS, GCP, or Azure
Preferred: experience building robust data pipelines
Preferred: experience supporting business intelligence
Bachelor's degree in a quantitative or logic-driven field
About Squarespace

Squarespace makes beautiful products to help people with creative ideas succeed. By blending elegant design and sophisticated engineering, we empower millions of people — from individuals and local artists to entrepreneurs shaping the world’s most iconic businesses — to share their stories with the world. Squarespace’s team of more than 1,000 is headquartered in downtown New York City, with offices in Dublin and Portland. For more information, visit www.squarespace.com/about.

Benefits & Perks
Health insurance with 100% premium covered for you and your dependent children
Flexible vacation & paid time off
Up to 20 weeks of paid family leave
Equity plan for all employees
Retirement benefits with employer match
Fertility and adoption benefits
Free lunch and snacks at all offices
Education reimbursement
Dog-friendly workplace in New York office
Commuter benefit in the form of reduced tax (Ireland) and pretax (US)
Today, more than a million people around the globe use Squarespace to share different perspectives and experiences with the world. Not only do we embrace and celebrate the diversity of our customer base, but we also strive for the same in our employees. At Squarespace, we are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ethnicity, ancestry, religion, national origin, gender, sex, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital or parental status, disability, veteran status, or other class protected by applicable law. We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",3.2,Squarespace,"New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,17,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,146.0,NY,4172,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
231,231,Data Scientist-Human Resources,$111k-$181k,"Lexington, MA, US

#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}

Company:
MIT Lincoln Laboratory
Job Summary
Responsible for the collection, synthesis, and analysis of employee data to meet organizational objectives. Gains insight into key Human Resources related business opportunities and deliverables by applying statistical analysis techniques to examine structured and unstructured data from multiple disparate sources. Interprets results from multiple sources using a variety of techniques, ranging from simple data aggregation via statistical analysis to complex data mining. Uses advanced mathematical, statistical, querying, and reporting methods to develop solutions. Develops information tools, algorithms, dashboards, and queries to monitor and improve business performance.

Successful candidates will have demonstrated:
Strong interpersonal, team building, communication and presentation skills to effectively communicate and collaborate with all levels of the organization.
An ability to maintain strict confidentiality as well as business and professional ethics.
Strong organizational skills, attention to detail and ability to handle multiple tasks.
Flexibility and ability to work effectively and meet deadlines in a dynamic, fast-paced environment.
Ability to perform successfully in a data driven, service-oriented environment and to interpret rules and guidelines flexibly to enhance the business values and the diverse culture.
Requirements
BS required, MS preferred in related disciplines such as Computer Science, Statistics, and/or Mathematics with 5-8 years of relevant experience.
Experience working with sensitive data, predictive analytics and behavioral science based information preferred.
Must have demonstrated experience with some or all of the following: Data and Quantitative Analysis / Decision Analytics / Predictive Modeling / Data-Driven Personalization / KPI Dashboards and BPI Plans / Big Data Queries and Interpretation / Data Mining and Visualization Tools / Machine Learning Algorithms / Business Intelligence (BI) / Research, Reports and Forecasts.
In addition, must have experience with some or all of the following: Data and Computer Science proficiency: SPSS, SAS, R, Rstats, Python, Apache Spark, Microsoft PowerBI, Matlab, HIVE, Pig, data warehouse (DW, DWH), Hadoop, Google Analytics, data mart projects, data management, machine learning, predictive analytics, prescriptive analytics, streaming analytics, SQL, Business Objects (Crystal Reports, Dashboards, WEBI), SAP BW, SAP HANA, SAP Lumera, and many and/or other products is a plus.

For Benefits Information, click http://hrweb.mit.edu/benefits

Selected candidate will be subject to a pre-employment background investigation and must be able to obtain and maintain a Secret level DoD security clearance.

MIT Lincoln Laboratory is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, veteran status, disability status, or genetic information; U.S. citizenship is required.

Requisition ID: 28943

Nearest Major Market: Boston
Job Segment:
Database, Scientific, Scientist, HR, ERP, Technology, Engineering, Science, Human Resources",3.8,MIT Lincoln Laboratory,"Lexington, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,69,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,146.0,MA,3353,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
234,234,Data Engineer,$111k-$181k,"Data Engineer

Why you want this job
You love working with data and seeing people use data to make decisions.
You love the idea of bringing a product built on older technology into the future.
You love setting standards for how data is managed and transformed.
You want to be part of a team that will influence how the company thinks about data.
You enjoy working with business analysts to understand their needs and give them a data product that will meet their needs.
You want to be part of a team that will raise the Data IQ of the entire company.
You want to be part of a team that loves data as much as you do.
Why you'll love us

If you have a desire to make a company better through data, then you'll love it here. We need someone that can help us use cloud technologies such as Kafka and DataBricks to modernize our data warehouse. Our team is focused on improving the company's data and raising the data IQ of everyone that uses it. We are committed to providing high quality, timely data to analysts and other data consumers. If you love data you will love us.

What you'll do
Work with a team that is making the transition from an on-premises Microsoft based data warehouse to a cloud data warehouse using tools such as Kafka and DataBricks.
Help to develop standards that will both strengthen the current data warehouse while preparing for the transition to a more modern solution.
Share your knowledge of modern data warehousing with the rest of your team and mentor in best practices in developing cloud solutions.
Participate in a proof of concept to prove out the effectiveness of using Kafka and DataBricks as a viable data warehouse.
Respond to data requests from business analysts
Maintaining existing ETL packages created in SQL Server Integration Services
Data modelling for production applications and data warehouse.
What you'll need
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science/Information Systems or equivalent
7+ years' experience working in a data warehouse environment
Experience working with data related cloud technologies such as Kafka and DataBricks
Experience developing in Python
Experience developing SQL Server Integration Services packages
Experience using SQL to transform data
Data modelling experience
Perks
In-house restaurant with highly discounted meals (Steak dinner under $3.00)
Free snacks, ice cream, and drinks every day
Full gym with various classes (yoga, cycling, etc)
Free personal trainers
Numerous fun company events
Paid training conference once per year
Tuition Reimbursement program
Free eye exams
Discounts on lenses, glasses, and other services",4.0,1-800 Contacts,"Draper, UT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,25,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,146.0,UT,2596,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
239,239,Data Scientist,$111k-$181k,"The emerging next-generation pharmaceutical supply chain is characterized by the orchestration of collaborating, networked stakeholders working to the common goal of delivering pharmaceutical products to patients on-time and in-full. TraceLink is leading that transformation by leveraging the benefits of big data and cloud technologies realized through advanced algorithms, data science, and analytics. We are extending our core data science team that is responsible for delivering innovative data science solutions to our customers. The ideal candidate is an experienced data science innovator capable of methodically producing performant solutions subject to business constraints. Experience that extends back into data engineering and data collection and forward into product realization within a cloud environment is highly desirable.

Collaboratively identify data science opportunities that support business and product goals
Propose, develop, evaluate, and perfect specific data science solutions
Modify solutions to address application constraints
Integrate modified solutions into cloud-based product offerings
Communicate results and ideas to business leaders

Skills and Qualifications Wish List
Analytical, data-driven, inquisitive mindset with a bias toward precision
Superb written and oral technical communication skills
Learn quickly especially within computer technologies and mathematical concepts
Proficiency in mathematics, statistical analysis, and software development
Proficiency in data science environments, tools, and technologies
Broad knowledge of data science techniques
Ability to distinguish applicability of alternatives
Understanding of the relative performance of competing techniques
Develop, evaluate, perfect, and implement data science solutions
Clean, enhance, profile, and mine structured and unstructured data
Identify and integrate data repositories from internal and external sources
Optimize and test estimators
Perform experimental analysis and validate results
Communicate trustworthy and objective results
Implement analytical models into production by collaborating with software developers and machine learning engineers.
Valuable Additional Skills and Experience
Formal training in data science or related disciplines such as mathematics, engineering, or computer science
Experience with big data cloud technologies especially Amazon offerings
Experience with software engineering tools and processes (agile software development)
Proficiency with MSOffice and Google G Suite tools
Experience with Java, Scala, javascript, SQL, Python, R, XML, yaml, JSON, shell scripting
Proficiency with applied mathematics such as probability and statistics, stochastic systems, queueing theory, optimization, control theory, and adaptive systems.",3.9,"TraceLink, Inc.","North Reading, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,11,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,146.0,MA,2783,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
241,241,Principal Data Scientist,$111k-$181k,"Job Description


Here at Discount Tire, we celebrate the spirit of our people with extraordinary pride and enthusiasm. As America’s largest independent tire retailer, specializing in tires & wheels, we have over 1,000 store locations and continue to grow every year. Our consistent growth over the last 60 years, the loyalty of our customers and passion of our people makes Discount Tire a great place to work.

Even more exciting, Discount Tire is predicting, embracing and driving the changes expected in the Automotive Industry. In particular, Data and Analytics are seen as our competitive advantage. As a Data Scientist you will be central in helping our company Executives address short term and long-term opportunities. In this role, you will actively be involved in shaping the company strategy. We are leveraging a word class data environment so that this position can help us to:
Develop decision support and predictive solutions for customers and staff.
Leverage AI for pattern recognition and beyond
Optimize business outcomes
Gain insights from big data
As a Principal Data Scientist, you will collaborate with a large, multi-disciplinary team of solution architects, engineers and data scientists on a wide range of business problems. You will not only work on large scale projects to provide value to the customers but are also routinely involved in building our internal R&D capability to have an edge in the analytics industry. We work on providing solutions to a wide range of clients coming from various domains including oil & mining, financial services and retail industry.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Work with large, complex data sets. Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed. Conduct end-to-end analysis that includes data gathering and requirements specification, processing, analysis, ongoing deliverables, and presentations.
Work on advanced analytics areas like deep learning and complex statistical data analysis
Interaction with senior leadership and other business leaders to provide business recommendations with effective presentations of findings, including visual displays of quantitative information
Develop analysis, forecasting and optimization methods/models to provide the business solution to internal customers
Research and develop internal capabilities to enhance the skill-sets on latest data science developments, work towards producing innovative solutions to the existing challenges
Perform quality control of deliverables
Provide thought leadership in algorithmic and process innovations, and contribute to creativity in solving unconventional problems

Job Requirements


Qualifications:

Analysis
Experience with writing SQL queries, performing basic conversion and transformations (e.g. formatting date string), and obtaining statistical summaries by using windowing functions.
Experience with usage of R/RStudio, Python, Jupyter Notebook
Experience with version control tool like Git
Strong experience with Excel and PowerPoint to present results
Ability to write scripts to automate ETL tasks
Problem Solving
Ability to run standard model algorithms in Python, to perform: classification/regression, clustering, basic text analytics, image recognition, etc. E.g. run a classification problem using random forest, and obtain the variable importance, produce performance metrics/KPIs; run a k-means clustering problem, produce a KPI to quantify the goodness of clusters
Demonstrated skills in selecting the right statistical tools given a data analysis problem
Experience with charting tools & knowledge of the proper charting tool to use, such as Excel. For instance, when to use box-and-whiskers plot, when to use waterfall. Ability to zoom-in to smaller data sets or display subcategories
Capable of running multiple scenarios and pick up the optimal solution
Capable of understanding advanced mathematical or physical explanations, to implement or execute the requested tasks. E.g. Fourier Transform, Power Spectral Density, Monte Carlo simulation, etc.
Actively participates and contributes in brain-storming session. Can work seamlessly with people from other disciplines: IT engineers, SMEs, stakeholders.
Experience articulating business questions and using mathematical techniques to arrive at an answer using available data. Experience translating analysis results into business recommendations
Experience in AI / Deep Learning for text/image/video analytics preferred
Experience in Cloud Computing and data streaming preferred
Team & Business Skills
Consistently improves communication skills, both verbally and in written materials
Demonstrated creativity in problem solving
Demonstrated leadership and self-direction. Demonstrated willingness to both teach others and learn new techniques.
Flexibility in task switching. For instance, when there is urgent requests or change of projects, can accommodate the changes without protesting
Mindful of iterations and quality check in a smaller team, before presenting results to larger audience
Raises critical issues when detected
Educational Requirements:

Ph.D. in a quantitative discipline (e.g., statistics, computer science, economics, mathematics, physics, electrical engineering, industrial engineering or other STEM fields)

Work Experience

5+ years of relevant work experience in data analysis or related field. (e.g., as a statistician / data scientist / data engineer).

Work Days:

Normal work days are Monday through Friday. Occasional Saturdays and Sundays may be necessary.

Work Hours:

Normal work hours are 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. Additional hours may be necessary.

Apply
Not ready to",4.0,Discount Tire,"Scottsdale, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,60,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,146.0,AZ,5680,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
242,242,Senior Data Scientist,$111k-$181k,"The Mars Agency is a global marketing practice, specializing in marketing to shoppers, consumers and retailers across the ever-expanding omni-commerce environment. Mars uniquely refers to this environment as the A-to-V Commerce SM space, which incorporates everything from Autonomous to Voice commerce.

Mars, proud of its independence and growth-for-clients focus, operates internationally across the Americas, Europe and Asia through its network of 13 offices.

We are currently seeking a Senior Data Scientist to work out of our Bentonville or Detroit office.

The Senior Data Scientist serves as a key member of the team building out the agency’s shopper marketing mix modeling and advanced analytics offering, evolving statistical modeling and analytics with technology to develop a best-in-class platform for measurement, evaluation and marketing ROI.
What You’ll Do:
Assist in the development and implementation of the agency’s shopper marketing mix modeling platform.
Lead the continued development of the Analytics capability for the agency, helping to define the role of Analytics in all aspects of a program from planning to measurement.
Work to enhance the agency’s overall Business Intelligence offering and analytics strategy.
Define and develop compelling analytic opportunities that complement the agency’s business and result in incremental category growth opportunities for our clients.
Synthesize data from a variety of sources including IRI, Nielsen, media, customer specific POS, shopper loyalty databases, consumer research and category management tools to identify and prioritize business-building opportunities.
Consult on data strategy for the agency, in collaboration with data strategy lead. Identify potential data sources and key data points to be captured, outlining and thinking about potential future uses.
Interface with clients and internal team members to explain complex analytic concepts in an easy to understand way.
Promote advanced analytic and data science capabilities during new business pitches and within the agency’s existing clients.
Provide recommendations for cloud analytics technology and be part of the team implementing.
Work with Python and its libraries, SQL, Spark, and R, all via a Cloud-based platform.

What You Bring to Us:
Bachelor’s or master’s degree in a related field, such as statistics, mathematics, econometrics, data science, computer science, or marketing.
Minimum of 3-5 years of experience in consumer marketing or shopper marketing insights and analytics, particularly in the CPG and retail industries.
Dynamic personality able to effectively engage and influence a variety of audiences.
Proficient on querying and reducing data from large database repositories and/or flat files.
At lease 2 years of experience in/with: building efficient data processing pipelines for analytical systems using cloud based technology.
Knowledge of the digital marketing ecosystem and fluency with common web technologies, as well as knowledge of media platforms (Google DFP, Google DFA, Facebook) and 3rd Party Tools (Adobe Analytics, Google Analytics, Google AdWords) as well as experience with CRM Data Analysis.
Hands-on experience with experimental design, offer testing methodology,
descriptive statistics, hypothesis testing, econometric modeling, and regression analysis.
Passion about business and dissatisfaction with the status quo – always thinking of ways to improve/grow the function.
Proficiency in IRI and Nielsen systems, data management and analytics tools, and data visualization software (Tableau preferred).
Leadership and organizational skills.
Capable of handling multiple projects simultaneously.
High level of energy and enthusiasm.
Comfortable with high pressure, fluid and ambiguous situations.
Ability to travel on an as-needed basis.

The Mars Agency is an Equal Opportunity Employer and will recruit, hire, train and promote persons in all job classifications without regard to race, ancestry, creed, color, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, disability or handicap, HIV, veteran, marital or family status, or any other status or condition protected by applicable state and/or federal laws, except where a bonafide occupational qualification applies.

The Mars Agency has developed a wide variety of inclusive benefit plans and policies that address and promote the needs of all employees and their family members, including comprehensive group health plans, a parental leave program that includes paid maternity and paternity benefits for pregnancy, adoption and surrogacy, flexible paid time off, a broad and confidential employee assistance program, ongoing wellness support initiatives, trusted financial health advice and guidance, promotion of education through tuition support and assistance, and a flexible and supportive work environment and culture.",3.0,The Mars Agency,"Rogers, AR",-1,201 to 500 Employees,48,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,146.0,AR,4869,1,data scientist,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,1
243,243,Sr. Data Scientist,$111k-$181k,"The Commercial Lines BI team at Woodruff Sawyer is a newly founded capability to enhance the organizations capacity in providing data-backed insights to its clients seeking P&C and liability insurance. The members of this team will work closely with the VP of Commercial Lines Business Intelligence and other enterprise stakeholders to develop and roll out analytics solutions. A successful candidate will apply data science methodologies, actuarial methods, knowledge of insurance, and the latest technological tools to create reusable business intelligence assets.

What you will be doing:

With limited guidance from the leaders, managers, or project leads:
Primarily collects, prepares and analyzes data from various sources.
Executes formal exploratory data analysis for data science projects.
Develops re-usable templates and reports for the review and feedback by other team members.
Prepares analysis summaries and provides to the colleagues and leaders.
Conducts data research and presents findings.
Identifies areas of more in-depth analysis and builds prototypes for IT implementation.
Required Qualifications:
A graduate degree in any of the quantitative disciplines, e.g., Actuarial Science, Math, Engineering, Stats, Finance, or a related discipline.
Knowledge of basic data science algorithms demonstrable through internships, coursework, or a combination.
2+ years of experience in visual analysis packages such as Tableau / Power BI.
2+ years of experience in programming using Python or R.
Skilled in developing presentations in PowerPoint or equivalent.
2+ years of work experience in an insurance or FINTECH environment as a data scientist or BI analyst. (4+ for an undergraduate).
Knowledge of common insurance terminologies. A couple of actuarial exams is a plus.
What you'll be getting from us:
The opportunity to work with sharp, motivated co-workers in a collaborative and entrepreneurial team
A flexible work schedule
A fun office in vibrant downtown San Francisco
Security for your future: Employee Stock Option Program (ESOP), 401K with company match and profit sharing
Medical, Dental and Vision benefits for employees and families (including domestic partners)
Life Insurance, short term and long-term disability benefits
Paid vacation, holiday and sick days
Tuition reimbursement
Access to an Employee Assistance Program
Fun company and team outings",4.0,Woodruff Sawyer,"San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,102,Company - Private,financial_related,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,146.0,CA,2380,1,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0
244,244,AWS Data Engineer - Customer Insights & Analytics,$111k-$181k,"Company Summary

Taking care of our customers, our communities and each other. Thats the Travelers Promise. By honoring this commitment, we have maintained our reputation as one of the best property casualty insurers in the industry for over 160 years. Join us to discover a culture that is rooted in innovation and thrives on collaboration. Imagine loving what you do and where you do it.

Target Openings

2

Job Description Summary

Are you a Data Engineer who wants to build enterprise data solutions to support better serving our customers? As an AWS Data Engineer on the CODIE Team, you will be responsible for data acquisition and data preparation in AWS. This position will work with data across many Travelers' systems to create data products that provide a holistic view of our customers' interactions with us. In this unique position, you will have the opportunity to work as part of a cross-LOB project team. Prior Data Engineering experience in AWS required.

Primary Job Duties & Responsibilities

Data Analysis, Acquisition, Preparation, and Exploration:
Independently perform Data Acquisition, Prep and Exploration: reviews, prepares, basic design, and integrates data. Able to correct minor problems and implements data cleansing/quality solutions.
Apply moderate and develops basic data derivations, business transformation rules, and data requirements.
Present simple data visualizations to help support data exploration as needed.
Data Solutions & Analytic Implementations:
Operationalize and automate well defined simple data products independently.
Build, test, and implement simple analytic processes, including pilots and proof of concept.
Assist in training business users on data products/analytic environment. Delivers basic training.
Apply knowledge of current industry trends and techniques to formulate solutions within the context of assigned projects.
Data Culture:
Continue to develop insurance and business intelligence knowledge while learning how work assignments address business issues.
Understand Travelers standards, processes, and environmental landscape.
Incorporate core data management competencies - data governance, data security, data quality.
Share knowledge with peer users on data or analytic products.
Minimum Qualifications
1 year of relevant experience with data tools, techniques, and manipulation required.
Education, Work Experience, & Knowledge
College Degree in STEM related field
3 years of relevant experience with data tools, techniques, and manipulation preferred.
Job Specific Technical Skills & Competencies
Python programming skills
Experience building data products
Experience building data pipelines
Strong SQL skills
Experience in code repository tool GitHub
Experience with AWS
Experience putting applications in Production at Travelers, preferred
Must demonstrate a proactive nature with willingness to contribute, collaborate and work in an Lean-Agile team environment
Employment Practices

Travelers is an equal opportunity employer. We value the unique abilities and talents each individual brings to our organization and recognize that we benefit in numerous ways from our differences.

If you have questions regarding the physical requirements of this role, please send us an email so we may assist you.

Travelers reserves the right to fill this position at a level above or below the level included in this posting.",4.1,Travelers,"Hartford, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,167,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,146.0,CT,3392,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
245,245,Senior Data Scientist,$111k-$181k,"Responsibilities: The NAVAIR Digital Group leads the digital transformation of NAVAIR and works to accelerate and scale digital/analytic technologies and capabilities across the NAVAIR Enterprise as a means to increase speed in the delivery and sustainment of warfighting capability. The Digital Group delivers and executes command-wide strategies that align activities and provides the workforce with agile self-service infrastructure, data accessibility, visualization and analytic tools, and digital/IT services to rapidly research, create, deploy, integrate, and maintain, applications, enterprise solutions, and other digital capabilities. NAVAIR’s digital transformation will require leveraging advanced digital tools to implement fundamentally different business models across all business, technology development, workforce, and mission operation domains. NAVAIR is committed to a digital culture that empowers the workforce to accelerate, innovate, collaborate, develop, and deliver capabilities to meet mission outcomes.
Selected candidate will:
Develop analytics methods and processes; identifies appropriate methods and tools to extract knowledge from data; leverages large volumes of data to answer challenges; prepares data for use in predictive and prescriptive modeling (data cleansing); automates organizational work through scripts for data processing and analytics; develops and applies algorithms and machine learning methods; applies analytic methods and software tools to design and develop analytic programs; performs mathematical modeling
Interact with the government customer, military personal and other contractors as required
Provide data architecture, design, engineering, business intelligence, and management support to include:
o Data plans and strategy development and execution support
o Data governance support
o Data architecture/framework assessment, design, deployment, and sustainment support
o Data science and analytic support
o Enterprise application management and support
o Research, develop, test, evaluate, and apply various analytics methods, processes, and technologies
o Provide support to apply common data analytics processes and tools across the Enterprise
Qualifications: Qualifications:
Bachelors or Master’s Degree in related filed is required plus Ten (10+) years of experience
Candidate is required to pass a Background Investigation
Security+ certification is required
An active DoD secret clearance or higher is required
Overview: Sabre Systems, Inc. is a quality driven, customer focused large business providing innovative solutions in the areas of Cyber, C4ISR, Business Intelligence and Data Analytics, and Enterprise Modernization to federal and civilian customers. Our mission is to ensure our customers have the technology, services, and expertise to overcome threats, maintain superiority, and quickly adapt to emerging obstacles. At Sabre, we're more than just a job - we're a team - and we care for and nurture our employees like family. If you want to be a part of creating and implementing enduring solutions that transform mission challenges into mission success – join Sabre!
Sabre provides an excellent benefits package, which includes healthcare, paid days off, tuition reimbursement, and a 401K plan.

We respect the unique perspectives that a diverse workforce of minorities, women, individuals with disabilities, and protected veterans brings not only to our company, but also to our customers. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin.
EOE: Minorities/Females/Disability/Veterans; VEVRAA Federal Contractor*
Job Type: Full-time",4.8,Sabre Systems,"Patuxent River, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,31,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,146.0,MD,3733,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
247,247,Data Scientist- Analytics,$111k-$181k,"OkCupid is looking for an analyst to contribute to our data-driven organization. We enjoy working on a product that helps millions of people find love and get a great sense of satisfaction in seeing our hard work make a difference. If that’s the kind of thing that appeals to you, you’re probably a good fit for OkCupid

About the Team:
OkCupid’s Analytics function is a close knit team of 4, we sit embedded in various business functions, and we each bring our diverse and unique experience to the team. Our team handles all aspects of the analytics life cycle, including data modelling and warehousing, reporting, traditional analytics, and statistical modeling.

In this role, you will:
-Partner with Product Managers and Senior leadership to recommend appropriate actions
-Utilize statistical modelling techniques where appropriate to drive business decisions
-Own experimentation for your product team by designing and implementing AB tests and network effect tests
-Analyze company performance across Product, Marketing, Finance, and more as needed
-Prepare trend analysis and investigative reporting for product teams and senior management

We’re looking for:
-3+ YOE with at least one statistical programming language: Python, R, SAS, Julia (Python Preferred)
-3+ YOE using SQL with any database
-Strong analytical skills and the ability to turn unstructured problems into easily digestible analyses and conclusions
-Previous experience analyzing behavior at an internet company, preferably in a B2C environment
-Ability to operate independently and proactively, we don’t just want you generating reports, we want you helping drive the business forwards

Extra points for:
-Bachelor’s degree in Economics, Computer Science, Mathematics, or other related fields a plus
-Experience with at least one BI tool (Tableau, Looker, Periscope, etc)
-Basic familiarity with Machine Learning concepts
-Advanced statistical knowledge

What are some perks?
-Competitive salary and full benefits, including Medical, Dental, Vision, and 401k
-Workstation and tools of your choice
-Paid attendance to conferences
-Regularly catered lunch and a bomb shelter stockpile of snacks and drinks
-Company funded happy hours/events
-A sunny office full of incredibly curious and friendly people

OkCupid is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are deeply committed to fostering an inclusive environment for all employees.



What’s in it for you?
- Competitive salary and full benefits, including Medical, Dental, Vision, and 401k
- Workstation and tools of your choice
- Paid attendance to conferences
- Daily complimentary catered lunch from some of NYC’s top restaurants, and an endless supply of snacks & drinks
- Company funded happy hours/events
- Discounted membership to some amazing NYC facilities including Chelsea Piers Gym
- Generous maternity and/or paternity leave and contributions towards fertility preservation
- A sunny office full of incredibly curious and friendly people

OkCupid is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are deeply committed to fostering an inclusive environment for all employees.",4.2,OkCupid,"New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,17,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,146.0,NY,3143,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
254,254,"Senior Data Scientist, Programmatic",$111k-$181k,"Who we are:

DoubleVerify is the leader in digital performance solutions, improving the impression quality and audience impact of digital advertising. Built on best practices, DoubleVerify solutions create value for media buyers and sellers by bringing transparency and accountability to the market, ensuring ad viewability, brand safety, fraud protection, accurate impression delivery and audience quality across campaigns to drive performance. Since 2008, DoubleVerify has helped hundreds of Fortune 500 companies gain the most value out of their media spend by delivering best in class solutions across the digital ecosystem that help build a better industry. Learn more at doubleverify.com.

What You'll Do:
Participate actively in all aspects of designing, researching, building, and delivering data-focused products for our clients.
Work on problems related to machine learning and data analytics over hundreds of millions of web pages; graph mining and algorithmic optimization on petabytes of data; and causal inference with missing data - to name a few.
Who You Are:
You have a sustained track record of making significant, self-directed, and end-to-end contributions to large and impactful machine learning projects. You think beyond just the task at hand to deeply understand the 'why' behind what you are doing.
You have a strong sense of data intuition. At our scale, many off-the-shelf modeling techniques (open source and enterprise) simply don't work. You are able to work from first principles and intuition to develop solutions and adapt them to a unique environment.
You are a broadly skilled data scientist with experience embedding models into always-on production systems, working across a variety of technologies and data sources.
You have a product-focused mindset. You have the passion and ability to contribute to the process of discovering what will delight our clients and push forward one of the world's largest and most influential industries toward a vision of openness, transparency, and evidence-based decision-making.
You work with confidence and without ego. Our data scientists have deep knowledge and exercise a high degree of leadership in their daily work. You have strongly-held, defensible ideas, and advocate for what you believe is right. You are also adept at identifying and evaluating trade-offs, willing to be proven wrong, and quick to walk through fire to support your fellow teammates.
You value, seek out, and foster diversity. We are a global team from many diverse backgrounds, with different experiences and perspectives. To complement this team, you will welcome ideas that are different from your own and be skilled at finding and building from common ground.
You are a creative thinker, not bound by ""the way things have always been done."" What you know is less important than how well you learn and innovate. We don't need data scientists who know all the answers; we need data scientists who can invent the answers no one has thought of yet, to the questions yet to be asked.
What We Consider as Advantages:
You have an abundance of intellectual curiosity and are enthusiastic to learn (and teach) new technologies / techniques.
You are comfortable working on an agile, distributed team spanning multiple time zones and continents.
You are able to communicate effectively across both technical and non-technical audiences.
You have over 3 years of experience working in a data-driven role. Some of those years of experience may have been spent pursuing an advanced degree in a quantitative field, but it's not a requirement. What and how you can contribute is what's most important to us which is why our consideration is not limited by the level of education you have.
You have experience with big data technologies such as Spark or AWS; are able to write efficient SQL; and are proficient in one or more of the following programming languages: R, Python, or Scala.",3.8,DoubleVerify,"New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,12,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,146.0,NY,3925,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
255,255,Data Scientist,$111k-$181k,"Job Title: Data Scientist

Location: Field - US East

WHY YOU'LL LOVE SALESLOFT:

Put Customers First. Team Over Self. Focus on Results. Bias Towards Action. Glass Half Full.

These are the values that define who we are, that have empowered our staggering growth, and could be instrumental to your career development

Headquartered in Atlanta, Georgia, with offices in San Francisco, New York, London, Indianapolis, and Guadalajara, SalesLoft is growing rapidly and is looking for future Lofters to join our team. As a testament to our Organizational Health, SalesLoft has been named by Forbes as one of America's Best Startup Employers in 2020, twice by Deloitte as a 'Fastest-Growing Technology Company in North America,' featured by The New York Times as a start-up on a path to a $1B valuation, and has been recognized as a '#1 Best Place to Work in Atlanta' three separate years. SalesLoft is ranked #1 in the emerging category of Sales Engagement software and is on a mission to equip companies to maximize revenue by creating a fantastic buying experience.

We're redefining an age old industry! This is challenging work – but our team of brilliant creatives makes the journey thrilling. We're fast-paced, innovative, and collaborative. We pursue excellence in everything and have a lot of fun along the way. Come join us!

THE OPPORTUNITY:

Although we're proud of our history, we're just as excited about the future. We want to create a world-class culture and company that attracts, develops, engages and retains elite talent.

At SalesLoft, our data scientists are pivotal to our company's success. You will be a key member of our fast-growing and high-performing data science team and will conduct innovative machine learning research and build product feature prototypes that will deliver value to our customers.

On a day-to-day basis, you will be responsible for solving business problems using our in-house data and your technical prowess. Specifically, you will:
Apply advanced statistical techniques and concepts to analyze data from the company databases and other unstructured data sources to build innovative product features, marketing content, and internal services.
Invest in the sales engagement domain; collaborate with product, engineering, sales, customer success, and other teams to understand business and customer needs, and translate them to tangible data science problems.
Own and manage complex projects and communicate effectively with stakeholders.
Contribute to the rapid growth of the research organization, being flexible in data engineering, algorithmist, and analyst responsibilities as they arise.
In addition to working with amazing colleagues who exemplify our 'team over self' core value, you will also have the opportunity to leverage your mathematical skills and technical expertise to transform the sales engagement space. You will have an opportunity to make a difference.

WHAT WE'RE LOOKING FOR:

We are seeking a hungry and passionate person who will be instrumental in growing the data science organization at the most successful early stage SaaS company in Atlanta. We are looking for someone who enjoys, and is unafraid of, getting their hands dirty with unstructured, unlabeled data and can think out of the box to solve business problems.

If you're looking for an opportunity to learn more, do more, and become more than previously possible… If you're passionate about innovation, growth and serving customers and thrive in a fast-paced, developmental environment, then becoming a Data Scientist at SalesLoft is the career path for you!

THE TEAM:

Our SalesLoft's Data Science team is comprised of seasoned and up-and-coming data scientists, machine learning engineers and a product manager who are all aligned on one vision and mission:
Vision: Every seller is loved by the buyers they serve (#saleslove)
Mission: Equip companies to maximize revenue by creating a fantastic buying experience
The Data Science team consists of results-oriented technology professionals who are hungry, humble and smart. They are passionate about making SalesLoft the leader in AI technologies in the sales engagement space and believe in leveraging data science and machine learning to guide and help our users. They are also the epitome of our core values - Customers First. Team Over Self. Focus on Results. Bias Towards Action. Glass Half Full.

THE SKILL SET:
2+ years experience as a data scientist or machine learning engineer
Proficient in a variety of ML techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and has a fundamental understanding of their real-world advantages/drawbacks
Experience with deploying data science products in production or collaborating with engineers to deploy in production
Prior experience of working with unlabeled and unstructured data. Experience with NLP and/or predictive forecasting preferred
Excellent verbal and communication skills and visualization abilities to communicate with stakeholders
Strong knowledge/experience with a variety of analysis tools, including Python, R, and SQL. Experience with Spark or Dask preferred.
WITHIN ONE MONTH, YOU'LL:
Attend SalesLoft's New Hire Orientation, where you will learn our SalesLoft story and understand what makes our ""Lofters"" unique
Begin 1:1's with your manager, understand your 30-60-90 plan, meet & shadow current members of the SalesLoft team, and delve into your territory
Set your OKRs (Objectives and Key Results) with your manager and develop an action plan to achieve them
Meet key partners in Product, Engineering, Customer Success etc.
Understand our various data sources and get your hands dirty with them
Explore our technical stack and infrastructure and get comfortable with them
WITHIN THREE MONTHS, YOU'LL:
Create a shadowing plan and begin executing it to understand the SalesLoft platform.
Apply various machine learning and data science techniques to solve sales business problems.
Create custom ETL capabilities to support your research efforts.
Lead and deliver your first research project.
Communicate research results to product and engineering leadership in verbal, visual, and written mediums.
WITHIN SIX MONTHS, YOU'LL:
Significantly contribute to team planning and estimation.
Continue to focus on your OKRs.
Create prototypes using product knowledge, customer insights and technical expertise.
Implement and compare models to improve key metrics.
Advise product leadership on data science data capture and collection requirements.
Collaborate with our machine learning engineers and software engineers to put your models in front of our customers.
WITHIN TWELVE MONTHS, YOU'LL:
Mentor other team members and assist them to tackle new problems.
Be a key advisor on team direction and SalesLoft's long-term data science strategy.
Collaborate with subject matter experts to develop success criteria to deliver new products, features and models.
Push the state of the art and apply the latest advances in deep learning and mathematical modeling to improve buyer and seller experiences.
IS THIS ROLE NOT AN EXACT FIT? Keep an eye on our Careers Page for other positions!

WHY SHOULD YOU WORK AT SALESLOFT:
You will become part of an amazing culture with a supportive CEO and smart teammates who actually care
You will work with an amazing team you can learn from and teach
You will experience joining a high-growth/high-traction organization
You will hear ""Yes, let's do that!"" and then have the opportunity to successfully execute on your ideas
We have a vibrant, open office that utilizes modern technology
You will grow more here than you would anywhere else, that is a promise
SalesLoft is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, disability, veteran status, pregnancy, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.6,SalesLoft,Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,9,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,146.0,Remote,7974,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
256,256,Data Scientist,$135k-$165k,"Data Scientist Opportunity in Chicago, IL!
W-2 Contract-to-Hire/Temp-to-Perm Position
$55/hour MAX
ACTIVE SECRET CLEARANCE REQUIRED

USPRO has partnered with our client in their search for a Data Scientist with an active secret clearance. This position will be remote to start, but will eventually transition to an office position in Chicago.

Overview:
Leverage your “science first” mentality, curiosity, deep technical expertise, and problem-solving skills to explore, discover, and predict patterns and insights within complex data sets.
This includes enabling government to capitalize on the value proposition of advanced analytics, and the derivation of clear narratives that help our clients understand their data and how those insights address their research questions.
Responsibilities:
Use analytical and statistical tools to evaluate data and aid in decision making.
Manipulate / create social media analytics and data to strengthen marketing campaign effectiveness
Manipulate common data formats, including comma-delimited, text files, and JSON.
Transform data and analysis into informative visualizations and interactive dashboards using open-source and commercially available tools.
Work with clients to prioritize research and modeling initiatives
Derive insights and analytic narratives from data and visualizations for effective storytelling and clear communication in response to client research questions.
Support the development of a mature analytics function informed by industry best practices
Work in a fast-paced, solutions-oriented, and collaborative environment focused on client deliverables, analysis, and reporting

Qualifications:
Degree (Master’s required) in science, technology, engineering, mathematics, computer science, economics, or other related business or technical discipline is required
Extensive experience in social media analytics and marketing campaign effectiveness.
Experience in Salesforce, Sprinklr, and Adobe Analytics - marketing analytics background
Experience working with tools, including object-oriented programming (Python, Java), computational analysis tools (R, MATLAB), and associated data science libraries (scikit-learn)
Significant experience in the AI/ML lifecycle, from ideation and solution concept development, to rapid prototyping and validation in operational environments, and importantly, in the sustainment of AI/ML solutions for CI/CD.
Significant experience and knowledge of best practices in the practical application and execution of AI/ML in operational environments.
Ability to frame and scale data problems to analyze, visualize, and find data solutions, and translate customer qualitative requirements into quantitative and technical approaches
Experience creating meaningful data visualizations and interactive dashboards using platforms such as Tableau, Qlik, Power BI, RShiny, plotly, and d3.js to communicate findings and relate them back to how your insights create business impact
Working knowledge of databases and SQL; preferred qualifications include linking analytic and data visualization products to database connections
At least 5+ years of experience in the field
DoD Secret clearance required
Superior communication skills, both oral and written
Preferred experience in the following areas:
DoD experience is preferred, in particular with human capital data and workforce analytics.
Data science methods related to data architecture, data munging, data and feature engineering, and predictive analytics
Knowledge of AI/ML SaaS platforms (e.g., DataRobot, H2O DriverlessAI)
Unstructured text and natural language processingo Computational tools such as R, Python, SAS, SQL, and MATLABo Anaconda, IBM Blue, and Oracle Big Data to analyze large data sets and develop automated analytics in making sense of data affecting DoD operations
Developing machine learning, data mining, statistical network, natural language processing, text analytics, and graph-based algorithms to analyze massive data setso Supervising algorithm implementation in on-premise and cloud-based computing environments
Developing software to generate reports and visualizations that summarize data sets and provide data-driven insights
Developing and implementing statistical, machine learning, and heuristic techniques to create descriptive, predictive, and prescriptive analytics as well as to develop statistical tests to make data-driven recommendations and decisions",4.1,USPRO,"Chicago, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,11,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,150.0,IL,4434,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
257,257,Data Scientist,$135k-$165k,"Onebridge is actively seeking a Data Scientist located near Carmel, IN or Eagan, MN (remote during COVID). *
Job Title: Data Scientist

Vertical: Energy

Location: Carmel, IN or Eagan, MN (Remote during COVID)

Country: US
Overview: Data Scientist *
Our local partner is seeking a full time Data Scientist to assist with current and upcoming R&D projects through 2020 and into 2021. This person should have a strong analytical background, excellent communication skills, and minimum 2-3 years of hands-on experience within Data Science/Analytics. While the team would like to focus on finding one full time contractor, there is potential to spit the role into two part time positions if necessary.
Required: *
In depth knowledge of SQL and databases; data acquisition, cleaning and transformation
2 contractors to help with summer data mining; full time, part time open to both
Python/R programming knowledge
Data Visualization (e.g. Plotly, Tableau)
Experience with ML & DL methods
Experience with distributed version control system (e.g. Git)
Ability to communicate to key stakeholders
Experience with energy industry would be a plus
Experience with Cloud technologies would be a plus
Energy or utility sector experience strongly preferred
Onebridge offers competitive compensation and access to a comprehensive program which includes: Medical, Dental, Vision, Flexible PTO, Holiday Pay, and 401K.

Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Pay: From $50.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Data Science: 3 years (Required)
Power or Utility sector: 1 year (Preferred)
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.6,Onebridge,"Carmel, IN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,15,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,150.0,IN,2049,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
259,259,Sr. Data Scientist,$135k-$165k,"Who is Trace3?

Trace3 is a leading Transformative IT Authority, providing unique technology solutions and consulting services to our clients. Equipped with elite engineering and dynamic innovation, we empower IT executives and their organizations to achieve competitive advantage through a process of Integrate, Automate, Innovate.

Our culture at Trace3 embodies the spirit of a startup with the advantage of a scalable business. Employees can grow their career and have fun while doing it!

Trace3 is headquartered in Irvine, California. We employ more than 850 people all over the United States. Our major field office locations include Atlanta, Denver, Detroit, Indianapolis, Grand Rapids, Lexington, Los Angeles, Louisville, San Diego, San Francisco, and Scottsdale.

Ready to discover the possibilities that live in technology?

Come Join Us!

Street-Smart - Thriving in Dynamic Times

We are flexible and resilient in a fast-changing environment. We continuously innovate and drive constructive change while keeping a focus on the ""big picture."" We exercise sound business judgment in making high-quality decisions in a timely and cost-effective manner. We are highly creative and can dig deep within ourselves to find positive solutions to different problems.

Juice - The ""Stuff"" it takes to be a Needle Mover

We get things done and drive results. We lead without a title, empowering others through a can-do attitude. We look forward to the goal, mentally mapping out every checkpoint on the pathway to success, and visualizing what the final destination looks and feels like.

Teamwork - Humble, Hungry and Smart

We are humble individuals who understand how our job impacts the company's mission. We treat others with respect, admit mistakes, give credit where it's due and demonstrate transparency. We ""bring the weather"" by exhibiting positive leadership and solution-focused thinking. We hug people in their trials, struggles, and failures – not just their success. We appreciate the individuality of the people around us.

About the Role: Do you enjoy solving computer vision problems such as optical character recognition, object detection and recognition and image classification? Text and document classification using natural-language processing tools, or predicitve analytics applied to time series? Do you love learning and trying out new state of the art machine learning and deep learning algorithms? Are you passionate in building computer AI solutions and applications?

At Trace3, you will work on problems for our enterprise clients. You will design and build AI products that will impact some of the largest companies in the country. You will be able to learn from fellow deep learning and machine learning engineers and data scientists, and follow and share cutting-edge research. You will research and POC some of the coolest technologies available and will have access to a pipeline of up-and-coming technologies made available through Trace3's VC relationships.

The Senior Data Scientist needs to be self-motivated, self-directing, adaptable and comfortable working in less-structured environments. The ideal candidate should be looking for an opportunity to help client transform their business using ML/DL/AI. Candidates will need experience in working on and leading large complex data science and business transformation projects. There is an opportunity for the candidate to eventually move into a leadership and management position as the Data Science team grows. Approximately 30-50% travel is required.

What You'll Do:
Perform project tasks independently, and may direct the efforts of others
Lead analytical effort for client engagements
Develop analytical skills and act an advisor for junior staff and external partners
Provide quantitative and business analytic skills to develop and implement solutions across several industry verticals, specifically financial, industrial and manufacturing, healthcare life sciences, consumer product & retail, telecom.
Define the key business problems to be solved and formulate mathematical approaches to solve those given problems
Form and maintain trusted relationships with clients and be the 'go-to' contact point for projects
Participate in and/or lead the development of deliverable content that meets the needs of the client and contract
Anticipate client needs and formulate solutions to client issues
Review deliverables for accuracy and quality
Contribute to new business proposals and proposal development
Manages own personal and professional development; seeks opportunities for professional growth and expansion of consulting skills and experiences
Qualifications & Interests:
8+ years relevant experience with a proven track record of leveraging analytics and large amounts of data to drive significant business impact.
Understanding of state of the art deep learning techniques
Solid understanding of CNN, RNN, supervised and unsupervised learning, optimization techniques
Experience with one or more deep learning frameworks such as TensorFlow, Deeplearning4j, Keras, PyTorch, etc.
Proficiency in at least one higher-level programming language such as Java, Scala, Python, C++, R, etc.
A focus on computer vision and/or machine learning and with Natural Language Processing (NLP) would be a plus.
PhD in Machine Learning, Statistics, Computer Science, Operations Research, Engineering, Mathematics or related field would be a plus
Proficient at translating unstructured business problems into an abstract mathematical framework.
Exceptional interpersonal and communication skills, including the ability to describe the logic and implications of a complex model to all types of business partners.
Self-starter with a passion for your work and attention to detail.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Humble with a team-first attitude.
The Perks:
Comprehensive medical, dental and vision plans for you and your dependents
401(k) Retirement Plan with Employer Match, 529 College Savings Plan, Health Savings Account, Life Insurance, and Long-Term Disability
Competitive Compensation
Training and development programs
Stocked kitchen with snacks and beverages
Collaborative and cool office culture
Work-life balance and generous paid time off
***To all recruitment agencies: Trace3 does not accept unsolicited agency resumes/CVs. Please do not forward resumes/CVs to our careers email addresses, Trace3 employees or any other company location. Trace3 is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/CVs.",3.4,Trace3,"Irvine, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,18,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,150.0,CA,6530,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,0
260,260,Data Science All Star Program - Data Scientist Track,$135k-$165k,"Data Science All Star Program - Data Scientist Track

Job Title

Data Science All Star Program - Data Scientist Track

Job
ID

27241005

Duration

Location

Columbia,

MD

Other Location

Description

Dynamic, Fast-growing, Entrepreneurial Data Science Solutions Company seeking data Scientists! If you’ve got entrepreneurial spirit and passion, are driven by results, and want to be a part of significant growth, we’re looking for you!

BLEND360 is a multi-award winning Marketing Company who is privileged to provide our services to some of the most respected and recognized brands in the world. At BLEND360 it is all about advancing our clients marketing capabilities and performance.

If you are ready to ignite the fire for digital marketing and join our team, please keep reading!

*************************************************************************************

Our Data Science All Stars Program is a 6-month consultant training program for master’s graduates in Analytics, Statistics, and other quantitative programs. Participants will have the opportunity to learn from top Data Scientists, work on real-world analytics projects, and gain experience with Fortune 500 clients across a variety of verticals. They will work alongside our Data Scientists to get data into proper shape, perform statistical analyses and develop predictive models to solve our clients’ business problems.

The primary objective of this program is to develop participants into productive, client engaged BLEND360 employees and set the foundation to build a fast track career in one of 4 areas:

Data Science

Data Engineering

Marketing- Adobe Cloud

Marketing Analytics .

The All-star focused on Data Science will receive internal training on tools, technology platforms (R, SQL, Excel) and modeling processes, learn how to apply theory to actual client project work, and hone business skills and applications of Data Science skills on business problems.

The four main areas of training will be:
Analytical methods
Technology programs and platforms
Data management and analysis
Business applications and approaches
The Details:
Location: Columbia, MD
Travel: Up to 25% (could be as much as 30% - 40% depending on projects)
Duration:Full-time
Benefits:Health, Vision, Dental, 401K plan, Life Insurance, Pretax Commuter Benefits, and an incredibly supportive team cheering you on!
Desired Qualifications:
MS degree in Business Analytics, Statistics, Math, or another quantitative discipline
Previous Data Science or Analytical experience or internships
Knowledge of predictive modeling and statistical analysis, as well as machine learning, text mining, geo-spatial analytics, time series forecasting, or optimization
Experience with one or more Advanced Data Science software languages such as R, Python, MATLAB, SAS, Java, or PHP
Experience with structured or un-structured data analysis tools such as SQL, Hadoop, Spark, NoSQL, MySQL, MariaDB, Hive, Pig, etc.
Experience with Google Analytics, Adobe Analytics, or other digital analytics tools a plus",4.5,Blend360,"Columbia, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,18,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,150.0,MD,3046,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
261,261,Staff BI and Data Engineer,$135k-$165k,"Job Description: Staff BI and Data Engineer
Location: San Jose, CA (or) New York, NY
Department: Data Engineering
Hours/Shift: Full Time
Reports To: VP, Data Engineering
Job Description:
Affinity Solutions is looking for a hands-on and self-driven Staff BI and Data Engineer, preferably with experience in the bank card loyalty/fin-tech/advertising/marketing space, to enhance and automate its data and analytics infrastructure to support its growing customer base and expanding partner ecosystem. The position is based in San Jose, CA., and reports into the Data Engineering division. The demand for advanced analytical solutions continues to grow exponentially, and this is your opportunity to grow with us in a fast-paced, collaborative environment.
The ideal candidate is a passionate and highly skilled individual, who can utilize programming and analytics tools such as SQL, Python, and Tableau to query and process large data sets to produce high quality customer facing data deliverables and insights. If you have experience designing and building business intelligence/analytics applications, especially around credit/debit card transactions, unified consumer behavioral and profile data, and excited about leveraging your experience to catapult a venture-backed company into hyper-growth, this job is for you.
Responsibilities:
Develop high quality analytical data assets with an eye towards process efficiency and automation through scripting. Experience in building data marts is a plus.
Build automated QA process to validate the quality of the data and report on data quality
Communicate and present data to both internal and external customers by developing reports/dashboards/charts using BI tools such as Tableau
Work closely with a dynamic and growing team of account managers, data engineers and data scientists to perform quantitative analysis of customer data, including gathering data requirements and validate data, applying judgement and statistical analysis to assist with planning and decision making.
Other responsibilities include but not limited to - data validation, troubleshooting issues, and process documentation.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science or related field such as Mathematics and Statistics, preferably with focus on Data Analytics.
At least 3 years of hands-on experience in designing and building data pipelines, analytical data applications and BI Reporting.
Proficient in SQL and Tableau, familiar with at least one coding language in Python/Shell scripting.
Experience in using Cloud based managed services and Big Data Environments for data warehousing/analytics is a big plus – e.g. Amazon RedShift, Google BigQuery, Spark, MapR etc.,
Very strong written and verbal communication skills; Ability to tell a story with the data
Analytical thinker, with an ability to evaluate multiple products/technologies to address various aspects of a big data platform.
Experience working on UNIX / Linux development and production environments
Experience working in Agile software development environments
Strong organization skills with attention to detail is a must.
Ability to manage multiple conflicting priorities, take proactive ownership of problems and outcomes, think outside the box
Knowledge of Retail and Financial verticals is useful but not required.",3.0,Affinity Solutions,"San Jose, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,22,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,150.0,CA,3333,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,1
263,263,Data Engineer,$135k-$165k,"Summary Description

nbkc isn’t your average bank. We take your traditional financial institution and make it better. Personal checking and savings accounts, home loans, business accounts— we do all of that. We’re cool about it, though.

We know what we offer our customers is only as good as the people behind the scenes who keep it going. That’s why we make sure you’re supported and encouraged along the way. You’ll work with awesome people in a fun and forward-thinking environment and accomplish plenty of things you’ll wanna brag about.

We are currently looking for adata engineer to join our rockstar Data Analytics team. Check out the details below.

What you’ll do

• Deploy your problem solving and modeling capabilities on one of the most data-rich industries around: finance
• Contribute to all facets of the data ecosystem (storage, pipelines, reporting, etc.)
• Work directly with key business leaders to deliver insight that has a real impact on the bank and its customers
• Play an integral role in designing and building nbkc’s data architecture
• Keep pace with the latest research and cutting-edge open source projects in the field today.
• Automate the movement of data throughout the bank
• Support the progression and maturation of nbkc into the data science space

What you’ll bring

• Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Analytics or related field
• 3+ years of work experience in data engineering, software development, data visualization or related topics
• 3+ years of experience writing production-oriented Python including major data libraries (Pandas, NumPy, etc.)
• 3+ years of experience with SQL
• A positive, self-motivated disposition and an excitement to tackle challenging problems
• Ability to communicate precisely on complex topics
• Knowledge of ETL and data warehousing best practices and processes
• Proficiency with relational and non-relational databases
• Ability to work comfortably in a Linux command line environment
• Familiarity working with cloud platforms
• Experience with git or other VCS
• Familiarity with machine learning principles

Bonus Points
• Experience building components in Microsoft Azure
• Familiarity with Microsoft Power BI or other visualization tools
• Experience with data pipelines like Luigi or AirFlow

Our Hiring Process
After our HR team reviews your application and feels you’re a potential fit we will reach out with next steps. Things move fast at nbkc bank, and we work hard to meet our candidates on their time- sometimes that’s a phone screen, video interview, or even a cup of coffee before coming in to check out our space and meet our team. We are committed to keeping you updated along the way.
Here’s what you can look forward to when you join our team:
Benefits:
• Take care of yourself and your family with our comprehensive health coverage
• Save more for your future with our 401k retirement savings plan + a sweet company match with immediate vesting.
• Enjoy 4 weeks of paid time off, 10 paid holidays, and 8 paid volunteer hours per year
• Spend time bonding with your family with paid parental leave options

Wellness:
• On-site gym facilities, personal trainer, and yoga instructor will get you moving
• On-site flu shots and health screenings make it easy to stay healthy
• Professional coaching and learning sessions help you build the career you want

Working here:
• Casual dress code and work environment let you be yourself
• Arcade games and open spaces to meet and work on every floor keep your brain moving
• Flexible schedules let you take care of what you need to in and out of the office
• Enjoy a $1000 travel voucher or an extra week of PTO for your 5-year anniversary
• Take a 4-week paid sabbatical for your 10-, 18-, and 25-year anniversaries

Awards + accolades
We’ve been named one of KC’s Best Places to Work by Glassdoor in 2019 and the KCBJ in 2017, 2018,& 2019 ( yes, that’s a three-peat)... won a Glassdoor Top-Rated CEO Award, are Health KC Platinum certified, and were nominated as one of KCBJ’s coolest office spaces in town.
Our customers love us too. All our 5-star reviews? We know that’s a direct result of our employees feeling supported, valued, and invested in everything they do at nbkc.
Needless to say... people really like working here.
And we think you will too.
Join us to find out!

Work Authorization/Sponsorship
At this time, we're not able to consider candidates needing sponsorship now or in the future or those needing work authorization for this role. (This includes students on F1-OPT, F1-CPT, J-1, etc.) However, we’d hope you continue to keep us in mind for future opportunities.

nbkc bank is an Equal Opportunity-Affirmative Action Employer– Minority/Female /
Disability / Veteran / Gender Identity / Sexual Orientation",4.6,NBKC Bank,"Kansas City, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,21,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,150.0,MO,4774,0,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
265,265,Associate Director RWE Data Scientist,$135k-$165k,"Do you have expertise in, and passion for Medical Affairs in Oncology? Would you like to apply your expertise to impact the Associate Director RWE Data Scientist role in a company that

follows the science and turns ideas into life changing medicines? Then AstraZeneca might be the one for you!

At AstraZeneca, we put patients first and strive to meet their unmet needs worldwide. Working here means being entrepreneurial, thinking big and working together to make the impossible a reality. If you are swift to action, confident to lead, willing to collaborate, and curious about what science can do, then youre our kind of person.

AstraZenecas vision in Oncology is to help patients by redefining the cancer-treatment paradigm, with the aim of bringing six new cancer medicines to patients between 2013 and 2020. A broad pipeline of next generation medicines is focused principally on four disease areas - breast, ovarian, lung and hematological cancers. As well as other tumor types, these are being targeted through five key platforms -immunotherapy, the genetic drivers of cancer and resistance, DNA damage repair, HER2 and antibody drug conjugates, underpinned by personalized healthcare and biomarker technologies.

The Role

The ideal candidate for this role will bring a proven track record of delivering value through the leverage of routinely collected data from healthcare settings to provide health analytics and insights in a range of contexts including Public Health, Pharmaceutical Research and Development and Commercial/ Payer.

They will collaborate with colleagues in Epidemiology, Statistics and Payer, giving scientific and technical guidance on study design, RW data selection and best practice in RW data utilization.

In addition, they will assist in advancing and shaping AZs Real World Science data strategy through the due diligence on new data providers/vendors, informatics support for data acquisitions in a range of Therapeutic Areas.

The role will promote best practice in Real World Data Science across multiple domains, and/or stakeholder groups.

Typical Accountabilities
Collaborate with Payer and Epidemiology teams to maximise the value derived from large observational research data
Deliver analyses of data from EMR, claims and primary observational data required by TA RWE strategies
Support the development of IVS strategies and selection of optimised contact models for prioritised markets through analysis of RWD
Provide scientific guidance on the application of Real World Evidence and observational research data to address issues across the Oncology and Biopharmaceuticals business units
Provide technical input, options and directions to strategic decisions made by AZ observational study teams on study design, data partner selection and best practices in RWE data utilization
Support technical teams to provide access to analytical tools and develop visual analytics to enable self-serving applications for end customers
Provide clear technical input, options, and direction to strategic decisions on RWE platform and capability build
Provide support for strategic decisions on AZ Medical Evidence and Observational Research external collaborations in the US and other markets
Assist in building a capability that becomes a source of sustained competitive advantage for AZ in identifying, acquiring, integrating and mining diverse RW data from multiple geographic and healthcare system sources to support evidence generation and real-world studies
Evaluate and assess strengths and weaknesses of external RW data sources, and potential partners for advancing the data strategy for specific therapeutic areas
Maintain a strong insight into the capabilities of potential external partners in RWE, especially for US and emerging markets.
Education, Qualifications, Skills and Experience

Essential
PhD or MS in data science or other advanced degree in life sciences with post doctoral or other training/work in Medical/Health Informatics or related field
Experience in real-world evidence and familiarity with health economics/epidemiology, and quantitative science such as health outcome modelling
Expertise in EMR/Health IT, disease registries, and insurance claims databases
Experience in Statistical Analysis Plan (SAP) generation and execution for observational studies
Expertise in methods development and application using statistical languages such as R/Matlab/SAS/SQL/Hadoop/Python
Experience in advanced visualisation and visual analytics of routinely collected healthcare data
Desirable
Expertise in clinical data standards, medical terminologies and controlled vocabularies used in healthcare data and ontologies (ICD9/10/ReadCode)
Experience in supporting pharmacoepidemiology studies with proven track record of advancing approaches with data science
Expertise in data mining approaches within healthcare settings generating insight from routinely collected healthcare data
A history of patient care or equivalent background of working at a patient care setting that allows the candidate to bring medical perspective into real-world evidence generation and observational studies
Demonstrated ability to build long-term relationships with stakeholders at senior levels, understand relevant scientific/business challenges at a deep level and translate into a programme of informatics activities to deliver defined value
Ability to lead & manage multi-disciplinary data science projects
Strong track record of delivering large, cross functional projects
Experience working in a global organization and delivering global solutions
Use of Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence in the generation of hypotheses within Real World Data
Why AstraZeneca?

At AstraZeneca when we see an opportunity for change, we seize it and make it happen, because any opportunity no matter how small, can be the start of something big. Delivering life-changing medicines is about being entrepreneurial - finding those moments and recognizing their potential. Join us on our journey of building a new kind of organization to reset expectations of what a bio-pharmaceutical company can be. This means were opening new ways to work, pioneering cutting edge methods and bringing unexpected teams together. Interested? Come and join our journey.

Are you already imagining yourself joining our team? Good, because we cant wait to hear from you.

Where can I find out more?

Our Social Media, Follow AstraZeneca on LinkedIn https://www.linkedin.com/company/1603/

Follow AstraZeneca on Facebook https://www.facebook.com/astrazenecacareers/

Follow AstraZeneca on Instagram https://www.instagram.com/astrazeneca_careers/?hl=en",4.0,AstraZeneca,"Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,107,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,150.0,MD,6665,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
267,267,Data Scientist,$135k-$165k,"Data Scientist

Job Details
Level
Experienced
Job Location
HQ- Lehi - Lehi, UT
Company Overview
PURPLE

Purple is a digitally-native vertical brand with a mission to help people feel and live better through innovative comfort solutions. To us, comfort means more than great products, it means empowering every employee to feel comfortable being themselves. We believe your career at Purple will be a one-of-a-kind “Career in Comfort” because our workforce is one-of-a-kind. We are committed to a culture of collaboration where every voice is heard and understood. As an innovation company at our core, we believe a diversity workforce brings better insights, solutions and products and serves as the backbone to bettering our company. Join with us as we add to our team of exceptional individuals who will help us take over the world — one mattress at a time.
Position Summary
Companies often talk about wanting “data science” or “predictive analytics” when really all they are looking to do is pay somebody too much money to make pretty Tableau dashboards. Purple is finally at a place where we are ready to move up the analytics maturity curve; to start unlocking the value of advanced analytics across nearly every function of the company (supply chain, manufacturing, fulfillment, marketing, CRM, customer service, etc).

We have use cases galore and need somebody that can come understand the business, assess opportunities and then wield your advanced analytics toolset to capture value (roughly 60% of expected workload).

Purple continues to invest in analytics and developing internal analytics talent. A major part of this role (approximately 30%) is to coach other analysts on the team who are eager to learn more on how to leverage advanced analytics to drive value in their areas. You will be a resource the entire team can utilize to amplify their various domain expertise.

So you’re probably asking yourself what the last 10% of the workload is allocated to. This is time set aside for open exploration. For investigating new methods. New tools. New parts of the business. Really just time for you to dig in and explore things that may or may not even lead to immediate value at Purple.

If you’re more interested in the latest python libraries or TensorFlow features, this is probably NOT the job for you. I need a true practitioner who has the curiosity, technical skills and people skills to join my team and help level-up analytics at Purple.

Qualifications:
Proven track record of applying advanced analytics techniques (regression, classification, and categorization) to solve business problems
Experience with NLP and other text analytics methodologies
Strong statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression, etc.
Strong presentation skills and the ability to communicate analytical and technical concepts with confidence and in an easy-to-understand fashion
Strong SQL skills
Proficiency with other querying languages, scripting languages, and statistical/mathematical programming languages (e.g. R, MATLAB
Minimum 10 years' experience in delivering analytic results working within in the e-commerce, retail, marketing or marketing research field
Degree in quantitative field (Econ, Stats, Math, Engineering, etc.), Masters degree preferred
BENEFITS AND PERKS
Medical, Dental, Vision
401(k) Match
Generous PTO
Market Money
Earn a Mattress
Purple Swag
Amazing Purple Products
WHY WORK AT PURPLE?
Make your mark: We value innovative thinking. At Purple, you will be empowered to bring your ideas to life as we work together to improve people’s lives through comfort.
Gain unique experience: Be a part of one of the fastest growing companies in Utah! The contributions you make will matter at Purple as the company continues to grow with you.
Awesome culture: Join the tight-knit team at Purple and you can enjoy working alongside industry experts, making close friends, and annual employee appreciation events.
Purple provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.

This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment.",3.8,Purple,"Lehi, UT",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,4,Company - Public,other_industries,Retail,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,150.0,UT,4418,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,1,1,0,0,1
275,275,Senior Research Statistician- Data Scientist,$135k-$165k,"Acuity is seeking a Senior Research Statistician- Data Scientist to use statistical knowledge and research skills to solve business problems. The Research Statistician will develop, implement, and interpret statistical models with a strong emphasis on data mining and statistical/predictive modeling. Provides work direction.
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Identifies and acquires additional data sources, both internal and external, that can be used to enhance analyses.
Lead the development of analytical models to drive superior business outcomes.
Develop in-depth understanding of drivers for optimization by utilizing statistics and data mining techniques.
Using latest PC tools, develop, enhance and monitor reports and models for other business areas.
Evaluate and use Data Mining Tools.
Support, train, encourage, consult other areas in the company and provide actionable information to management.
Continually monitor database information and future needs.
Explore and acquire data from outside sources.
Use database tools to support other departments
Regular and predictable attendance.
Perform other duties as assigned.
EDUCATION:
Masters/PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Economics, Operations Research or Computer Science
EXPERIENCE:
5 years P&C insurance, modelling and project leader experience. Programming skills including SAS and R.
OTHER QUALIFICATIONS:
Strong interpersonal, quantitative, problem-solving, computer and conceptual skills.
Aptitude in predictive modeling, multivariate analysis, statistical modeling, data mining techniques and mathematical statistics.
Ability to apply strong programming and data management skills.
Knowledge of and experience with at least one major computer programming language or advanced syntax in a major statistical package.
This job is classified as exempt.",4.9,Acuity Insurance,"Sheboygan, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,95,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,150.0,WI,1806,1,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
277,277,Data Engineer,$135k-$165k,"Now Hiring a Data Engineer

Ability to maintain a Interim Secret Clearance Required

As a Data Engineer, you will use cutting edge cloud and data technologies to streamline services to our clients. Join our team of Data and Cloud professionals and accomplish what others only dream of. An Interim Secret Clearance is required. This is a remote position, must be able to commute to the DC Metro Area.
Ability to apply your skills in Azure Cognitive Services, Azure PaaS, data science, data analytics, and data warehousing to pioneer Azure cloud and data services within the DoD, bringing Azure Data Factory to IL4 & IL5.
Work in a team using cutting edge technologies to solve challenging business problems and build solutions
Interact directly with our client(s) to understand their needs and meet, or exceed their expectations by meeting delivery deadlines
Work in an agile environment with participation in daily stand-ups/scrum
Design, write, test, troubleshoot, and document application code
Provide mentorship to junior developers
Learn new technologies and be aware of industry standards, best practices, and trends.
Profile of Success
Bachelor's degree in a related field and 6+ years of experience
Deep knowledge of data ingestion strategies and understanding of the V-dimensions of data (velocity, volume, variety, veracity)
Extensive experience with the Azure storage technologies (Azure Data Lake, Azure SQL Data Warehouse, Azure SQL Database)
Extensive experience with Azure data movement and transformation capabilities (Azure Data Factory, Data Lake Analytics, Data Bricks, Stream Analytics)
Proven experience developing Big Data solutions in the Azure space
SQL Server 2014+ experience.
Comfortable with Microsoft SQL data technologies (SSAS/SSIS/SSRS)
Proven ability to work with clients to understand requirements and envision data ingestion solutions
Possess DoD 8570 security certification
Desirable Skills
Microsoft related certifications such as the MCSD/MCSE
Experience with Hadoop-based technologies (HDInsight, Spark, Hive, Pig, Scala, etc.)
Experience with visualization tools such as Power BI or Tableau",4.5,Applied Information Sciences,"Washington, DC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,38,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,150.0,DC,2129,0,data engineer,0,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
282,282,Remote Sensing Data Scientist,$135k-$165k,"Job Posting Title:

Remote Sensing Data Scientist

----

Hiring Department:

Applied Research Laboratories

----

Position Open To:

All Applicants

----

Weekly Scheduled Hours:

40

----

FLSA Status:

Exempt

----

Earliest Start Date:

Immediately

----

Position Duration:

Expected to Continue

----

Location:

PICKLE RESEARCH CAMPUS

----

Job Description:

Exploitation and analysis of remotely sensed (airborne and space-based), geospatial data for a variety of applications. Contribute to the Geospatial Laser Applications and Measurements group research tasks and objectives associated with existing projects. Explore and develop new research technologies.

----

Job Details:

Responsibilities
Develop software and algorithm solutions for remote sensing applications.
Provide guidance and technical leadership in the area of remote sensing.
Provide support in business development through proposals and sponsor engagement.
Publish and present research results.
Other related functions as assigned.
Required Qualifications


Ph.D in engineering, geoscience or other applied sciences. Demonstrated experience and proficiency in working with remotely sensed data, and data products. Applicant should have proficiency in programming for development and conceptual derivation. Applicant must be willing to work with new technologies, be highly organized, and capable of planning and coordinating multiple tasks and managing their time. The applicant should have experience with software packages for research projects. The position will require attention to detail, effective problem solving skills, and innovation. Ability to work independently with sensitive and confidential information, maintain a professional demeanor, work as a team member without day-to-day supervision and effectively communicate with diverse groups of clients. Regular and punctual attendance is required.

US Citizen: Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information at the level appropriate to the project requirements of the position.

Preferred Qualifications


Significant experience related to remote sensing applications (orbital mechanics, geodesy, geospatial statistics, climatology, meteorology, geology, ecology, and hydrology). Demonstrated experience and familiarity in working with 3-D geospatial data, data registration and big data analysis. Knowledge of 2D (imagery) and 3D geospatial data exploitation methods is also desired. Applicant should have prior experience in geospatial application solutions using novel algorithm techniques and working knowledge of processing, exploitation and dissemination workflows for airborne and space-based remote sensing. Demonstrated interpersonal communication skills and technical leadership. History of publication in relevant peer reviewed journals and/or industry conferences. Cumulative GPA of 3.0 with a 3.5 in major coursework or higher.

General Notes


An agency designated by the federal government handles the investigation as to the requirement for eligibility for access to classified information. Factors considered during this investigation include but are not limited to allegiance to the United States, foreign influence, foreign preference, criminal conduct, security violations, drug involvement, the likelihood of continuation of such conduct, etc.

Please mark ""yes"" on the application question that asks if additional materials are required. Failure to attach all additional materials listed below may result in a delay in application processing.

Salary Range


$90,000-$115,000+/negotiable depending on qualifications

Working Conditions
Working Conditions
Standard office conditions
Repetitive use of a keyboard at a workstation
Use of manual dexterity
Some weekend, evening and holiday work
Possible interstate/intrastate travel
Required Materials
Resume/CV
3 work references with their contact information; at least one reference should be from a supervisor
Letter of interest
Unoffiical college transcripts
Important for applicants who are NOT current university employees or contingent workers: You will be prompted to submit your resume the first time you apply, then you will be provided an option to upload a new Resume for subsequent applications. Any additional Required Materials (letter of interest, references, etc.) will be uploaded in the Application Questions section; you will be able to multi-select additional files. Before submitting your online job application, ensure that ALL Required Materials have been uploaded. Once your job application has been submitted, you cannot make changes.

Important for Current university employees and contingent workers: As a current university employee or contingent worker, you MUST apply within Workday by searching for Find UT Jobs. If you are a current University employee, log-in to Workday, navigate to your Worker Profile, click the Career link in the left hand navigation menu and then update the sections in your Professional Profile before you apply. This information will be pulled in to your application. The application is one page and you will be prompted to upload your resume. In addition, you must respond to the application questions presented to upload any additional Required Materials (letter of interest, references, etc.) that were noted above.

----

Employment Eligibility:

Regular staff who have been employed in their current position for the last six continuous months are eligible for openings being recruited for through University-Wide or Open Recruiting, to include both promotional opportunities and lateral transfers. Staff who are promotion/transfer eligible may apply for positions without supervisor approval.

----

Retirement Plan Eligibility:

The retirement plan for this position is Teacher Retirement System of Texas (TRS), subject to the position being at least 20 hours per week and at least 135 days in length. This position has the option to elect the Optional Retirement Program (ORP) instead of TRS, subject to the position being 40 hours per week and at least 135 days in length.

----

Background Checks:

A criminal history background check will be required for finalist(s) under consideration for this position.

----

Equal Opportunity Employer:

The University of Texas at Austin, as an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer, complies with all applicable federal and state laws regarding nondiscrimination and affirmative action. The University is committed to a policy of equal opportunity for all persons and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, national origin, age, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, disability, religion, or veteran status in employment, educational programs and activities, and admissions.

----

Pay Transparency:

The University of Texas at Austin will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information.

----

Employment Eligibility Verification:

If hired, you will be required to complete the federal Employment Eligibility Verification I-9 form. You will be required to present acceptable and original documents to prove your identity and authorization to work in the United States. Documents need to be presented no later than the third day of employment. Failure to do so will result in loss of employment at the university.

----

E-Verify:

The University of Texas at Austin use E-Verify to check the work authorization of all new hires effective May 2015. The university’s company ID number for purposes of E-Verify is 854197. For more information about E-Verify, please see the following:
E-Verify Poster (English) [PDF]
E-Verify Poster (Spanish) [PDF]
Right To Work Poster (English) [PDF]
Right To Work Poster (Spanish) [PDF]
----

Compliance:

Employees may be required to report violations of law under Title IX and the Jeanne Clery Disclosure of Campus Security Policy and Crime Statistics Act (Clery Act). If this position is identified a Campus Security Authority (Clery Act), you will be notified and provided resources for reporting. Responsible employees under Title IX are defined and outlined in HOP-3031.

The Clery Act requires all prospective employees be notified of the availability of the Annual Security and Fire Safety report. You may access the 2019 report here or obtain a copy at University Compliance Services, 1616 Guadalupe, Suite UTA 2.206, Austin, TX 78701.",3.8,Applied Research Laboratories,"Austin, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,College / University,other_industries,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,150.0,TX,9162,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
284,284,Principal Machine Learning Data Scientist - Telecommute,$135k-$165k,"The Data Science Transformation team seeks a Principal Data Scientist to join our team. You should be an exceptional disciplined and self-motivated Data Scientist with predictive modeling and advanced analytics experience and a passion for working with healthcare data (relevant experience with data from other industries of interest as well; financial, retail, telco, etc), experience using various computational approaches, and a portfolio of projects you can show and talk about.

Primary Responsibilities:
Improve and extend the analytic methods in our products
Work alongside other data scientists, engineers, and project managers to design and implement models and experiments from end to end, including data ingestion and preparation, feature engineering, analysis and modeling, model deployment, performance tracking and documentation
Conduct hands-on data analysis and predictive analytics on large datasets
Effectively communicate complex technical results to business partners
Support and drive analytic efforts around machine learning and innovation
Work with a great deal of autonomy to find solutions to complex problems
Coach and mentor junior data scientists
Youll be rewarded and recognized for your performance in an environment that will challenge you and give you clear direction on what it takes to succeed in your role as well as provide development for other roles you may be interested in.

Required Qualifications:
MS or PhD in Applied Mathematics, Physics, Computer Science, Statistics or related technical field.
5+ years of hands-on experience developing analytics with machine learning, deep learning, NLP, and/or other related modeling techniques
Strong proficiency in advanced data science tools such as R, Python, Spark and H2O
Familiarity with wrangling large datasets with big data tools such as Hadoop, Hive and Spark.
Experience applying computational algorithms and statistical methods to structured and unstructured data
Expert ability to breakdown and clearly define problems
Strong ability to communicate highly technical results to a diverse audience
Comfort working as part of a team, as opposed to solo projects
Available location: Eden Prairie, MN; Boston, MA or Basking Ridge NJ. Telecommute maybe considered for the right candidate.
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with deploying ML models in Azure, AWS, and/or Google Cloud
Expertise in healthcare data, e.g. medical and pharmacy claims, EMR/clinical data, lab data, etc.
Experience with agile product development
Careers with Optum. Here's the idea. We built an entire organization around one giant objective; make health care work better for everyone. So when it comes to how we use the world?s large accumulation of health-related information, or guide health and lifestyle choices or manage pharmacy benefits for millions, our first goal is to leap beyond the status quo and uncover new ways to serve. Optum, part of the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, brings together some of the greatest minds and most advanced ideas on where health care has to go in order to reach its fullest potential. For you, that means working on high performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter. Optum, incredible ideas in one incredible company and a singular opportunity to do your life's best work.(sm)

Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: UnitedHealth Group is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.

UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.

Job Keywords: data science, principal data scientist, R, Python, Hadoop, Hive, H2O, advanced analytics, predictive analytics, machine learning, artificial intelligence, data modeling, telecommute, telecommuter, telecommuting",3.4,Unitedhealth Group,"Eden Prairie, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,43,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,150.0,MN,4104,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,1,0,0
285,285,"Senior Manager, Data Science",$135k-$165k,"This is a great opportunity to be a part of a successful Healthcare IT company experiencing significant growth. We have a proven product, brand-name customers, significant revenue and growth, and are backed by leading investors. Here you'll get to work with some of the smartest and most interesting people around; solving unique and complex challenges in healthcare on a scale matched by few companies.
Over 220,000 healthcare professionals, 67,000 pharmacies and 60% of the healthcare IT vendors in the market depend on us every day to manage medication safety and efficiency, reduce clinical errors, and improve patient outcomes.
Our culture is entrepreneurial, team oriented, collaborative, and fast-paced. If you get excited about stretching yourself in new ways, developing yourself to your fullest potential, and care about working with smart colleagues; we want to talk to you!

By driving innovation, and finding ways to digest, understand and analyze the complex data derived from its medication management and secure communications platforms, you will lead the data science team to produce new data products and product enhancements. This data combines provider and patient information, allowing our team to understand both the doctor’s intentions and what the patient’s actions. Since our products intervene at the critical time between when the doctor writes a prescription to when the patient picks it up at the pharmacy, we can uniquely identify and influence patient behavior. Your work will impact thousands of doctors and touch the lives of millions of patients across the country.
You will work directly with stakeholders and manage the activities of the data team to address business challenges, identify actionable opportunities, and design innovative and intelligent data-driven solutions.

Leading:
Teaching and coaching is an integral part of this role. We want a person who wants to share their experiences, best practices and knowledge to elevate the team as a whole. You will directly manage the day-to-day operations of the team, including defining roles and responsibilities within the team to ensure clear deliverables and accountability. Under your leadership, you will create a work environment in which teammates find their work challenging, stimulating, and professionally rewarding.
Building.
You will collaborate across a variety of internal and external data source to analyze and model terabytes of structured and unstructured data and implement algorithms using advanced statistical and mathematical methods from statistics, machine learning, predictive modeling, data mining, and operations. Ultimately, you will work with stakeholders and partners to identify and pursue opportunities where data science can be used for new products or to enhance existing products.
Delivering:
We are committed to producing world class products. Being skilled at managing competing priorities, pivoting and adjusting quickly, and thinking about the big picture are keys to success. You will select and utilize a diverse array of technologies and tools as needed to deliver insights and solutions
Problem solving:
The problems we are solving are unique and complex. This takes critical thinking, root cause analysis, and issue dissection with the team to come up with the best solution. You be at the forefront, translating business problems into technical approaches and designs that yield actionable recommendations to enhance and drive products/solutions
Deploying.
Our technologists, no matter what level, never go hands off. We think it’s important to be close to the technology and solutions, to have a line of sight into how our models integrate with the products. Our data scientist team is involved in all aspects of the model building process, from conception to deployment. You will be the lead working with development for the implementation of data-driven solutions
Who will love this job
A Driver who works with purpose and passion; someone who will elevate our data science team through new perspectives, ideas, and solutions
A Builder who enjoys building teams, products, processes, systems, and structures as well as optimizing existing ones
A Trusted advisor and leader who sets a high bar, develops and grows their team to perform today and tomorrow, and liaises effectively with internal and external business partners and customers
A Communicator who can motivate technical team members, communicate business priorities, and explain technical decisions and design to stakeholders and non-technical team members
A Learner who has a growth mindset, stays up on their craft, and always has an eye out for what is coming next.

Excellent data science skills -hands on knowledge of new data science technologies
Masters/PhD in Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, Physical Sciences, Operations Research or another similar quantitative field
A minimum of three years of successful technical team management experience
Innovative thinker who is creative and thinks out of the box with data and data solutions
Deep experience in extracting, cleaning, preparing, and modeling data
Strong knowledge in the following fields: statistics, data mining, machine learning, artificial intelligence, operations research, natural language processing, and/or predictive modeling
Python experience is required, Bash scripting big plus
Familiarity with data science technologies, such as TensorFlow, Git, Snowflake, AWS, Hadoop, NumPy, SQL, Elasticsearch, Docker, Kubernetes
Passionate about data science and analytics
Deep understanding of statistics and data engineering
Basic understanding of software engineering and familiarity with SDLC, Agile, and issue tracking

10% Travel
60% Desk work
30% Phone work",3.1,DrFirst,"Rockville, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,20,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,150.0,MD,5739,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,1,0,1
288,288,Data Scientist – Customer Relationship & Loyalty Analytics,$82k-$144k,"The vision of the Market and Consumer Insights (MCI) Group at Best Buy is to provide a clear, relevant, measurable, actionable, and trusted view of the customer to assist marketing and the enterprise in building customer relationships and driving our customer obsessed mindset.

In this role, as a central individual on the Customer Relationship and Loyalty Analytics team, you will help inform customer relationship and loyalty strategies; and drive excellence in customer engagement efforts, Customer Lifetime Value, Brand Love, and the My Best Buy loyalty program.

The ideal candidate will be adept at using large datasets to find opportunities for customer, product, and process optimization as well as utilizing statistics, math, and data science to analyze and measure the effectiveness of efforts to build better customer relationships in order to understand how they translate into positive customer behavior and long-term engagement, loyalty, brand love, and sales.

A critical need for this role will be your ability to deliver decision support based on a well-rounded skill set that includes strong technical and business acumen, as well as the ability to communicate effectively.

Key Responsibilities:
Proactively and reactively execute analyses related to customer relationship development, customer lifetime value, customer engagement, customer health, and our My Best Buy Loyalty program.
Use moderate to advanced statistical, data science, and analytical techniques to increase and optimize customer experiences, customer obsession, brand love, revenue generation, personalization, and other business outcomes.
Mine and analyze data from company databases to drive optimization and improvement of process development, marketing techniques, and business strategies.
Work cross-functionally within Market & Consumer Insights to synthesize multiple sources of information and perform cross-functional, transformational, analyses in support of the Enterprise.
Present analytic project results to a variety of audiences, from analytical and research peers, to business partners within the organization.
Manage multiple, varying sized, projects concurrently.
Build tools and processes that enable capability growth.
Basic Requirements:
• 3 years’ experience in retail, analytics, direct marketing, business or research disciplines.
• 2 years of database analytics experience using Structured Query Language (SQL) preferably in a Netezza or Teradata environment.
• 2 years’ experience using statistical computer languages/software (SAS, R, Python, etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
• 2 or more years of project management experience and ability to work autonomously.

Preferred Qualifications:
• Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
• Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications
• Familiarity with consumer loyalty programs or one to one marketing analytics.
• Experience using data visualization software (i.e. Tableau, PowerBI).
• Strong client management skills and experience with end-to-end project management.
• Experience in a consumer insights function for a global consumer-oriented organization in retail, manufacturing or a related industry
• Relentless curiosity, creative problem-solving skills and initiative.",3.8,Best Buy,"Richfield, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,54,Company - Public,other_industries,Retail,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,113.0,MN,3527,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
289,289,Pricing Lead Data Scientist/Product Manager,$82k-$144k,"The vision of the Pricing & Merchandising Analytics team at Best Buy is to provide clear, relevant, actionable, measurable, and trusted intelligence to the enterprise, which will be acted upon to drive growth of the global enterprise.

The Pricing Lead Data Scientist / Product Manager will own multiple pricing analytics products. They will define the product strategy, own and execute the roadmap, and communicate both the business value and the technical rationale behind their decisions.

The ideal candidate will have experience working as an analytics Product Manager/Product Owner as part of an agile development team, including writing User Stories/User Acceptance Criteria, participating in agile ceremonies such as Backlog Grooming and Sprint Planning. A strong basis in statistical modeling techniques such as linear and logistic regression, clustering, time series modeling, and machine learning techniques is also needed. The candidate should be comfortable with variable reduction, validation techniques, model deployment techniques, and automation.

The individual in this position will work with both end business clients and lead data scientists within the pricing and analytics team. The individual in this role will have the credibility and technical acumen to influence business stakeholders and peer decision making around the implementation and use of advanced analytics within business decision making frameworks.

Key Responsibilities:

Serve as Product Manager/Owner for Multiple Pricing Advanced Analytics Solutions

Partner collaboratively with business users, developers, data scientists, data engineers and others to scope and drive advanced analytic solutions and innovation.
Manage multiple stakeholders to define roadmaps, guide use case rollouts/updates and diagnose/solve project problems.
Participate in Agile/Scrum teams–assist team in planning and execution of sprints, epic and story backlog refinement, and related operating mechanisms.
Develop, execute, and analyze project KPIs.
Translate product strategy into detailed analytic requirements.
Evaluate business processes, anticipating requirements, uncovering areas for improvement, and developing and implementing solutions.
Effectively communicate insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management.
Maintain and prioritize the product backlog.
Support the analytics and development teams with any questions they may have.
Document current and future states.
Minimum Requirements:
At least 6 years experience in Retail, Finance, Business or related field
At least 6 years of applied advanced analytics, statistics and/or data science experience, using R and/or Python, to solve business problems
At least 4 years leading analytics projects (product manager / product owner type role) leveraging data science tools and data visualization tools, such as SQL, SAS, Tableau, R and Python
At least 2 years managerial or leadership experience
Preferred:
Bachelor’s degree with 8 or more years of experience in mathematical or statistical modeling
OR
Master’s degree with 6 or more years of experience in mathematical or statistical modeling
Experience with price optimization and demand forecasting
Experience with cloud computing, particularly GCP
Experience with python and data science libraries
Excellent written and oral communication skills
Ability to clearly communicate ideas and results to non-technical business people",3.8,Best Buy,"Richfield, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,54,Company - Public,other_industries,Retail,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,113.0,MN,3431,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
291,291,Sr. Data Engineer,$82k-$144k,"Join our team of Data Consultants and work on dynamic long-term projects. The majority of our team members are long-term employees who enjoy consistent work and a collaborative team approach!
Background in computer science and comfortable in programming in a variety of languages, including Java, Python, Scala;
Determining the appropriate software packages or modules to run, and how easily they can be modified;
Handling large scale structured and unstructured data from internal and third-party sources;
Architecting highly scalable distributed data pipelines using open source tools and big data technologies such as Hadoop, Pig, Hive, Presto, Spark, Drill, Sqoop and ETL frameworks;
Utilizing Linux shell scripting and containerization technologies (Docker, Kubernetes); and,
Leading teams in a dynamic work environment while managing stakeholder expectations and scope.
Requirements
Bachelor's degree, preferably in technology related disciplines.
Cloud computing platforms such as Azure, AWS, and GCP;
Relational databases and writing SQL queries, evaluating their performance
Strong experience with data processing software in Azure, AWS and GCP
Or Big data machine learning toolkits such as SparkML, messaging systems (Kafka) and NoSQL databases (Cassandra, HBase, MongoDB) desirable
Building data lakes and data pipelines that adhere to our engineering philosophy
Benefits

For more than 20 years, Moser Consulting has been the go-to source for exceptional IT talent with the ability to self-manage. At Moser Consulting, our people are our #1 asset. We hire the best people, welcome them like family, connect them with opportunities, and let them do what they do best: produce innovative solutions to technology problems.

Our culture gives us a competitive advantage by keeping our employees happy, healthy, and by lowering stress levels in a very demanding industry. It is no accident that we are recognized as one of the Best Places to Work in Indiana. We focus on giving employees: an incredible work space; a fun, collaborative, and creative atmosphere; an extremely generous compensation package; and dozens of outstanding and unique perks usually not found at one company.

Equal Opportunity Employer–minorities/females/veterans/individuals with disabilities/sexual orientation/gender identity.",4.8,Moser Consulting,"Indianapolis, IN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,24,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,113.0,IN,2311,1,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
293,293,Data Science Support Analyst,$82k-$144k,"Overview


JM&A Group is one of the largest independent providers of finance and insurance (F&I) products in the automotive industry. For nearly 40 years, the company has helped automobile dealers achieve unsurpassed levels of performance. JM&A Group provides more than 3,800 dealerships with a variety of products and services, such as new and used vehicle protection plans, pre-paid maintenance plans and GAP protection programs. Among JM&A Group’s competitive advantages is its robust training and consulting services for F&I professionals, and the company is actively evolving to meet consumer preferences to remain a market leader and a partner of choice.

Job Description


JM&A, a division of JM Family Enterprises, Inc., is looking for an experienced Data Science Support Analyst to join its Customer Services Admin team. The Support Analyst will partner with the Data Scientists to: support production deployment of models and web applications related to technologies developed by the Data Science team; participates in new development of web applications and restful api’s; gain exposure to production machine learning model pipelines and the design and creation of new models using statistical techniques.

Responsibilities:
Continually check metrics and validate models, compute model performance metrics.
Access, analyze, cleanse, pre-process data.
Retrieve data from multiple stores CSV/Teradata/Oracle/API/.
Train new models per specifications from Data Scientist.
Deploy new models and determine when to replace existing.
Configure Linux server web sites and update code base as needed.
Monitor web application performance and fix issues accordingly.
Configure SQLite/SQL/Mongo databases and stored queries, updating as needed.
Participate in meetings and offer ideas and solutions to present problems.
#LI-JD1

Job Requirements
Python (numpy/pandas/matplotlib/sklearn/flask)
Version control (git)
SQL and database APIs (cx_oracle, pymysql, sqlalchemy)
Cloud deployment experience (AWS, containerization) and familiarity with AWS services
Experience working in an Agile/Scrum environment
Machine Learning algorithm development experience.
Ability to learn new technologies rapidly and turn around implementations.
Excellent communication skills (both written and verbal) with ability to effectively communicate to all levels with varying degrees of technical knowledge
Critical thinking Independent problem resolution
Ability to work in a team and collaborate with others
Bachelor's Degree (Data Science, Analytics, Business, Finance, Computer Science, Engineering or related field)
2-4 years experience (candidates with a relevant Masters degree and less experience will also be considered).",4.0,JM&A Group,"Deerfield Beach, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,42,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,113.0,FL,2708,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
294,294,Customer Insights Data Scientist,$82k-$144k,"Hi, We’re AppFolio.

We’re innovators, changemakers, and collaborators. We’re more than just a software company — we’re a cloud-based powerhouse that creates products to make our customers’ lives easier. We’re revolutionizing the way people do business, and we want your ideas, your enthusiasm, and your passion to help us keep on innovating.

We love where we work, and you can, too.

To find out more about what AppFolio has to offer, check out appfolioinc.com/careers.

The Customer Insights Analyst will bring together quantitative and qualitative data and be responsible for the ongoing analysis, reporting, and insight identification for vital Customer Experience programs and metrics such as but not limited to NPS and VOC. As part of the CX team to build a focused set of CX metrics used across the business as predictive measures that improve the customer experience and drive business outcomes.

Outcomes
Launch VOC text analytics capabilities by leveraging technology and machine learning.
Implement & create text analytics models and processes to synthesize and identify emerging customer insights informing product development.
Stitch together multiple customer data sources (CRM and product data) to perform comprehensive CX analysis to identify past, present, and potential customer patterns yielding actionable insights to drive business change.
Build CX metrics - data and dashboard
Bring together multiple customer data sources (CRM and product data) to perform comprehensive CX analysis to identify past, present and potential customer patterns yielding actionable insights to drive business change
Own monthly analysis and insights for NPS program leading to recommendations for actions across the business to drive an increase in NPS in targeted customer segments
Contribute to ongoing improvements to NPS reporting, dashboards, and engagement across the company.
Identify and champion impactful customer experience insights aligned to our key business priorities across customer segments, markets, and offerings.
Competencies
Strategic Thinking. Ability to execute against a clear framework for defining a predictive set of Customer Experience metrics that drive business outcomes. Experience with CX metrics industry trends, best practices, and technology capabilities is preferred.
Tireless Advocate for the Customer. Lead with the customer's voice in everything you do and instill the customer mindset across the organization.
Analytical Skills. Able to synthesize quantitative and qualitative data across separate customer listening posts to draw impactful insights that inform strategy and prioritization.
Agile & Experimentation Mindset. Unafraid to take innovative approaches to problems and bring other's creative ideas forward with an agile ""progress over perfection"" mindset.
Business Acumen. Ability to connect the dots and communicate how customer experience efforts and metrics can impact business priorities and commit to delivering specific business outcomes.
Communication. Storyteller with the ability to weave together data, insights, and voice of the customer to inspire an organization to action.
Influence and Partnership. Relationship builder with the ability to navigate across the organization to drive alignment and action effectively.
CX Industry Expertise. Develop expertise, knowledge, and connections of the CX industry, best practices, and experts to inform our work and how we operate.
Must-Haves
2+ years experience in the CX space understanding how customer data can be used to dig into problems and work cross-functionally to improve the customer experience
Experience building and leading text analytics models with experience building using Clarabridge(preferably), Qualtrics, and or Medallia.
Solid understanding of industry-standard methodologies of customer insights, and desire to help evolve our VoC program
Strong ability to analyze quantitative and qualitative data, optimize data sets, tools, and analysis techniques to drive business outcomes.
Understanding of how to apply statistical methods to identify drivers of business results based on customer feedback and customer journey touch points
Sharp emotional intelligence and skills in leading robust multi-functional relationships.
Effective communicator with written and oral presentations to inspire actions. Demonstrate validated presentation, demonstration, and technical writing skills.
Substantial experience with analytical software (Tableau, SQL, data warehouse, etc.) preferred.
Experience working in a fast-paced, data-driven B2B SaaS environment is preferred.
Bachelor's degree, Master's Degree preferred.
Our Story

AppFolio (NASDAQ: APPF) was founded in 2006 with the mission to revolutionize vertical industry businesses by providing great software and service. Our easy-to-use, cloud-based software helps our customers more effectively market, manage, and grow their businesses. Today our software solutions exist in two verticals including the real estate (AppFolio Property Manager, AppFolio Property Manager PLUS, and AppFolio Investment Manager) and legal (MyCase) industries.

To find out more about what AppFolio has to offer, check out appfolioinc.com/careers.",4.6,AppFolio,"San Diego, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,14,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,113.0,CA,5202,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
297,297,Data Engineer,$82k-$144k,"We're looking for an engineer interested in developing, maintaining, and scaling data pipelines that empower our organization to make data-driven decisions in all areas of business.

You’ll work on huge datasets (more than 150 billion events a month), building systems that make messaging more powerful and relevant for more than 1 million developers.

We have built a data lake that ingests terabyte-scale data and gets queried by a MPP SQL engine, which is used daily by our internal data users. We plan to extend this usage to our core product and you will take on a core role to scale and architect our data infrastructure. You will also be laying the foundation for customer-facing data features that will help millions of websites and apps to reach their goals.
What you'll do:
Identify innovative applications of data to enable new features in our core product
Work closely with the product and BI teams to help understand data better
Maintain and develop data pipelines
Architect solutions to address our data pipeline scaling needs
Open source contributions
Skills and experience:
3+ years of experience working with the Hadoop ecosystem. (HDFS, Hive)
2+ years of experience working with data pipelines (Airflow, Oozie)
Experience working with MPP databases (Presto, Impala)
Experience writing with at least one statically typed language such as Rust, Java, C++, etc.
Experience with scripting languages, e.g. Bash, Python,
Good to have experience in R, Matlab, VBA, C#, stream processing (Kafka)
Proficiency in written and oral communications
Ability to collaborate well on a team
Can deliver solutions independently
Friendliness, empathy, modesty, and love of learning
Preferred skills and experience:
Experience operating data infrastructure on Kubernetes
Experience writing a custom Presto/Hive plugin
Experience working with structured data serialization (ProtoBuf, Cap’n Proto)
Strong understanding of the CQRS pattern/event sourcing
In keeping with our beliefs and goals, no employee or applicant will face discrimination/harassment based on: race, color, ancestry, national origin, religion, age, gender, marital domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability status, or veteran status. Above and beyond discrimination/harassment based on 'protected categories,' we also strive to prevent other, subtler forms of inappropriate behavior (e.g., stereotyping) from ever gaining a foothold in our office. Whether blatant or hidden, barriers to success have no place at OneSignal.",5.0,OneSignal,"San Mateo, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,113.0,CA,2518,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
300,300,"VP, Data Science",$82k-$144k,"Oversee a team of Data Scientists with overall responsibilities to analyze vast amounts of raw data to find patterns and build models that will help improve profitability, our customers’ experience, improve processes, and mitigate risks. Utilize your skills as an experienced Data Scientist to extract valuable business insights, and make real-time predictions to improve the profitability of our business or how our business operates.

Collaborate with business domain subject matter experts in various departments to understand the problem and the objectives.
Identify valuable data sources, and work with our IT team to collect such data.
Undertake preprocessing of structured and unstructured data
Analyze large amounts of information to discover trends and patterns
Research and devise innovative statistical models for data analysis
Build predictive models, neural networks, and machine-learning algorithms
Combined models through ensemble modeling
Present information using data visualization techniques
Propose data science solutions and strategies to business problems
Ensure solutions are feasible to implement and achieve the objectives.
Manage a team of more junior data scientists working on various potentially unrelated problems.

BS in Computer Science, Engineering, Applied Math or related discipline; graduate degree in Data Science or other quantitative field is desirable
Proven experience as a Data Scientist
Minimum 5 years of experience in data mining, machine learning, neural networks or other data science technique
Strong proficiency with R, SQL, and Python including the Tensorflow, Keras, and XGBoost libraries.
Experience with Excel and PowerPoint
Strong quantitative, math, and problem solving skills
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Strong business acumen and ability to interface effectively with executive management
Curious and creative mind that seeks continuous improvement
#LI-SB1",3.9,PennyMac,"Phoenix, AZ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,12,Company - Public,financial_related,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,113.0,AZ,1933,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
302,302,"Software Engineer (Data Scientist, C,C++,Linux,Unix) - SISW - MG",$82k-$144k,"During the current global health crisis, the priority for Siemens Digital Industries Software is the health and well-being of our entire community including current and future employees, which may add time to our hiring processes. We appreciate your patience and invite you to visit our website to learn more about how Siemens is responding to the pandemic.
Company: SISW - MG
Job Title: Software Engineer (Data Scientist, C,C++,Linux) - 189288
Job Location: USA - CA - Fremont
Job Category: R&D SW Engineering

Job Description:

We are looking for a highly motivated engineer to work in the RET team in the Calibre business unit. In this role you will be responsible for analyzing modeling data (experimental and synthetic/simulated) and coming up with novel ways to organize it, while deriving meaningful operations and extracting maximum information from this data.

You will also be expected to develop supporting software that will be properly integrated in the modeling suite of tools that are used specifically in modeling of semiconductor manufacturing.

You will be teaming up with a group of senior software engineers contributing to final production-level quality of new components and algorithms and to support existing components.

This is a unique role that will challenge you and allow you to grow in interdisciplinary areas of software engineering and data analysis.

Knowledge and experience in the area of data science/data analysis is preferred.

Some familiarity with physical modeling of any discipline (e.g. from fields in electrical or mechanical engineering) will be very useful for the suitable candidate.

Job
Qualifications:

The successful candidate will possess the following
combination of education and experience:
BS or
MS in Data Sciences, Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Physics or
Applied Mathematics.
Working
knowledge in development of C and C++ on UNIX and/or LINUX platforms.
Excellent
programming skills in at least one mainstream scripting language, preferably
Python.
Experience/knowledge
in data analysis.
Experience/knowledge
in machine learning technology.
Experience
with Python, Keras and Tensorflow.
Demonstrated
ability to learn and explore new technologies.
Excellent
analysis and problem-solving skills.
Must
have the ability to collaborate closely with other members of the team and
develop critical components consistently and in a timely manner.
Experience
with MATLAB/R or equivalent mathematical package is expected.
This position may require access to export-controlled technology. If an export license is required and Mentor Graphics elects to apply for such a license, then candidates must be approved and licensed by the applicable government authorities as a condition of employment.

#LI-MGRP
#LI-JE1

Organization: Digital Industries

Company: Mentor Graphics Corporation

Experience Level: Recent College Graduate

Job Type: Full-time

Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Siemens is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer encouraging diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, creed, religion, national origin, citizenship status, ancestry, sex, age, physical or mental disability unrelated to ability, marital status, family responsibilities, pregnancy, genetic information, sexual orientation, gender expression, gender identity, transgender, sex stereotyping, order of protection status, protected veteran or military status, or an unfavorable discharge from military service, and other categories protected by federal, state or local law.

EEO is the Law
Applicants and employees are protected under Federal law from discrimination. To learn more, Click here.

Pay Transparency Non-Discrimination Provision
Siemens follows Executive Order 11246, including the Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision. To learn more, Click here.

California Privacy Notice
California residents have the right to receive additional notices about their personal information. To learn more, click here.",4.1,Mentor Graphics,"Fremont, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,39,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,113.0,CA,4070,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
303,303,Data Engineer,$82k-$144k,"Grow your career at AppLovin.

AppLovin is a global leader in mobile entertainment. Its studios create popular, immersive mobile games and its technology brings games to more players around the world. Since 2012, the company's platform has been instrumental in driving the explosive growth of mobile games, resulting in a richer ecosystem and more games played by millions of people every day. AppLovin is headquartered in Palo Alto, California with several offices globally. Learn more at applovin.com.

AppLovin is one of Inc.'s Best Workplaces and a recipient of the 2019 Glassdoor Top CEO employee's choice award. The San Francisco Business Times awarded AppLovin one of the Bay Area's Best Places to Work in 2019 and 2020, and the Workplace Wellness Award in 2019 which recognizes businesses that are leaders in improving worker well-being.

About You:
Have 1-3 years of experience and a minimum of a BS and/or MS in Computer Science
Have excellent knowledge of computer science fundamentals including data structures, algorithms, and coding
Experience independently creating and maintaining projects
Product focused mindset
Have experience working with big data systems (Spark, Hadoop, Pig, Impala, Kafka)
Experience designing, building, and maintaining data processing systems
Experience with a backend language such as Java or Scala
About the Role:
Collaborate with various engineering teams to meet a wide range of technological challenges
Work closely with product and business teams to improve data models that feed business intelligence tools
Define company data models using Spark
Perks:
Free medical, dental, and vision insurance
Daily lunches and fully stocked kitchen
Free public transit
Free laundry service (wash/dry clean)
Free gym membership
401k matching
Fun company parties and events
Autonomy to make decisions in a rapidly growing company
Flexible Time Off - work hard and take time when you need it
Interested? Send us your resume and let's talk!

AppLovin is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will be considered for employment without attention to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran or disability status.

#LI-JZ1",4.8,AppLovin,"Palo Alto, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,8,Company - Private,Video Games,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,113.0,CA,2218,0,data engineer,0,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
305,305,Data Engineer,$82k-$144k,"Responsibilities:
Responsible for building and maintaining the machine learning data and development platform.
Build, integrate and deploy machine learning solutions into the BlackLine application in collaboration with product management, cloud, engineering and data science teams.
Create and maintain scalable data pipeline in the cloud (AWS and GCP).
Assemble large, complex data sets that meet functional / non-functional business requirements.
Identify, design, and implement processes automation and data delivery.
Build infrastructure for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources.
Execute extract, transform and load (ETL) operations on large datasets including data identification, mapping, aggregation, conditioning, cleansing, and analyzing.
Build analytics tools to provide actionable insights into business and product performance.
Keep data separated, isolated and secured.
Assist data scientists in implementing achine learning algorithms and contribute to building and optimizing our product into an innovative industry leader.
Participate in establishing best practices while team is transitioning to new technologies, tools and infrastructure. Maintain specifications and metadata; follow the best practices.
Recommend and implement process improvements.
Maintain specifications and metadata; follow and develop best practices.
Coach and technically train data analysts, if needed.
Qualifications:
5+ years as a data engineer.
Experience with SQL, Python, R languages.
ETL experience using Python.
Experience with Hadoop, Spark, Hive. Presto is a plus.
Practical experience with GIT version control.
Strong familiarity with GCP, AWS, SQL Server.
Comfortable working with open source tools in Unix/Linux environments.
Data warehousing experience, data modeling and database design.
Experience with machine learning packages and various ML algorithms.
Experience with predictive and prescriptive analytics, modeling, and segmentation.
Experience with data analytics, big data, and analytics architectures.
Comfortable handling large amounts of data.
Experience ensuring data and modeling accuracy, cleanliness, reliability.
Works independently without the need for supervision.
Experience translating business requirements into functional, and non-functional requirements.
Strong sense systems and data ownership.",4.0,BlackLine,"Pleasanton, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,19,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,113.0,CA,2378,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
308,308,Data Scientist - Two Sigma Insurance Quantified,$82k-$144k,"Two Sigma is a different kind of investment manager. Since 2001, we have used data science and technology to derive insights that forecast the future and discover value in markets worldwide. Our team of scientists, technologists and academics looks beyond traditional finance to understand the bigger picture and develop creative solutions to some of the world’s most challenging economic problems. Our work spans across markets and industries, from insurance and securities to private investments and new ventures.

Two Sigma IQ works closely with its industry partners to deliver products and solutions, which lead to enhanced automation and data-driven decision making. Comprised of a diversified and growing team of highly skilled data scientists, engineers, and business professionals, Two Sigma IQ possesses the agility and innovation of a dynamic startup with the resources and long-term view of Two Sigma. Learn more about TSIQ at https://twosigmaiq.com/

You will take on the following responsibilities:
Work with large, possibly unstructured datasets;
Perform exploratory data analysis and develop predictive models using large data sets
Carry out independent investigations/research studies and produce reports and visualizations to communicate your results;
Generate statistical models for a variety of phenomena;
Interact with industry professionals to understand their business and propose technical/statistical approaches;
Write libraries and research tools, developing and maintaining a research infrastructure to accelerate future results.

You should possess the following qualifications:
A strong academic record with at least one degree in a technical discipline.
Solid knowledge of Computer Science and Statistics.
Experience with data analysis tools (R, numpy/pandas/scikit-learn) and SQL.
Advanced programming skills in Python
Experience producing research reports and predictive models.
Good communication skills, both written and verbal.
Interest in working in a fast-paced and dynamic environment.

You will enjoy the following benefits:
Core Benefits: Fully paid medical and dental insurance premiums for employees and dependents, competitive 401k match, employer-paid life & disability insurance
Perks: Onsite gyms with laundry service, wellness activities, casual dress, snacks, game rooms
Learning: Tuition reimbursement, conference and training sponsorship
Time Off: Generous vacation and unlimited sick days, competitive paid caregiver leaves

We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or any other applicable legally protected characteristics.",4.5,Two Sigma,"New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,19,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,113.0,NY,2791,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
310,310,Data Engineer,$82k-$144k,"Maxar is seeking a Data Engineer to join our team. We use quick iteration and regular feedback to prototype for our government customers before ultimately discovering the perfect fit. We embed our Data Engineers with analytic teams to create dynamic and flexible data storage solutions that can be queried in a wide variety of ways.

Life with Us

Project:
Were collecting and aggregating feature data from many different sources in order to model a spatial distribution. We use Apache NiFi and need a skilled developer to create and monitor inputs and implement streaming data enrichments for our analytic workflows.
The team is currently well-sorted with regards to geospatial tools and techniques, but to round out the team properly we need someone to help accelerate our backend development timelines.

Career:
Were very serious about professional development and continuing education. We offer everyone the opportunity to define their own career trajectory. Our group has some amazing resources at its disposal specifically for this purpose. You will work with your direct supervisor and/or a mentor to set appropriate goals and design a plan to help you make consistent progress.
Dedicated professional development time; conference attendance; corporate partner and industry training; peer groups; paid certifications; education reimbursement; student loan forgiveness; hackathons! And much more

Day-to-day with your colleague:
Youll be developing data pipelines and analytic enhancements. These transformations are used to facilitate greater workforce performance by:
Encouraging further analytic exploration.
Structuring data for use by multiple applications.
Enabling potential in the workforce that is otherwise stifled by imperfect technologies.
We work in very Lean Agile environment without the overhead associated with traditional Scrum. Weve eliminated unnecessary development meetings and we love it!

Minimum requirements:
Active TS/SCI clearance with Polygraph.
Bachelor's degree in a related field, e.g. Computer Science, Systems Engineering, etc. or 4 years of additional experience may be substituted in lieu of degree
5 years of development experience.
Strong Python and Java skills!
Recent experience with some of the following technologies:

AWS: EC2, S3, RDS, Lambda
High performance computing (HPC) clusters and distributed processing
Backend: Apache Nifi
Data Stores: PostgreSQL
Version Control: GitHub or GitLab

Preferred Qualifications
Natural Language Processing, Independent Component Analysis, large data structures and organization, NoSQL methodologies.
Understanding of Agile methodologies, specifically frequent, iterative releases which rely on user feedback to refine features over time.
Exposure to GIS technologies, e.g. PostGIS or Esri ArcGIS.
Knowledge of Design Thinking principles.

#cjpost",3.5,Maxar Technologies,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,113.0,VA,2835,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
311,311,Data Engineer,$82k-$144k,"The Data Engineer will play a key role in designing Framework’s creative use of data through leading the development of Framework’s data warehouse and initial data integration initiatives. We have a range of valuable data assets which are growing in volume and scope, we need to use them effectively and efficiently. The Data Engineer will serve as the technical lead for developing Framework’s internal insights and analytics data warehouse. They will identify critical initiatives and work with the Business Insights team to plan out their implementation. They will also act as a technical expert for the rest of the Business Insights team, helping them learn new skills and improve their own workflow. This work will support Framework’s development of core data analytics tools and products for internal stakeholders.

We are looking for a collaborative and open-minded team player who has experience implementing technical solutions as part of a greater data analytics strategy. The ideal candidate can demonstrate a commitment to continuous growth and use creative problem solving to assess how Framework’s data architecture can prepare for the future. This position requires humble confidence with self-starter inclinations and a proven ability to own solutions from start to finish. This is a mid-level position with great opportunities for professional development and growth.

This position reports to the Business Insights Manager and is located in the Greater Boston Area, with offices in Boston, MA.
What You’ll Do: First 90 Days
Work with Data Analyst to understand current technology solutions used to meet critical analytics needs.
Work with analysts to identify immediate risks of existing data infrastructure, prioritize key opportunities for development and actionable tasks
Collaborate extensively with key stakeholder teams such as marketing, product and engineering to understand business logic of key data and identify opportunities for optimization through data integrations
Implement workflows and technical work management systems that support iterative development, task prioritization and requirement documentation.
Work with Business Insights manager and CTO to begin developing a road map for our data warehouse strategy and self-service business intelligence.
What You’ll Do: Team Leadership
Manage data system integrations used for analytics across Framework. This includes monitoring and expanding Framework’s ETL and translating business needs into technical specifications.
Serve as the technology lead for Framework’s data warehouse development.
Manage communication of Framework’s technology capabilities and limitations. Serve as our subject matter expert on this within the team and as a voice of reason in collaborative efforts.
Participate in the Business Insights team’s continued growth as a technology team documenting knowledge gains clearly, mentoring younger staff and supporting growth of direct reports and team members.
What You’ll Bring
Technical experience: Demonstrated knowledge of data warehouse architecture, integration development and ETL implementation. Exposure to service orientated architecture concepts, familiarity with best practices for analytics data warehouses. Experience with programming languages is preferred. Data modeling for business intelligence tools or a curiosity to learn more is a plus.
Development experience: Success in implementing data engineering best practices, workflow structures and task execution principles. Demonstrated ability to set requirements, test solutions, identify milestones and meet deadlines.
Business perspective focus: Ability to consider business lead perspectives while making technical decisions. Experience translating technical capabilities to business outcomes and reverse.
Knowledge management skills: Self led prioritization of knowledge management skills such as documentation, knowledge sharing and training others at various levels.
Maker and Manager: Ability to dive into the weeds of the work while working with Business Insights team colleagues to tackle problems together. Desire to grow into a management role.
Ability to develop, articulate and implement a larger vision while identifying the intricate work required to achieve success.
An orientation toward learning and exploration with an interest in learning from and sharing with others.
Ability to work effectively with remote teammates.
A strong sense of empathy towards different perspectives and an ability to collaborate with compromise.
Passion for efficiency in technical solutions and ability to achieve iteratively.
Preferred Qualifications and Experience
Bachelor’s degree, preferably in Information Systems, Computer Science, or related field; or comparable professional experience
3-5 years of experience in data warehouse development and ETL design, implementation and data maintenance
1-2 years of experience working closely with analytics teams in an analyst role
Experience with tools within various levels of the analytics stack, including but not limited to cloud data warehouses, ETL (Fivetran), data modeling, APIs, cloud services, etc.
Our vision inspires you!
About the Team
The Data Engineer will be a key member of a rapidly evolving Business Insights team. The Business Insights team paves the path for Framework’s data driven decision making aspirations and develops the technology tools that will be crucial along the journey. From key Framework products to internal customer success systems, the Business Insights team stewards the collection of data across the company and delivery of key business insights for internal and external use.

Job Classification
This is a full-time, exempt position.

Work Environment and Physical Demands
This job requires the routine use of standard office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopiers, and filing cabinets. It requires the ability to speak and hear in person, over the phone, and in settings where there are groups of people. Occasional travel is required, including overnight travel for up to four days at a time and travel via airplane.

What We’ll Offer You / Benefits of Working for Framework
The Framework team is a group of thoughtful, creative, and caring human beings. Our company boasts employees that hail from several different countries and speak a multitude of languages. We are collaborators who value each other’s differences and are committed to bringing our authentic selves to work each day, so that we might design quality products for humans that need them. We offer a suite of benefits designed to support our employees’ thriving in the workplace, including but not limited to:

• Flexible Work Schedules
• Remote Work
• Health Plans Incl. Dental and Vision
• 401(k) Savings Plan
• 11 Paid Holidays Incl. Election Day
• Open Vacation
• 52 Weeks Paid Parental Leave
• Personal and Professional Growth Opportunities
• Opportunity to help build and deliver cutting edge, socially driven products from scratch!

About the Company
Framework is a startup social enterprise built on a simple idea: every homebuyer should have access to unbiased information about the mortgage process and feel knowledgeable about the responsibilities of owning a home. And more—it should be easy and affordable.

We are proudly pro-homeownership and believe it is a uniquely accessible and powerful way for people to build long term financial security. We make it easier for people to do this by providing the tools we believe will lead prospective homebuyers into homes that improve their quality of life, giving them the space to grow into their future, and gain value over time.

From our state-of-the art homebuyer education course that has helped over 700K people into their homes since its inception, to our newest digital homebuyer and homeownership experience—KeepHome—our mission to support homeowners continues to grow every year, and so does our team!

As we leverage the power of technology to strengthen communities one homeowner at a time, the individual contributions of our tight-knit team play a vital, daily role in shaping our products and services. Creative thinking, collaboration, and problem solving are at the core of the Framework culture, and we’re seeking team members with drive and ingenuity to add to the mix.

Come join us!


The position description is a guide to the critical duties and essential functions of the job, not an all-inclusive list of responsibilities, qualifications, physical demands and work environment conditions. Position descriptions are reviewed and revised to meet Framework’s changing needs, at the sole discretion of management.",4.2,Framework Homeownership,"Boston, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,8,Company - Private,other_industries,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,113.0,MA,8642,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
312,312,Data Science All Star Program - Marketing Analytics Track,$82k-$144k,"Data Science All Star Program - Marketing Analytics Track

Job Title

Data Science All Star Program - Marketing Analytics Track

Job
ID

27345478

Duration

Location

Columbia,

MD

Other Location

Description

BLEND360 is a multi-award winning Marketing Company who is privileged to provide our services to some of the most respected and recognized brands in the world. At BLEND360 it is all about advancing our clients marketing capabilities and performance.

Our All Stars Program is a 6-month consultant training program for master’s graduates in Analytics, Statistics, and other quantitative programs. Participants will have the opportunity to learn from top Data Scientists, work on real-world analytics projects, and gain experience with Fortune 500 clients across a variety of verticals.

The primary objective of this program is to develop participants into productive, client engaged BLEND360 employees and set the foundation to build a fast track career in one of 4 areas:

Data Science

Data Engineering

Marketing- Adobe Cloud

Marketing Analytics .

The All-Star focused on Marketing Analytics will:

* Work with client to translate Marketing strategy to specific analyses and resulting recommendations

* Work within a fast-paced, action-oriented environment

* Conduct analyses to support the business, across one or more areas of insight

* Present analysis findings and insights to the client Marketing organization

* Develop dashboard reports in Tableau to support the broader set of Marketing stakeholders

* Work with Decisioning platform and enterprise data in an EDW / Analytics Sandbox environment

* Collaborate with data team to configure fact tables that support the broader analytics team

* Collaborate and support other team members with data preparation, vestigation, methodology and development

* Work directly with the client to understand business goals, methodology considerations and timing for analysis and reporting work

Skills:
MS in Markeing Analytics, Business Analytics, or other quantitative field with some experience in Marketing

* Independent thinker, prepared to provide situational analysis and recommendations for moving things forward

* Ability to evaluate customer requirements and modify analyses and deliverables accordingly

* Ability to work closely with colleagues and client teams towards building a collective body of decisioning insights

* Strong knowledge of accessing and analyzing data in a data warehouse environment

* Ability to investigate data (vetting, anomaly detection and resolution, etc.)

* Experience in marketing analytics (CRM/Digital experience a plus)

* Ability to craft data stories through visualizations and derive insights from data

* Strong skills in Excel and data visualization e.g., Tableau, Power BI",4.5,Blend360,"Columbia, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,18,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,113.0,MD,2794,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
313,313,Data Scientist,$82k-$144k,"STRATACACHE provides salable customer experiences, empowering retailers to learn deeply about their customers’ shopping preferences and behaviors, allowing for personalized shopper interaction. Our solutions deliver consumer activation at the point-of-decision, generating new sales opportunities and enhanced retail profitability. With 3 million+ software activations globally, we power the biggest digital networks for the world’s largest brands. Across the STRATACACHE family of complementary digital media/ad tech solution companies, we have the technology, expertise and track record to bring retail innovation that delivers results.

Learn more about the STRATACACHE family at www.stratacache.com.

Data Scientist

Do you love data? Do you enjoy creating statistical models and finding insights that make a difference? Are you interested in the future of retail, commerce, and customer analytics? If so, this is the role for you. In this role you will have the opportunity to work with software engineering, sales, and product organizations to develop innovative, impactful data applications. Your efforts will enhance the overall product quality utilizing many aspects of data science, including various types of modeling that drive toward strategic analytics. You will be focused on the future of the restaurant and retail experience by discovering insights while creating strategic, marketing, retail, customer experience and digital analytics. Your background in statistics, data science, big data, normalization, modeling, quantitative research, and/or analytics consulting will be very beneficial as you take on this exciting position in the company and join our Data Science team. In this role you will also have the opportunity to continue to build and improve the marketing of technology products that are influenced by data, understand human behavior and determine how to influence and impact the retail marketplace with exciting new solutions and insights.

Responsibilities include:

Design, build, and deliver statistical models and related actionable data-focused results to support product and customer requirements and initiatives.
Work closely with engineering, product and sales teams to understand business and technical requirements, translate these into important discovery directives, and follow through to optimize and support the enhancement and growth of Stratacache products.
Establish and make effective use of internal and external datasets to back up and support key strategic, product, and customer decision-making efforts.
Serve as the data science expert on cross-functional teams for large strategic initiatives and education on accessing and utilizing qualified and focused data for decision making.
Analyze, propose, design and successfully deliver data experiments for engineering, product and sales teams to ensure statistical rigor and effectiveness.
Provide expertise and professionalism in handling sensitive, privacy-protected data, including sources, structures, organization, and optimization.
Communicate complex ideas about our product through visual aids like charts and dashboards.
Keep up-to-date with emerging data science and statistical technologies, methods and practices.
Create and/or use existing data models for predictions regarding user behavior.
Communicate ideas, processes, and results to all levels of internal and external clients and teams.
Basic & Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor's degree required in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Analysis, or other technical field related to software development.
Minimum 3 years of related experience working with data science and statistical modeling.
Experience in the QSR, retail or ecommerce industries from a data perspective is required.
Experience with recommendation engines and discovering new and advanced modeling methods i.e. deep neural networks, gradient boosted decision trees, etc.. is required.
Experience with SQL and at least one functional or statistical programming language is required.
Minimum of 3 years of related experience working with R and Python is required.
Minimum of 3 years of related experience working with REST APIs is required.
Experience working with Postgres, Timescale DB and/or other related database technologies is required.
Ability to distill complex statistical concepts and methodology, and articulate insights to cross-functional teams and clients with varying levels of knowledge in this space is required.
Ability to work with distributed and remote teams is required.
Experience with complex query writing is required.
Experience with result-set performance tuning and related data administration is required.
Experience with big data technologies is required.
Experience and understanding of various statistical modeling tools and platforms is required.
Experience in ecommerce, wifi, app messaging, social and other datasets is beneficial.
Experience in machine learning and artificial intelligence methods and practice is beneficial.
Understanding and experience with database technologies is beneficial including Oracle, SQLServer, etc..
Understanding and experience with BI technologies is beneficial: Tableau, Microstrategy, Microsoft, OBI, etc..
Experience with kafka, Go, or Redis is beneficial.
Understanding of data modeling techniques and star schemas is beneficial.
Experience with Hadoop and MapReduce is beneficial.
Experience with ftp, file transfers, data exchange methodologies.
A solid understanding of methodology, data and systems from a broad range of research and analytics providers, including emerging tools and methods is required.
Ability to articulate and tie data to business strategy.
Microsoft Excel and PowerPoint skills
Self-motivated, self-starter with a team-centric focus while working in a fluid environment.
Exceptional communication skills: verbal, written, and presentation.
Experience in the following areas: strategic analytics, marketing analytics, digital analytics, data analytics, statistics, data science, big data, normalization, modeling, quant research, analytics consulting.
Desire and interest to uncover and discover insights using disparate data sources.
Desire and interest in being the “Go To” person for data science.
Dynamic personality and passion for data, analytics, visualizations and storytelling is beneficial for this role.
Keen sense of user interface design, style, aesthetics and effective visual presentation.
Experience with agile development methodologies.
Ability to work effectively in fast-paced, results-oriented work environment.
Ability to handle and adjust to change in requirements and direction.
Positive attitude, attention to detail, and great problem solving skills are important.

STRATACACHE and its family of companies provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, pregnancy, childbirth or related medical condition, veteran, marital, parental, citizenship, or domestic partner status, or any other status protected by applicable national, federal, state or local law.

While we are excited and appreciate you interest in our opportunities, please keep in mind that we are not able to contact all applicants that have applied.

No vendor/agency solicitation please.",3.6,STRATACACHE,"Dayton, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,21,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,113.0,OH,7428,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
315,315,Aviation Data Scientist & Machine Learning Engineer,$82k-$144k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE has an immediate opening for an Aviation Data Scientist with a specialization in machine learning to be part of a dynamic team of professionals working to improve the efficiency of traffic flow management operations in the United States National Airspace System (NAS). We are looking to expand our team with someone with demonstrated technical excellence involving analysis of aviation data and the application of machine learning techniques to solving complex problems.

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.2,MITRE,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,113.0,VA,2306,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
317,317,Data Engineer,$82k-$144k,"Why We Work at Dun & Bradstreet


We are at a transformational moment in our company journey - and we’re so excited about it. Each day, we are finding new ways to strengthen our award-winning culture, and to accelerate creativity, innovation and growth. Our purpose is to help customers improve business performance with Dun & Bradstreet’s Data Cloud and Live Business Identity, and we’re wildly passionate and committed to this purpose. So, if you’re looking to make an immediate impact at a company that welcomes bold and diverse thinking, come join us!



Brief Description
A Data Engineer’s role involves developing applications designed to accumulate, derive meaning from, and apply stewardship to, large datasets. This Data Engineer will have to both be able to work with the Global People Data team’s internal datasets and tools, as well as be able to coordinate with outside groups to continuously meet their needs.
The Data Engineer is expected to be a key developer of Global People Data tools and products, both in maintaining and upgrading existing tools and in developing new products using state of the art techniques and programming concepts.
Responsibilities:
Develop new applications in a variety of programming languages
Take ownership of existing applications for further development/improvements
Work closely with related groups to ensure business continuity
Perform analysis on large datasets to make and implement recommendations for maximizing customer experience
Work as a member of one or more agile teams, using lean principles and SCRUM methodology
Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree (preferable in computer science or a related field)
2 - 5 yrs. experience with SQL
2 - 5 yrs. experience with Python
Ability to work closely with others to problem solve
Experience with hosted environments (AWS, and Azure recommended)
A thorough understanding of software testing methodologies
Nice to have:
Experience with Snowflake Data Warehouse systems
#LI-PD1

Dun & Bradstreet is an Equal Opportunity Employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, pregnancy, genetic information, protected military and veteran status, ancestry, marital status, medical condition (cancer and genetic characteristics) or any other characteristic protected by law.

We are committed to Equal Employment Opportunity and providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with physical and/or mental disabilities. If you are interested in applying for employment with Dun & Bradstreet and need special assistance or an accommodation to use our website or to apply for a position, please send an e-mail with your request to TalentAcquisitionTeam@dnb.com. Determination on requests for reasonable accommodation are made on a case-by-case basis.

Please note that all Dun & Bradstreet job postings can be found at https://dnb.wd1.myworkdayjobs.com/Careers and all communication from Dun & Bradstreet will come from an email address ending in @dnb.com.",3.0,Dun & Bradstreet,"Waltham, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,179,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,113.0,MA,3138,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
318,318,Data Scientist,$82k-$144k,"Company Description:

Quartet is a pioneering healthcare technology company striving to improve the lives of people with mental health conditions. We connect people to a personalized care team to get them the right care at the right time. Our collaborative technology platform and range of services brings together physicians, mental health providers, and insurance companies to effectively improve patient outcomes and drive down healthcare costs. Backed by $153MM in venture funding from top investors like Oak HC/FT, GV (formerly Google Ventures), F-Prime Capital Partners, Polaris Partners, Centene Corporation and Echo Ventures. Quartet is headquartered in NYC and is currently operating in several markets across the United States Pennsylvania, Washington, Northern California, New Jersey, North Carolina, Louisiana, and Illinois.

About the team & opportunity:

As a Data Scientist at Quartet, you will work on a range of projects -- developing statistical analyses to study impact of Quartet interventions; predicting mental health needs among populations; building machine learning models to suggest timely and appropriate behavioral health care interventions for patients. You'll develop a deep understanding of Quartet interventions and the predictive models and algorithms.

You will design and develop effective models, features, and algorithms involving multiple datasets, including user activity, Electronic Health Records (EHR), admissions, discharges and transfers (ADT), medical claims, pharmacy claims, and lab test claims. Leverages knowledge of computer science, machine learning, data mining and software architecture to build high-quality data products. Supports the design of Quartet products, including: an entity resolution and de-duplication library for linking patients and providers data, which is collected from multiple sources; a machine learning application for the detection of opioid use disorder in patients using supervised learning and deep learning; and an optical mark recognition (OMR) computer vision application for transcribing paper assessments.

Accountabilities:
Research and develop machine-learning and statistical models in Quartet Health's platform to improve software personalization and recommendations for users
Drives a data-informed process for experimenting with new products to improve patient outcomes and operational efficiency.
Performing ML research, exploratory data analysis, and computer-vision modeling; developing model evaluation and online maintenance methodologies, including confidence estimation, calibration, and concept drift
Develop general-purpose frameworks to support machine learning applications in production.
Minimum Qualifications:
2-3 years experience as a data scientist.
Formal training in statistics and computer science.
Knowledge of mathematical fundamentals: probability theory, linear algebra and statistics.
Strong data transformation and extraction skills with SQL databases.
Strong statistical programming skills in both Python and R.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with Amazon Web Services infrastructure.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with Linux command line.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with git for version control.
Ability to work on projects from initial to final phase- beginning by defining a problem, developing an implementation plan, and overseeing deployment and maintenance.
Ability to clearly communicate across disciplines and work collaboratively.
Experience with any of the following: Docker, TensorFlow, Keras, Numpy, Scipy, Pandas, Gensim, Scikit-learn, NLKT, Jupyter
Employee Benefits for Quartet include: Unlimited vacation, volunteer opportunities, catered lunches, snacks, team events and outings, mental healthcare coverage of 15 free therapy sessions + unlimited copay reimbursements, medical, dental + vision coverage, generous parental leave, commuter benefits, 401K, stock option grants, gym benefits.

Want to know what Quartet life is like? Click here to meet our team.

Quartet is committed to building a diverse team and fostering an inclusive culture, and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We embrace and encourage our employees' differences in race, religion, color, national origin, gender, family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, veteran status, disability, pregnancy, medical conditions, and other characteristics. Headhunters and recruitment agencies may not submit resumes/CVs through this Web site or directly to managers. Quartet does not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes. Quartet will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with Quartet.

Please note: Quartet interview requests and job offers only originate from quartethealth.com email addresses (e.g. jsmith@quartethealth.com). Quartet will also never ask for bank information (e.g. account and routing number), social security numbers, passwords, or other sensitive information to be delivered via email. If you receive a scam email or wish to report a security issue involving Quartet, please notify us at: security@quartethealth.com.

Have someone to refer? Email talent@quartethealth.com to submit their details to us.",3.9,Quartet Health,"New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,6,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,113.0,NY,5210,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
320,320,DOD Data Scientist/Engineer - Senior,$113k-$183k,"Overview

Guidehouse is a leading management consulting firm serving the public and commercial markets. We guide our clients forward towards new futures that build trust in society and your professional skills along the journey. Join us at Guidehouse.

Responsibilities

In the position of Data Scientist, the incumbent will support the Naval Air Systems Command (NAVAIR) in a once-in-a-generation digital transformation, driving change and devising how data can be integrated, controlled, distributed, and accessed by programs, business units and operators across the enterprise. Guidehouse is seeking an enthusiastic data scientist with the desire to harness data through the application of data science principles, tools, and methods and to share this knowledge as a mentor and coach for others. The individual will support the NAVAIR Digital Group in establishing practical and applied data science practices at NAVAIR, and in solving complex problems that have data driven solutions. This individual will additionally mentor and instruct employees during this process with the goal or sharing their knowledge and growing the data science skill base in Southern Maryland at Patuxent River.

Qualifications

Security Clearance:

Must have an Active Secret Clearance or above.

Responsibilities:

Work with large, complex data sets.
Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed.
Conduct end-to-end analysis that includes data gathering and requirements specification, processing, analysis, ongoing deliverables, and presentations.
Build and prototype analysis pipelines iteratively to provide insights at scale.
Develop comprehensive understanding of data structures and metrics advocating for changes where needed for both products development and sales activity.
Interact cross-functionally with a wide variety of people and teams.
Work closely with engineers to identify opportunities for, design, and assess product improvement.
Make business recommendations (e.g. cost-benefit, forecasting, experiment analysis) with effective presentations of findings at multiple levels of stakeholders through visual displays of quantitative information.

:Required Skills

5 years of relevant work experience in data analysis or related field. (e.g., as a statistician / data scientist / computational biologist / bioinformatician).
Experience with statistical software (e.g., R, Python, Julia, MATLAB, pandas) and database languages (e.g., SQL).
Deep expertise and experience with statistical data analysis such as linear models, multivariate analysis, stochastic models, sampling methods.
Applied experience with machine learning on large datasets.
Experience articulating business questions and using mathematical techniques to arrive at an answer using available data. Experience translating analysis results into business recommendations
Able to clearly communicate (speaking and writing) technical concepts to a non-technical audience
Experience with data engineering and data security practices
Experience managing, unifying, and automating dataflows from disparate sources

Required Experience:

Masters Degree (preferred) or Bachelors Degree (required). Heavy preference given to Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Information Science, or a similar quantitative field
5 years related work experience with Masters (7 with Bachelors)
2 to 4 years of programming experience with the ability to write / maintain scripts in Python (or other scripting languages)
Strong understanding of SQL
Working knowledge of data format conversion
Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written.
Ability to work both independently and as part of a team.
Strong problem solving skills.
Ability to maintain a DOD Secret clearance required.

Desired Experience:

MS degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., statistics, operations research, bioinformatics, economics, computational biology, computer science, mathematics, physics, electrical engineering, industrial engineering).

Additional Requirements

The successful candidate must not be subject to employment restrictions from a former employer (such as a non-compete) that would prevent the candidate from performing the job responsibilities as described.

Disclaimer

About Guidehouse

Guidehouse is an Equal Employment Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status, religion, creed, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, genetic information, or any other basis protected by law, ordinance, or regulation.

Guidehouse will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law or ordinance including the Fair Chance Ordinance of Los Angeles and San Francisco.

If you have visited our website for information about employment opportunities, or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation, please contact Guidehouse Recruiting at 1-571-633-1711 or via email at RecruitingAccommodation@guidehouse.com. All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.

Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of Guidehouse and Guidehouse will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.

Rewards and Benefits

Guidehouse offers a comprehensive, total rewards package that includes competitive compensation and a flexible benefits package that reflects our commitment to creating a diverse and supportive workplace.

Benefits include:

Medical, Rx, Dental & Vision Insurance

Personal and Family Sick Time & Company Paid Holidays

Parental Leave and Adoption Assistance

401(k) Retirement Plan

Basic Life & Supplemental Life

Health Savings Account, Dental/Vision & Dependent Care Flexible Spending Accounts

Short-Term & Long-Term Disability

Tuition Reimbursement, Personal Development & Learning Opportunities

Skills Development & Certifications

Employee Referral Program

Corporate Sponsored Events & Community Outreach

Emergency Back-Up Childcare Program",3.4,Guidehouse,"Patuxent River, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,148.0,MD,6428,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
321,321,Journeyman Data Scientist/Analyst,$113k-$183k,"Description

Job Description:

JOB SUMMARY:

The Intelligence and Homeland Security Group of Leidos is seeking a Journeyman Data Scientist for an Intelligence Community (IC) program in Northern Virginia. An Active TS/SCI with polygraph security clearance is required in order to be considered for this position. The candidate will support Government staff in developing a broad range of written products in support of senior leadership and USG policymakers.

PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES:

Provide expert and professional data scientists to implement effective and innovative solutions meshing disparate data types to discover insight and trends in Human Capital information. Perform work on a data science team to advance Human Capital Analysis across the IC. Centralize Intelligence Community Chief Human Capital Office (IC CHCO) data collection and synthesis, including survey data enabling strategic and predictive analytics to guide business decisions. Develop or utilize complex programmatic and quantitative methods to find patterns and relationships in data sets; lead statistical modeling, or other data driven problem solving analysis to address novel or abstract business operations questions; and incorporate insight and findings into a range of products

BASIC QUALIFICATIONS:

Active TS/SCI with polygraph.
8+ years demonstrated core experience in the Labor Category area.
Demonstrated knowledge of the Intelligence Community.
Demonstrated experience performing data analysis and modeling on an independent (i.e., without significant guidance or direction) basis.
Demonstrated experience in developing and applying quantitative methods to find patterns and relationships in large human capital data sets (such as the Human Capital Data Call, Foreign Language Data Call, FAIR act data, etc.) using statistical and graphical packages.
Applied knowledge in the mathematical sciences such as probability, statistics, predictive modeling, computational social sciences; computer programming such as but not limited to Python, R, SAS, SPSS; and COTS data visualization packages such as but not limited to Tableau. Experience with Oracle Database and Procedural language/Structured Query Language (PUSQL).
Preferred experiences include but not limited to C#.NET, ASP.NET Model View Controller (MVC), jQuery, and Cascading Style Sheets (CSS), etc.
Demonstrated experience with structuring data, natural language processing, database technologies, and machine learning algorithms.
Ability to translate complex, technical, or analytic findings into an easily understood narrative - tell a story with the data in graphical, verbal, or written form.
Demonstrated five (5) years expertise in supporting quantitative and analytic efforts and knowledge of workforce planning. Experience should include engagement with the Intelligence Community and expertise with using analytical software.
Demonstrated professional experience in developing quantitative financial analysis related to budget formulation and execution. Experience in development of financial procedural guidance data formats related to CBJB workforce displays and analytic support, resource management and planning.
Demonstrated experience in human resource management supporting the federal government.
Demonstrated experience in the use of programming, design, development, and implementation of on*line and automated survey instruments.
Bachelor's or advanced degree in social sciences or related fields and requisite experience. Related fields may include statistics, mathematics, computer science, physical science, economics, or engineering.

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph

Travel:
No

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world's toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company's 33,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Virginia, Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $10.19 billion for the fiscal year ended December 28, 2018. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.6,Leidos,"Bethesda, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,51,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,148.0,MD,5625,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
323,323,Senior Data Engineer,$113k-$183k,"Cision Ltd is a leading global provider of innovative earned media software and services to public relations and marketing communications professionals. Cision’s Communications Cloud platform allows users to identify key influencers, craft and distribute strategic content, and measure meaningful impact of PR and Communications Teams’ campaigns. Cision has over 4,500 employees with offices in 23 countries throughout the Americas, EMEA, and APAC. For more information about our products and services, visit www.cision.com and follow us on Twitter @Cision.
Cision employs the brightest, most passionate people in the tech industry. We’d love for you to join that group! We invest in our people through training and professional development and we empower them to grow their careers - because the most important measure of our success is yours.


As a Senior Data Engineer for the Earned Media Attribution Software Engineering team, you will work with business data and database systems that power our market leading solution, Impact. You will be working with data engineers, software engineers and quality engineers on high-scale data collection and processing systems to gain insights from web scale analytics data. The team will work in an iterative manner to consistently and frequently deliver high-quality, robust and scalable software solutions.
You will help us by:
Leading development work on core data warehouse for attribution product and designing platform iterations to accommodate rapid growth
Working closely with QA, Architecture, and Product teams to help Cision deliver innovative software to our customers and industry partners
Designing and optimize database architecture including schemas, partitioning and aggregations
Developing standards to ingest, enrich and aggregate large amounts of data while focusing on consistency and data quality
Building and implementing data integrations using ELT/ETL frameworks and APIs with industry partners
You would be a good fit if you have:
7+ Years proven professional experience in data engineering field such as architecture, data management, data warehousing or data quality
In depth understanding and practical experience and understanding of designing, developing and maintaining a modern data warehouse in AWS
Proven experience in the following: developing in Java or similar experience and interest in adopting Java, MPP and/or columnar databases, RedShift preferred, bash scripting and Python for ETL processing
Ability to understand key business needs and translate those needs into data solutions
Expertise with the following: OLAP data modeling, concurrency, data structures, business intelligence tools such as MS Power BI/Tableau, data streaming platforms such as Apache Kafka as well as creating RESTful APIs for use in data visualization applications
Ability to recommend and optimize for new higher performing multi-dimensional architectures for more efficient Business Intelligence performance
You would be a great fit if you also have:
Experience with one or more of: high availability (HA) applications; distributed and redundant data storage and processing; service-oriented architecture and data mining
Experience with the following: agile software development or an iterative development environment and with continuous integration and continuous delivery
Understanding of data privacy and data protection
Cision is committed to building an environment where all employees are set up to thrive and reach their full potential. We believe diversity, equity and inclusion is vital to driving our culture, sparking innovation and achieving long-term success. Cision is proud to have joined more than 600 companies in signing the CEO Action for Diversity & Inclusion™ pledge, the largest CEO-driven business commitment to advance diversity and inclusion within the workplace.
Cision is proud to be an equal opportunity employer, seeking to create a welcoming and diverse environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, veteran status, or other protected statuses.
EEO/AA employer M/F/D/V, 41 CFR 60–1.4
Please see EEO is the law and EEO is the Law Supplement.
Please review our Global Candidate Data Privacy Statement to learn about Cision’s commitment to protecting personal data collected during the hiring process.",2.9,Cision,"Austin, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,128,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,148.0,TX,4468,1,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
327,327,Geospatial Data Engineer with TS/SCI Clearance,$113k-$183k,"Type of Requisition:

Regular

Clearance Level Must Currently Possess:

Top Secret/SCI

Clearance Level Must Be Able to Obtain:

Top Secret SCI + Polygraph

Suitability:

Polygraph

Public Trust/Other Required:

Job Family:

Systems Engineering

Job Description:

GDIT is your place. You make it your own by embracing autonomy, seizing opportunity, and being trusted to deliver your best every day. We think. We act. We deliver. There is no challenge we can’t turn into opportunity. And our work depends on TS/SCI level cleared Geospatial Data Engineer joining our team to support our Intelligence customer in Springfield, VA

The Geospatial Data Engineer is required to extract and/or acquire geospatial information, derivative information and multi-INT data for analysis and visualization to solve problems and enhance the knowledge of NGA missions. This also includes extracting specific feature data in accordance with the NGA Feature Data Specifications, project specific guidance, and other NGA data and product specifications.

Required Skills
BS/BA and 8+ years of experience or equivalent years of education and experience
At least 3+ years of experience in engineering and managing spatial data infrastructure to include both proprietary and open source technologies. This includes experience conducting data transformations between spatial data formats, QA/QC on data, understanding NSG data schemas, database management, and managing OGC compliant web services.
Must have a strong background in Relation Database Management System (RDBMS) and NoSQL concepts and tools to include firm understanding of SQL and Python syntax for ETL workflows.
Must be comfortable working in a linux shell environment as well as standard GUI management tools.
Prior experience deploying and using PostgreSQL and Postgis extension to manage spatial data.
Prior experience deploying and managing open source spatial data web servers such as GeoServer, MapServer, TileserverGL, or similar to enable OGC compliant web services.
Comfortable using GDAL, GRASS, GeoPandas, Rasterio, or other open source geoprocessing applications and tools.
Prior AWS Development or DevOps experience. Prior Elasticsearch experience creating and managing indexes.
Must have a Secret clearance and/or eligible for TS/SCI clearance
Job Duties
Create, update, and manage geospatial information system databases and products.
Obtain, compile and assess geospatial data sets to support requirements.
Collaborate with analysts and customers as required.
Use a variety of geospatial analysis software suites to accomplish the mission.
Provide geospatial analysis services in the form of datasets and visualization products
#GDITPriority

Scheduled Weekly Hours:

40

Travel Required:

None

Telecommuting Options:

Telecommuting Not Allowed

Work Location:

USA VA Springfield

Additional Work Locations:

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.5,General Dynamics Information Technology,"Springfield, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,24,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,148.0,VA,3703,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
328,328,Senior Data Scientist,$113k-$183k,"About Earnin:

Earnin is a community-supported financial platform with a suite of tools that let people take control of their financial future. Earnin started out by solving one of the greatest – and least discussed – inequities in the American financial system: the practice of employers paying workers bi-weekly. Earnin's core product, Cash Out, allows people to access the pay they've already earned. There are no loans or hidden costs. People pay what they choose. Other products include: Balance Shield, which helps prevent overdrafts, a financial calendar that helps people budget and schedule payments, and Tip Yourself - a revolutionary free social savings app.

Funding: Series C, current funding partners include Andreessen Horowitz, DST, Matrix Partners, Ribbit Capital, Felicis Ventures and March Capital.

Join us and help build a new financial system focused on fairness and people's needs.

You can help make a difference.

About the Team:

We're looking for a talented and motivated data scientist to build sophisticated models with data collected across our business to aid Earnin's mission in giving the world access to their pay as soon as they've earned it.

Data Scientists are the central node to every team within Earnin. As a data scientist, you'll be interfacing with analysts to gain insights, our product managers to evaluate areas where we can protect and improve our business model, and our engineering team to advance our product utilizing artificial intelligence.

Every decision made at Earnin is backed by data; our company trajectory is defined by the systems, tools, and analytics powered by our exceptional team. We integrate multifaceted data streams such as rapidly changing market data, customer data based on app activity and feedback, and financial banking operations data to perfect our processes and workflows. Improving these systems and maintaining scalability across a growing user base (X million and counting) is thrilling.

What Sets Us Apart:
We care more about the thought process, perseverance, tenacity in solving really difficult problems (rather than checking off all the technology boxes)
Solving unique problems in the financial payments industry
Helping people on a human level
As a Data Scientist you will:
Build machine learning models with large-scale datasets across personal finance and user employment information
Research and explore with various machine learning algorithms to best help on products
Work very closely with cross-functional teams to come up with machine learning approaches to improve the user experience or business metrics.
Collaborate with product teams on ad-hoc product analytics
Optimize models by adding more features, improving algorithms, tuning parameters
Create monitoring systems to track the quality of models
Apply statistical concepts such as hypothesis testing, statistical significance etc to model explanation, reporting and decision making.
Come up with and implement decision strategies based on model predictions
Requirements:
Deep understanding of machine learning and statistics
Strong product sense and analytical thinking
Experience building predictive models from scratch data to production
Strong SQL abilities and experience.
Proficient in Python
Experience with Spark, R and Scala is a plus
3+ years industry experience in data mining, machine learning, statistical analysis, and modeling
Excellent communication skills
A MS or PhD in Computer Science, Physics, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, or any quantitative disciplines
At Earnin, we believe that the best way to build a financial system that works for everyday people is by hiring a team that represents our diverse community. Our team is diverse not only in background and experience, but also in perspective. We celebrate our diversity and strive to create a culture of belonging. Earnin does not unlawfully discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding or related medical conditions), gender identity, gender expression, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, physical or mental disability, legally protected medical condition, family care status, military or veteran status, marital status, registered domestic partner status, sexual orientation, genetic information, or any other basis protected by local, state, or federal laws. Earnin is an E-Verify participant.

Earnin does not accept unsolicited resumes from individual recruiters or third party recruiting agencies in response to job postings. No fee will be paid to third parties who submit unsolicited candidates directly to our hiring managers or HR team.",3.4,Earnin,"Palo Alto, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,8,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,148.0,CA,4651,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,1,0,0
336,336,Data Engineer,$113k-$183k,"At Phantom AI, experience the fast paced environment and help the development of the next generation of autonomous vehicles. We are seeking a Data Engineer to help our visionary team through building a robust pipeline and handling terabytes of data.
You will be designing and implementing full-stack solutions for computing, storing, and presenting evaluation metrics using data gathered from vehicles. This will be a unique opportunity to both improve and implement a scalable pipeline that will be the backbone of the company.

Responsibilities
· Design, improve, and manage datasets
· Support technical design and implementation of demand planning automation projects that use these datasets
· Monitor and enforce data quality standards
· Hands-on coding, able to implement what was designed
· Familiar with architecting and designing tools, and self-motivated for documentation
· Optimize pipeline performance to reduce data lag and refresh time

Requirements
· 3+ years of experience working in data architecture or a related field
· 3+ years of Python Experience
· Web framework experience
· Experience building and optimizing data sets
· Deep understanding of data architecture best practices such as normalizing data structures, minimizing logic complexity, defining intuitive and consistent semantic layers, and eliminating redundancy
· Self-motivated and strong work ethic for continuous development with a strong sense of ownership

Preferred Skills
· Master’s degree in Computer Science or Data Science or work equivalent experience
· Experience with ROS
· Web development experience
· Hands-on experience in dev-ops best practices and implementations
· Demonstrated industry efficiency in the fields of database, data warehousing or data sciences",5.0,Phantom AI,"Burlingame, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,4,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,148.0,CA,1759,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
338,338,Big Data Engineer,$113k-$183k,"ABOUT US
At Revel, we unlock human creative potential so that we can embrace the world’s most thrilling opportunities and conquer the world’s most compelling challenges. We partner with our clients to create substantial value through strategic execution by cultivating an innovative approach that attracts, develops and inspires people to achieve more, together. With empathy as our guiding principle, we are committed to creating powerful human experiences in the digital era and we want you to join us.
THE CHALLENGE
Revel Technology unlocks the latent potential of data to provide the actionable insights needed to make better decisions.
With equal parts expertise, intuition, and creativity, we help clients acquire the right data, find the right signal, and set a long-term course toward an enlightened, mature technology capability.
As a Big Data Engineer Senior Associate in the Technology Community, you will work across industries in a fast-paced, team environment developing data pipelines and data engineering solutions to power the diagnostic and descriptive analytics needed to solve our client’s most difficult problems, as well as work with Revel Data Scientists to feed their machine learning model and unlock predictive and prescriptive analytics. To our clients, you will play the role of trusted advisor, working to transform data into business insights, and describing complex ideas concisely and accurately.
A DAY IN THE LIFE
AS A TEAM, WE:
Pursue business opportunities within Revel’s core offerings
Collaborate with clients and cross-functional teams to align business needs with solutions
Seek opportunities and relationships that leverage our problem-solving capabilities
AS A BI & ANALYTICS SENIOR ASSOCIATE AT REVEL, YOU:
Lean in with current clients; creating (y)our next big opportunity
Continuously strive to convert top clients into advocates
Contribute value through idea flow – collaboration / co-creation & QA activities across projects and accounts
AS A BIG DATA ENGINEER SENIOR ASSOCIATE FOR THE TECHNOLOGY COMMUNITY, YOU:
Deliver digital marketing, commerce, and experience solutions leveraging both proven and emerging technologies, such as Spark, sqoop, Kafka, Databricks, and Azure Data Factory
Communicate effectively with both technical and nontechnical stakeholders
Serve as a subject matter expert in Big Data & Data Engineering – conduct and support white-boarding sessions, workshops, design sessions, and project meetings as needed, playing a key role in client relations
Create thought leadership on latest Big Data & Data Engineering technologies and applications
WORKING TOGETHER, WE WILL:
Opt in – strive to empower and activate, not command and control
See what can be – elevate creativity and uniqueness over scale and repeatability
Lead with empathy, trust, respect, vulnerability and flexibility
Be present – be the change instead of waiting for the change
Say yes, and… provide space to grow and stoke latent potential
Love what we do – treat everyone uniquely the same and support each on our journeys
SET YOURSELF APART:
Understanding of and experience with driving and applying human-centered design processes, working collaboratively with customers and cross-functional teams
Experience in Service and Digital Product Creation
Curiosity about technology and its impact on design solutions
Excellent leadership skills, problem-resolution abilities, and good judgment
Entrepreneurial spirit
WHAT YOU NEED TO SUCCEED
Advanced knowledge of Big Data & Data Engineering, with deep, hands-on technical experience in tools, libraries, and frameworks such as Numba, Numpy, and Pandas in Python, Spark, Snowflake, HBASE, Hadoop, Azure Data Factory, Databricks, AWS Data Pipeline Service, Kafka, sqoop, and/or Flume
Advanced knowledge of relational, dimensional, and tabular data modeling principles and practices
Working knowledge of SQL for the use of data extraction, cleansing, and analysis
Previous experience in consulting a strong plus
Highly refined communication skills, with the ability to speak both to technical engineers and executive stakeholders
Able to work regular business hours (8am - 5pm)",3.7,Revel Consulting,"Seattle, WA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,15,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,148.0,WA,4157,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
341,341,Data Scientist,$113k-$183k,"WHAT WE DO MATTERS:

Here at The Knot Worldwide, we believe in doing work that matters. In 15 countries around the world, our leading family of brands (The Knot, WeddingWire, Bodas, GigMasters, The Bump, How They Asked, Lasting, and more) inspire, inform, and celebrate our communities as they move through life's milestones. From the proposal to creating a home, and starting a family together, we're there for every step of the journey. Our couples and business partners depend on us. They're all in. So are we.

ABOUT THE ROLE AND OUR TEAM:

The Knot Worldwide is in search of a full-time Data Scientist. Our Data Scientists work with stakeholders across all departments within the company. They answer strategic questions and provide insight to internal decision makers ranging from executives and senior management to product managers and team leads. They also work with our product team to develop data driven algorithms that improve features on the website.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Create smarter product solutions for our couples and vendors
Answer strategic questions by analyzing behavioral data
Communicate, collaborate and present results to clients within The Knot Worldwide
Explore novel ways to look at our data
SUCCESSFUL DATA SCIENTIST CANDIDATES HAVE:
Master's Degree or Ph.D. preferred
Experience implementing auction based business models
Strong product experience
Proficiency in key statistical and machine learning techniques (predictive modeling, classification, clustering, text analytics, recommender systems , data mining methods, forecasting, and other advanced techniques)
Proficiency with R or Python
Familiarity with common Linux command line tasks and version control software like git or svn preferable
Ability to communicate effectively and influence others
Ability to work in a fast paced environment and shift gears quickly
At The Knot Worldwide, we believe you are more than a resume and invite you to go for it, take the leap of faith, and apply for this job if it sparks your passion to join TKWW and make a difference!

WHAT WE LOVE ABOUT YOU:
You Dream Big. You iterate and experiment to drive innovation.
You Love Our Users. You keep our global community at the center of everything you do.
You Respect All Voices. Inclusion strengthens us and powers your decisions.
You Hustle Every Day. You favor urgency and own your outcomes.
You Win Together. People are at the heart of our success and you play as a team.
WHAT YOU LOVE ABOUT US:

The Knot Worldwide offers a unique employee experience and we are deeply proud of our award-winning culture. From flexible vacation and generous parental leave benefits to promoting wellness and giving back to our community, we believe in happiness above all else—in and out of the office.

----

The Knot Worldwide provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, or disability. In addition to federal law requirements, The Knot Worldwide complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. The Knot Worldwide expressly prohibits any form of workplace harassment based on race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status.

--

This position is not eligible for sponsorship.

--

If you are a resident of California, by submitting your application, you acknowledge that you've read the California Privacy Notice.",3.4,The Knot Worldwide,Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,148.0,Remote,3593,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
342,342,Data Engineer,$113k-$183k,"WorldQuant develops and deploys systematic financial strategies across a variety of asset classes and global markets. We seek to produce high-quality trading signals (Alphas) through our proprietary research platform to employ trading strategies focused on exploiting market inefficiencies. Our teams work collaboratively to drive the production of Alphas and financial strategies the foundation of a sustainable, global trading platform.

Technologists at WorldQuant research, design, code, test and deploy projects while working collaboratively with researchers and portfolio managers. Our environment is relaxed yet intellectually intense. Our teams are lean and agile, which means rapid prototyping of products with immediate user feedback. We seek people who think in code, aspire to solve undiscovered computer science challenges and are motivated by being around like-minded people. In fact, of the 600 employees globally, approximately 500 of them code on a daily basis.

WorldQuants success is built on a culture that pairs academic sensibility with accountability for results. Employees are encouraged to think openly about problems, balancing intellectualism and practicality. Great ideas come from anyone, anywhere. Employees are encouraged to challenge conventional thinking and possess a mindset of continuous improvement. Thats a key ingredient in remaining a leader in any industry. Our goal is to hire the best and the brightest engineers. We value intellectual horsepower first and foremost, and people who demonstrate an exceptional talent. There is no roadmap to future success, so we need people who can help us create it. Our collective intelligence will drive us there.

The Role:

Design and implement software to facilitate data integration with trading and simulating systems
Adopt new technologies to improve existing frameworks of data flow and monitoring
Implement and maintain software that interface with external vendors to bring in new data sets
Implement the rules and procedures that ensure integrity in data sets
Provide second level support to production support team regarding market data issues
Collect and analyze statistics on market data applications and devise approaches to improve the relevant processes
Design and implement systems that track and manage data availability, access and usage
What Youll Bring:

Degree in a quantitative or technical discipline from a top university and strong academic scores
Interest in applying technology to real situations, comfortable working in a fast-paced environment, detail-oriented and capable of performing tasks under pressure
Demonstrated experience with C++ or other object oriented languages
Experience with scripting languages such as Perl, Python, and shell scripting; Interface with database (such as MySQL)
Possess strong trouble shooting and problem solving skills
Ability to work independently and as member of a team
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Have experience working under a Linux environment, familiar with Vim or Emacs for editing files under the command line
Copyright © 2020 WorldQuant, LLC. All Rights Reserved. WorldQuant is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate in hiring on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, sex, sexual orientation or preference, age, marital status, citizenship, national origin, disability, military status, genetic predisposition or carrier status, or any other protected characteristic as established by applicable law.",4.1,WorldQuant,"Austin, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,13,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,148.0,TX,3496,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
345,345,Senior Data Scientist,$113k-$183k,"Job Requisition ID #
20WD40666
Job Title
Senior Data Scientist
Job Description

Senior Data Scientist

Location: San Francisco, CA- United States

Job ID: 20WD40666

Position Overview

Autodesk is seeking a Senior Data Scientist to join our Data Platform & Insights organization. The organization is chartered with building innovative data products and analytics solutions for Autodesk’s strategy, product, marketing, sales and customer support teams. This critical data scientist role will help us make machine intelligence an integral part of how Autodesk makes decisions and designs and builds its products.

You will work alongside a product development team and apply data mining, analytics and machine learning methods to understanding how customers use, adopt and achieve successful outcomes with our products. The ideal candidate is a strong data scientist who thinks outside the box, is naturally curious, highly collaborative, and has a passion for tackling complex data-centric problems.

Responsibilities

Work on a variety of problems that seek to better understand how customers use their products and what drives deeper adoption and usage of products

Apply your quantitative analysis, data mining and machine learning expertise to building models that make sense of user needs, usage patterns, factors that drive deeper adoption and contribute to subscriber churn

Influence product development, strategy and roadmap prioritization

Design and implement machine learning pipelines that improve Autodesk’s evidence-based decision-making capabilities

Tackle complex problems requiring a creative mindset to find innovative and elegant solutions

Minimum Qualifications
BS/MS/PhD in the fields of: Mathematics, Physical Sciences, Statistics/Analytics, Computer Science, or other relevant fields
Experience working with relational SQL and/or NoSQL databases
Experience working with big data platforms (Hadoop, Spark, Hive)
Fluency with one or more programming language: Python, Java, Scala, etc.
Good understanding of CS fundamentals, e.g. algorithms and data structures
Experience in statistical programming tools such as R, Matlab, SAS, Python data science toolkits, etc.
Experience with data science toolkits like pandas, Jupyter, scikit, TensorFlow, etc.
Familiarity with Statistics concepts and analysis, e.g. hypothesis testing, regression, experimental design, etc.
Familiarity with Machine Learning techniques, e.g. classification, clustering, regularization, optimization, dimension reduction, etc.
Good communication skills and ability to explain complex topics to both technical and non-technical audience as well
At Autodesk, we're building a diverse workplace and an inclusive culture to give more people the chance to imagine, design, and make a better world. Autodesk is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected characteristic. We also consider for employment all qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable law.

Are you an existing contractor or consultant with Autodesk? Please search for open jobs and apply internally (not on this external site). If you have any questions or require support, contact Autodesk Careers.",3.9,Autodesk,"San Francisco, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,38,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,148.0,CA,3415,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,1,0,0
347,347,Data Engineer,$113k-$183k,"About the Position


Mist, a Juniper Company, is the first vendor to bring enterprise-grade Wi-Fi, BLE and IoT together through a highly scalable cloud architecture. Our mission is to deliver personalized location-based wireless services by making Wi-Fi predictable, reliable and measurable. At Mist, we built the first AI-empowered platform to provide an unprecedented visibility into the user experience. Mist is the new global standard for many fortune 500 companies.

The mission of the Data Science team at Mist is to deliver AI driven self-driving network solution. We build analytics infrastructure, insights, models and tools, to empower our AI platform. Data Engineers on the team will be the enabler and amplifiers. This position offers limitless opportunities for an ambitious data science engineer to make an immediate and meaningful impact within a hyper growth team.

We are looking for a talented and driven individual to partner closely with data scientists, build and scale our self-driving network solution. He/she is encouraged to think out of the box and play with the latest technologies while exploring their limits. Successful candidates will have strong technical capabilities, a can-do attitude, and are highly collaborative.

Minimum Qualifications:
Fluent with Python, Java, or Scala
5+ years of experience of developing and managing streaming or batch data pipelines. Hands on experience with either one or all, Storm, Spark, Kafka and Flink .
Familiarity with cloud based platforms - AWS or GCP
Working knowledge of message queuing, stream processing, and highly scalable ‘big data’ data stores.
Highly motivated to build a great product and great codebase in a fast-paced environment
Strong communication skills with a growth and learning mindset
Preferred Qualifications:

MS in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering or other Engineering majors with 10+ years of total experience.
Knowledge and experiences of using machine learning tools such as Numpy, ScikitLearn, MLlib, Tensorflow
Juniper Networks is enrolled in E-Verify® and will be participating in E-Verify in addition to our Form I-9 process. www.dhs.gov/E-Verify
Juniper Networks is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer.",3.8,Juniper Networks,"Cupertino, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,24,Company - Public,other_industries,Telecommunications,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,148.0,CA,2226,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,0
350,350,Data Engineer,$113k-$183k,"About Us

Born out of frustration with the traditional cash register business, ShopKeep was designed by a retailer with a noble aim: to rescue independent business owners from the nightmare of archaic point of sale systems, and replace them with something beautiful, simple, and affordable. It turned out that by doing this, we were giving our fellow merchants a fighting chance against the big guys

Today, our mission is simple: empower independent business owners to dream big and to fight smart. We're doing this through our cloud-based architecture, amazing customer care, and intuitive software that delivers the data small business owners need to run smarter businesses.

At ShopKeep, we've been successful because of our awesome team that believes small businesses make up the heart of our communities.

About This Role

We have terabytes of data and want you to put it to use. You'll work with us on the Data Engineering team to help others throughout the company get the most out of our data. A typical day might include taking a meeting with Customer Care about tracking agent productivity followed by running down a bug with Product's event analytics models in the afternoon. In this role you'll be wearing different hats but mostly building out our python ETL processes or writing excellent SQL, so you should be comfortable jumping in and out of projects.

What You'll Do
You are passionate about working with data to solve business problems and will build and maintain the infrastructure to answer questions with data.
We have a big data warehouse with data ranging from merchant transactions to Zuora billing to Product usage. You'll model new constructs and improve existing ones.
Help streamline our data science workflows, adding value to our product offering and building out our customer life cycle and retention models.
All of our teams are hungry for insights. You'll work with stakeholders across the company, fielding abstract requests. This may involve pointing someone to the answer, teaching them how to fish, or ticketing a large project for later.
What We'd Like to See
SQL (3 or more years of experience)
Python (3 or more years of experience)
Data visualization / exploration tools (1 or more years of experience)
Communications skills, especially of technical concepts to non-technical business leaders
Familiarity with the AWS ecosystem specifically RedShift and RDS
Attention to detail
Bonus Points For
Looker experience
Building or maintaining ETL processes
Ability to juggle multiple projects
Experience with Git
Benefits


We provide the essentials…
Medical, Dental, and Vision Insurance
Flexible Paid Time Off (PTO)
Commuter Benefits
401k Match
...and the fun-damentals:
Lively and enriching Engineering culture
Regularly scheduled hackathons, meetups and Tech Talks
Opportunity to attend Engineering Conferences, thanks to our generous company conference budget
Newsletters produced by Engineering teams
Cross-office collaboration between our NYC and Belfast teams with the opportunity to travel to our different offices
Regular team events, including Happy Hours and Game Nights
Catered lunches
Break area to play and relax
Standing desks
Meditation Sessions
And more to come as we work on ideas to help us keep the community feel connected while working remote
ShopKeep is an Equal Opportunity Employer

We are an Equal Opportunities Employer. We don't discriminate based on gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, nationality, or any other individual characteristics. We practice equality of opportunity in employment and select the best person for the job.",3.5,ShopKeep,"New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,12,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,148.0,NY,3611,0,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
352,352,Data Engineer,$67k-$125k,"The Data Engineer will work with product owners and data stewards to deliver high quality technical solutions in response to business requirements. You will be counted on to provide your peers with technical expertise that will offer solutions for difficult programming problems.

Duties and Responsibilities:

SQL Server Integration Services (SSIS) including UI and custom code features.
Write or create stored procedures, SQL scripts, SSIS packages that can be used to:
Move data from source databases to target databases
Clean / Condition data
Convert or transform data
Reconcile and confirm converted data
Find data errors
Validate data to business rules
Ability to examine existing ETL scripts and track data back to
source
SQL Server administration, tuning, and workbench.
Work with business experts to understand data and complete
data mappings.
Focus on the development of extract, transform, and load (ETL) jobs currently using Microsoft SQL, Server, and SSIS.
The environment currently supports hundreds of related ETL jobs that move data between 30 different source systems and between multiple classifications.
Part of the challenge as a data engineer will be to find scalable and efficient coding solutions that plug into this extensible system in order to add more data to the Enterprise data store.
Other duties as assigned

Minimum Qualifications: (To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.)

Bachelor’s Degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field
Equivalent years of experience in lieu of degree
4 years of relevant experience with the following software / tools:
Experience with Microsoft SQL
Prior experience supporting IC/DoD
The existing data warehouse is built on Microsoft SQL hosted on Amazon Web Services (AWS), so experience developing solutions that scale well in these environments is a plus.
Active Top-Secret Clearance with ability to obtain SCI

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:

Ability to work independently and yet be effective within a team setting
Must be capable of managing multiple efforts with time related constraints in a fast-paced contracting environment
Demonstrated ability to effectively communicate and collaborate with diverse internal and external stakeholder groups and individuals
Friendly presence, helpful attitude, good interpersonal skills, and ability to work well with others.
Excellent skills in Microsoft Word, Excel, and other Office applications
Proficient with Microsoft Office Applications, and experience working in a home office setting as well as the ability to train end users on frequently asked technical issues.
Ability to provide technical assistance and support over the phone; good phone skills, professional demeanor, previous customer service experience strongly desired.

Good problem-solving skills; ability to visualize a problem/situation and think abstractly to solve it

Physical Demands: (The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.)

While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee is frequently required to walk; use hands to finger, handle, or feel and reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to stand; climb or balance and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision.

Work Environment: (The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.)

The employee will normally work in a temperature-controlled office environment, with frequent exposure to electronic office equipment.
During visits to areas of operations, may be exposed to extreme cold or hot weather conditions. Is occasionally exposed to fumes or airborne particles, toxic or caustic chemicals, and loud noise.

Chenega Corporation and family of companies is an EOE.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Native preference under PL 93-638.

We participate in the E-Verify Employment Verification Program.

Recruiter Jonas Patterson

Job Posting May 4, 2020, 1:51:27 PM",2.9,Chenega Corporation,"Springfield, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,46,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.0,VA,4474,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
353,353,Senior Data Scientist - R&D Oncology,$67k-$125k,"At AstraZeneca,we work together to deliver innovative medicines to patients across global boundaries. We make an impact and findsolutionsto challenges. We do this with integrity, even in the most difficult situations,because we are committed to doing the right thing.

Job Description

The Machine Learning and AI team in AstraZenecas Oncology Data Science & Analytics group is where we develop and apply sophisticated algorithms and techniques to solve the hardest problems in oncology drug discovery and development. The team uses their scientific, quantitative, and problem-solving skills to work on a broad range of challenges across the whole oncology portfolio, working collaboratively with other scientists across a range of disciplines to scope, define, and deliver projects that both advance the state of the art in data science and accelerate the delivery of innovative medicines to patients.

As a Senior Data Scientist you will play a key role on the front line in this rapidly growing team working to extract insight from complex biomedical data. You will develop your leadership skills and apply and develop your expertise in rigorous quantitative data science to provide solutions to a variety of data science problems, researching, recommending and delivering novel methodologies to solve the problems that matter to the oncology pipeline.

Examples of projects the team works on include machine learning models for developing digital biomarkers, patient risk stratification for clinical trials, new algorithms for survival analysis, approaches to quantitatively analyse wearable data, linking of medical imaging data with omics and longitudinal outcomes to identify and/or validate new drug targets, and much more!

Typical Accountabilities
Provides advanced data science expertise to AstraZeneca projects and recommends data science solutions.
Delivers advanced data science solutions to AstraZeneca projects, appropriately communicating with non-technical stakeholders.
Works within established frameworks to deliver a variety of tasks that support projects in meeting their objectives.
Independently keeps own knowledge up to date and learns from senior team members, proposing appropriate training courses for personal development.
Reviews working practices and ensures non-compliant processes are escalated
Ensures own work is compliant within Clinical Development.
Collaborate in a multidisciplinary environment with world leading clinicians, data scientists, biological experts, statisticians and IT professionals.
Education, Qualifications, Skills and Experience

Essential
MSc degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering)
Practical software development skills in standard data science tools (such as R or python)
Knowledge of range of mathematical and statistical modelling techniques, and drive to continue to learn and develop these skills.
Minimum 2+ years of experience or post doctoral.
Desirable
PhD degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering)
Experience within the pharmaceutical industry
Communication, business analysis, and consultancy.",4.0,AstraZeneca,"New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,107,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.0,NY,3169,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
357,357,DATA ENGINEER,$67k-$125k,"DATA ENGINEER

Job Details
Job Location
Keet Health - Austin, TX
Description
Are you looking for a fast-paced company where our people are our competitive advantage? A company that fosters your entrepreneurial spirit by encouraging you to act like an owner? Do you have the passion and drive to push beyond the adequate to exceptional? Are you passionate about fixing the healthcare system? If so, you may be perfect for our open position.

Keet is a team of passionate, fun-having, taco-loving people on a mission to make healthcare experiences feel better.

At Keet, we help put humanity back into healthcare. It feels good to know that what we do ultimately contributes to a patient’s well-being. We know our clients, and our client’s patient’s want to get back to doing more of what they love, so that is the core of our culture—merging talented people doing what they love, to create products that help others do the same.

DATA ENGINEER

ROLE SUMMARY

The position of Data Engineer will help to create new reporting solutions for Keet Health’s platform, and improve current solutions. The Data Engineer position will be working with a variety of databases (MySQL, Postgres, MongoDB, etc) to be deployed in a cloud infrastructure (AWS) and made available in AWS Quicksight.
Qualifications
ESSENTIAL RESPONSIBILITIES
Develop and maintain reporting processes and ETL solutions for moving data
Develop reporting solutions for internal and external customers
Develop and maintain ETL solutions for moving data into reporting schemas
EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE
Bachelors degree or computer science, engineering, data analytics or equivalent experience in related fields.
Experience with SQL (MySQL, Postgres, etc) and NoSQL (Mongo, etc) databases.
Experience with scripting languages (python, scala, ruby)
Comfortable working using the command line (Bash, etc)
Experience with cloud server architectures (AWS, Azure)
Experience with Linux.
KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES
Must have 5+ years using SQL, and NoSQL database
Must have 3+ years experience working as a data engineer
Must have skills in linux, Bash, cloud infrastructure, docker, mobile development, analytics,
Must have experience using git, and worked in an agile development environment
Must have familiarity with AWS data technologies such as Glue, Redshift, S3, and other big da-ta technologies
Nice to have medical industry experience.
Nice to have Java experience.
Nice to have experience with AWS Glue, Athena, and QuickSight.
OUR CORE VALUES
• Collaboration: We're continuously learning how to work together, better.
• Heart: We've got it, and we're not afraid to show it.
• Innovation: We are lifelong learners.
• Service: We’re here to serve.
• Humility: We're humans, and we come from dirt.

PERKS

(We’ve got them).

Keet offers a competitive benefits package with fully-paid medical benefits, unlimited PTO, company hosted lunches, happy hours, and special events.

We have a flexible work from home policy dependent upon productivity and ability to communicate effectively. Oh, and we have snacks. Our office is located in the hip south river district of Austin, TX in the heart of Austin weirdness.

Keet is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, national or ethnic origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, protected veteran status or other characteristics protected by law.",3.0,Clinicient,"Austin, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,16,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.0,TX,3453,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
359,359,Staff Data Scientist,$67k-$125k,"Overview
TheRouting and Matchingteam at Intuit AI works diligently to improve our customers experience using machine learning models. As part of the customer success group, we utilize reams of tabular, text and voice data to better provide help to our customers when they need it most. Come join our collaborative and creative group of data scientists and machine learning engineers, and build models that directly affect hundreds of thousands of our customers.In this role you will be building and deploying machine learning models using both analytical algorithms and deep learning approaches. We are waiting for you to join us and do the best work of your life.
What you'll bring
4+ years of industry experience with data science
BS, MS or PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Economics, Operations Research, or equivalent work experience
4+ years of hands-on expertise with data mining and statistical modeling techniques such as clustering, classification, regression, tree-based methods, neural nets, support vector machines, anomaly detection, and natural language processing
Expertise in modern advanced analytical tools and programming languages such as Python, Scala, Java and/or R.
Efficient in SQL, Hive, SparkSQL, etc.
Comfortable working in a Linux environment
Experience with building end-to-end reusable pipelines from data acquisition to model output delivery
Quick learner, adaptable, with the ability to work independently in a fast-paced environment
Strong oral and written communication skills. Ability to conduct meetings and make professional presentations, and to explain complex concepts and technical material to non-technical users

How you will lead
Excellent leadership and communication skills to influence teams and to evangelize data science across the organization
Perform hands-on data analysis and modeling with huge data sets
Apply data mining, NLP, and machine learning (both supervised and unsupervised) to improve relevance and personalization algorithms
Work side-by-side with product managers, software engineers, and designers in designing experiments and minimum viable products
Discover data sources, get access to them, import them, clean them up, and make them model-ready. You need to be willing and able to do your own ETL
Create and refine features from the underlying data. Youll enjoy developing just enough subject matter expertise to have an intuition about what features might make your model perform better, and then youll lather, rinse and repeat
Run regular A/B tests, gather data, perform statistical analysis, draw conclusions on the impact of your optimizations and communicate results to peers and leaders
Explore new design or technology shifts in order to determine how they might connect with the customer benefits we wish to deliver
Communicate key analytic findings within the business and to senior stakeholders
Research, explore, and enable new quantitative techniques and technologies in data science",4.4,Intuit - Data,"Mountain View, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,37,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.0,CA,2982,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,1,0,0
360,360,Senior Data Engineer,$67k-$125k,"About Demandbase:

Our success depends on our ability to create a diverse, equitable and inclusive environment. We're committed to attracting, developing, retaining and promoting a diverse workforce. By ensuring that every Demandbase employee is able to bring a diversity of talents to work, we're increasingly capable of living out our mission and providing real insight from our products to support our customers. We encourage people from underrepresented backgrounds and all walks of life to apply. Come grow with us at Demandbase!

The world's largest and fastest-growing companies such as Accenture, Adobe, DocuSign and Salesforce rely on Demandbase to drive their Account-Based Marketing strategy and maximize their B2B marketing performance. We pioneered the ABM category nearly a decade ago, and today we lead the category as an indispensable part of the B2B MarTech stack. Our achievements and innovation would not be possible without the driven and collaborative teams here at Demandbase. As a company, we're as committed to growing careers as we are to building word-class technology. We invest heavily in people, our culture and the community around us, and have continuously been recognized as one of the best places to work in the Bay Area.

About the Data Engineering Team:

We are a group of talented individuals with deep expertise in the domain area of business applications and building large complex systems with simple user interfaces. We also have deep expertise in big data technology such as IR, NLP, and large graphs and utilize the best technology to provide innovative and novel products to frustrated end-users in the enterprise.

As a Senior Data Engineer, you will be building out all aspects relating to the Demandbase Data ecosystem and moving products from R&D into production scale. A successful Senior Data Engineer will possess a natural curiosity about data and clear technical ability.

You will be both hands-on and strategic—with both a broad ecosystem-level understanding of our market space and the ability to work closely with engineering, data science and product teams to deliver software in an iterative, continual-release environment. This position involves close collaboration across several functional groups as well as interaction with executive stakeholders.
Please note that due to the COVID-19 pandemic, the Demandbase offices will be closed for the foreseeable future and all positions are remote until further notice.

What you'll be doing:
Define: Work with internal stakeholders to design and develop components in the next generation of Demandbase's Data Products
Code: Build out new services and integrations to connect machine learning intelligence with the Demandbase SaaS platform
Monitor & Deploy: Ensure high reliability of all maintained product offerings by building reporting and monitoring mechanisms into our infrastructure.
What we're looking for:
BS or MS in Computer Science plus at least 5 years of relevant work experience
Proven experience with Spark building data products at scale and speed
Strong software design and development experience in Python, Scala or Java
Strong understanding of application architecture fundamentals
Strong experience with cloud computing (we use AWS and GCP)
Ability to help define standards and best practices for the team
Benefits:

Our benefits include 100% paid for Medical, Dental and Vision for you and your entire family, short-term/long-term disability, life insurance, flexible vacation policy and 401K. Due to the COVID pandemic the Demandbase offices are closed for the foreseeable future. When the office reopens, we also offer commuter benefits, free snacks, catered lunch every Friday, chair massages, weekly yoga and much more!

More About Demandbase:

Demandbase is the leader in Account-Based Marketing (ABM) and an indispensable part of the B2B tech stack. The company offers the only end-to-end ABM platform that helps B2B marketers identify, win and grow the accounts that matter most. The biggest and fastest growing companies in the world, such as Accenture, Adobe, DocuSign, GE, Salesforce and others rely on Demandbase to drive their ABM strategy and maximize their marketing performance. The company has been named to the JMP Securities list ""The Hot 100: The Best Privately Held Software Companies,"" the Deloitte Fast 500 and named a Gartner Cool Vendor for Tech Go-To Market. In 2019, Demandbase executives authored the definitive book on ABM, Account-Based Marketing: How to Target and Engage the Companies That Will Grow Your Revenue. For more information, please visit www.demandbase.com or follow the company on Twitter @Demandbase.",4.6,Demandbase,Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,14,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.0,Remote,4669,1,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
363,363,Senior Data Scientist,$67k-$125k,"Job Description

ENERGY FOR WHATS AHEAD

Are you looking to make a difference in your career? Were working on smarter grids, cleaner energy and tools to help people manage energy more efficiently.

About Transmission and Distribution

Southern California Edisons (SCE's) Transmission and Distribution Organizational Unit (T & D) is responsible for planning, engineering, constructing, operating, and maintaining transmission and distribution facilities throughout the 50,000-square-mile territory. T&D is the steward of roughly $19 billion in assets that safely and reliably deliver electricity to 14 million residents via SCEs 5 million customer accounts.

Position Overview

The Senior Data Scientist Advisor is responsible for leading the modeling of complex analytical problems, discovering insights, and identifying opportunities using statistical, algorithmic, mining, and visualization techniques. In addition to advanced analytical skills, the senior advisor will be responsible for developing business requirements and coordinating with groups in and outside of the Transmission and Distribution group. You will be responsible for developing, presenting, and communicating results. You will also be responsible for leading and mentoring other Data Scientists.

Typical Responsibilities:
Lead data scientists on developing models that meet or exceed business requirements.
Generate advanced analytical approaches using predictive modeling, optimization and simulation abilities.
Apply statistical and pattern recognition techniques to perform description, prediction, and optimization.
Develop and implement tools for data acquisition, extraction, transformation, management, and manipulation of large and complex data sets. Explore, model, mine, and experiment with data to answer critical business issues. And, generate and communicate business insights.
Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications
Bachelors in a quantitative discipline such as Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Computer Science, or information sciences such as business analytics or informatics.
Five or more years of experience in Predictive Modeling or Machine Learning or Statistical Modeling or Data Mining.
Proficient with R and Python.
Desired Qualifications
MS or PhD in a quantitative discipline such as Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Computer Science, or information sciences such as business analytics or informatics.
Experience in leading and mentoring junior team members and guiding them on data science and advanced analytics (machine learning, predictive analytics) development.
In-depth industry/business knowledge in Electric Utility industry.
Proficiency with SQL and/or SAS.
Strong Leadership skills and experience.
Comments
Candidates for this position must be legally authorized to work directly as employees for any employer in the United States without visa sponsorship.
Relocation may apply to this position.
Southern California Edison, an Edison International (NYSE:EIX) company, serves a population of approximately 15 million via 5 million customer accounts in a 50,000-square-mile service area within Central, Coastal and Southern California. Join the utility leader that is safely delivering reliable, affordable electricity to our customers for over 125 years.

SCE is a proud Equal Opportunity Employer and will not discriminate based on race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, protected veteran status or any other protected status.

#L1-EA1",3.9,Southern California Edison,"Pomona, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,141,Subsidiary or Business Segment,other_industries,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.0,CA,3517,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
364,364,Data Engineer,$67k-$125k,"Otus is creating a culture of success while maximizing learning in the K-12 space. We do this by implementing amazing ideas from awesome people and we need more awesomeness on our team. Are you passionate, collaborative, love to geek out on technology, and want to work for a mission-driven company that is shaping the way teachers, students and parents of students learn together? If so, we want to hear from you.
Our diverse team consists of talented designers, developers, coaches, and leaders who share a variety of interests. You'll find musicians, world travelers, beer enthusiasts, nerds, sports fans, and all-around great people who shape our positive culture.
Your Role
Otus is a building a next generation Platform for EdTech in order to support our transformative vision for K-12 education across the US
Model and architect our data in a way that will scale with the increasingly complex ways we’re analyzing it
Build robust pipelines that make sure data is where it needs to be, when it needs to be there
Build frameworks and tools to help others design and build their own data pipelines in a self-service manner
Performance testing and engineering to ensure that our systems always scale to meet our needs
Key member of the team focused on pure hands-on contribution to the implementation and operation of our data platform
Qualifications
Breadth - Substantial experience as a high-performance Engineer across multiple environments on high-performance data systems that process data across various sources at a near real-time pace
At least 1 project where you personally designed, implemented, and operated large scale, high throughput data pipelines with a focus on high data quality
At least 1 other project where you built a secure, reliable, scalable system on AWS that saw significant traffic
Depth - You can go up and down the stack from deep in the infrastructure up to the data, application, and client layers
Speed - Experience with small teams that move fast -- all members are expected to be able to achieve maximum results with minimal direction
Ownership and accountability - You own the things that you build
Drive - When you see a need, you fill a need. You can step in where you see a need and push us all forward
Modern Infra - Hands-on experience with Kubernetes, Airflow, and Kafka
Modern CI/CD - Hands-on experience with Codefresh, Spinnaker, Jenkins or similar
Benefits and Perks
Competitive salary and professional development spending
20 PTO days a year, plus a day off for your birthday (or a loved one's), an interest day (to do something you love) and paid holidays
Up to 12 weeks of parental leave, and great work/life balance
Flexible hours and remote work so you can be at your most productive
Excellent medical, dental, and vision insurance
Life Insurance and disability benefits
401K with an employer match (up to 4%)
Otus is an Equal Opportunity Employer and embraces diversity of every kind. You must be legally authorized to work in the US. Unfortunately, the company is unable to support sponsorships at this time.",5.0,Otus,Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,6,Company - Private,other_industries,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.0,Remote,3063,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
365,365,"Data Scientist, Product Analytics",$67k-$125k,"At Noom, we use scientifically proven methods to help our users create healthier lifestyles, and manage important conditions like Type-II Diabetes, Obesity, and Hypertension. Our Engineering team is at the forefront of this challenge, solving complex technical and UX problems on our mobile apps that center around habits, behavior, and lifestyle.

We are looking for a Data Scientist to join our Data team and help us ensure that we apply the best approaches to data analysis and research, artificial intelligence, and machine learning.

What You'll Like About Us:
We work on problems that affect the lives of real people. Our users depend on us to make positive changes to their health and their lives.
We base our work on scientifically-proven, peer-reviewed methodologies that are designed by medical professionals.
We are a data-driven company through and through.
We're a respectful, diverse, and dynamic environment in which Engineering is a first-class citizen, and where you'll be able to work on a variety of interesting problems that affect the lives of real people.
We offer a generous budget for personal development expenses like training courses, conferences, and books.
You'll get three weeks' paid vacation and a flexible work policy that is remote- and family-friendly (about 50% of our engineering team is fully remote). We worry about results, not time spent in seats.
What We'll Like About You:
You have 4+ years of experience as a Data Scientist or Data Analyst in a similarly-sized organization, with a proven record of analysis and research that positively impacts your team.
You possess excellent communication skills and the ability to clearly communicate technical concepts to a non-technical audience
You possess excellent SQL/relational algebra skills, ideally with at least a basic knowledge of how different types of databases (e.g.: column vs row storage) work.
You have a superior knowledge of statistical analysis methods, such as input selection, logistic and standard regression, etc.
You are comfortable writing Python code, and have good working knowledge of pandas and numpy. We don't expect you to write production-quality code, but you should have some programming experience.
You are comfortable with at least ""medium data"" technologies and how to transcend the ""memory bound"" nature of most analytics tools.",4.5,Noom US,"New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,12,Company - Private,other_industries,Consumer Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.0,NY,2350,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
366,366,Senior Machine Learning Data Scientist - Telecommute,$67k-$125k,"Great outcomes are the result of strong purpose, conviction and pride - pride in your ability and your product. UnitedHealth Group offers a portfolio of products that are greatly improving the life of others. Bring along your passion and do your life's best work.(sm)

Optum is the industry leader delivering health services dedicated to one goal: making the health system work better for everyone. For those who need care, provide care and pay for care, we deliver integrated, intelligent solutions designed to modernize the health system and improve the health of individuals and populations. We are investing significantly in new capabilities to design, develop and deliver better solutions for these constituents.

The Data Science Transformation team seeks a Senior Data Scientist to join our team. You should be an exceptional disciplined and self-motivated data scientist with substantial machine learning experience and a passion for working with healthcare data (relevant experience with data from other industries is of interest as well, e.g. financial, retail, telco, etc.), experience using various computational approaches, and a portfolio of projects you can show and talk about.

You should be a creative thinker in how to solve problems, utilizing machine learning methods, deep understanding and curiosity about data, and business understanding to devise appropriate analytic solutions. Youll work within Optums unparalleled data assets and big data infrastructure to develop innovative machine learning capabilities.

Youll enjoy the flexibility to telecommute* from anywhere within the U.S. as you take on some tough challenges.

Primary Responsibilities:
Work alongside other data scientists, engineers, and project managers to design and implement models and experiments from end to end, including data ingestion and preparation, feature engineering, analysis and modeling, model deployment, performance tracking and documentation
Improve and extend the analytic methods in our products
Conduct hands-on data analysis and predictive analytics on large datasets
Effectively communicate complex technical results to business partners
Support and drive analytic efforts around machine learning and innovation
Work with a great deal of autonomy to find solutions to complex problems
Coach and mentor junior data scientists
Youll be rewarded and recognized for your performance in an environment that will challenge you and give you clear direction on what it takes to succeed in your role as well as provide development for other roles you may be interested in.

Required Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree or higher in Applied Mathematics, Physics, Computer Science, Statistics or related technical field
4+ years of hands-on experience in in developing with machine learning, deep learning and/or NLP with Machine Learning (4+ years can be a combination of business/corporate experience and academic, but your academic projects need to be clearly defined)
Strong proficiency in advanced data science tools such as Python, Spark, SQL
Experience with wrangling large datasets with big data tools such as Hadoop, Hive and Spark
Experience applying computational algorithms and statistical methods to structured and unstructured data
Experience combining analytic methods with advanced data visualizations using, for example, Tableau, Shiny or D3
Experience breaking down and clearly defining problems
Experience communicating highly technical results to a diverse audience
Experience deploying machine learning models into production
Comfort working as part of a team, as opposed to solo projects
Telecommute is available for the right candidate
Careers with Optum. Here's the idea. We built an entire organization around one giant objective; make health care work better for everyone. So when it comes to how we use the world's large accumulation of health-related information, or guide health and lifestyle choices or manage pharmacy benefits for millions, our first goal is to leap beyond the status quo and uncover new ways to serve. Optum, part of the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, brings together some of the greatest minds and most advanced ideas on where health care has to go in order to reach its fullest potential. For you, that means working on high performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter. Optum, incredible ideas in one incredible company and a singular opportunity to do your life's best work.(sm)

*All Telecommuters will be required to adhere to UnitedHealth Groups Telecommuter Policy

Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: UnitedHealth Group is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.

UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.

Job Keywords: Data Scientist, Healthcare, UnitedHealth Group, Boston, MA, Massachusetts, Eden Prairie, MN, Minnesota, Telecommute, Remote, Work from home",3.4,Unitedhealth Group,"Eden Prairie, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,43,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.0,MN,5267,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
370,370,Data Engineer,$67k-$125k,"Summary

As a Data Engineer (Level II), you are familiar with the data warehousing technical components, infrastructure, and their integration. You'll analyze large amounts of data, discover and solve real world problems. You love the idea of being able to provide insight as well as presenting those insights. You are responsible for high level design/architecture. You are comfortable fostering relationships with internal business partners and other members of the development team.

Key Responsibilities
Design, develop, and maintain modular code base to solve real world problems.
Conduct regular peer code reviews to ensure code quality and compliance following best practices in the industry.
Work in cross-disciplinary teams to understand client needs and ingest rich data sources.
Research, experiment, and utilize leading Big Data technologies in AWS
Help drive the process for pursuing innovations, target solutions, and extendable platforms for ampliFI's products.
Participate in developing and presenting thought leadership and assist in ensuring that ampliFI's data source technology stack incorporates and is optimized for using specific technologies.
Required Skills and Experience
Qualified individuals possess the ampliFI attributes of being smart, curious, committed to vision, passionate, fun/pleasant, an achiever and having a sense of urgency
Minimum of three years of big data experience with multiple programming languages and technologies, three years as a lead / team manager.
Bachelor's degree or master's degree from an accredited college/university in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or related field (i.e. math and physics);
Ability to manage established relationships internally as well as with clients.
Ability to communicate complex technical concepts succinctly to non-technical colleagues, understand & manage interdependencies between all facets of a project.
Ability to interface with clients; Must have demonstrated advanced proficiency in complex, mature and sophisticated Design & Analysis technologies and solutions.
Skilled ability to rapidly ingest, transform, engineer, and visualize data, both for ad hoc and product-level (e.g., automated) data & analytics solutions.
Experience with large-scale, AWS big data methods such as EC2, S3, EMR, Kinesis, DynamoDB, and Redshift.
Ability to work efficiently under Unix/Linux environment, having experience with source code management systems like GIT.
Strong knowledge with programming methodologies (version control, testing, QA) and agile development methodologies.
3-5 years' experience
Physical Requirements
Frequently required to sit and stand
Occasionally required to stoop, kneel and crouch
Required to use hands to handle or feel objects, tools or controls
Other Duties

Duties, responsibilities and activities are not all encompassing and may change at any time with or without notice. To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential job duty satisfactorily. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable qualified individuals with disabilities to perform essential job functions

PI122947362",-1.0,ampliFI Loyalty Solutions,"Naperville, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.0,IL,3139,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
373,373,Data Engineer,$67k-$125k,"Join a team of financial software specialists responsible for the acquisition and management of financial market and related data required for research implementation of systematic trading strategies.
Primary Responsibilities:
Implement robust solutions for adoption, storage and management of large volumes of data
Develop quality assurance systems in support of high integrity data sets
Assist quantitative analysts in crafting custom, bespoke data sets
Support timely and fault tolerant data systems in support of production trading algorithms
Meet tight deadlines in an efficient manner
Requirements of the Candidate include:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or applicable degree and very strong exposure to programming and computer systems
Experience with Python and C++
Experience with data storage and manipulation using approaches such as HDF5, Pandas, and RDBMS/SQL
2+ years professional experience in data management role
The desire to work in a fast-paced, hardworking and committed environment with a talented team
Strong problem solving skills, critical thinking and clear written and verbal communications
Financial industry, market data and cloud data environment experience are beneficial",4.6,STEVENS CAPITAL MANAGEMENT LP,"Philadelphia, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,18,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.0,PA,1209,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
375,375,Senior or Staff Data Scientist,$67k-$125k,"GRAIL is a healthcare company whose mission is to detect cancer early, when it can be cured. GRAIL is focused on alleviating the global burden of cancer by developing pioneering technology to detect and identify multiple deadly cancer types early. The company is using the power of next-generation sequencing, population-scale clinical studies, and state-of-the-art computer science and data science to enhance the scientific understanding of cancer biology, and to develop its multi-cancer early detection blood test. GRAIL is headquartered in Menlo Park, CA with locations in Washington, D.C., North Carolina, and the United Kingdom. It is supported by leading global investors and pharmaceutical, technology, and healthcare companies. For more information, please visit www.grail.com.

In this role, you will lead analyzing some of the largest, richest biological datasets in the world to find biological signals and patterns and guide our assays, bioinformatic pipelines, and product strategies. Working closely with scientists, clinicians, and engineers, you will develop machine learning and statistical methods to pull signals out of ultra-deep sequencing data and identify cancer at its earliest stages. You will develop and experiment with machine learning models operating across GRAIL’s data sets, public data, and data from collaborators in academia and industry. Your analysis will result in exciting discoveries in cancer biology, impactful publications, and products for early detection of cancer.
You Will:
Develop GRAIL’s deep bench of knowledge in bioinformatics, machine learning, statistics, and data science.
Modeling and analysis of large, complex genomics datasets using advanced machine learning and statistical methods to generate predictions and biological insights.
Create and perform end-to-end analysis that include design, data gathering, processing, analysis, iteration with stakeholders, and presentation of results.
Interact cross-functionally with other teams including software, clinical, operations, research, and product development.
Promulgate approaches and build tools that preserve scientific rigor and quality and which maintain GRAIL’s statistical culture.
Maintain an active external scientific presence.

Your Background Will Include:

M.Sc. or Ph.D in Computer Science, Bioinformatics, Statistics, Computational Biology, Genomics, Physics, or equivalent preparation and experience.
3 to 7 years (depending on level) relevant experience in positions of increasing responsibility.
Deep understanding of machine learning and statistics.
Ability to apply machine learning and statistical tools for analysis of genomics datasets and to uncover new biological insights from large genomics datasets.
Proven track record of strong contributions demonstrated by highly cited publications, impactful tools, products, data sets used by the scientific community, presentations at international conferences, or awards.
Strong knowledge in at least one major programming language (e.g. Python, Go, C++, R, Java) and proficiency in Linux environment, version control tools, and reproducible research practices.
Technical leadership and self-direction, willingness to both teach others and learn new techniques.
Effective written and verbal communication skills.
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",3.7,GRAIL,"Menlo Park, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,4,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.0,CA,3531,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
378,378,"Data Scientist, Machine Learning",$67k-$125k,"Job Description

At Shipt, we are transforming the grocery shopping experience and giving time back to consumers. Shipt shoppers handpick fresh groceries and household essentials, then deliver them to your door in as little as one hour.

Shipt is growing and we are searching for a Data Scientist, Machine Learning to join our team! At Shipt, we're using machine learning (ML) and analytics to drive our business forward. We're looking for help understanding our data, optimizing our processes, and making predictions to improve our product and customer experience.

The data science team builds data driven solutions using machine learning and modeling techniques. Our solutions include predictive models, clustering, segmentation, complex reporting, and quantitative research. Our ideal candidate will be data-driven, intellectually curious, and a clear communicator with experience building machine learning models.

What You'll Gain
You will get experience working with a cross-disciplinary team shipping real-world products to our customers around the nation. You will also receive hands-on mentorship from your friendly teammates on topics ranging from design to career advice

Your Responsibilities
Develop a thorough understanding of our data and interpret them as they relate to shopper behavior, search performance, profitability, and product development
Build predictive models and optimization routines to capture opportunities and solve problems. Applications include modeling demand in a given market, delivering search recommendations, and optimizing internal processes
Collaborate with other members of the Data Science and engineering teams on ways to approach problems, augment code, and share new techniques
Work with functional team leaders (in Product, Operations, Marketing, etc.) to explain your analysis, findings, and recommendations
Find opportunities for improvement across the business and assist in decision-making across teams
Stay abreast of developments in the field and contribute to its advancement
Requirements
At least 2 years of experience with machine learning, predictive modeling, and/or optimization techniques
High degree of proficiency with one of R or Python
Proficiency with SQL
Experience with a data visualization tool (Tableau, Chartio, Looker, Spotfire, Power BI, etc.)
Experience with cloud computing services or platforms
Comfortable giving verbal presentations and communicating with technologies like Zoom and Slack
Bachelor's degree in a quantitative field or related experience
Nice to Haves
Experience deploying predictive models in a cloud environment
Experience with batch processing framework
Familiarity with AWS, version control, and peer code review systems
Familiarity with on-demand and/or multi-sided marketplaces
Proficiency in both R and Python
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",3.5,Shipt,"Birmingham, AL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,6,Subsidiary or Business Segment,other_industries,Consumer Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.0,AL,3050,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
379,379,Data Engineer / Senior Data Engineer,$67k-$125k,"Data Engineer/Senior Data Engineer

At Liberty Mutual, technology isn't just a part of our business, it's what drives us forward. We deliver our customers peace of mind every day by helping them protect what they value most. Our passion for placing the customer at the center of everything we do is driving a transformational shift at Liberty Mutual. Operating as an Agile team within a Fortune 100 company, we are on the front edge of an IT transformation for how people work and deliver solutions.

Hosting Cybersecurity Systems and Services(CSS) is actively searching for a Data Engineer/Senior Data Engineer to join their team. This position will support activities across the CSS organization and will act as a highly productive member of our agile teams to serve as a technical expert in analysis, design, coding and testing innovative data solutions.

This is a range posting. Candidates will be considered at the Data Engineer/Senior Data Engineer level based on experience.

Responsibilities:
Designs and develops programs and tools to support ingestion, curation and provisioning of complex enterprise data to achieve analytics, reporting, and enhanced cybersecurity visibility and action.
Identifies process improvements that address complex technology gaps within a single process. Builds strong knowledge of technology enablers.
Analyzes and prepares complex technology-enabled recommendations to address process gaps.
Provides successful deployment and provisioning of data solutions to required environments.
Designs and builds data extracts, integrations and transformations. Designs and builds data architecture and applications that enable reporting, analytics, data science, and data management to improve security visibility, efficiency, compliance and overall security posture.
Develops effective, defect free code to automate security processes; creates dashboards and auto-ticketing using code and APIs.
Applies machine learning to work as applicable.
Interacts with cross-functional customers and development team to gather and define requirements.
Reviews defects or discrepancies in requirements and resolves with stakeholders.
Mentor team members as needed
Identify and recommend appropriate continuous improvement opportunities
Qualifications:
Bachelor or Master's degree in technical or business discipline or equivalent experience. Generally, 3-5+ years of professional experience.
Proficient in data visualization design and development, ensuring accuracy & ease of consumption
Proficient in data engineering languages and tools, and strong proficiency in general programming languages and frameworks; ability to develop on multiple platforms
Knowledge of a variety of data platforms such as MS SQL, AWS RDS, AWS Redshift, Splunk.
Knowledge and ability to write, test, and debug application programming interfaces (APIs)
Experience with software and data engineering technologies such as Python, JSON, PowerShell, Power BI, Azure DevOps, AWS EC2, AWS Lambda and other AWS and LM Cloud Technologies.
Strong negotiation, facilitation and consensus building skills. Strong oral and written communication skills; presentation skills
Extensive knowledge of the following: IT concepts, strategies, methodologies & cybersecurity concepts, architectures and frameworks
Versed in diverse technologies and new technical architecture principles and concepts.
Experience working with agile methodologies and cross-functional teams
Must be proactive, demonstrate initiative and be a logical thinker.
Strong consultative skills, including the ability to understand and apply customer requirements, including drawing out unforeseen implications and making design recommendations.
Benefits & Culture:

At Liberty, we embrace all of the values of our Fortune 100 company and push our practices and technology skill sets to the next level. In this organization, we are an agile set of teams dedicated to helping impact the lives of thousands of customers every day. We embrace a modern co-working style with exceptional work/life balance, ergonomic work areas, substantial benefits, and best-in-class amenities.

Liberty Mutual is one of America's Best Employers for Diversity and one of the Best Employers for Women http://bit.ly/LibertyMutual-BestPlacesToWorkforWomen one of the Best Employers for New Grads http://bit.ly/LibertyMutual-BestPlacesforNewGrads and one of the Best Places to Work http://bit.ly/LibertyMutual-BestPlacestoWork . We offer excellent benefits for our employees including generous parental leave, retirement plans including 401k and pension, education reimbursement, commuter benefits, college savings plans, and much more.

To learn more about our benefit offerings and culture please visit:
https://LMI.co/Benefits
http://bit.ly/LibertyMutual-Culture

EOE Statement:

Liberty Mutual is an equal opportunity employer. We embrace an environment that is free from all discrimination in the workplace, in its business, or by its vendors. Liberty Mutual values diversity and the differences and similarities of our employees. We foster a diverse and inclusive work environment that leads to better ideas, stronger teams and more innovative products and services for our customers.
Learn More",3.5,Liberty Mutual Insurance,"Portsmouth, NH",-1,10000+ Employees,108,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.0,NH,5227,1,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
380,380,"Data Scientist, Mars Petcare - Portland, OR",$67k-$125k,"Back to search results
Previous job

Next job

JOB DESCRIPTION

The Petcare Segment consists of five Divisions: Pet Nutrition, Royal Canin, Mars Veterinary Health N. America, Mars Veterinary Health International & Diagnostics, Kinship. Under this new organization of Petcare Product and Service brands, we launched our Strategy in 2018 with an objective to “Create a Better World for Pets by extending global leadership in Nutrition, Health and Services powered by Data”.

With the breadth and scale of our Petcare businesses we have unique and unrivalled data assets. The potential to create benefits for Pets and sustainable competitive advantage is huge and we need to seize this opportunity now. Our data assets consist of Veterinary data including appointment and invoice details as well as the medical histories and diagnostic details this provides. We have breed and disease marker data from our DNA diagnostics business (Wisdom Health), Location and Activity Tracking data from our Whistle business. From our nutrition businesses we have sales data, some consumer data as well as valuable information about retailers, Veterinarians, Breeders and Shelters. We also have third party data providing us with product purchasing insights and the potential to develop deeper and broader views into Petcare shopping through collaboration and D2C engagement. We began our work to leverage these more strategically to power our ecosystem in 2018 and there is a core team at the Petcare level incubating and guiding these efforts.

Role Purpose:

To deliver on this ambition of a Powered by Data strategy we need talent with expertise and experience of data science and advanced analytics to deliver the multiple initiatives and join the change in data and pet- and pet-centric thinking across the entire Mars Petcare business
The purpose of this role is to join the data science function in the US and to deliver the Powered By Data project across Mars Petcare divisions using the ecosystem of data available.

We are searching for an experienced Analytics professional to join the US analytics and data science function; to help deliver the ecosystem analytics roadmap across all divisions in the US; working closely with the division stakeholders in managing and delivering projects; working with global teams to identify and implement efficient delivery of the vision; and, to articulate the strategic opportunities of a pet-centric analytics driven strategy.

The primary responsibilities are:
Apply data science approaches to understand and predict pet and pet owner behaviors
Use machine learning techniques, visualizations, & statistical analysis to gain insight into various data sets – some readily available, and some you create and curate yourself
Collaborate with internal and external teams to ensure we focus on pet-centric product and service recommendations
Support new pet technology businesses and partners by generating actionable insights from our data assets
Develop compelling stories that provide insight into the drivers of business performance and Pet/Pet Owner behavior
What we are looking for:
A Bachelor’s degree in quantitative field (economics, statistics, business, computer science) or equivalent experience
4+ years’ experience in a data science role handling varied and complex data
Rich experience in working with data and deliver business-changing analytics, data science and marketing personalization
Truly inspired by, and want to live, our purpose of creating a better world for pets.
Varied technical experience in delivering statistical analytics, data science and insight on large-scale consumer data sets across multiple sectors, including packaged goods and retail
Hands-on experience with Python is required; Familiarity with PySpark is also desirable
Comfortable with ambiguity, with a passion for collaboration to achieve objectives
Superior planning, project management and organizational orchestration skills
Also desirable:
Passion for growing and strengthening a business using data driven approaches
Familiarity with cloud-based computing services e.g. Azure, Databricks, etc.
Enjoys explaining how models and systems work to both non-technical and technical stakeholders.",4.0,Mars,"Portland, OR",-1,10000+ Employees,109,Company - Private,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.0,OR,4222,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
384,384,Data Scientist-Junior,$21-$29,"Business Group Highlights

Defense

The Defense group supports the Department of Defense (DoD) mission to keep our homeland and its citizens safe. We provide solutions to improve the Nation's defense by providing software, systems engineering, IT, training and logistics and fleet management solutions.

Responsibilities

This position is for a large contract for the Army, providing leadership and support existing systems, processes, and policies as well as working to implement new technologies and processes in support of the client’s mission to provide Intelligence training and technologies to military personnel.

Provides data science and data engineering support to targeting activities that bring in large datasets. Data science and data engineering support is needed to help manage and execute the ingest (extract, transform and load (ETL) operations), parsing, data normalizations, database design, as well as performing data analysis at scale and implementing algorithms to find impactful operational and finished intelligence in large data streams. Involved in the analysis of unstructured and semi-structured data. Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases. Handles processing against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams. Has the ability to make discoveries in the world of big data. Requires strong technical and computational skills coupled with the ability to code, design, develop, and deploy sophisticated applications using advanced unstructured and semi-structured data analysis techniques. Has the ability to utilize advance tools and computational skills to interpret, connect, predict and make discoveries in complex data and deliver recommendations. Develops documentation to support objectives of operationally-focused team members.

Qualifications

3 years experience and a BA/BS degree

Responsible for assisting more senior positions and/or performing functional duties under the oversight of more senior positions.

Current TS/SCI clearance

Bachelor of Science Degree or higher computer science, statistics, or other related STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math)

Desired qualifications:

Strong understanding of data engineering, structure, formatting, conditioning and analysis.
Knowledge of database tools and current data science processes.
Full-stack development experience.

Desired Skills:

Thorough/Working knowledge of Python and some of the following software/tools: SQL, R, Hadoop, Spark, Java, C/C++, Git Bash, Tableau, ArcGIS, Unix commands.
Thorough/Working knowledge of research designs.
Thorough/Working knowledge of collection methods, capabilities and tasking process.
Familiarity with project management concepts and principles.
Intellectual curiosity; creativity and innovation to go beyond current tools to deliver the best solution to complex problems.
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.2,Perspecta,"Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,2,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,Per,1,0,50.0,DC,4683,0,data scientist,1,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
386,386,"Data Engineer (Java, Scala or Python, SQL, Stream Processing)",$21-$29,"FILTERED IS REQUIRED FOR THIS POSITION:
Data Engineer - Python
Data Engineer - Java
Data Engineer - Scala

Data Engineer – Work in partnership with data science and visualization teams to understand use cases, data needs, and outcome objectives. Utilizing big data and cloud technologies to develop data pipelines and deliver data sets. As a partner, you will have project work and ad hoc requests that require agility and often fast paced response to business needs.

Required

• 5 years or more experience in Java, Scala or Python.
• Ability to perform complex data analysis with large volumes of data.
• Experience with stream processing, e.g. Kafka, Spark Streaming, Akka, Flink, etc..
• Expert level proficiency in SQL.
• Experience data modeling for large scale databases, either relational or NoSQL (graph, key:value, document, etc.)
• 5+ years experience with developing ETL/Data Pipeline solutions.
• Proven experience (2 years) with distributed systems, e.g. Mesos, Kubernetes, Spark, Hadoop, distributed databases, grid computing

Desired:
• Experience developing and utilizing Data Lakes.
• Experience with data privacy concerns
• Ability to build and maintain modern cloud architecture, e.g. AWS, Google Cloud, etc.
• Experience contributing to open source projects
• Knowledge of data science practices, to better steer our efforts to support them through the infrastructure we create

Intake Call Notes:
• Give me an overview of the role: What is a day like in this role? From a candidate’s perspective, what’s exciting about this role and team?
o Data Engineer – Work in partnership with data science, analysts and visualization team to understand use cases, data needs, and outcome objectives. Utilizing big data and cloud technologies to develop data pipelines and deliver data sets. As a partner, you will have project work and ad hoc requests that require agility and often fast paced response to business needs.
• Who will this person work with on a daily basis?
o The Scrum team.
• Why is this role open? Is this more maintenance or new development work?
o We are building out a data layer to enable data discovery, analytics and visualization.
• Location of this role (CC, North Campus, Chesterfield, etc)?
o Chesterfield
• What are the ‘must haves’ to be successful in this role?
o 5 years or more experience in Java, Scala or Python.
o Ability to perform complex data analysis with large volumes of data.
o Experience with stream processing, e.g. Kafka, Spark Streaming, Akka, Flink, etc..
o Expert level proficiency in SQL.
o Experience data modeling for large scale databases, either relational or NoSQL (graph, key:value, document, etc.)
o Proven experience (2 years) with distributed systems, e.g. Mesos, Kubernetes, Spark, Hadoop, distributed databases, grid computing
• What are the items that would be nice to have, but not an absolute must?
o Experience with data privacy concerns
o Ability to build and maintain modern cloud architecture, e.g. AWS, Google Cloud, etc.
o Experience contributing to open source projects
o Knowledge of data science practices, to better steer our efforts to support them through the infrastructure we create
• What is the long term plan for the role?
o 1 year with the potential to go beyond
• Are you open to remote candidates?
o Will start remote but must be able to relocate to STL when campus opens
• Open to subcontractors?
o No
• Interview process? Who from the team will be involved? Phone screen or face-to-face?
o Phone then webex
• What is the highest level of education is needed for this position?
o Bachelor or 5 years experience.",4.3,The Syllogisteks Company,"Chesterfield, MO",-1,Unknown,28,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,Per,1,0,50.0,MO,3607,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
388,388,Yardi Technical Analyst – Data Engineer,$21-$29,"Company Summary:

Hudson Homes Management, LLC is a property management start-up offering a full complement of services to the U.S. single-family residential market, including leasing and management operations, accounting and asset management. We are looking for driven and motivated people to join our team and be a part of our collaborative work environment!

Position Summary:

The Yardi Technical Analyst – Data Engineer will be a member of the Hudson Homes Technology and Support team responsible for the analysis, development, and testing all of our Yardi platform. The Data Engineer will be responsible for development and integration of Yardi related jobs requiring in depth knowledge of the backend of Voyager. This is a highly technical position requiring experience and skills in programming best practices, data architecture standards/procedures, and integration techniques.

Essential Functions:

Expert level knowledge of Voyager backend functions
Development best practices and procedures
Data acquisition best practices and procedures
Development of data set processes
Use of programming language and tools
Identify ways to improve data reliability, efficiency, and quality
Use large data sets to address business issues
Use data to discover tasks that can be automated

Required Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:

Experience in architecting and building enterprise level systems
Expertise in large scale enterprise data warehousing and integration projects
Expertise in PL/SQL and/or T SQL, data integration, data modeling, data warehousing, business intelligence, SSIS, and Cubes
A strong knowledge of Yardi Voyager 7s (i.e., all its modules) as well as its applications to residential property management
Experience in tracing programs and tuning queries
Experience with scripting languages (power shell or shell scripting)
Experience in big data is a plus
Project management experience a plus
Highly effective written and verbal communication skills are required
Effective organizational, stress and time management skills
Demonstrates a sense of urgency and ability to meet deadlines
Ability to work independently or as a team member

Education:

Bachelor’s degree in accounting, computer science or equivalent work experience

Experience:

3-5 years of experience in a similar technical role required
Experience with the property management and single family housing environment/industry a plus

Work Environment:

This job operates in a professional office environment

Travel Requirements:

This role requires minimal to no travel

Desired Organizational Competencies:

Accountability - Demonstrates a commitment to and responsibility for accomplishing individual, team and business objectives
Drive - Consistently achieves challenging goals/objectives, and demonstrates an ability to create value and maximize results, often under pressure
Planning - Identifies business needs, problems and risks proactively, and develops well founded plans that specify strategies, actions/solutions, risk mitigants, and desired results
Critical Thinking / Judgment - Commits to an action after developing alternative solutions that are based on logical assumptions and factual information and that take into consideration resources risks and organizational values
Adaptability - Exhibits the capacity to successfully change and evolve one’s actions, opinions and behavior as a result of changing priorities or environment
Communication Skills - Proactively communicates in the appropriate medium with clarity and focus at the right level to ensure delivery has the appropriate impact
Team Work - Fosters collaboration among team members and business partners, and uses capabilities to achieve team goals

What We Offer:

Competitive compensation including annual merit-based bonuses and paid time off
Medical, Dental & Vision as well as 401K with employer match

Hudson Homes Management is an equal opportunity employer and will not tolerate discrimination in employment on the basis of race, color, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, religion, disability, ethnicity, national origin, marital status, veteran status, genetic information or any other legally protected classification or status.

The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by individuals assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed.",1.0,Hudson Homes,"Irving, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,Per,1,0,50.0,TX,4628,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
389,389,Senior Data Engineer,$21-$29,"About Sysco LABS

Sysco LABS is a technology-focused division within Sysco, dedicated to reimagining foodservice through innovation. An extension of Syscos commitment to deliver exceptional products and services to the foodservice industry, Sysco LABS uses customer and market intelligence, data-driven insights and agile technology development to rethink the entire foodservice ecosystem.

Our innovation will improve everything from the ordering process, inventory, pricing and automation to the in-restaurant customer experience. Operating with the mindset of a startup and backed by the authoritative expertise of an industry leader, Sysco LABS mission is to improve the Sysco customer experience and consistently deliver cost savings and new innovations through technology.

About the Role

As a Senior Data Engineer, you will build scalable data and analytics models and architecture from event formation to ingestion to reporting, from scratch. You will evaluate and lead the implementation of robust systems used by every team within Sysco Labs. You will shape the vision and architecture of end-to-end pipeline while following industry best practices.

Responsibilities:
Manage all aspects of the data and analytics system from stream configuration to ETL to aggregate tables and cubes for reporting needs. Establish and maintain the data pipeline architecture.
Partner will all facets of the business to include development, operations and consumers of data. Form and maintain relationships with stakeholders to understand needs and translate those needs into priorities and executable plans.
Write scripts to schedule data ingestion and syncing. Evaluate, lead and form back end logic to create data marts from requirements for the purposes of self-serving stakeholders.
Oversee the code creation from junior members of the team.
Assist data architects to build the working framework for data search and retrieval.
Identify required changes to the design and communicate to the architects.
Other duties as assigned.
About You

Minimum Qualifications
6 years experience of hands-on data platform design and development in large-scale and complex environments.
Experience with SQL and Python.
Experience with Redshift and Postgres.
Experience with AWS platform and technologies including Kinesis, Firehose and Glue.
Experience with cloud storage such as S3.
Experience orchestrating data ingestion and syncing metadata with event data.
Experience with ETL for reporting and business users (marketing, finance, product owners).
Preferred Qualifications
Recognized degree in computer science or certification in technical related field.
10 years experience of hands-on data platform design and development in large-scale and complex environments.
Experience with Tableau and Tableau Server.
Perks at Sysco LABS:
Competitive base & bonus packages
Fun, casual, fast-paced work environment filled with talented colleagues
Brand-new high-tech office space located in the heart of East 6th St, (walking distance to the MetroRail)
Generous PTO policy
Flexible work environment that encourages work/life balance
Fully stocked break room & weekly catered lunch
Excellent medical, dental and vision benefits and company 401(k) program
At Sysco LABS you will be part of a team that values trust, learning, and working together to solve problems. Your efforts will help to build groundbreaking experiences for our customers. Come join us!

We embrace diversity and equal opportunity in a serious way. We are committed to building a team that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, and skills. The more inclusive we are, the better our work will be.",4.3,Sysco Labs,"Austin, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,9,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,Per,1,0,50.0,TX,3656,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
391,391,Senior Data Scientist,$21-$29,"We are looking for a Data Scientist who will be responsible for shaping our company’s data strategy innovating the $85B digital and linear television advertising market. You are passionate about all things data and tech, and have extensive knowledge of the digital space. You are accomplished in the areas of creating new analysis and deriving business-changing insights and you are ready to support the strategic objectives of a highly cross-functional organization.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Your work will have an outsized impact on tools we’re building, forecasting, planning, allocation, and audience behavior prediction
Work with Pb-scale data sets representing the total US video and TV audiences
You will build new, and support scaling out existing models in support of audience segmentation
You will be working with the data-engineering team to product ML pipelines and coordinating data models with other engineering teams
Building Data Models and managing machine learning pipelines
QUALIFICATIONS:
Managing ML pipelines with tools such as Python, Julia, and Apache Spark
SQL fluency and an understanding of relational data models
Comfortable in the Linux environment
A master of all trades mentality and an ability to embrace new challenges regularly
Eager and energized to work with some of the latest open source technologies
Able to work on-site in Los Angeles, CA
PhD in Data Science, Physics, Mathematics or other scientific field
PERKS:
Unlimited paid time off each year
Annual vacation stipend
Onsite gym, fitness classes and personal trainer
Casual dress code
Kitchen stocked with healthy snack snacks
Health, dental and vision benefits
Parental leave
Epic growth
ABOUT

At VideoAmp, we believe in challenging advertising paradigms to maximize value for clients. We do this by enabling companies to execute on business outcomes across their media investment instead of more traditional media metrics. VideoAmp is the software and data solutions company powering the convergence of the linear TV and digital video advertising. Our solutions connect linear TV viewership with addressable data assets to benefit the marketing and media industries. This enable marketers and content owners to holistically plan, transact, and measure deduplicated audiences across digital video, OTT, connected and linear TV advertising.

Come and join us!",3.5,VideoAmp,"Los Angeles, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,6,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,Per,1,0,50.0,CA,2348,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,1,0,1
392,392,Data Scientist,$21-$29,"Position Number: 343981

Location: Creve Coeur, MO 63141

Position Type: Temporary

Required Skill Set:
Java, Oracle, Python, R Programming, Teradata

Position Description:
*C2C is not available**
*Only U.S. Citizens and those authorized to work in the U.S. can be considered as W2 candidates.**
Duration: 12 months
Location: Creve Coeur, MO, 63141

Data Scientist

PhD in Operations Research, Industrial Engineering, Computer Science or any related area
Experience in solving scheduling, vehicle routing and allocation problems using operations research
techniques and heuristics (+5 years)
CPLEX/Gurobi experience (+5 years)
Java experience (+4 years)
Database knowledge (+5 years)
Ability to work in fast paced environment

Preferred skill set:
Experience in solving large scale scheduling and routing problems using operations research (column generation, B&P, etc)
Experience in IBM DOC
Experience in working with data API’s, Teradata, Oracle
Knowledge in Python or R (+3 years)
The candidate will be working on developing regional and global resource allocation, scheduling, and vehicle routing models to make recommendations for field (planting, detasseling, harvest) and facility operations. The recommendations should result in operations efficiency. The candidate has to work closely with business partners to gather assumptions and scope the problem, then independently formulate, code and execute the problem. Finally, models need to be validated with and approved by the business user and technical documentation needs to be developed.",4.5,Rose International,"Creve Coeur, MO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,27,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,Per,1,0,50.0,MO,1548,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0
393,393,Lead Data Scientist - Investments,$21-$29,"Job Description

Since 1851, MassMutuals commitment has always been to help people protect their families, support their communities, and help one another. This is why we want to inspire people to Live Mutual. Were people helping people.

A career with us means you will work alongside exceptional people and be empowered to reach your professional and personal goals. Our employees are the foundation of what makes MassMutual a strong, stable and ethical business. We seek and value unique and varied perspectives and experiences because we believe we are stronger when all voices are heard. We invite you to bring your bright, innovative ideas to MassMutual as we continue to help millions of Americans rely on each other.

Description

Position Summary:

MassMutuals Advanced Analytics group is seeking an exceptional, highly motivated and self-directed data scientist. In this role, you will perform data-driven research, problem solving, and algorithm development through the systematic application of mathematics, statistics and computer science as well as cutting edge data technologies. Results of this work manifest themselves in a variety of ways, including interactive visualizations, presentations, publications, web applications, predictive algorithms, and APIs.

This is an opportunity to join a small but growing high performing team with diverse backgrounds in applied math, computer science and physics that have been tasked with developing, maintaining and extracting knowledge from a strategic data asset. Our work revolves around studying fundamental and high impact business questions that directly impact the direction of the company and industry at large.

Overall Responsibility:
Set strategy and assume a leadership role in the investments domain expertise
Develop roadmaps for projects and services, data, and technology
Oversee operations of algorithm and system deployments
Partner with executive leadership to ensure alignment of data science initiatives and company strategy
Lead projects and research initiatives
Develop algorithms and predictive models, create prototype systems, visualizations, and web applications
Design and analyze experiments
Assemble data sets from disparate sources and analyze using appropriate quantitative methodologies, computational frameworks and systems
Disseminate findings to non-technical audiences through a variety of media, including interactive visualizations, reports and presentations
Mentor junior team members
Candidate Requirements:
2+ years Investments Experience Required
7+ years working with data and relevant computational frameworks and systems
7+ years developing of probabilistic models and machine learning algorithms
Proficient level of understanding in the following areas and an expert in at least one: machine learning, probability and statistics (esp. Bayesian methods), natural language processing, operations research
Exceptional problem solving skills and willingness to learn new concepts, methods, and technologies
Expert in data analysis using R or Python (numpy, scipy, matplotlib, scikit-learn, pandas, etc.) programming languages
Knowledge of HTML/CSS/Javascript, d3.js and web application frameworks (Flask, Django, Play!, etc.)
Knowledge of NoSQL systems, Hadoop/map-reduce, Spark, Hbase, etc.
Experience in database design and SQL
Ability to work in a highly collaborative environment
Outstanding communication skills (publication history a plus)
Education - M.S. or Ph.D. in a quantitative discipline (Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Electrical Engineering, Physics, etc.) is required",3.7,MassMutual,"Boston, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,169,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,Per,1,0,50.0,MA,3605,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
394,394,"Product Manager, Data Science",$21-$29,"We are looking for an exceptional Product Manager to support our Data Science team. The Data Science team at Numerator is building some of the most progressive and innovative products to help improve operational efficiency and product performance.

As our Product Manager, you will play a critical role in personalizing our product experience and building data-driven solutions to optimize our business success. This role will give you the opportunity to work with stakeholders, data scientists, and engineers to build high-quality data products for strategic initiatives and opportunities.

This is a new role, as our Product Manager, you will work directly with the Panel Data Science team to craft our growing landscape of data and machine learning technologies into delightful product experiences.

What you get to do!

Own and champion product plans, objectives, and progress against plans and KPIs to all stakeholders (Data Science team, Engineering, and business leaders).
Work with the partnership team to vet and integrate external data sources that could improve our products.
Lead internal and client discovery calls to inform roadmap, business requirements, and vet early outputs.
Assist the data science team through the model development by clarifying business priorities for projects and identifying and scoping data pipelines as needed.
Prioritize features and resources to ensure critical data science resources are working on the highest impact solutions.
Manage stakeholder communication and internal alignment.
Become the subject matter expert in how our panel data science product works and interact with other products at Numerator

What we are looking for

2+ years product management or product development experience preferably in a data & analytics role.
Work experience in market intelligence and working closely with a data science team or analytics team to build out data products.
Previous experience working with purchase panel data and/or survey responses.
Familiarity with Data Science fundamentals and statistics.
Ability to work with internal stakeholders to collect feedback, prioritize tasks, and manage the engineering backlog.
Strong analytical skills and ability to evangelize the use of data for sound decision making across functions.
Strong oral and written communication skills, and ability to collaborate with, and influence cross-functional partners.
Self-motivated, self-directed, and the ability to thrive in a fast-paced environment in an industry that constantly changes.
Organized with a knack for managing complex projects.
Creative and resourceful when it comes to problem-solving.
A passionate can-do attitude. You are not afraid to try, learn, and improve.

Extra, Nice to haves

Familiarity with SQL and big data technologies.
Experience working as an engineer in big data, machine learning, or data science.
Experience working and leading a geographically dispersed team is a plus.

What We Offer

An inclusive and collaborative company culture - we work in an open environment while working together to get things done and adapt to the changing needs as they come.
An opportunity to have an impact in a technologically data-driven company.
Ownership over data and environments in an industry-leading product.
Market competitive total compensation package.
Volunteer time off and charitable donation matching.
Strong support for career growth, including mentorship programs, leadership training, access to conferences, and employee resources groups.
Regular hackathons to build your own projects and Engineering Lunch and Learns.
Great benefits package including health/vision/dental, unlimited PTO, flexible schedule, 401K matching, travel reimbursement, and more.

If this sounds like something you would like to be part of, we'd love for you to apply! Don't worry if you think that you don't meet all the qualifications here. The tools, technology, and methodologies we use are constantly changing and we value talent and interest over specific experience.

We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.1,Numerator,"Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,16,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,Per,1,0,50.0,IL,4279,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
395,395,Senior Data Engineer,$21-$29,"Why We Work at Dun & Bradstreet


We are at a transformational moment in our company journey - and we’re so excited about it. Each day, we are finding new ways to strengthen our award-winning culture, and to accelerate creativity, innovation and growth. Our purpose is to help customers improve business performance with Dun & Bradstreet’s Data Cloud and Live Business Identity, and we’re wildly passionate and committed to this purpose. So, if you’re looking to make an immediate impact at a company that welcomes bold and diverse thinking, come join us!



Brief Description
A senior data engineer’s role involves the development of new applications for major projects to drive significant revenue and cost savings for Dun and Bradstreet. Senior data engineers are expected to delve into new, cutting-edge technologies to explore new markets and opportunities.
Senior data engineers are expected to react quickly to high-tech marketplace needs, rapidly developing and deploying new products in an agile work environment to best meet and exceed the expectations of our clients and potential prospects.
Senior data engineers are well respected by the engineering team, and grow the skills and confidence of those around them.
Responsibilities:
Develop new applications in a variety of programming languages
Take ownership of existing applications for further development/improvements
Work closely with related groups to ensure business continuity
Perform analysis on large datasets to make and implement recommendations for maximizing customer experience
Work as a member of one or more agile teams, using lean principles and SCRUM methodology
Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree (preferable in computer science, mathematics, data science, or a related field)
Experience with SQL and Linux (3-5 years)
Experience with application development (3-5 years), strong preference for candidates with Python experience.
Strong collaboration skills
Experience with hosted environments, AWS, Azure, or other cloud service providers preferred
Nice to have:
Experience with Snowflake Data Warehouse systems
#LI-PD1

Dun & Bradstreet is an Equal Opportunity Employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, pregnancy, genetic information, protected military and veteran status, ancestry, marital status, medical condition (cancer and genetic characteristics) or any other characteristic protected by law.

We are committed to Equal Employment Opportunity and providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with physical and/or mental disabilities. If you are interested in applying for employment with Dun & Bradstreet and need special assistance or an accommodation to use our website or to apply for a position, please send an e-mail with your request to TalentAcquisitionTeam@dnb.com. Determination on requests for reasonable accommodation are made on a case-by-case basis.

Please note that all Dun & Bradstreet job postings can be found at https://dnb.wd1.myworkdayjobs.com/Careers and all communication from Dun & Bradstreet will come from an email address ending in @dnb.com.",3.0,Dun & Bradstreet,"Waltham, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,179,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,Per,1,0,50.0,MA,3264,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
396,396,Data Engineer,$21-$29,"Data Engineer

The data team designs, implements and scales data pipelines that transform raw data into actionable models and metrics that enable insight. This team owns the pipelines that transport and process database data from all of Asana's product surfaces. We build and operate the infrastructure and services that ensure data accuracy and data availability for data scientists, analysts, and business and product teams.

We are looking for a data engineer to found our product data engineering team. This team will have ownership of the core data pipelines powering Asana's metrics and partner with our existing data infrastructure team, data science team, and cross-functional partners to help evolve our analytic data model as data volume grows and new needs arise to support the growth of the business.

What you'll achieve
Architect, build, and launch scalable data pipelines to support Asana's growing data processing and analytics needs. Some upcoming projects you may work on include designing and implementing pipelines that deliver data with high quality, consistency, and timeliness. Evangelize high-quality software engineering practices for building data infrastructure and pipelines at scale.
Produce foundational data tables and metrics with clear definitions, lineage, and test coverage to ensure that data is reliable, intelligible, and maintainable
Understand and influence logging frameworks and practices to support our data flow, architecting logging best practices where needed
Implement systems to track data quality and consistency
Partner with business domain experts, data scientists and analysts, and engineering teams to build a roadmap for foundational data sets that are aligned with business goals and that enable self-service. Some upcoming projects you may work on include evolving data models and schemas based on business, product, and engineering needs to facilitate data-driven decisions and features across Asana. Drive the collection of new data and the refinement of existing data sources; develop relationships with product engineering teams to manage our analytic data model as the Asana product evolves.
About you
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Math, Statistics, Engineering, or a related quantitative field, or equivalent experience
5+ years of industry experience in software engineering or data engineering
Experience using coding languages Python, Java, Scala
Experience using workflow management engines (e.g. Airflow, Luigi, Prefect, Dagster, digdag.io, Google Cloud Composer, AWS Step Functions, Azure Data Factory, UC4, Control-M)
Experience with Hadoop or similar ecosystem (MapReduce, Yarn, HDFS, Hive, Spark, Presto, Pig, HBase, Parquet)
Effective in working across team boundaries to establish overarching data architecture, and provide guidance to individual teams
Expertise in relational databases and query authoring (SQL)
About us

Asana helps teams orchestrate their work, from small projects to strategic initiatives. More than 75,000 organizations and millions of users rely on Asana, including AirAsia, AllBirds, Grab, KLM Air France, Kohl's, Sephora, Traveloka, and Viessmann. Asana has been named a Top 5 Best Workplace and the #1 Best Workplace in the Bay Area by Fortune three years in a row, and one of Glassdoor's and Inc.'s Best Places to Work. With nine global offices, including a San Francisco headquarters and flagship offices in Dublin, New York, Sydney, and Tokyo, Asana is always looking for curious, collaborative, and mission-driven people to help us enable the world's teams to work together effortlessly.

Our goal is to ensure that Asana upholds an inclusive environment where all people feel that they are equally respected and valued, whether they are applying for an open position or working at the company. We welcome applicants of any educational background, gender identity and expression, sexual orientation, religion, ethnicity, age, citizenship, socioeconomic status, disability, and veteran status, and we'd love to learn about what you can add to our team.

More information:
Rethinking the org chart: Areas of Responsibility (AoRs)
Distributed responsibility: An engineering manager's perspective
The Pyramid of Clarity",4.9,Asana,"San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,11,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,Per,1,0,50.0,CA,4227,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
405,405,"Data Engineer (Go, RESTful API, Apache)",$21-$29,"Data Engineer

The mission of Bayer Crop Science is centered on developing agricultural solutions for a sustainable future that will include a global population projected to eclipse 9.6 billion by 2050. We approach agriculture holistically, looking across a broad range of solutions from using biotechnology and plant breeding to produce the best possible seeds, to advanced predictive and prescriptive analytics designed to select the best possible crop system for every acre.

To make this possible, Bayer collects terabytes of data across all aspects of its operations, from genome sequencing, crop field trials, manufacturing, supply chain, financial transactions and everything in between. There is an enormous need and potential here to do something that has never been done before. We need great people to help transform these complex scientific datasets into innovative software that is deployed across the pipeline, accelerating the pace and quality of all crop system development decisions to unbelievable levels.

What you will do is why you should join us:
Be a critical senior member of a data engineering team focused on creating distributed analysis capabilities around a large variety of datasets
Take pride in software craftsmanship, apply a deep knowledge of algorithms and data structures to continuously improve and innovate
Work with other top-level talent solving a wide range of complex and unique challenges that have real world impact
Explore relevant technology stacks to find the best fit for each dataset
Pursue opportunities to present our work at relevant technical conferences
o Google Cloud Next 2019: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fqvuyOID6v4
o GraphConnect 2015: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6KEvLURBenM
o Google Cloud Blog: https://cloud.google.com/blog/products/containers-kubernetes/google-kubernetes-engine-clusters-can-have-up-to-15000-nodes
Project your talent into relevant projects. Strength of ideas trumps position on an org chart
If you share our values, you should have:
At least 2 years experience with Go
Proven experience (2 years) building and maintaining data-intensive APIs using a RESTful approach
Experience with stream processing using Apache Kafka
A level of comfort with Unit Testing and Test Driven Development methodologies
Familiarity with creating and maintaining containerized application deployments with a platform like Docker
A proven ability to build and maintain cloud based infrastructure on a major cloud provider like AWS, Azure or Google Cloud Platform
Experience data modeling for large scale databases, either relational or NoSQL
Bonus points for:
Experience with protocol buffers and gRPC
Experience with: Google Cloud Platform, Apache Beam and or Google Cloud Dataflow, Google Kubernetes Engine or Kubernetes
Experience working with scientific datasets, or a background in the application of quantitative science to business problems
Bioinformatics experience, especially large scale storage and data mining of variant data, variant annotation, and genotype to phenotype correlation
Location: Creve Coeur, MO or Remote from another location. If local, they must work onsite. Only open to candidates who have prior experience working remotely. Make sure it is clearly listed on the resume where they worked remotely. Please include in the Supplier Partner Summary what tools they used to work remotely.",4.3,The Syllogisteks Company,"Creve Coeur, MO",-1,Unknown,28,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,Per,1,0,50.0,MO,3381,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
406,406,Lead Data Scientist - Cyber Security,$21-$29,"Since 1851, MassMutuals commitment has always been to help people protect their families, support their communities, and help one another. This is why we want to inspire people to Live Mutual. Were people helping people.

A career with us means you will work alongside exceptional people and be empowered to reach your professional and personal goals. Our employees are the foundation of what makes MassMutual a strong, stable and ethical business. We seek and value unique and varied perspectives and experiences because we believe we are stronger when all voices are heard. We invite you to bring your bright, innovative ideas to MassMutual as we continue to help millions of Americans rely on each other.

Position Summary:

MassMutuals Advanced Analytics group is seeking an exceptional, highly motivated and self-directed cyber security lead data scientist. In this role, you will perform data-driven research, problem solving, and algorithm development through the systematic application of mathematics, statistics and computer science as well as cutting edge data technologies. Results of this work manifest themselves in a variety of ways, including interactive visualizations, presentations, publications, web applications, predictive algorithms, and APIs.

This is an opportunity to join a small but growing high performing team with diverse backgrounds in applied math, computer science and physics that have been tasked with developing, maintaining and extracting knowledge from a strategic data asset. Our work revolves around studying fundamental and high impact business questions that directly impact the direction of the company and industry at large.

Overall Responsibility:
Set strategy and assume a leadership role in cyber security domain expertise
Develop roadmaps for projects and services, data, and technology
Oversee operations of algorithm and system deployments
Partner with executive leadership to ensure alignment of data science initiatives and company strategy
Lead projects and research initiatives
Develop algorithms and predictive models, create prototype systems, visualizations, and web applications
Design and analyze experiments
Assemble data sets from disparate sources and analyze using appropriate quantitative methodologies, computational frameworks and systems
Disseminate findings to non-technical audiences through a variety of media, including interactive visualizations, reports and presentations
Mentor junior team members
Candidate Requirements:
Industry recognized cyber security expertise
7+ years working with data and relevant computational frameworks and systems
7+ years developing of probabilistic models and machine learning algorithms
Proficient level of understanding in the following areas and an expert in at least one: machine learning, probability and statistics (esp. Bayesian methods), natural language processing, operations research
Exceptional problem solving skills and willingness to learn new concepts, methods, and technologies
Expert in data analysis using R or Python (numpy, scipy, matplotlib, scikit-learn, pandas, etc.) programming languages
Knowledge of HTML/CSS/Javascript, d3.js and web application frameworks (Flask, Django, Play!, etc.)
Knowledge of NoSQL systems, Hadoop/map-reduce, Spark, Hbase, etc.
Experience in database design and SQL
Ability to work in a highly collaborative environment
Outstanding communication skills (publication history a plus)
Education - M.S. or Ph.D. in a quantitative discipline (Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Electrical Engineering, Physics, etc.) is required

CORE VALUES
Focus on the Customer: We understand our customers well and look for every opportunity to deliver an experience that is clear, easy, personal, human, empowering and trustworthy.
Act with Integrity: We deliver on our promises by being open, honest and humble and by adhering to the letter and spirit of applicable laws, rules, regulations and company policies.
Value People: We respect and learn from each others diverse backgrounds, experiences and ideas. We engage and develop people to their greatest potential.
Work Collaboratively: We work together to achieve results by actively listening, seeking, understanding and creating solutions as a unified team driving toward one company, one culture, and one brand.
Achieve Results: We focus on winning by exceeding expectations and getting better everyone, every day.",3.7,MassMutual,"Boston, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,169,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,Per,1,0,50.0,MA,4429,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
407,407,Data Engineer,$21-$29,"Lionbridge enables more than 800 world-leading brands to increase international market share, speed adoption of products and effectively engage their customers in local markets worldwide. Using our innovative cloud technology platforms and our global crowd of more than 100,000 professional cloud workers, we provide translation, digital marketing, global content management and application testing solutions that ensure global brand consistency, local relevancy and technical usability across all touch points of the customer lifecycle. Based in Waltham, MA, Lionbridge maintains solution centers in 28 countries.

Employee Sub-Group: Regular FT Hourly
Work Schedule:
Location: Redmond , Washington
Position Title: Data 1
Req: 26618

Data Engineer (Games)

Are you an experienced data analyst who takes pride in mining data and building actionable insights? Do you want to help one of the world's most ambitious, innovative, and customer-centric game studios develop and launch cutting edge games? Well, Lionbridge is looking for you!

We are looking for a Technical Data Analyst to join our team. Suitable candidates are self-guided, energetic, and analytic problem solvers. To be successful in this role, you will need to be able to work on tight deadlines and have exceptional technical and communication skills.

Role Responsibilities
Retrieve and process data using a broad set of data technologies and resources, knowing how, when, and which to use
Write high-quality SQL queries to retrieve and analyze data from database tables
Build Business Intelligence applications to surface and report data and insights
Investigate data quality and implementation issues and ensure successful rollout of signals and ongoing telemetry health
Prepare specifications, documentation, reports, and presentation materials
Build trust and respect with people outside of the inner immediate team
Facilitate communication within groups
Conduct root cause analysis against uncovered issues
Work closely with the team lead to deliver requested daily results
Contribute to a culture of innovation and quality
Work closely with business partners on assigned tasks
Qualifications
BA/BS in Engineering, Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Data Science, or related quantitative discipline
1+ years of experience as an analyst or engineer in data or business intelligence space
1+ years of work experience in analyzing and interpreting data using SQL
Experience in using C#
Proficiency in navigating GIT, work experience is preferred
Experience in using Microsoft Visual Studio.
Experience with BI data visualization and delivery tools such as Power BI, Tableau, etc.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Self-driven, meticulous and curious in nature
Ability to prioritize in a complex and fast-paced environment
Ability to learn new technology and tools
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status.",3.4,Lionbridge,"Redmond, WA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,24,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,Per,1,0,50.0,WA,3062,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
409,409,Sr Data Scientist,$21-$29,"This role will use AI and machine learning technique to
drive the main purpose of increasing HouseCalls program member engagement and penetration
through leveraging internal enterprise data sources including member medical history
and behavior information and external information.

As HouseCalls enabling
operation continues to grow, there are specific skills sets that are needed to
help us achieve the financial goal and member experience satisfaction.
Strategic solution team is seeking a director role of outreach strategy with
advanced technical expertise, marketing background and great healthcare
industry experience. We are looking for an innovative individual who is not
only able to strategize via data, but also able to implement the strategy
through the end.

Youll enjoy the
flexibility to telecommute* from anywhere within the U.S. as you take on some
tough challenges.

Primary Responsibilities:
The Sr. Data
Scientist will play an analytical role researching,
designing, implementing and deploying full-stack scalable machine learning
solutions to support house call member engagements
Develop intelligent solutions to drive
increase in HouseCalls penetration rate by using unstructured data like voice
and text
Consolidate internal and external data to
establish member journey line across different programs
Establish analytic machine learning models to
increase member outbound reach experience and NPS scores, implement the
solutions into applications or operation
Drive inbound scheduling through text mining
in scripting and NLP
Youll be rewarded
and recognized for your performance in an environment that will challenge you
and give you clear direction on what it takes to succeed in your role as well
as provide development for other roles you may be interested in.

Required Qualifications:
Bachelors degree in Applied Mathematics, Statistics,
Computer Sciences, Information Management, Actuarial Science or a related
technical field; MS or PhD strongly preferred
Minimum 5 years experience in data analytics
and machine learning modeling
Minimum5 years experience in correlating
business processes and front-end applications to back-end databases and systems
Minimum 5 years experience working with large
databases to create meaningful, usable data structures to extract information
out of application transactional data
Minimum 5 years experience leading technical
and non-technical resources in the area of Information Management, Data
Strategy, Business Intelligence development, data mining and predictive
analytics with machine learning/statistical modeling techniques
Minimum 3 years' experience in Python
Strong ability to communicate highly technical
issues/results to a diverse audience both verbally and in written
Experience working for a large enterprise with
fragmented data sources, lack of documentation, unstructured requirements and
ambiguity
Experience working with business stakeholders
and senior leaders in understanding data analytics and information needs, and
executing on transformation of high-level, abstract data needs into meaningful
data management solutions, information and analysis
Experience understanding and managing business
data and information, and the ability to correlate business processes to data
Experience converting raw data into processed,
actionable, insightful information is required
Strong execution mentality
Preferred Qualifications:
MS in Applied Mathematics, Physics, Computer
Sciences, Information Management, Statistics, Actuarial Science or a related
technical field
Minimum 3 years of Speech Recognition modeling
and/or NLP preferred
Careers with Optum. Here's the idea. We built an entire organization around one
giant objective; make health care work better for everyone. So when it comes to
how we use the world's large accumulation of health-related information, or
guide health and lifestyle choices or manage pharmacy benefits for millions,
our first goal is to leap beyond the status quo and uncover new ways to serve.
Optum, part of the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, brings together
some of the greatest minds and most advanced ideas on where health care has to
go in order to reach its fullest potential. For you, that means working on high
performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter. Optum,
incredible ideas in one incredible company and a singular opportunity to do your
life's best work.(sm)

OptumCare
is committed to creating an environment where physicians focus on what they do
best: care for their patients. To do so, OptumCare provides administrative and
business support services to both owned and affiliated medical practices which
are part of OptumCare. Each medical practice part and their physician employees
have complete authority with regards to all medical decision-making and patient
care. OptumCares support services do not interfere with or control the
practice of medicine by the medical practices or any of their physicians.

*All Telecommuters will be required to adhere to UnitedHealth Groups Telecommuter Policy.

Diversity
creates a healthier atmosphere: OptumCare is an Equal Employment
Opportunity/Affirmative Action employers and all qualified applicants will
receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion,
sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual
orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic
information, or any other characteristic protected by law.

OptumCare
is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before
beginning employment.

Job Keywords: Data analytics, machine learning modeling, databases, NLP, Python, data mining, predictive analytics, statistical modeling, speech recognition modeling, telecommute, Eden Prairie, MN, Minnesota",3.4,Unitedhealth Group,"Eden Prairie, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,43,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10+ billion (USD),-1,Per,1,0,50.0,MN,5818,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
413,413,Claims Data Scientist,$77k-$156k,"About ConcertAI

ConcertAI is the leading provider of precision oncology solutions for biopharma and healthcare, leveraging the largest collection of research-grade Real-world Data and the only broadly deployed oncology-specific AI solutions. Our mission is to improve translational sciences; accelerate therapeutic clinical development; and provide new capabilities for post-approval studies to accelerate needed new medical innovations to patients and to improve patient outcomes.
ConcertAI has emerged as one of the highest growth technology companies in Real-world Data and AI, backed by industry leading private equity companies: SymphonyAI, Declaration Partners, Maverick Ventures, and Alliance|Bernstein.

Role Summary
As a Claims Data Scientist at ConcertAI, you will be responsible for data exploration, and analysis on patient data for various stakeholders in the oncology and healthcare domain, including claims and claims-clinical linked data assets. You will report to the Vice President of Data Products. You should have a good mix of programming/CS, visualization, stats/math, and ML skills (with a particular strength in at least 2 of those areas), and ideally, you have been applying those skills in healthcare. You should have previous experience with healthcare claims. You will design methods and models around client driven needs and you will collaborate with various subject matter experts to inform those methods. You will assist the client delivery team with insights, dashboards, and ad-hoc analytics. You will also work with the engineering team to build prototypes and models for new product development.
Responsibilities
Understand external claims data assets and oversee the ingestion, processing, de-identification, and provisioning for data assets and research projects.
Understand client / product needs and translate them into tactical R&D initiatives with defined goals and timelines.
Reason about healthcare specific problems to analyze visualize, interpret, and contextualize results.
Run a variety of analytics from data QA to complex models.
Become the internal subject matter expert on all things claims.
Implement models using high level software packages (SKlearn, R, TensorFlow, Spark).
Collaborate on software projects with engineers, providing analytical guidance and contributing to codebase.
Requirements
BSc or higher in a STEM field, with formal training in CS, stats, and math.
Strong programming abilities in at least one high level language (python, stata, R).
Knowledge of statistical methods- regression, ANOVA, EDA, PCA, etc.
Basic visualization skills- matplotlib/seaborn/plotly/etc, tableau.
Experience with big data – Cloud data warehouses, cluster computing, Spark, MapReduce/Hadoop.
Experience with healthcare claims data
Intimate familiarity with the python data science stack (pandas, sklearn, numpy/scipy).
Firm understanding of claims data processing and adjudication, including rejections, re-submissions, and identifying final claims.
Ideal candidate would have a competency around linking EMR and claims data via identity management.
Learn More About ConcertAI

ConcertAI is transforming how healthcare is delivered and dedicated to improving patient outcomes in oncology by offering innovative solutions on how data and intelligence is used to solve healthcare problems. We are creating something special in our culture, by building a collaborative, engaged, patient focused, team approach to our mission. Our high-performance teams are looking to add great talent to the mix and we are hiring for the right mix of new skills and diverse mindset. Learn more about ConcertAI at www.concertai.com or on LinkedIn .",3.8,ConcertAI,Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,116.5,Remote,3678,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,0
414,414,Senior Data Scientist,$77k-$156k,"Formation provides personalization for the largest enterprise businesses in the world. We work with high-volume data streams and apply Data Science to bring individualized multi-step promotions to customers. Our Data Science Team is transforming the relationships between Fortune 500 companies and their customers.

You'll work in small teams with a common goal: create excellent data science solutions anchored in a culture of quality, customer focus, and growth.

As a Senior Data Scientist at Formation you will work in an agile environment to prioritize and test hypotheses using principles of rigorous experimental design. You understand that Data Science is an expansive area and no line of code is written until you have clearly defined the problem, methods, and definition of done. Your guidance on causal inference, machine learning techniques, and work prioritization will be sought by other team members. You will contribute to process documentation, and methodology design and review. You will create platform architecture specifications as you work with Engineering and Product Management to integrate Data Science processes into the product platform.

You understand that bugs, inadequate processes, and less than ideal code are part of building a startup. You welcome the challenge of solving these kind of problems while building a great product with the Data Science team.

You will report to the Manager of Data Science.

Key Responsibilities:
Work with Solution Architects and Customer Success to determine how to best apply Formation's product to client use cases
Explore and understand unfamiliar data-sets with tools such as Apache Spark and AWS Athena
Determine metrics and conduct power analysis to determine the feasibility and design of experiments
Implement processing pipelines to clean and process source data
Present experimental methodology and results to Fortune 500 clients
Work with Engineering and Product to standardize and integrate DS workflows into Formation's product
Provide mentorship and prioritization of DS work to junior Data Scientists
Skills and Experience:
Minimum 5 years experience as a Data Scientist, or 3 years experience as a Data Scientist at a startup
Proficient with the Python scientific ecosystem, Apache Spark, and SQL
Have foundational software engineering skills such as bash scripting, version control, and continuous integration
Have worked with job schedulers such as Apache Airflow
Knowledge of experimental design and analysis of results
Understand common concepts related to e-commerce, e.g. lifetime value, net incremental revenue, and churn
Machine learning proficiency with a focus on recommender systems and supervised learning techniques
Experience with optimization techniques such as constrained linear optimization and contextual bandits
Experience in customer onboarding and long-term customer engagement
Experience participating in talent screening and interviewing
About Formation:

Formation distills complex customer data into uniquely tailored experiences; we orchestrate physical and digital exchanges into one seamless journey. Our business is building lasting, trusted relationships between people and brands—and making it look easy.

We're already reaching millions of people a day, and we're just getting started. Our founding leadership is equal parts business, design, and engineering—because we believe differing perspectives + passionate discourse achieve the greatest outcomes. We give our whole selves. We love learning new things.

Formation is committed to inclusion and diversity and is an equal opportunity employer. You will receive consideration without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or veteran status.

If you're up for the challenge of a lifetime, we're looking for outstanding talent to join our team.

Benefits:

Among our many benefits:
100% medical, dental, and vision
Discretionary PTO policy in addition to 11 paid holidays per year
401K
Commuter Benefits",2.8,Formation,Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,5,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,116.5,Remote,4040,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
417,417,Data Scientist -,$77k-$156k,"Our Mission
We’re here to create a safer, happier and more mindful future for all with the help of data science, engineering, design, and mobile technology. We're starting by reinventing insurance, by rethinking the technologies that enable it, but our true goal is to build a platform that rewards people for driving well — creating safer roads with fewer accidents in the process.

Backed by impressive funding, we're poised to re-engineer a trillion-dollar category. We’re using rich customer insights, advanced technology and data science to build our cloud-native InsurTech solution. We're out to change behavior and promote mindful living.

Job Requirements
You must have all the skills and experiences associated with one of the options below. These options change over time and reflect the current needs of the team.
Option one - Telematics ML
Machine learning: Kaggle grandmaster-level skills with history of deploying models to production
Telematics experience: You have led telematics modeling at a major company known for telematics
Software development in Python: Strong scientific Python skills using pandas, scikit-learn, and statsmodels, as well as strong understanding of model deployment patterns
Option two - Telematics DL
Deep learning: Experience contributing new deep learning research to solve previously unsolved problems
Telematics experience: You have led telematics modeling at a major company known for telematics
Software development in Python: Strong scientific Python skills using pandas, scikit-learn, and statsmodels, as well as strong understanding of model deployment patterns
Option Three - Contact Center Optimization
Contact center knowledge: You are an expert at using data science methods to optimize contact centers
Machine learning: Strong understanding of ML theory with significant applied experience
Software development in Python: Strong scientific Python skills using pandas, scikit-learn, and statsmodels, as well as strong understanding of model deployment patterns
More details
Salary: We invest in first-rate people and pay top-of-market salaries for most positions, factoring in experience, talent and location. We do not offer equity.
Benefits: Medical, dental, vision, 401(k), wellness reimbursement, four weeks of vacation + six weeks of parental leave, and great work-life balance. Our office building offers on-site shower and bike stalls, and panoramic views of San Francisco.
Location: Due to COVID-19 our teams are all working remotely through 2020. We provide an in-home office set-up including laptop, monitor, ergonomic desk, chair and other items as needed
Location: Post COVID-19: San Francisco, CA near Montgomery Bart Station
All are welcome at Blue Owl. We are an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer who values diversity and inclusion and looks for applicants who understand, embrace and thrive in a multicultural world. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

If you are a San Francisco resident, please read the City and County of San Francisco's Fair Chance Ordinance notice.
https://sfgov.org/olse/sites/default/files/FCO%20poster2020.pdf",4.5,Blue Owl,"San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,4,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,116.5,CA,3422,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
419,419,Data Scientist,$77k-$156k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

The HLSC Software and IT Systems Department is seeking talented data scientists experienced in data analytics and data visualization. With more and more data everywhere, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) needs dedicated technical expertise and subject-matter support in data storage, security, computation, analysis and visualization.

Key Functions:
Acquire fundamental understanding of analytical equipment and tools to include open source intelligence (OSINT) platforms
Operate analytical equipment and tools
Perform processing and analysis of collected information
Support the development and application of a technical process approach to a sponsor problem
Present results in an intuitive manner that can be understood by all sponsor audiences, regardless of technical expertise and conduct insightful, actionable analyses
Experience with databases technologies (e.g., PostgreSQL, Oracle, MySQL, SQL Server, MongoDB, Neo4j)
Experience manipulating datasets with at least one modern programming language or business intelligence platform like Python, SAS, MATLAB, C++, R, Java, SQL, PL/SQL
Creatively apply visualizations to large datasets using tools like Tableau, Power BI, or Qlik
Ability to understand and map data relationships
Work with sponsors, vendors, and partner contractors to gain understanding of sponsor business challenges and evaluate possible technical solutions
Be a contributing member on a project team, able to be flexible with scope and schedule changes
Minimum Qualifications:
BS and 5 years of experience
Required Qualifications:
BS in Computer Science or other related discipline
5 or more years of experience with data analytics and data visualization
The candidate should possess extensive experience analyzing large scale datasets from prominent and emerging domains as well as complex social networks using unique and innovative methodologies.
The candidate should have a strong knowledge of data science, various programming languages, and open source technologies.
Skills sought include:
Experienced with utilizing existing open source social media methodologies to apply specialized tools and capabilities in support of the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) national security mission
Experienced organizing analytic results for further analysis
Ability to find patterns in data and clearly articulate the entire analysis (e.g., methodology, results, assumptions, constraints) using various suites of tools
Experienced with databases technologies (e.g., PostgreSQL, Oracle, MySQL, SQL Server, MongoDB, Neo4j)
Experienced manipulating datasets with at least one modern programming language or business intelligence platform like Python, SAS, MATLAB, C++, R, Java, SQL, PL/SQL
Creatively apply visualizations to large datasets using tools like Tableau, Power BI, or Qlik
Ability to understand and map data relationships
Ability to assess the quality of data or tool against a set of requirements
Ability to prepare comprehensive written reports, presentations, and charts based on research, collection, and analysis of intelligence data
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, adapted to a variety of audiences and technical understanding
Advanced and proven ability to:
Assess the gaps between current capabilities and target business/IT needs
Analyze and align business and technology strategies
Identify, analyze, and recommend high-impact alternative solutions and prototypes
Required Business/Soft Skills:
Experience in a customer-facing environment
Ability to leverage both MITRE and team knowledge effectively
Ability to work in a “war room” environment (i.e., close quarters within an open team room with multiple conversations)
Ability to work with a variety of audiences to include sponsors, vendors, and partner contractors
Strong communications and interpersonal skills
Must have good analytical, written, presentation skills
Strong interpersonal communication skills to interact with senior Government staff, technical peers, and MITRE team members
Ability to work in a dynamic fast-paced environment
Preferred Qualifications:
Candidates who currently possess DHS Suitability clearance
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.2,MITRE,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,116.5,VA,5984,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
420,420,Senior Data Scientist,$77k-$156k,"As the world's leader in digital payments technology, Visa's mission is to connect the world through the most creative, reliable and secure payment network - enabling individuals, businesses, and economies to thrive. Our advanced global processing network, VisaNet, provides secure and reliable payments around the world, and is capable of handling more than 65,000 transaction messages a second. The company's dedication to innovation drives the rapid growth of connected commerce on any device, and fuels the dream of a cashless future for everyone, everywhere. As the world moves from analog to digital, Visa is applying our brand, products, people, network and scale to reshape the future of commerce.

At Visa, your individuality fits right in. Working here gives you an opportunity to impact the world, invest in your career growth, and be part of an inclusive and diverse workplace. We are a global team of disruptors, trailblazers, innovators and risk-takers who are helping drive economic growth in even the most remote parts of the world, creatively moving the industry forward, and doing meaningful work that brings financial literacy and digital commerce to millions of unbanked and underserved consumers.

You're an Individual. We're the team for you. Together, let's transform the way the world pays.

To ensure that Visa’s payment technology is truly available to everyone, everywhere requires the success of our key bank or merchant partners and internal business units. The Global Data Science group supports these partners by using our extraordinarily rich data set that spans more than 3 billion cards globally and captures more than 100 billion transactions in a single year. Our focus lies on building creative solutions that have an immediate impact on the business of our highly analytical partners. We work in complementary teams comprising members from Data Science and various groups at Visa. To support our rapidly growing group we are looking for Data Scientists who are equally passionate about the opportunity to use Visa’s rich data to tackle meaningful business problems. You will join one of the Data Science focus areas (e.g., banks, merchants & retailers, digital products, marketing) with an opportunity for rotation within Data Science to gain broad exposure to Visa’s business.

The position is based at Visa's headquarters in the San Francisco Bay Area (Foster City, CA).

Essential Functions
Be an out-of-the-box thinker who is passionate about brainstorming innovative ways to use our unique data to answer business problems
Communicate with clients to understand the challenges they face and convince them with data
Extract and understand data to form an opinion on how to best help our clients and derive relevant insights
Develop visualizations to make your complex analyses accessible to a broad audience
Partner with a variety of Visa teams to provide comprehensive solutions
Find opportunities to craft products out of analyses that are suitable for multiple clients
Work with stakeholders throughout the organization to identify opportunities for leveraging Visa data to drive business solutions
Synthesize ideas/proposals in writing and engage in productive discussions with external or internal stakeholders
Mine and analyze data from company databases to drive optimization and improvement of product, marketing techniques and business strategies for Visa and its clients
Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
Develop custom data models and algorithms to apply to data sets.
Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, data insights, advertising targeting and other business outcomes.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy
Broad knowledge across the entire data science lifecycle, including data engineering, statistics and governance
Provide guidance in modern analytic techniques and business applications to unlock the value of Visa’s unique data set, in keeping with market trends, client needs and emerging techniques
Organize and manage multiple data science projects with diverse cross-functional stakeholders
Basic Qualifications
4 years of work experience with a Bachelor’s Degree or at least 2 years of work experience with an Advanced degree (e.g. Master’s, MBA, JD, MD) or 0 years of work experience with a PhD degree
Preferred Qualifications
6-8 years of work experience with a Bachelor’s Degree or 4-6 years of work experience with an Advanced Degree (e.g. Master’s, MBA, JD, MD) or 3 years of experience with a PhD
4+ years’ experience in data-based decision-making or quantitative analysis
Bachelor’s degree in an analytical field such as statistics, operations research, economics, computer science or many others (graduate degree is a plus)
Experience with extracting and aggregating data from large data sets using SQL or other tools
Competence in Excel, PowerPoint and Tableau
Experience in understanding and analyzing data using statistical software (e.g., Python, SAS, R, Stata or others)
Experience in managing analytics/data science projects from scoping to delivery
Previous exposure to financial services, credit cards or merchant analytics is a plus, but not required
Work Hours:

Incumbent must make themselves available during core business hours.

Physical Requirements

This position will be performed in an office setting. The position will require the incumbent to sit and stand at a desk, communicate in person and by telephone, frequently operate standard office equipment, such as telephones and computers, reach with hands and arms, and bend or lift up to 25 pounds.

Travel

This position requires the incumbent to travel for work 0-5% of the time

Visa is an EEO Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status. Visa will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with EEOC guidelines and applicable local law.",3.7,Visa Inc.,"Foster City, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,62,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,116.5,CA,6166,1,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
423,423,Senior Data Scientist,$77k-$156k,"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking a Senior Data Scientist to develop innovative solutions for customers and internal product teams. We look to rapidly prototype solutions and deploy the most promising of them. We identify and leverage the latest techniques (fast.ai is a team favorite) so that our customers can stay one step ahead. On every project you'll learn something new (and likely teach us something as well).

Responsibilities include:
Develop solutions spanning multiple subject areas, from NLP to image and video.
Maintain awareness of state-of-the-art machine learning and techniques, methods and platforms, including commercial and open source.
Implement, configure and test machine learning and deep learning libraries and platforms (e.g. fast.ai, TensorFlow, Keras, XGBoost, LightGBM).
Test solutions on AWS using services such as SageMaker, EC2, and Snowball Edge.
Write blog posts and presentations that clearly communicate complex machine learning concepts to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Contribute to visually-appealing, web-enabled prototype applications that illustrate relevant machine learning capabilities.
Basic Qualifications:
Experience with Python (2+ years).
Experience with machine learning or statistics (2+ years).
Ability to work both independently and collaboratively.
High levels of curiosity, creativity, and problem-solving capabilities.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Comfortable navigating the command line.
Desired Skills:
Research experience in machine learning specific to natural language processing, computer vision, or deep learning.
Experience with managing data and creating algorithms using AWS.
Experience with R, Java, or other programming languages.
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SCI with polygraph required.
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.


Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,Novetta,"Herndon, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,8,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,116.5,VA,3544,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
431,431,Data Scientist,$77k-$156k,"At Waymo, we're focused on bringing self-driving technology to the world. Our mission is to make it safe and easy for people and things to move around. Today, our driverless cars are serving our first customers with no drivers behind the wheel. To experience our self-driving technology, see this 360-degree video.

In this data science role, you will:
Safety evaluation is of fundamental importance to Waymo, and measuring it is subtle. This role works with a wide variety of teams across the company (onboard software engineering, product, safety, systems engineering) to evaluate the driving and safety performance of Waymo's self driving car. This is based on a wide variety of data from real and simulated driving from Waymo's self-driving system as well as from external data sources.
The Planner Team is responsible for ""motion planning"" for the self driving car. This includes gracefully handling many complex situations involving social interactions (merging, negotiating narrow roads, etc), while dealing with a noisy and uncertain environment. Evaluation of this onboard decision-making system is a complex, open-ended problem with tremendous potential impact. The quality of the road maneuvers we execute is subjective, contextual, and geometrically subtle, and evaluation needs apply to a wide variety of conditions with an extremely long tail.
Additionally:
Analysis and improvement of existing data sources and metrics
Development of novel approaches to measuring and improving
Self-driving performance (either generally, or for motion planning specifically)
Collaborate with engineers and other data scientists to evaluate and improve core
Waymo technologies, with a focus on bringing statistical depth, general analytical rigor, and accurate causal interpretation of data.
We'd like you to have:
PhD in statistics, math, or other quantitative area
Progressive statistics background either in academia or industry
Data science and system evaluation experience
Willingness to understand a complex system and its various components
Experience with tools for manipulating big data
Experience with R/Python and statistical libraries
It's preferred if you have experience in:
Experience with C++
Familiarity with Spark/MapReduce
Training or interest in geometry or classical physics",3.0,Waymo,"Mountain View, CA",-1,Unknown,11,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,116.5,CA,2293,0,data scientist,1,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0
434,434,Data Scientist,$77k-$156k,"The opportunity


Grammarly empowers people to thrive and connect, whenever and wherever they communicate. More than 20 million people around the world use our AI-powered writing assistant every day. All of this begins with our team collaborating in a values-driven and learning-oriented environment.

We're looking for a Data Scientist to help us drive decision-making, find bigger opportunities, and improve our product. As a consumer internet company, we produce huge amounts of data, and in this role, you will have outsize opportunities to develop the insights to make it actionable. You will have broad impact and exposure across Grammarly, working with team members from our Product, Research, Marketing, Engineering, and Finance teams.

Grammarly's engineers and researchers have the freedom to innovate and uncover breakthroughs—and, in turn, influence our product roadmap. The complexity of our technical challenges is growing rapidly as we scale our interfaces, algorithms, and infrastructure. Read more about our stack or hear from our team on our technical blog.

Your impact


As a Data Scientist at Grammarly, you will help our team make better decisions by advocating for data-driven approaches across the organization. Your analysis will contribute to our strategy across the business in areas such as user acquisition, engagement, retention, and more.
Within your first month, you will start developing a good understanding of the overall data-processing pipeline, understand a subset of Grammarly's key metrics, and complete at least two small data reports to present to relevant business owners.
By month three, you will become an expert user of our analytical tools, start contributing to the Data Science team's projects, understand all of Grammarly's key metrics, and independently work on small-to-medium-complexity data projects (including A/B tests, channel analysis, and user engagement).
By month six, you will start working independently on complex data projects, such as user segmentation, short- and long-term user-engagement analysis, and lifetime value projections.
By year one, you will become the go-to person and subject-matter expert for a few of Grammarly's key metrics, own and drive projects independently with minimal supervision, and along with our other Data Scientists, ensure ""data science excellence"" at Grammarly (dashboards, high-quality reports, empowered teams, etc.).
We're looking for someone who
Embodies our EAGER values—is ethical, adaptable, gritty, empathetic, and remarkable.
Holds a PhD in a quantitative field or a masters in a quantitative field and has at least 3 years of experience working as a data scientist.
Has experience in data analysis, A/B testing, retention tracking, etc. (consumer product experience is preferred).
Is proficient in data mining and statistics.
Has experience with SQL as well as experience programming in Python, R, Scala, or an equivalent language.
Has strong analytical and critical thinking skills as well as a strong bias toward actionable insights; loves finding insights and getting others to act on them.
Is a self-starter with superior organizational and prioritization skills.
Support for you, professionally and personally
Professional growth: We hire people we trust, and we give team members autonomy to do their best work. We also support professional development with training, coaching, and regular feedback.
A connected team: Grammarly builds products that help people connect, and we apply this mindset to our own team. We have a highly collaborative culture supported by our EAGER values. We also take time to celebrate our colleagues and accomplishments with global, local, and team-specific events and programs.
Comprehensive benefits: Grammarly offers all team members competitive pay along with a benefits package that includes superior health care. We also offer ample and defined time off, catered lunches, gym and recreation stipends, admission discounts, and more.
We encourage you to apply


At Grammarly, we value our differences, and we encourage all—especially those whose identities are traditionally underrepresented in tech organizations—to apply. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, gender expression or identity, sexual orientation, national origin, citizenship, age, marital status, veteran status, disability status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Grammarly will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance. Grammarly is an equal opportunity employer and participant in the U.S. Federal E-Verify program.",5.0,Grammarly,"San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,11,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,116.5,CA,4651,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
435,435,Junior Data Scientist Data Science Development Program,$77k-$156k,"Description
Junior Data Scientist | Data Science Development Program
Amherst, MA

Deadline to apply: October 15, 2020
Start date: Mid-June, 2021

To finalize application, you must also submit a portfolio of project work. See below for more information.

What Great Looks Like In This Role

Our ideal teammate is someone who is a continuous learner who can adapt and thrive in complex, uncertain and changing situations. Someone who enjoys tackling complex tasks in a collaborative environment is well-suited to a position on our team. Self-motivated individuals comfortable working in a challenging, fast paced, technical environment are highly encouraged to apply!

You Are Able To Demonstrate This Through

A track record of thinking outside the box, taking initiative, and promoting innovation and change-making Ownership, commitment and follow-through in achieving results in school or work projects
Managing priorities effectively and adapting quickly to achieve goals
Pursuing opportunities for continuous learning to develop new skills and perspectives

About the Data Science Development Program

The Data Science Development Program (DSDP) trains junior team members to become well-rounded data scientists within three years. The development program includes high impact project work, mentorship from senior data scientists, in-house training and workshops, and sponsorship for graduate level coursework at the University of Massachusetts Amherst.

Data Science Development Program Highlights:
High-impact project work: Junior data scientists work together with MassMutuals data scientists to solve challenging problems in finance,

operations, marketing, digital initiatives, security, and product development.

Interdisciplinary learning: In the DSDP, junior data scientists are exposed to multiple fields within and adjacent to data science such as data visualization, software engineering, and enterprise architecture.

Mentorship: Peer mentors and senior mentors across data science domains are paired with each member of the DSDP
Training & Development: In-house workshops, tech-talks, seminars, and team-wide learning challenges such as our annual Month of Code

are available to all development program members.

Academic coursework: Members of the DSDP engage in graduate-level courses at the University of Massachusetts Amherst in computer science and statistics according to an individually tailored development plan.

Volunteer & Community Opportunities: Team members have many opportunities to volunteer throughout the year. Junior data scientists volunteer at hackathons throughout the state, attend community data events, speak at external talks, and participate in community data for good efforts annually..

About Us

The MassMutual Data Labs in downtown Amherst consists of a dynamic team that is actively engaged in dozens of high-impact projects across the enterprise, frequently working remotely with teams based in Springfield, MA, New York, and Boston. Our environment and workspace reflects our dedication to innovation and learning, and has a collaborative, start-up vibe. We hold weekly training meetings to present technical ideas, new models, or interesting code libraries.

Junior Data Scientist Duties Include
Statistical analysis
Programming in R and Python
Data ingestion and data cleaning
Model building, testing, deployment, and maintenance Building visualizations
Presenting and explaining output
Executive presentations and discussions
Adherence to internal standards in data science Collaboration across functions and business units

Application Instructions
To finalize your application for consideration, all applicants must submit a portfolio. For instructions, visit https://datascience.massmutual.com

/dsdp/apply

We accept applications from early career professionals and graduating students from undergraduate and graduate programs.

Minimum qualifications

Bachelors degree

Academic study or independent training in computational, quantitative, or technical fields, such as computer science, math, physics, or statistics

Working knowledge of Python, R, and SQL
Quantitative and technical skills in math and computer science Community engagement, involvement, and volunteerism Demonstrated leadership and change-making
Strong communication skills

Applications are accepted on a rolling basis through 2020, with priority consideration for applications received by Friday, October 23rd

*Ability to work in U.S. without sponsorship now or in the future

Preferred qualifications

Enthusiastic about pursuing an interdisciplinary career in data science, analytics, and technology Research and/or practical experience in related fields
Demonstrated work experience through part time employment, internships, or professional endeavors

Committed to Diversity and Inclusion

Our employees are the embodiment of the idea that we all are stronger and better through our support for one another. By valuing people for who they are, how they think, and what they bring to the table, weve become a stronger, more innovative company. We continue to receive external recognition for our policies and programs that seek to create a diverse and inclusive environment.

Americas Best Employer for Diversity Forbes (2019)
Score of 100 on the Human Rights Campaign Corporate Equality Index (2019)
National Association for Female Executives Top Company for Executive Women (2018) Disability Equality Index (DEI) Best Place to Work for Disability Inclusion (2019) Diversity Best Practices Inclusion Index Company (2018)",3.7,MassMutual,"Amherst, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,169,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,116.5,MA,5556,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0
437,437,Data Engineer I,$77k-$156k,"BigCommerce is disrupting the e-commerce industry as the SaaS leader for fast-growing, mid-market businesses

BigCommerce, named a ""Best and Brightest"" place to work in San Francisco 2020 is looking for a Data Engineer. This is an exciting opportunity to build and manage a real time big data pipeline and SaaS analytics platform using the latest cloud technologies. You will be working with cross-functional teams in a highly visible role. You are gritty, focused on results and eager to learn.

What you will do
Build and maintain scalable and reliable near real time data pipeline on cloud that collects, transforms, loads and curates data from various internal and external data sources
Own data quality for the pipelines you build and make them auditable
Evaluate new technologies and build prototypes for continuous improvements in Data Engineering
Partner with Infrastructure and Engineering teams to ensure instrumentation, logging and monitoring is in place
Work with various stakeholders to help define and maintain event schemas needed for Data pipeline
Collaborate with Product, Engineering, QE, Design to build Data products
Communicate effectively w/engineers & stakeholders
Who you are
Bachelor's degree in CS, EE or MIS; or equivalent experience
Strong Software Engineering skills
Understanding of Data Engineering and Distributed Systems
2+ years of programming experience in Python, Java and/or Scala
2+ years of programming experience with SQL (MySQL, Redshift, etc)
A team player, fast learner, with a focus on getting things done
Bonus points
Experience with AWS and/or GCP
Experience with Big Data technologies such as HBase, Kafka, etc.
Diversity & Inclusion at BigCommerce

We have the opportunity to build not only a great business, but a great company, with soul. Our beliefs and commitment to diversity and inclusion are a central part of achieving that.

Our dedication to diversity and inclusion is grounded in two things: a moral belief in the dignity, value, and potential of every individual, and a practical belief that diverse, inclusive teams will create the best outcomes for our customers, partners, employees, and company. We welcome everyone to be a part of our journey.

Current BigCommerce Employees: Please use the internal job board to apply for openings.",4.1,BigCommerce,"San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,11,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,116.5,CA,2298,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
443,443,Data Scientist,$55k-$81k,"A Career with Point72’s MI Data team
At Point72 MI Data, our Data Scientists sift through petabytes of unstructured data from diverse sources to discover trends and insights that help Point72’s Portfolio Managers create new investment theses. We combine an experiment-based approach with the strongest possible management support and the freedom to innovate unencumbered by bureaucracy. We encourage our Data Scientists to imagine the impossible, and provide the structure to bring those ideas to market in months, not years.
What you’ll do
Our Data Scientists conduct research through data mining and statistical modeling to discover insights from Big Data that are used by our investment professionals to make investment decisions. You will have the opportunity to work in a highly collegial environment that emphasizes teaching and learning as a team. In this role, you will:
Tackle the challenges of featurizing and modeling large and unstructured data using machine learning and statistical techniques
Manage all aspects of the research and execution process including methodology selection, data collection and quality, modeling and analysis, and performance monitoring
Deliver research findings to investment teams, portfolio managers, and other internal clients
Work within a team to help drive technical innovation through a collaborative R&D process

What’s required
We look for candidates with extensive knowledge in machine learning, statistical models, and data mining tools, and a proven track record of working with large structured and unstructured data sets to extract timely, actionable insights. Other requirements include:
MS or PhD degree in a quantitative discipline
3+ years of industry working experience in a role that requires advanced statistical analysis
3+ years of hands-on working experience with varied and complex data sets
Strong programming skills in the following languages: SQL, Python (preferred), R, Scala, Spark
Ability to think creatively and see the big picture as well as finer details

We take care of our people
We invest in our people, their careers, their health, and their well-being. We want you to concentrate on success and leave the rest to us. When you work here, we provide:
Fully-paid health care benefits
Generous parental and family leave policies
Mental and physical wellness programs
Tuition assistance
A 401(k) savings program with an employer match and more

About Point72
Point72 Asset Management is a global firm led by Steven Cohen that invests in multiple asset classes and strategies worldwide. Resting on more than a quarter-century of investing experience, we seek to be the industry’s premier asset manager through delivering superior risk-adjusted returns, adhering to the highest ethical standards, and offering the greatest opportunities to the industry’s brightest talent. We’re inventing the future of finance by revolutionizing how we develop our people and how we use data to shape our thinking.",3.9,Point72,"New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,6,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,68.0,NY,2971,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,1,0,0
444,444,Data Engineer,$55k-$81k,"Who is Trace3?

Trace3 is a leading Transformative IT Authority, providing unique technology solutions and consulting services to our clients. Equipped with elite engineering and dynamic innovation, we empower IT executives and their organizations to achieve competitive advantage through a process of Integrate, Automate, Innovate.

Our culture at Trace3 embodies the spirit of a startup with the advantage of a scalable business. Employees can grow their career and have fun while doing it!

Trace3 is headquartered in Irvine, California. We employ more than 850 people all over the United States. Our major field office locations include Atlanta, Denver, Detroit, Indianapolis, Grand Rapids, Lexington, Los Angeles, Louisville, San Diego, San Francisco, and Scottsdale.

Ready to discover the possibilities that live in technology?

Come Join Us!

Street-Smart - Thriving in Dynamic Times

We are flexible and resilient in a fast-changing environment. We continuously innovate and drive constructive change while keeping a focus on the ""big picture."" We exercise sound business judgment in making high-quality decisions in a timely and cost-effective manner. We are highly creative and can dig deep within ourselves to find positive solutions to different problems.

Juice - The ""Stuff"" it takes to be a Needle Mover

We get things done and drive results. We lead without a title, empowering others through a can-do attitude. We look forward to the goal, mentally mapping out every checkpoint on the pathway to success, and visualizing what the final destination looks and feels like.

Teamwork - Humble, Hungry and Smart

We are humble individuals who understand how our job impacts the company's mission. We treat others with respect, admit mistakes, give credit where it's due and demonstrate transparency. We ""bring the weather"" by exhibiting positive leadership and solution-focused thinking. We hug people in their trials, struggles, and failures – not just their success. We appreciate the individuality of the people around us.

About the Role:

What You'll Do:

The Data Engineer will be responsible for leveraging new and emerging technologies to solve key technical challenges for our clients. The Data Engineer will act as an expert and trusted advisor who develops, implements, troubleshoots, and optimizes data solutions across many platforms. This role will work closely with clients, partners and other business units to ensure consulting engagements are successful.

SUMMARY OF ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS:
Understand customers' overall data estate, IT and business priorities and success measures to design implementation architectures and solutions using advanced analytics and artificial intelligence
Develop deep relationships with key customer IT decision makers, who drive long-term cloud adoption within their company to enable them to be cloud advocates
Maintain and advance deep technical skills and knowledge, keeping up to date with market trends and competitive insights, and share within the technical community
Be a Voice of Customer to share insights and best practices, connect with Engineering team to remove key blockers
Assess the Customers' knowledge of Azure platform and overall cloud readiness to support customers through a structured learning plan and ensure its delivery through partners
Responsible for design, development, and hands-on implementation of data intelligence solutions including data platform build-up, proof of concepts or pilot implementation, software development, software integration, and documentation
Perform hands on development of apache, big data technologies, and framework
Serve as a data intelligence technical resource in team's efforts to determine the needs of our client's businesses that will simplify and automate the applications as well as make them more efficient
Align solutions with standards and best practices working with cross-functional engineering and consulting teams
Collaborate and communicate with Sales and Account Management team to ensure smooth and successful delivery and assist with the identification of additional Advanced Services and Sales opportunities within the customer's environment
Establish strong and lasting relationships with key stakeholders and decision makers in client organizations
Contribute to the development of internal best practices as well as new innovative consulting services offerings that we can take to market
Build a community and following around our company solutions and brand awareness
REQUIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE:
Bachelor's degree from an accredited university required
Understanding and hands on experience with modern distributed data systems(Hadoop ecosystem, public cloud, etc).
Experience building applications in c# or java.
Understanding of BI technologies from traditional data warehousing to SaaS solutions in the cloud.
Experience in designing data and analytics architectures in Microsoft Azure cloud.
Well informed on cloud native technologies that enable batch and streaming data ingestion into cloud (For example: Azure Data Factory, Azure Event Hubs, Azure IoT Hubs etc)
Experienced in designing data lakes in Azure cloud for serving big data analytical workloads.
Proven track record of driving decisions collaboratively, resolving conflicts and ensuring follow through with exceptional verbal and written communication skills
Microsoft Certified Azure Solutions Architect Expert certification a plus.
Previous experience working for a consulting or services organization strongly preferred
5+ years of software development experience in distributed systems and building large-scale applications
5+ years of experience in building large scale, high performance, high availability systems and Strong Computer Science fundamentals (algorithms, data structures)
Hadoop, NoSQL or other Big Data certifications are a huge plus
Experience with Big Data technologies (SPARK, HDFS, HBase, Cloudera, MAPR, Hadoop and other frameworks in Hadoop ecosystem
Deep knowledge of Hadoop tools (MapReduce, SPARK, Oozie, ELK, KAFKA, HUE, HBase)
Fluency in several programming languages such as Python, Scala, or Java, with the ability to pick up new languages and technologies quickly
Intermediate knowledge with software engineering best practices
Must be able to quickly understand technical and business requirements and be able to translate them into technical implementations
Ability to mix deep technical expertise with simple, everyday language to deliver a story that is memorable, educational and useful
Highly organized, detail-oriented, excellent time management skills and able to effectively prioritize tasks in a fast-paced, high-volume, and evolving work environment
Ability to approach customer and sales requests with a proactive and consultative manner; listen and understand user requests and needs and effectively deliver
Comfortable managing multiple and changing priorities, and meeting deadlines in an entrepreneurial environment
Motivated self-starter who loves to troubleshoot and solve challenging problems and feels comfortable working directly with customers
The Perks:
Comprehensive medical, dental and vision plans for you and your dependents
401(k) Retirement Plan with Employer Match, 529 College Savings Plan, Health Savings Account, Life Insurance, and Long-Term Disability
Competitive Compensation
Training and development programs
Stocked kitchen with snacks and beverages
Collaborative and cool office culture
Work-life balance and generous paid time off
***To all recruitment agencies: Trace3 does not accept unsolicited agency resumes/CVs. Please do not forward resumes/CVs to our careers email addresses, Trace3 employees or any other company location. Trace3 is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/CVs.",3.4,Trace3,"Houston, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,18,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,68.0,TX,7802,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
447,447,Data Engineer,$55k-$81k,"Data Engineer
Location


Atlanta - Midtown

Department


Systems Architecture Enterprise

Employment duration


Full time

Apply Now

Work at Purchasing Power


Purchasing Power is a fantastic place to work because: Purchasing Power was founded on the belief that we could empower people and provide the means for them to obtain the small (and sometimes big!) things that improve the quality of their lives.

Data Engineer

Purchasing Power, Atlanta, GA (Midtown Location)

Data Engineer

Purchasing Power one of Atlanta’s fastest-growing e-retailers is seeking a Data Engineer to join our team in Atlanta, GA. In this role, the selected candidate will be responsible for all aspects of the design and implementation of mid-to-large scale enterprise projects by delivering data pipelines in a cloud environment and will report directly to the Data Architect. The Data Engineer will be responsible for consistently analyzing and maintaining our AWS cluster for our data warehouse. In this role, you will maintain the data pipeline and ensure that data lineages are kept up to date.

What you’ll do (Duties)
Work with enterprise/application/solution architects, product architects, product owners, data scientists, and engineers to bring big data and data science R&D projects into Production.
Deliver “hands-on” design expertise in support of the Purchasing Power Environment. Looking for Data Architects/Engineers to build, optimize, and maintain conceptual and logical database models.
Develops and maintains scalable data pipelines and builds out integrations to support continuing increases in data volume and complexity.
Demonstrate technical expertise in enterprise-level cloud data architecture and advance analytic solutions
Understanding of conceptual, logical, and physical architectures for cloud-based data solutions – AWS preferred.
Develop end-to-end cloud data solutions including architecture, infrastructure, storage, data model, ETL/ELT, and consumption
Lead the technical design and solution of migrating on-premise legacy data solutions to cloud-based data platforms. Again, AWS is our preferred cloud infrastructure and would prefer somebody with extensive AWS experience in EC2 and Redshift.
Define best practices and frameworks for capabilities across the data and analytics landscape.
Designs and evaluates open source and vendor tools for data lineage
Works closely with all business units and engineering teams to develop a strategy for long term data platform architecture.
Provide visionary leadership for projects related to Big Data technologies and software development support for client research projects
Establishes and participates in data management processes including data lineage, data profiling, data quality management, data stewardship, and governance.
Document the architecture and architectural decisions related to the assigned application portfolio.
Develop highly scalable and extensible data platforms/warehouses which enable the collection, storage, modeling, and analysis of massive data sets
Requirements
Experience with Java/J2EE technologies and other web technologies.
Experience working with a data pipeline in the cloud (AWS highly preferred).
Kafka, Spark, Zookeeper, Kafka Connect, Oracle, Dremio, Redshift, Elastic Search, and other open source technologies are a requirement.
Data Visualization: any of Tableau, PowerBI, QlikView, Domo
Data Ingestion framework: Confluent platform including Kafka, Kafka connect, Schema Registry
Database Platforms (DBaaS): Snowflake, RedShift, Azure SQL DW, Azure SQL DB, Big Query
At least 3-5 years of dimensional data modeling
Strong Scripting skills in Python and shell scripting.
In-depth understanding of database structure principles
Familiarity with data visualization tools
Strong interpersonal and management skills.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Good understanding of SDLC process.
Experience working in public cloud environments, i.e. AWS
Enterprise Database: Oracle, DB2, SQL Server, Mongo DB, NoSQL, Dynamo DB
Retail industry knowledge and experience required
Source control knowledge: GitHub
Agile / Scrum experience preferred
To be able to work in a fast-paced agile development environment
B.Sc in Computer Science preferred
Nice To have but not required: ML, AI,
Must have Elastic Search experience
Why Purchasing Power?

We are the leading specialty e-retailer offering consumer products, vacations and online education services through an easy and convenient payment plan. Our customers love us because we make paying for their purchases stress- and hassle-free. The automatic payments help them to avoid penalty fees and ballooning interest associated with other payment options. While the fixed payment duration options empower them to budget more efficiently. Ours is a revolutionary e-commerce experience that gives customers access to a better life combined with a responsible way to buy.

Purchasing Power is ‘Powering People to a Better Life™’ through its employee purchase program, financial literacy efforts and charitable contributions.

For more information, visit www.PurchasingPower.com
Our people! We are very proud of our people, we “Power People to a better life”
100% company paid benefits for employees
Kitchen stocked with gourmet coffee, teas and free snacks
Casual work environment
Summer Hours
Flexible PTO
Top of the line hardware
Purchasing Power is an equal opportunity employer. At Purchasing Power, we make all employment decisions, which include hiring, promoting, transferring, demoting, evaluating, compensating and separating, without regard to sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, race, color, religion, age, national origin, pregnancy, citizenship, disability, service in the uniform services, or any other classification protected by federal, state or local law.",2.5,Purchasing Power,"Atlanta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,19,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,68.0,GA,5835,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
448,448,Data Engineer,$55k-$81k,"Company Description
Sagence is a management advisory firm dedicated to helping our clients optimize the value of their data assets. From thinking to doing, Sagence works with leading institutions in the acquisition, evaluation, development and management of their critical data assets and in the application of analytics to discover new insights, shorten time-to-value, and drive competitive advantage.
**All candidates must be currently authorized to work in the US on a full-time basis. Sagence does not provide sponsorship for work visas upon hire or once on board.**
Job Overview
Sagence is looking for experienced, client-facing Data Engineers to help us build and sustain our client’s data capabilities and our competitive advantage. Along with the requirements below, candidates must possess deep, practical experience in one or more of the following Data Management competencies; data warehousing, data lakes, reference data or master data management, data architecture, data modeling, data governance, data analysis, business intelligence.
Skills & Requirements:
MUST BE HANDS ON. Candidates should have system development experience and proficiency with system development methodologies and possess the following skills and knowledge:
Must have significant hands-on experience with various IT concepts of data management/engineering (ETL, data modeling, data warehousing, etc.)
Must have significant hands-on experience with SQL, data profiling, and data discovery
Experience building business intelligence, analytics, or reporting solutions - either front-end consumption mechanisms (e.g., Microsoft, Tableau & Qlik) or supply of data for these purposes
Familiarity with data architecture principles/approaches, data environment infrastructure considerations, and data modeling principles/approaches
Ability to drive out technical requirements with business and IT stakeholders for implementations of data solutions
Hands-on experience with Agile delivery methodology
Prior professional experience in an IT management, management consulting, or client facing role is preferred
Knowledge of the Financial Services, Insurance, Healthcare or Retail industries is preferred
Demonstrated ability in engaging, communicating, and presenting to stakeholders across both business and technology functions
Tools and Technology:
Proficient at leveraging tools and technology to drive value for clients. Examples include the following;
Database Management Tools:
Relational – e.g. Oracle, MySQL, Microsoft SQL Server, PostgreSQL, DB, or similar
NoSQL – e.g. MongoDB, Couchbase, DataStax, Redix, MarkLogic, or similar
Cloud – e.g. AWS, Azure, xxx, xxx, xxx
ETL Tools - e.g. Informatica, Talend, Microsoft SSIS, or similar
Data Modeling tools - e.g., Toad, ERWin, ER/Studio, PowerDesigner, IBM Data Architect, or similar
Industry Leading BI tools - e.g., Business Objects, Microsoft, Cognos, Tableau, OBIEE, Qlickview, or similar
General:
Must be currently authorized to work in the US on a full-time basis. Sagence does not provide sponsorship for work visas
3+ years of professional experience working in a related role
Must be collaborative, innovative, curious, and resourceful, and exhibit a positive attitude
Strong desire to work on interesting projects with smart and creative people
Willingness to travel up to 80% of the week (M-Th)
Chicago or New York area candidates preferred, but will consider candidates in other parts of U.S.
Our Culture
Passionate, diverse, creative, genuine, flexible, hands-on…these are just a few of the words that describe our culture. Our Partners are deeply involved in the client work on a daily basis. We have a high-energy workplace with a focus on producing high-quality, impactful results. We are committed to equality of opportunity, fairness, work and lifestyle balance, and mutual respect. We promote an entrepreneurial spirit by encouraging individual initiative and foster a collaborative culture and work environment which includes open communication and on-going learning. We build teamwork through small, dedicated teams who continuously teach each other and learn from one another. We strongly believe these characteristics enable our employees to develop to their fullest potential. To learn more, please visit us at www.sagenceconsulting.com",4.6,Sagence,"Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,11,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,68.0,IL,4294,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
451,451,Principal Data Engineer,$55k-$81k,"Principal Data Engineer
People make Sage great. From our colleagues delivering ground-breaking solutions to the customers who use them: people have helped us grow for more than thirty years, and people are driving our future as a great SaaS company. We’re writing our next chapter. Be part of it!

Experience has taught us that when our customers thrive, we thrive. As a team, we always start with what customers need. Through the good… and more challenging times. Innovating at pace so customers can manage their finances, operations and people. Every one of us shapes our culture at Sage - doing what’s right and succeeding together, united by our commitment to each other. We encourage each other to grow in our roles, in our careers and as individuals.

Follow us on our social media sites below to join in conversations about career tips, open positions and company news! #lifeatsage #sagecareers. If you would like support with your application (or require any adjustments) please contact us at careers@sage.com for assistance. All qualified applicants will be thoughtfully considered and never discriminated against based on their race, color, age, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status.

EOE AA/M/F/Vet/Disability
Sage Software is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We comply with the laws set forth in the Equal Employment Opportunity in The Law poster: http://1sa.ge/EjaS30kzhpR
Who we are:

Sage Artificial Intelligence Labs ""SAIL"" is a nimble team within Sage building the future of cloud business management by using artificial intelligence to turbocharge our users' productivity. The SAIL team builds capabilities to help businesses make better decisions through data-powered insights.

We are currently hiring a Principal Data Engineer to help us build machine learning solutions that will provide insights to empower businesses and help them succeed. As a part of our cross-functional team including data scientists and engineers you will help steer the direction of the entire company’s Data Science and Machine Learning effort.

If you share our excitement for machine learning, value a culture of continuous improvement and learning and are excited about working with cutting edge technologies, apply today!
You will:
• Work closely with our Data Scientists and ML engineers to build data warehouses and pipelines
• Collaborate with our AI Infrastructure team to extend the capabilities of our machine learning platform
• Monitor and optimize the quality and performance of our data pipelines and tools
• Collaborate with other teams to integrate new data sources, ensuring privacy and security protocols are followed
• Collaborate with data scientists and ML engineers to design and build data analytics tools for detecting data anomalies and ensuring data quality

You have:
• 5+ years of relevant practical experience working on data integration, data modelling and metadata management
• Expert knowledge and experience with several relevant languages, tools and frameworks: e.g. Python, SQL, Scala, Spark, Beam, Hadoop, Pig, Hive, Amazon Kinesis, Amazon EMR etc
• Database experience: e.g. you know how to write and optimize SQL queries, design efficient schemas for OLAP and OLTP and understand differences and tradeoffs between them
• Excellent written and verbal communication skills, and ability to evaluate and explain technical details clearly
• Willingness to adapt to significant changes in either technology or environment
• Previous experience working with financial data is a plus

What's it like to work here
You will have an opportunity to work in an environment where Data Science is central to what we do. The products we build are breaking new ground, and we have a focus on providing the best environment to allow you to do what you do best - solve problems, collaborate with your team and push first class software. Our distributed team is spread across multiple continents, we promote an open diverse environment, encourage contributions to open-source software and invest heavily in our staff. Our team is talented, capable and inclusive. We know that great things can only be done with great teams and look forward to continuing this direction.

Do you love where you work? WE do!

Who is Sage? https://www.sage.com/en-us/company/careers/who-we-are/
How we make a difference: https://www.sage.com/en-us/company/sage-foundation/
Champion of Business Builders: https://www.sage.com/en-us/products/
Life at Sage: https://www.sage.com/en-us/company/careers/life-at-sage/

Our comprehensive total rewards program included:
• Extended health, dental and vision coverage
• On-going training and professional development
• 21 days paid time off from the start
• Paid 5 days to volunteer through our Sage Foundation
• Matching Retirement contributions
• And, so much more…
Product
United States
San Jose;San Francisco",4.2,Sage,"San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,39,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,68.0,CA,4903,1,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
453,453,Senior Data Scientist,$55k-$81k,"Company Overview:
Age of Learning is a leading education technology innovator based in Glendale, California, with a talented team of more than 600 individuals comprised of nationally-renowned educators, curriculum experts, developers, artists, writers, designers, engineers, producers, product managers, analysts and marketing experts! Together we develop engaging, effective digital learning technology and content to help children build a strong academic foundation for lifelong success.
Our flagship product ABCmouse.com Early Learning Academy® is a comprehensive online curriculum and the #1 digital learning product for young children. To-date, more than 30 million children worldwide have completed over 7 billion Learning Activities on ABCmouse. We recently launched Adventure Academy, the first massively multiplayer online (MMO) game designed specifically to help elementary- and middle-school-aged children learn. It features thousands of engaging Learning Activities—including minigames, books, original animated and live action series, and more—in a fun and safe virtual world. Other Age of Learning programs include immersive English language learning products for children in China and Japan; ReadingIQ, a digital library and literacy platform; and a groundbreaking personalized, adaptive digital learning system that individualizes math instruction for every child through AI-driven technology.

We are committed to helping all children succeed. We provide our educational programs at no cost to teachers, Head Start programs, public libraries, and other community organizations, and have served millions of children through these initiatives. We recently established the Age of Learning Foundation to expand this work globally.
As we expand our global reach and increase the educational impact of our programs, we’re looking for passionate, ambitious, and collaborative leaders to become a part of our growing team.


Summary:
We are seeking a strong, highly-motivated, results-oriented Senior Data Scientist to help conduct in-depth analyses and derive relevant insights. You will be an integral part of a newly-formed central analytics team and your work will influence business operations and strategy throughout the company.
In this senior role, you will be the go-to person for advanced analytics and data science projects as well as mentoring and assisting junior analysts on our centralized data and analytics team as need be.
Responsibilities:
Partner closely with stakeholders from a variety of teams, including the executive team, curriculum, brand marketing, partnerships, strategy and customer success, to surface insights and learnings that solve key business challenges
Develop statistical analyses and build and deploy machine learning models to understand and predict customer behavior and product performance
Create, report and interpret key metrics to assess performance, measure the impact of strategic initiatives, and identify ways to grow revenue and reduce costs
Drive A/B and multivariate testing strategy and implementation of user behavior to inform media tactics, audience acquisition and targeting, churn, lifetime value, product and content recommendations and personalized experiences
Create beautiful visualizations
Communicate results to technical and non-technical stakeholders and mentor/lead more junior analysts as needed
Drive data capture and data integrity requirements while partnering with other teams so that the right data is captured
Maintain vigilant eye on data quality
Develop frameworks, models, tools, and processes to ensure data-driven decisions across org
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative field and 5+ years of experience in professional data-intensive role excluding any independent data-related projects or internships that may or may not have been part of an undergraduate program
OR Master’s and/or Ph.D. in a quantitative field and 3+ years of experience in professional data-intensive role excluding any independent data-related projects or internships that may or may not have been part of an graduate program
Advanced knowledge of analytical, statistical and machine learning methods
Proficiency in SQL and complex SQL querying
Experience modeling in R and/or Python
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Proven ability to explain technical concepts to non-technical stakeholders
Must be intellectually curious, self-motivated, collaborative, and a team player
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience productionalizing models a plus
Experience with testing and optimization a plus, ideally in a digital environment
Experience in games or education a plus
We Provide:
Medical, Dental, Vision + 401k
Highly competitive PTO policy
Casual Dress Code
Snacks + Drinks (Coca Cola Freestyle Machine)
Gaming room including an Arcade (2,000+ games)
Frequent team and company outings
Limitless opportunities for professional growth!",3.2,Age of Learning,"Glendale, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,13,Company - Private,other_industries,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,68.0,CA,4934,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,1,1
454,454,"Senior Data Scientist (San Francisco, CA)",$55k-$81k,"Earnest empowers people with the financial capital they need to live better lives.

We're an accomplished team of technology, finance, and design geeks who believe consumer lending can be radically improved and are doing something about it. We are disrupting the trillion dollar student loan industry by redefining what it means to be creditworthy. We created a company that combines data science, streamlined design, and technology to:
Build products that simplify the lending process.
Personalize loans to suit the needs of our customers.
Engage with our customers through more human experiences.
Our culture is one that values transparency and blameless problem solving. Earnest has a strong track record of employee growth and career progression. Earnies are empathetic, product-focused, proactive, and curious.

As the Senior Data Scientist, you will report to the Head of Analytics and:
Prototype machine learning models that encapsulate best practices around feature engineering, model selection, and model validation.
Write code in common machine learning frameworks (Scikit-learn, Tensorflow, Pytorch).
Write ETL pipelines that would transform Earnest data into consumable insights and intelligence.
Present impact of models and analyses to executive stakeholders.
Improve existing models by identifying defects and proposing changes to model methodologies.
Ideal background and expertise:
5+ years developing traditional data science models
2+ years experience building production-ready machine learning models and systems
3+ years in Python and SQL
Master's degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Engineering, or a related field
Earnest Perks & Benefits:
Health, Dental, & Vision benefits plus savings plans
Employee Stock Purchase Plan
401(k) plan to help you save for retirement plus a company match
Tuition reimbursement program
$1000 flight on each Earnie-versary to anywhere in the world and 25 days of annual PTO
Great culture with an awesome team
Earnest provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. Qualified applicants with criminal histories will be considered for the position in a manner consistent with the Fair Chance Ordinance.

#LI-ES1",3.8,Earnest,"San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,7,Subsidiary or Business Segment,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,68.0,CA,2303,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,1
456,456,Staff Data Scientist,$55k-$81k,"At realtor.com, we process terabytes of data everyday and transform that data into information that powers decisions for millions of home buyers, renters, dreamers, and real estate professionals. We aim to radically simplify home buying/selling and help more people achieve the American dream on our realtor.com website and mobile apps.

What will you do?

We seek a highly seasoned Staff Data Scientist to join our experienced data science team and help take it to the next level. As a key member of the team, you will be responsible for the development of innovative concepts, research, predictive modeling, and machine learning algorithms. You will serve as a mentor for the junior data scientists on the team and provide guidance on their individual projects.

Responsibilities:
Develop predictive, explanatory models and machine learning algorithms.
Create automated learning systems that gracefully scale to increasing complexity and expectation.
Perform exploratory analysis on realtor.com's wealth of data including consumer web and mobile behavior and North America's most comprehensive and up-to-date listings and properties data set.
Effectively partner with product and engineering teams to build new data driven and machine learning based features for enriching the consumer experience of home shoppers, renters and sellers.
Design and build data science solutions to drive revenue growth, customer retention and support strategic decision making.
Generate descriptive visualizations and presentations to communicate insights.
Drive A/B & multivariate tests and design of experiments to facilitate testing of new product and design features, with focus on improving engagement, retention, and conversion.
Help improve the scope of our data sets by identifying new data collection and procurement opportunities on an ongoing basis.
Mentor a team of data scientists on data exploration, machine learning and developing data-oriented products.
Work with a sense of ownership and urgency, advocate for experimentation based, agile culture.
What will you bring?
Requirements:
PhD/MS in computer science, statistics, mathematics, operations research or related fields.
4+ years of relevant experience in data science, machine learning or applied statistics.
Experience with Machine Learning, NLP or Computer Vision and data mining tools and underlying algorithms.
Experienced in Python, R, Spark or other languages and frameworks appropriate for large scale analysis of structured and unstructured data.
Working experience with relational databases (SQL) and large scale distributed systems.
Experience with experiment design and A/B and multivariate tests.
Proven track record of developing online data products.
Strong creative thinking and problem solving skills.
Excellent oral and written communication and presentation skills.
About realtor.com

At realtor.com®, we believe that everyone deserves a home of their own. We're a community of nearly 2,000 employees that work hard to ensure that from the moment someone starts dreaming about a new home, to the moment they walk in the door and beyond, we're there to lend a helping hand. Every month, 70 million people trust us with their journey home by visiting our site and mobile apps, and we'd love to have you join our team to help.

We've got great offices across Canada and the US and lots of sweet jobs to choose from, so we're hoping you'll join us on our journey to make home buying and selling easier, and more rewarding for everyone.

Let's make a difference, together. For Real.

#LI-IH1",2.7,realtor.com,"Santa Clara, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,27,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,68.0,CA,3560,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,1,0,0
457,457,Cloud Data Engineer,$55k-$81k,"Who is Trace3?

Trace3 is a leading Transformative IT Authority, providing unique technology solutions and consulting services to our clients. Equipped with elite engineering and dynamic innovation, we empower IT executives and their organizations to achieve competitive advantage through a process of Integrate, Automate, Innovate.

Our culture at Trace3 embodies the spirit of a startup with the advantage of a scalable business. Employees can grow their career and have fun while doing it!

Trace3 is headquartered in Irvine, California. We employ more than 850 people all over the United States. Our major field office locations include Atlanta, Denver, Detroit, Indianapolis, Grand Rapids, Lexington, Los Angeles, Louisville, San Diego, San Francisco, and Scottsdale.

Ready to discover the possibilities that live in technology?

Come Join Us!

Street-Smart - Thriving in Dynamic Times

We are flexible and resilient in a fast-changing environment. We continuously innovate and drive constructive change while keeping a focus on the ""big picture."" We exercise sound business judgment in making high-quality decisions in a timely and cost-effective manner. We are highly creative and can dig deep within ourselves to find positive solutions to different problems.

Juice - The ""Stuff"" it takes to be a Needle Mover

We get things done and drive results. We lead without a title, empowering others through a can-do attitude. We look forward to the goal, mentally mapping out every checkpoint on the pathway to success, and visualizing what the final destination looks and feels like.

Teamwork - Humble, Hungry and Smart

We are humble individuals who understand how our job impacts the company's mission. We treat others with respect, admit mistakes, give credit where it's due and demonstrate transparency. We ""bring the weather"" by exhibiting positive leadership and solution-focused thinking. We hug people in their trials, struggles, and failures – not just their success. We appreciate the individuality of the people around us.

JOB SUMMARY:

The Data Engineer (DE) provides technical expertise primarily in the Engage and Evolve phases of Trace3's services framework. In the ""Engage"" phase, the BDE primarily delivers building and integration. The DE also may assist in delivering development and customization services in the ""Evolve"" phase. The DE is a deeply technical role in their specific discipline area(s) of expertise (Data Scientist, Programmer, Hadoop Engineer, etc.)

SUMMARY OF ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS:
Minimum 6 months of designing, building and operationalizing large scale enterprise data solutions and applications using AZURE or AWS data and analytics services in combination with custom solutions - Spark, Azure Data Lake, HDInsights, SQL DW, DocumentDB, Search, Elastic Pool etc.
Minimum 6 months of hands-on experience analyzing, rearchitecting and re-platforming on-premise data warehouses to data platforms on AZURE or AWS cloud using AZURE or AWS custom services.
Minimum 6 months of designing and building production data pipelines from ingestion to consumption within a hybrid big data architecture, using Java, Python, Scala etc.
Minimum 6 months Experience in performing detail assessments of current state data platforms and creating an appropriate transition path to AZURE or AWS cloud.
Hands-on Cloud experience with examples of solutions designed and implemented at production scale.
REQUIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Technical Science or 3 years of technical architecture and build experience with large scale solutions.
Minimum 6 months of experience in architecting large-scale data solutions, performing architectural assessments, crafting architectural options and analysis, finalizing preferred solution alternative working with IT and Business stakeholders.
6 months of hands-on experience architecting, implementing operating large production Hadoop clusters on Cloud using Azure HDInsight or Amazon EMR.
6 months of hands-on experience in implementing Kafka pipelines for streaming data ingestion into Azure or AWS cloud,
6 months of hands-on experience designing and implementing data ingestion solutions using Azure Data Factory, AWS Glue or using custom approaches.
6 months of hands-on experience designing and implementing data lakes on AZURE or AWS cloud serving analytics and BI application integrations.
6 months of experience in designing and optimizing data models on AZURE or AWS cloud using data stores such as AWS Redshift, Amazon RDS, Amazon Aurora, Azure Cosmos DB, Azure SQL Data Warehouse and Azure SQL Databases/Managed Instances.
Minimum 6 months of experience introducing and operationalizing self-service data preparation tools (e.g. Trifacta, Paxata) on AZURE.
Minimum 6 months architecting and implementing metadata management on AZURE.
Architecting and implementing data governance and security for data platforms on AZURE.
Designing operations architecture and conducting performance engineering for large scale data lakes a production environment.
Craft and lead client design workshops and provide tradeoffs and recommendations towards building a solutions.
IMPORTANT ATTRIBUTES

Entrepreneurial in a team setting
Entrepreneurial: anticipates and identifies what needs to be done and takes action
Team setting: communicative, aware of potential synergies and conflicts
Energized by growing the business from the ground up
Consultative problem solving
Clearly understands clients' short- and long-term goals and obstacles and constraints even in ambiguous/vague settings
Uses these to frame the problem
Develops solutions that leverages repeatable components
Demonstrates clarity and confidence to clients by articulating issues and solutions in clients' contexts
Innovative
Continuously seeks to develop ever-better way to frame the problem and to develop solutions than those that are generally accepted
Willing and able to develop and test new hypotheses
Aware of and challenges conventional approaches within the realistic parameters of time, capabilities, and budgets
Results-oriented
Self-identifies strategies, milestones, and plans, and focused on achieving them
Resourceful and finds ways to circumvent obstacles or minimizes their impacts
The Perks:
Comprehensive medical, dental and vision plans for you and your dependents
401(k) Retirement Plan with Employer Match, 529 College Savings Plan, Health Savings Account, Life Insurance, and Long-Term Disability
Competitive Compensation
Training and development programs
Stocked kitchen with snacks and beverages
Collaborative and cool office culture
Work-life balance and generous paid time off
***To all recruitment agencies: Trace3 does not accept unsolicited agency resumes/CVs. Please do not forward resumes/CVs to our careers email addresses, Trace3 employees or any other company location. Trace3 is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/CVs.",3.4,Trace3,"Irvine, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,18,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,68.0,CA,6959,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
461,461,Principal Data Scientist,$55k-$81k,"Job Description:


Fidelity is asking the question: How much AI can be applied to practically improve investors decision support process? Fidelity is looking for an experienced data scientist to advance the research and development of AI/ML methods as components in the delivery of innovative investment management technology solutions. This role will design and implement portfolio risk and optimization techniques to deliver industry differentiated capabilities.

The ideal candidate will have experience combining multi-variate statistical modeling, machine learning and open-source approaches to Cloud computing and Big Data into practical investment capabilities. We desire candidates with proven track records in the design and implementation of deep learning and/or portfolio optimization methods. Experience/interest in high performance computing, including quantum computing will be a plus.

This position will be based in Boston, MA.


The Team

The Advanced Technology for Investment Management (ATIM) is an innovation team within Fidelity. ATIM makes pivotal investments in building break-through technologies as practical and innovative investment capabilities. The goal is to continually strengthen investment decision support, build portfolio construction insights and support personalized investment goals. The team works within an innovation ecosystem that includes partners from investment, client relations, technology and centralized R&D units. Fidelitys ATIM seeks cross-domain authorities with backgrounds that connect investment management, machine learning and technology implementation. We cultivate success through a rigorous, collaborative approach that builds, tests, and iterates as we learn and seek challenging processes and problems in investment management.

The Expertise You Have
PhD in Computer Science, Applied Math, Statistics, Physics, Data Science or related field
Interest in financial markets, products, and investment processes.
Prior experience in building simulation models, predictive models or optimization solutions which delivered business value.
Expertise in model evaluation and computation performance tuning on production environment
Strong verbal and written communication skills, effective in interacting with both technical and non-technical professionals.
Embrace agile methodology and pay meticulous attention to detail
Unquestioned integrity
The Skills You Bring


Required:
Proven and deep expertise in applying deep learning, generative modeling and advanced AI techniques to tackle business problems
Proven passion for the financial markets, products, and investment process (including: Fixed Income Analytics, Asset Pricing Models and Multi-Factor Risk Models)
Good applied knowledge with statistical models, predictive models and time series analysis (such as regression, classification, simulation, dimension reduction techniques)
Good applied knowledge of mathematical algorithms of solving common optimization problems (including: linear/nonlinear/integer programming)
Proven success building computing algorithms with Java, Scala, Python or R with GPUs and/or map-reduce framework
Strong data exploration and analysis skills using advanced SQL
Desire to work with interactive web tools and quick prototyping with visualization
Preferred:

Experience with crafting proprietary machine learning processes to model dynamic dependencies and causalities
Knowledge with quantum computing, applying existing quantum computing libraries and quantum circuit design
The Value You Deliver
Advancing the research and development of AI/ML methods as components in the delivery of innovative investment management technology solutions
Designing and implementing portfolio risk and optimization techniques to deliver industry differentiated capabilities
Effective partnering across Fidelitys technology, AI Center of Excellence and investment teams
Certifications:
Category:
Business Analytics and Insights

Company Overview


At Fidelity, we are focused on making our financial expertise broadly accessible and effective in helping people live the lives they want. We are a privately held company that places a high degree of value in creating and nurturing a work environment that attracts the best talent and reflects our commitment to our associates. We are proud of our diverse and inclusive workplace where we respect and value our associates for their unique perspectives and experiences. For information about working at Fidelity, visit FidelityCareers.com.

Fidelity Investments is an equal opportunity employer.",4.0,Fidelity Investments,"Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,74,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,68.0,MA,4574,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,1,0,0
463,463,Senior Data Scientist (Remote),$55k-$81k,"Remote location

When the world throws technology challenges at us, we eat them up. And then we ask for more. Welcome to life on the TMP technology team. Here, you will work on our scalable, evolving platform, face tremendous software challenges and work on projects for Fortune 100 clients. You'll be part of a fiercely collaborative technology team charged with creating digital solutions that are transforming the way employers and job seekers connect. Developing next-generation applications and products for some of the most recognized brands in the world. And actively supporting our diverse suite of best-in-class technologies. All this in an environment that constantly challenges you to push beyond boundaries and enhance your expertise - with the support of a global team of industry experts. Sound like a fit for your talent and passion? Read on.

TMP advertising products is seeking a Sr. Data Scientist to support its efforts in building a leading performance media platform for recruitment.

What does a Senior Data Scientist do?

We run hundreds of thousands of job campaigns generating millions of clicks each month. The Data Science team for advertising has expertise in optimization, regression, classification, and NLP principles to develop world-class strategies for performance advertising that yield the most important results for our customers: hiring the best employees.
Building machine learning models to optimize campaign performance at massive scale
Identifying, creating, and transforming informative features based on historical and real-time data
Leading the technical direction of the Data Science team, in parallel with the VP, Product
Working with Product to define data collection and modeling frameworks
Coordinating and working closely with engineering to put models and algorithms into production
Working collaboratively with other Data Science teams in cross product efforts
Deep understanding of statistical and machine learning models (logistic regression, decision trees, SVMs, etc.) and clustering and classification techniques
Proven experience building models and placing models into production
Experience in optimization problems, and solving those problems at scale
Well versed in statistical programming languages such as R, Python
Familiarity with relational databases such as Postgres and Amazon Redshift and accessing data via SQL
Degree in a technical field such as computer science, artificial intelligence, engineering
Graduate work in machine learning a plus or relevant work experience
Experience in ""Ad Tech"" data science principles a huge plus
Data driven leader, ready to provide technical direction to a team from day 1
Knows and loves the startup world - quick thinking and acting with minimal/no supervision
Self-driven, independent, creative and eager to learn new skills
Ability to work effectively with incomplete information
Great communication skills
Embraces the remote nature of the future of work
We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",3.5,TMP WORLDWIDE,"New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,14,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,68.0,NY,3228,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
465,465,Data Scientist,$55k-$81k,"Noah is a modern finance company that helps homeowners tap into their home equity without selling or adding additional debt (and the burden of monthly payments). Noah is focused on making home-ownership more affordable and accessible for millions of Americans, and is partnering with homeowners to help them maximize the value of what is likely their most valuable asset. Founded in 2016, with backing from Union Square Ventures and Tribe Capital, Noah has offices in San Francisco and New York.

The Role

Noah is seeking a data scientist to join our Data Science & Analytics team. Candidates should be comfortable owning a broad range of data science-related responsibilities, including the ideation and development of Noah's business and portfolio analysis tools, as well our risk and pricing models. Candidates will be expected to operate both at an execution and strategic level. This position offers high exposure to Noah's executive team, and will be reporting directly to the CIO.

Day-to-day responsibilities will include:
Translating business priorities and requirements to data science deliverables
Working with data scientists, data engineers, and software engineers to develop and support the internal tools used for pricing, underwriting, marketing, product & operations support.
Design, develop and maintain business dashboards to track KPIs across marketing, operations and product linked activities.
Develop and maintain a suite of portfolio analytics and metrics utilized for reporting to internal and external stakeholders
Developing methods to analyze risk of the US housing market in a systematic and objective manner
Identifying, sourcing and managing the data required to build Noah's risk and pricing models
Contributing to developing the core algorithms and analytical models for Noah's products
Creating frameworks for back-testing Noah's proprietary models
Requirements:
Degree in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics, Economics or other technical field
3 years of data science/analytics experience
Experience with analytic and visualization tools such as Mode Analytics, Looker etc.
Experience with: data collection, filtering, and cleaning techniques, statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, hypothesis testing), and SQL and relational databases like Postgres
Development experience, preferably in Python
Ability to organize and present complex data to technical and non-technical audiences
Team player with high integrity
Nice to have:
Experience working at an early stage startup
Open to feedback with an ongoing desire to improve
Understanding of financial concepts such as risk, volatility, IRR
A high degree of self awareness
Exposure to: A/B testing, statistical models and their interpretability, mortgage and home price models
Working knowledge of backend software development, including RESTful APIs and database
A collaborative mindset, and eagerness to partner with engineering, product, and business development teams
Benefits include:
Competitive salary, 401k, and equity in a company that is growing rapidly
Comprehensive health, vision, and dental insurance, FSA
Paid time off
Ongoing training and development",3.6,Noah,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,4,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,68.0,CA,3211,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
470,470,Data Engineer,$55k-$81k,"Join SADA as a Data Engineer!

Your Mission

As a Data Engineer at SADA, you will work collaboratively with architects and other engineers to recommend, prototype, build and debug data infrastructures on Google Cloud Platform (GCP). You will have an opportunity to work on real-world data issues facing our customers today. Engagements vary from being purely consultative to requiring heavy hands-on work and cover a diverse array of domain areas, such as data migrations, data archival and disaster recovery, and big data analytics solutions requiring a combination of batch or streaming data pipelines, data lakes and data warehouses.

You will be recognized as an established contributor by your team. You will contribute design and implementation components for multiple projects. You will work mostly independently with limited oversight. You will also participate in client-facing discussions in areas of expertise.

Pathway to Success

#BeOneStepAhead: At SADA we are in the business of change. We are focused on leading-edge technology that is ever-evolving. We embrace change enthusiastically and encourage adaptability. This means that not only do our engineers understand that change is inevitable, but they embrace this change to continuously broaden their skills, preparing for future customer needs.

Your success comes from your enthusiasm, insight, and positive impact. You will be given direct feedback quarterly with respect to the scope and quality of your contributions, your ability to estimate accurately, customer feedback at the close of projects, your collaboration with your peers, and the consultative skill you demonstrate in customer interactions.

As you continue to execute successfully, we will build a personalized development plan together that leads you through the engineering or management growth tracks.

Expectations

Required Travel - 30% travel to customer sites, conferences, and other related events. Due to the COVID-19 pandemic, travel has been temporarily restricted.

Customer Facing - You will interact with customers on a regular basis, sometimes daily, other times weekly/bi-weekly. Common touchpoints occur when qualifying potential opportunities, at project kickoff, throughout the engagement as progress is communicated, and at project close. You can expect to interact with a range of customer stakeholders, including engineers, technical project managers, and executives.

Training - Ongoing with a first-week orientation at HQ followed by a 90-day onboarding schedule. Details of the timeline can be shared.

Job Requirements

Required Credentials:
Google Professional Data Engineer Certified or able to complete within the first 45 days of employment
Required Qualifications:
Expertise in at least one of the following domain areas:
Big Data: managing Hadoop clusters (all included services), troubleshooting cluster operation issues, migrating Hadoop workloads, architecting solutions on Hadoop, experience with NoSQL data stores like Cassandra and HBase, building batch/streaming ETL pipelines with frameworks such as Spark, Spark Streaming and Apache Beam, and working with messaging systems like Pub/Sub, Kafka and RabbitMQ.
Data warehouse modernization: building complete data warehouse solutions, including technical architectures, star/snowflake schema designs, infrastructure components, ETL/ELT pipelines and reporting/analytic tools. Must have hands-on experience working with batch or streaming data processing software (such as Beam, Airflow, Hadoop, Spark, Hive).
Data migration: migrating data stores to reliable and scalable cloud-based stores, including strategies for minimizing downtime. May involve conversion between relational and NoSQL data stores, or vice versa.
Backup, restore & disaster recovery: building production-grade data backup and restore, and disaster recovery solutions. Up to petabytes in scale.
Experience writing software in one or more languages such as Python, Java, Scala, or Go
Experience building production-grade data solutions (relational and NoSQL)
Experience with systems monitoring/alerting, capacity planning and performance tuning
Experience in technical consulting or other customer-facing role
Useful Qualifications:
Experience working with Google Cloud data products (CloudSQL, Spanner, Cloud Storage, Pub/Sub, Dataflow, Dataproc, Bigtable, BigQuery, Dataprep, Composer, etc)
Experience with IoT architectures and building real-time data streaming pipelines
Applied experience operationalizing machine learning models on large datasets
Knowledge and understanding of industry trends and new technologies and ability to apply trends to architectural needs
Demonstrated leadership and self-direction -- a willingness to teach others and learn new techniques
Demonstrated skills in selecting the right statistical tools given a data analysis problem
About SADA

Values: We built our core values on themes that internally compel us to deliver our best to our partners, our customers and to each other. Ensuring a diverse and inclusive workplace where we learn from each other is core to SADA's values. We welcome people of different backgrounds, experiences, abilities and perspectives. We are an equal opportunity employer.
Make them rave
Be data driven
Be one step ahead
Be a change agent
Do the right thing
Work with the best: SADA has been the largest partner in North America for GCP since 2016 and has been named the 2019 and 2018 Google Cloud Global Partner of the Year. SADA has also been awarded Best Place to Work by Inc. as well as LA Business Journal!

Benefits: Unlimited PTO, competitive and attractive compensation, performance-based bonuses, paid holidays, rich medical, dental, vision plans, life, short and long-term disability insurance, RRSP, professional development reimbursement program as well as Google Certified training programs.

Business Performance: SADA has been named to the INC 5000 Fastest-Growing Private Companies list for 12 years in a row garnering Honoree status. CRN has also named SADA on the Top 500 Global Solutions Providers for the past 5 years. The overall culture continues to evolve with engineering at its core: 3200+ projects completed, 3000+ customers served, 10K+ workloads and 25M+ users migrated to the cloud.",4.7,SADA,"New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,20,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,68.0,NY,6270,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
471,471,Sr. Data Scientist,$55k-$81k,"Be proud of where you work, be proud of your Career. Join Navient.

We're proud of our people. Navient team members bring passion, commitment, and integrity to our business. We drive results and foster the innovation that makes us an industry leader. It's time to make that move, choose Navient as the next stepping stone in your career.

Navient (Nasdaq: NAVI) provides asset management and business processing solutions to education, healthcare and government clients at the federal, state, and local levels. We help our clients and millions of Americans achieve financial success through our services and support. Headquartered in Wilmington, Delaware, Navient employs team members in Western New York, Northeastern Pennsylvania, Indiana, Tennessee, Texas, Virginia, and other locations. Learn more at navient.com.

During this time of recommended social distancing, Navient will conduct telephone interviews only until it is safe and permissible to invite candidates to our offices for personal interviews. We look forward to receiving your application and appreciate your flexibility and understanding.

The Senior Data Scientist will utilize analytical, statistical, and programming skills to collect, analyze, and interpret large data sets.

Responsibilities include:

Data Science & Analysis
Analyze enormous amounts of data (structured and unstructured datasets)
Extract data from sources such as enterprise data warehouse, production databases, and other providers
Write machine learning models to produce desired results (shallow ML & ANNs)
Develop techniques for machine learning and predictive analytics
Create charts and other data visuals of analyzed data
Utilize NLP engines to process and correlate unstructured data
Engage with domain experts as well as senior leaders and engineers to effectively deliver interpretable results.
Python Development
Utilize Python to retrieve and prepare data for algorithm processing
Program APIs to access data on existing systems and databases
Program machine learning solutions to process large datasets
Program output to be organized and ready for presentation
MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS

This position will support a federal government contract. Applicants must be able to obtain Public Trust security clearance as required of federal government contractors to include a background check conducted by the U.S. Government to determine eligibility and suitability for federal contract employment for public trust or sensitive positions. For this level of clearance, applicants must possess U.S citizenship.

Master's degree in Data Science, Math, Computer Science or other related area (additional experience may substitute)

2+ years experience in the following (additional education may substitute:
Programming Language(s) Python and Spark
Data Munging: SQL / Python
Data Storage / Data handling: Hadoop / Spark
Statistical Analysis & Machine Learning models
Deep Learning libraries (ex. TensorFlow / Sikit-learn / PyTorch)
Data Visualization (ex. Tableau / d3.js / Python data visualization libraries)
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Experience building chatbot solutions
Knowledge of PySpark API and RStudio programming
Programming user interfaces (ex. Python, Java, .net, C++, C)
Excellent technical, communication, and analytical capabilities
Demonstrated ability to complete tasks/project quickly and effectively
Able to work in an ever-changing environment and positively adapt to organizational, process, and technology changes
Software design principles
Databases and SQL
Strong knowledge of normalization methods
Strong knowledge with DL modern architectures
Numpy/Pandas experience
Software testing principles
MS TFS/Github
ETL workflows
All offers of employment are contingent on standard background checks. Navient and certain of its affiliated companies are federal, state and/or local government contractors. Should this position support a Federal Government contract, now or in the future, the successful candidate will be subject to a background check conducted by the U.S. Government to determine eligibility and suitability for federal contract employment for public trust or sensitive positions. Positions that support state and/or local contracts also may require additional background checks to determine eligibility and suitability.

EOE Race/Ethnicity/Sex/Disability/Protected Vet/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity. Navient Corporation and its subsidiaries are not sponsored by or agencies of the United States of America.

Navient is a drug free workplace.",3.2,Navient,"Fishers, IN",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,6,Company - Public,financial_related,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,68.0,IN,4524,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,1
472,472,Senior Genomic Data Scientist,$117k-$134k,"GeneDx is seeking a Senior Genomic Data Scientist

GeneDx is a rapidly-growing, diverse clinical laboratory in Gaithersburg, MD that provides molecular diagnosis for genetic disorders. GeneDx is recruiting for a full-time Senior Genomic Data Scientist. This scientist will work as part of a team to develop techniques and software for genomic and phenomic data analysis. The successful candidate must be self-motivated and able to work both independently and as part of a small team.

To learn more about GeneDx, please visit our website at www.genedx.com.

Responsibilities include:
Improve existing data pipelines to further automate internal workflows
Ongoing assessment and incorporation of relevant public and commercial analytical tools and the development of novel methods as needed
Develop and use bioinformatics tools to process, analyze, and interpret DNA, datasets resulting from NGS, array-based, and other technologies
Apply classical statistics to mine historical data for research projects
Build predictive models to classify and prioritize genetic variants
Automate new assays by developing machine learning pipelines
Collaborate with the engineering team to develop large-scale data processing pipelines
Collaborate internally on software development and/or statistical analysis for scientific research
Contribute development and expertise for ad-hoc analysis on interdisciplinary company projects

Qualifications include:
MS or PhD in Genetics, Bioinformatics, Computer Science or a related field
3+ years relevant professional experience including analysis of large genomic or phenomic data sets
Proficiency in Python or another major scripting language
Advanced knowledge of statistics and related software tools (R, PANDAS)
Working knowledge of command-line Linux, shell scripting, and HPC/cloud computing (SLURM, SGE, AWS, Azure or similar)
Working knowledge of relational databases (PostgreSQL or similar) preferred
Experience with Git, SVN or other version control software plus other best practices for software development preferred
Familiarity with next-generation sequencing (NGS) data and related tools (Samtools, GATK, etc.) and other genetic assay data (e.g. aCGH)
Prior experience with human genetics preferred

Benefits include:
Paid Time Off (PTO)
Health, dental, vision, life insurance, LT/ST disability plans
Flexible Spending Account (FSA)
Health Savings Account (HSA)
401K retirement savings plan with company match
Employee Discounts
Regular performance appraisals
Many promotions from within
Business casual dress code",2.6,GeneDx,"Gaithersburg, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,125.5,MD,2558,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,1,0,0
473,473,Data Science All Star Program - Data Engineer Track,$117k-$134k,"Data Science All Star Program - Data Engineer Track

Job Title

Data Science All Star Program - Data Engineer Track

Job
ID

27260177

Duration

Location

Columbia,

MD

Other Location

Description

Dynamic, Fast-growing, Entrepreneurial Data Science Solutions Company seeking data Engineers! If you’ve got entrepreneurial spirit and passion, are driven by results, and want to be a part of significant growth, we’re looking for you!

BLEND360 is a multi-award winning Marketing Company who is privileged to provide our services to some of the most respected and recognized brands in the world. At BLEND360 it is all about advancing our clients marketing capabilities and performance.

If you are ready to ignite the fire for digital marketing and join our team, please keep reading!

*************************************************************************************

Our Data Science All Stars Program is a 6-month consultant training program for master’s graduates in Analytics, Statistics, Computer Science and other quantitative programs. Participants will have the opportunity to learn from top Data Scientists, work on real-world analytics projects, and gain experience with Fortune 500 clients across a variety of verticals. They will work alongside our Data Scientists to get data into proper shape, perform statistical analyses and develop predictive models to solve our clients’ business problems.

The primary objective of this program is to develop participants into productive, client engaged BLEND360 employees and set the foundation to build a fast track career in one of 4 areas:

Data Science

Data Engineering

Marketing- Adobe Cloud

Marketing Analytics .

The All-Star focused on Data Engineering will:
Work with business leaders to solve clients’ business challenges and improve clients’ business results using advanced analytics techniques. We contribute our Advanced Data Science subject matter expertise to the recommendations and solutions delivered to our clients.
Spend most of their time on getting data into proper shape, performing statistical analyses, developing predictive models and machine learning algorithms to solve clients’ business problems. We evaluate different sources of data, discover patterns hidden within raw data, create insightful variables, and develop competing models with different machine learning algorithms. We validate and cross validate our recommendations to make sure our recommendations will perform well over time.
Partner with client technical resources as well as BLEND360 team members, providing guidance and solutions for data architectures, data conversions, ETL and implementation of models in a production environment. The ideal candidate has retail experience and can provide technical expertise working with cloud based platforms as well as traditional data warehouse environments.
Main Responsibilities
Work with practice leaders and clients to understand how to make data accessible and usable throughout the organization.
Defines data environment design for the reporting and modeling/machine learning use cases that is consistent, maintainable and flexible.
Works with client and BLEND360 teams to identify use cases and functional requirements that drive the reporting and modeling data solutions.
Designs the database structure including tables, views, synonyms, sequences, triggers, procedures, functions, indexes and materialized views as relevant.
Provides the framework for integrating source systems with the reporting and modeling data environments – develops the ERD and data dictionaries
Implements business rules via stored procedures, middleware, or other technologies.
Develops strategies for flexibility and scalability, and defines the future technical architecture direction for the business intelligence reporting and analytical environments.
Problem solve with practice leaders to understand how to build the data pipelines that can support the business, formulate different approaches, outline pros and cons for each approach.
Work with practice leaders to get client feedback, get alignment on approaches, deliverables, and overall timeline
Document data flow, infrastructure and processes.
Turn models and machine learning algorithms into implementable production code
The Details:
Location: Columbia, MD
Duration:Full-time
Travel Requirements:Up to 25% (could be as much as (30% - 40% depending on projects)
Benefits:Health, Vision, Dental, 401K plan, Life Insurance, Pretax Commuter Benefits, and an incredibly supportive team cheering you on!
Qualifications:

o MS or PhD degree in Operation Research, Advanced Analytics, Computer Sciences, Engineering

o 1+ years’ professional experience in Data Engineering practices, such as:
data warehousing, optimization, and productionalization with examples of increased responsibility and evolving technologies.
developing code and/or applications using software such as Pyspark, Python, SQL, Scala, Java, etc.
deploying machine learning and data science pipelines into production using model management solutions and leveraging CICD solutions (e.g., Jenkins) for automation
configuring cloud platforms and configuring elastic compute environments in a cloud platform
Familiarity with and understanding of modern machine learning approaches, algorithms, libraries, and processes for feature selection / engineering
Experience building containerized applications and deploying those applications using solutions like Kubernetes
Experience with structured or un-structured data processing tools (SQL, Hadoop, Spark, NoSQL, MySQL, MariaDB, Hive, Pig, etc)
Comfortable with cloud-based platforms (AWS, Azure, Databricks, Google)",4.5,Blend360,"Columbia, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,18,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,125.5,MD,5671,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,1,0,1
474,474,Data Scientist (Federal),$117k-$134k,"C3.ai is a leading enterprise AI software provider for accelerating digital transformation. The comprehensive and proven C3 AI Suite uses a model-driven abstraction layer to enable organizations to develop, deploy, and operate enterprise scale AI applications 40x to 100x faster than alternative approaches. www.c3.ai

C3.ai is looking for a Data Scientist (Federal) to solve challenging, novel, and large-scale enterprise problems for Federal clients. In this capacity you will represent C3.ai as a technical expert and help our team to frame problems, choose appropriate machine learning algorithms, and identify opportunities to leverage the C3.ai Suite.

Recent examples of successful engagements include predictive maintenance on oil and gas equipment and aircraft subsystems, supply chain optimization, manufacturing yield optimization, chronic disease prevention, customer spend prediction, and equipment lifetime optimization.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve results at large-scale.

This role requires US Citizenship or US Permanent Residence.

Your Responsibilities:
Become an expert in the C3.ai Suite and associated tools to teach, enable, and assist C3.ai customers to build their own applications.
Design and deploy machine learning pipelines for C3.ai's federal customers.
Collaborate with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
US Citizenship or US Permanent Resident
Bachelor's degree
Strong understanding of machine learning algorithms & principles (regression analysis, time series, probabilistic models, supervised classification and unsupervised learning), and their application
Strong background in mathematics, statistics, and computer science
Excellent programming skills in Python
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference
Excellent verbal and written communication
Preferred
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields. Specialization in machine learning preferred.
Active Department of Defense (DoD) security clearance (Secret or higher)
Excellent programming skills in JavaScript. Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
Experience with deep learning, natural language processing, computer vision, or reinforcement learning
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.)
C3.ai provides a competitive compensation package and excellent benefits.

C3.ai is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status.",4.5,C3.ai,"Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,11,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,125.5,DC,2926,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
476,476,Data Scientist/Machine Learning,$117k-$134k,"Data Scientist/Machine Learning

Mist, a Juniper Company, is the first vendor to bring enterprise-grade Wi-Fi, BLE and IoT together through a highly scalable cloud architecture. At Mist, we built the first AI-empowered platform to provide an unprecedented visibility into the user experience. Mist is the new global standard for many fortune 500 companies.

The mission of the Data Science team at Mist is to leverage state-of-art ML and AI technologies to build the next-generation self-driving network solution, which can take actions on behalf of or together with human experts to automatically monitor, detect and remediate common network issues. The team includes a group of experienced and talented data scientists and data science engineers, and builds the end-to-end data analytics infrastructure and ML models of the product.

Now we are looking for a Senior Data Scientist to help define and expand this mission. As a data scientist, you will collaborate with product managers and domain experts to identify use-impacting real customer problems, use your deep DS/ML knowledge to develop data-driven solution with terabytes data, and work closely with data engineers to implement and scale the models in production.

Qualifications/Requirements:
• MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, Applied Math or equivalent fields with strong mathematical background
• Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, including clustering, anomaly detection, optimization, neural network etc
• 3+ years experiences building data science-driven solutions including data collection, feature selection, model training, post-deployment validation
• Strong hands-on coding skills (preferably in Python) processing large-scale data set and developing machine learning models
• Familiar with one or more machine learning or statistical modeling tools such as Numpy, ScikitLearn, MLlib, Tensorflow
• Good team worker with excellent communication skills written, verbal and presentation

Desired Experience:
• Experience with AWS, S3, Flink, Spark, Kafka, ElasticSearch
• Knowledge and experience with NLP technology
• Previous work in a start-up environment

Juniper Networks is enrolled in E-Verify® and will be participating in E-Verify in addition to our Form I-9 process. www.dhs.gov/E-Verify
Juniper Networks is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer.",3.8,Juniper Networks,"Cupertino, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,24,Company - Public,other_industries,Telecommunications,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,125.5,CA,2407,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,1,0,0
477,477,Data Engineer (Python),$117k-$134k,"What we're looking for

We are looking for a motivated data engineer who is passionate about building reliable and scalable data pipelines to make data sets available for analysis. The ideal candidate is entrepreneurial, motivated to grow, and has a passion for Python development.
Our Engineering Values
Collaboration: We believe that engineers do their best work when working together in cohesive teams.
Excellence: We believe in doing things the ""right way"" rather than the ""fast way"", and holding ourselves to a high standard of excellence.
Growth: We believe engineers do their best work when they are constantly growing, learning, and changing.
Communication: We believe in combining empathy with openness and honesty to set clear expectations and hold each other accountable.
Impact: We believe we're making the world a better place by empowering marketers to really help their customers rather than just sell stuff.

What you'll be doing
Developing and enhancing multiple ETL pipelines
Designing and implementing data storage structures and ETL pipelines, keeping long-term impacts in mind
Assemble large, complex data sets that meet functional / non-functional business requirements.
Working knowledge of message queuing, stream processing, and highly scalable 'big data' data stores.
Strong project management and organizational skills.
Identifying and improving upon current internal processes through automation and optimization

Who you are:


Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, or related field/equivalent experience
3+ years of experience with Python, Java, Scala, R, Go or similar language
3+ years of experience in working with cloud computing technology (AWS, Google Cloud Platform, etc.)
3+ years experience working on data warehouse systems such as Snowflake
Have developed systems based on key principles (consistency and availability, liveness and safety, durability, reliability, fault-tolerance, consensus algorithms)
Comfortable using version control and working in a collaborative environment
Experienced with CI/CD tools for testing and deployment
Self-starter with the ability to work independently or in a team
Able to manage one's schedule and prioritize tasks independently
Why You Should Join


At Conductor, we are looking for engaged and passionate engineers that can raise the bar. There is a tremendous opportunity here to have immediate impact in the day-to-day and affect the company's success and growth. We all share in the same values and push each other to meet these standards.

We are made up of a diverse group of people from all backgrounds and include a team of exceptional engineers in Kyiv as well. Wherever you are from, you will find a common ground here for continuing to push forward your career and make a difference in this industry.

Conductor, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.

About Conductor


Conductor's search and content intelligence platform helps marketers create and optimize content to improve visibility online.

The technology generates customer intent insights that lead to compelling content, increased traffic, and higher organic marketing ROI. Customizable dashboards and workflows guide marketers through the content creation process, empowering them to measure, refine, and demonstrate the effectiveness of their SEO and content marketing efforts.

In addition to its SaaS platform, Conductor offers a suite of services and support including site audits, site migrations, and managed services that empower in-house marketing teams and digital marketing agencies to drive results and put their customers' needs first.

Conductor's forward-thinking customers include global and emerging enterprise brands like Citibank, Salesforce, ClassPass, and WeWork.",4.5,Conductor,"New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,10,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,125.5,NY,3847,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
480,480,Senior Data Scientist,$117k-$134k,"As a leading mobile games developer, Jam City is looking to “level up” our talent. We’re on the hunt for innovators who consider themselves dynamic, collaborative, and thrive in a fast-paced environment.

PERKS & BENEFITS
Unlimited Vacation, Paid Sick Days & Holidays
100% Employee Covered Medical, Dental, Vision Plan Base Plan
Life Insurance, 401k, Flexible Spending Accounts, Commuter Benefits & More
Catered Lunches & Well-stocked Kitchens
Yoga & Wellness Activities
Happy Hours
Company Events
Dog Friendly

Jam City is looking for passionate, engaged and data driven individuals to join our growing Data Science team. We are searching for Data Scientists ready to work across our portfolio of games and be involved in every part of the process of delivering fun to millions of users worldwide. Working with our state of the art data infrastructure and diverse team you will see your contributions influence every aspect of our games, from marketing to production and even gameplay. As part of a data driven gaming and entertainment company you’ll be well placed to see your models and analysis shape the future of the company.

Our ideal candidate has experience working with large scale data sets and driving projects from conception to completion. Additionally they are able to take models or analysis one step farther and use data to tell stories and create understanding both within the analytics team and across the entire company. If doing a deep dive into the latest cutting edge literature on neural networks or probabilistic programming in the morning and working with game designers or engineers to turn findings into product in the afternoon sounds fun then you’ll fit right in at Jam City.
RESPONSIBILITIES:
Use your knowledge of data cleaning, statistical analysis and visualization to turn numbers into results that make Jam City’s games better.
Collaborate with stakeholders ranging from marketers to product managers and artists to make sure that data informs decisions at all levels of Jam City.
Work on a mixture of short term tactical analysis that deals with immediate needs and long term strategic projects that drive major change within the company.
Create data visualizations and analysis pipelines that turn complicated problems into simple solutions for stakeholders.
Experiment with cutting edge techniques to help drive the next generation of analytics at Jam City.
QUALIFICATIONS:
An advanced or postgraduate degree in a quantitative field.
The ability to use SQL or a scripting language such as Python or Scala to generate, clean and explore complex datasets.
A demonstrated track record of using statistical languages/packages such as R or Python to build features, create models and explore datasets.
Experience presenting and describing complex datasets or statistical processes to audiences without a technical background.
The ability to learn and use skills that you already have to tackle new problems in a creative way.
NICE TO HAVE:
Evidence of presentations/publications demonstrating the ability to drive research projects from start to finish.
Experience with neural network frameworks such as Tensorflow/Torch.
Knowledge of Apache Spark and associated products.
Or some other unique skill that you can teach the team to help us level up our analytical capabilities!
ABOUT JAM CITY
Jam City is an award-winning mobile entertainment studio providing unique and deeply engaging games that appeal to a broad, global audience.

Led by CEO Chris DeWolfe, former MySpace co-founder and CEO, and COO Josh Yguado, former 20th Century Fox executive, Jam City is the creative powerhouse behind some of the highest-grossing and most enduring mobile games. Jam City’s global franchise Cookie Jam has generated more than half a billion dollars, and Panda Pop has more than 120 million downloads to date.

The company also is the go-to studio for Hollywood, having developed immersive, narrative-rich mobile games around iconic entertainment brands. The company’s popular RPG game Harry Potter: Hogwarts Mystery was the #1 game in more than 40 countries at its launch in April 2018.

Jam City has nine studios located in Los Angeles (HQ), Berlin, Buenos Aires, Bogotá, Burbank, Cedar Falls, San Diego, San Francisco, and Toronto.",3.9,Jam City,"Culver City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,10,Company - Private,Video Games,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,125.5,CA,4260,1,data scientist,1,0,0,1,1,0,0,0,0
483,483,AI Ops Data Scientist,$117k-$134k,"Company

AstraZeneca is a global, innovation-driven biopharmaceutical business that focuses on the discovery, development and commercialization of prescription medicines for some of the world's most serious diseases. But we're more than one of the world's leading pharmaceutical companies. At AstraZeneca, we're proud to have a unique workplace culture that inspires innovation and collaboration. Here, employees are empowered to express diverse perspectives and are made to feel valued, energized and rewarded for their ideas and creativity.

Role

We are looking for a data scientist to join our new AI Ops platform team in Science IT. The ideal candidate will have industry experience working in a range of different cloud environments where they devised and deployed large-scale production infrastructure and platforms for data science. The position will involve taking these skills and applying them to some of the most exciting data & prediction problems in drug discovery.

The successful candidate will be part of a new, close-knit team of deeply technical experts and together have the chance to create tools that will advance the standard of healthcare, improving the lives of millions of patients across the globe. Our data science environments will support major AI initiatives such as clinical trial data analysis, knowledge graphs, imaging & omics for our therapy areas. You will also have responsibility to help provide the frameworks for data scientists to develop scalable machine learning and predictive models with our growing data science community, in a safe and robust manner.

As a strong software leader and an expert in building complex systems, you will be responsible for inventing how we use technology, machine learning, and data to enable the productivity of AstraZeneca. You will help envision, build, deploy and develop our next generation of data engines and tools at scale. You will be bridging the gap between science and engineering and functioning with deep expertise in both worlds.

Key Accountabilities
Liaise with R&D data scientists to understand their challenges and work with them to help productionise models and algorithms.
Be part of the development roadmap to build and operationalise our data science environment, platforms and tooling.
Support any external opportunities, through close partnership and engagement such as Benevolent.AI collaboration.
Deployment of systems, applications and tooling for data science on cloud environments.
Understanding of the necessary guardrails required for different use cases and data sensitivities.
Adapt standard machine learning methods to best exploit modern parallel environments (e.g. distributed clusters, multicore SMP, and GPU).
Provide the necessary infrastructure and platform to support the deployment and monitoring of ML solutions in production Optimizing solutions for performance and scalability.
Liaise with the Data Engineering team to ensure that the platform and the solutions deployment therein benefit from an optimised and scalable data flow between source systems and analytical models
Implementing custom machine learning code and developing benchmarking capabilities to monitor drift of any analyses over time.
Understanding of the latest AI webservices and data science tools, from DataBricks to citizen data science tools like Dataiku, C3.AI and Domino. Experience working on regulatory data would be helpful but not essential.
Liaise with other teams to enhance our technological stack, to enable the adoption of the latest advances in Data Processing and AI
Being an active member of the Data Science team, you will benefit from, and contribute to, our expanding bank of Data Science algorithms and work efficiently with our data science infrastructure.
Testing and assessing the quality of new tools.
Team recruitment, training provision and coaching
Candidate Knowledge, Skills and Experience
BSc in Computer Science or related quantitative field or MSc/Ph.D degree in Computer Science or related quantitative field.
More than 2 years of experience and demonstrable deep technical skills in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, recommendation systems, pattern recognition, natural language processing or computer vision.
Experience managing an enterprise platform and service, handling new customer demand and feature requests.
Strong software coding skills, with proficiency in Python and Scala preferred.
Significant experience with AWS cloud environments, working knowledge of Google and Azure platforms. Knowledge of Kubernetes, S3, EC2, Sagemaker, Athena, RDS and Glue is essential. Certification in appropriate areas will be viewed favourably.
Experience with best practice of data transport and storage within cloud system.
Experience building large scale data processing pipelines. e. g. Hadoop/Spark and SQL.
Experience provisioning computational resources in a variety of environments.
Experience with containers and microservice architectures e.g. Kubernetes, Docker and serverless approaches.
Experience with automation strategies e.g. CI/CD, gitops.
Use of Data Science modelling tools e.g. R, Python, SAS and Data Science notebooks (e.g. Jupyter).
Creative, collaborative, & product focused.
Ability to just get things done.",4.0,AstraZeneca,"Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,107,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,125.5,MD,5274,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
487,487,Data Engineer,$117k-$134k,"Why VillageMD?

VillageMD is changing the trajectory of healthcare by empowering primary care physicians to make informed decisions and engage patients in meaningful ways. We work with thousands of clinicians and healthcare disruptors across the country to build and contribute to our platform to improve patient health while driving down the cost to deliver it.

We are a mission-oriented organization and are thrilled about the work that we do every day. We're transparent, collaborative, and relentless in pursuit of our mission, all while doing so with humility and a low ego. We believe that diverse backgrounds and experiences create the best opportunity for innovation and the community that we are creating is greater than any individual.

We've built our technology using the best of cloud and open-source technologies to create an open, data-first platform that is enriched with analytical models and modernly connected to internal and external apps. These apps drive clinical decision support, patient engagement, and other facilitators of innovative, information-enriched health experiences.

Data Engineers at VillageMD build distributed components, pipelines, and tools that enable our organization to make analytical, data-driven decisions. We're in a unique position to impact everyone in primary care from independent, family-owned practices to world-class health systems. We aggregate, process, and deliver rich datasets to improve the effectiveness of primary care for our doctors and patients.

What are examples of work that Data Engineers have done at VillageMD?
Built and implemented a data profiling tool to reverse engineer data schemas from new data sources facilitating normalization of the data into our data model
Created a summary data platform supporting our presentation layer that allows clinicians and operators in our practices to pinpoint interventions on-demand to patients most in need
Analyzed and designed the best ways to expand our data model to incorporate more data that's mission critical
What will make you successful here?
Strong analytical and technical skills
A real passion for problem solving and learning new technology
Vision to balance speed and maintainability in solution design
The ability to handle multiple, concurrent projects
Crafting and implementing requirements, keeping projects on track, and engaging partners
Challenging the status quo to improve our processes and tools
Communicating complex technical details in meaningful business context
A low ego and humility; an ability to gain trust by doing what you say you will do
What you might do in your first year:
Own ten projects to design and implement best-in-class data processing enabling clean data flow directly to our data model and on to our presentation layer
Work with analytics, engineering and operations to design and implement a new analytics product that supports improving patient health
Design a new concept within our data model to meet a new operational or analytical need
The following experience is relevant to us:
5+ years of full-time experience including extensive experience with healthcare data
Ability to understand and design relational data structures required
Very strong capabilities manipulating data using SQL
Knowledge of, and/or willingness to learn, non-relational data structures and other technologies (e.g. Postgres, Redshift, Cassandra, MongoDB, Neo4j, S3, etc.)
Experience or willingness to learn building information pipelines utilizing Python or Java a plus
BS/MS in computer science, math, engineering, or other related fields is required.
Track record of successfully executing projects with multiple partners
What can we offer you?
Competitive salary, bonus, and health benefits
Paid gym membership
Fun, fast-paced, startup environment (with snacks)
Pre-tax savings on commute expenses
Remote flexibility
A highly-collaborative, conscientious, forward-thinking environment that welcomes the impact you can make from Day 1.
A clear link between our daily work on products and services and the improved quality of healthcare that this work facilitates for patients.
At VillageMD, we see diversity and inclusion as a source of strength in transforming healthcare. We believe building trust and innovation are best achieved through diverse perspectives. To us, acceptance and respect are rooted in an understanding that people do not experience things in the same way, including our healthcare system. Individuals seeking employment at VillageMD are considered without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",4.0,VillageMD,"Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,7,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,125.5,IL,4664,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
488,488,Data Scientist (COVID-19) - ACESO,$117k-$134k,"Join the HJF Team!*
HJF is seeking a *Data Scientist* (COVID-19) to support the Austere environments Consortium for Enhanced Sepsis Outcomes (ACESO), located in Bethesda, MD. HJF provides scientific, technical and programmatic support services to ACESO.

ACESO aims to identify host-based markers capable of accurately diagnosing and prognosing patients with severe infections in austere settings and transitioning those markers to point-of-care assay platforms.

The ideal candidate will collaborate with scientists and clinical investigators analyzing complex data and developing insights through the use of mathematical modelling, data mining, and data visualization techniques The candidate will also work closely with other ACESO data scientists to analyze large, multi-omic datasets consisting of transcriptomic, proteomic, phosphoproteomic, and metabolomic data, as well as demographic, clinical, and outcome data from longitudinal cohorts of patients with sepsis. The candidate will need to communicate results on a regular basis with the science team and key stakeholders, as well as prepare manuscripts for publications in peer-reviewed journals and presentations at scientific conferences.
Responsibilities: *
Develops analysis and data visualization of complex, multi-omics datasets (including RNA sequence data, proteomic, phosphoproteomic, and metabolomics data). (35%)
Analyzes longitudinal data using dynamical systems modeling techniques. Applies advanced mathematical and predictive modeling techniques. Develops innovative approaches to answer research questions. (25%)
Integrates and prepares large datasets, develops specialized database and computing environments as needed. (10%)
Provides subject matter expertise as needed, including recommendations on data collection and integration. Communicates results on a regular basis with the science team and key stakeholders, and prepares presentations and reports as needed. Assists in the development of the analytical methods sections for protocols, grant applications and manuscripts. (10%)
Provides relevant analysis and project status updates to research staff. Works with research staff to achieve the goals of the research program. (10%)
Responsible for assuring that data for analyses and output are complete and accurate, ensuring conclusions are valid. Interact with data management personnel as necessary to ensure that datasets are in usable format. (10%)
May perform other duties and responsibilities as assigned or directed by the supervisor.
Required Knowledge, Skills and Abilities*: Knowledge of applicable complex scientific procedures and techniques; excellent communication skills; ability to troubleshoot technical procedures; ability to work independently and as part of a team. Experience or training in computational algorithms used to analyze complex biological datasets, such as but not limited to dynamical systems and longitudinal analyses, are required. Experience with machine learning and data mining/pattern recognition approaches preferred. Strong computer skills and hands-on experience in analyzing and modeling of microarray data, next-generation sequencing and biomarker assay data, and other clinical data. A strong interest in bioinformatics, systems biology, applied mathematics, machine learning, modeling data, and development of decision support tools. Strong time management skills; can prioritize multiple assignments and ability to meet deadlines of projects.
Minimum Education*: Doctoral degree in Mathematics, engineering, data science, computer science, or related field required.
Minimum Experience/ Training Requirements*: 2-5 years of experience required.
Work Environment: * Set in an office environment.
Travel Requirements: * This position will be based in Bethesda, MD; however, incumbent will be required to meet with partners, sponsors, and/or attend local conferences/training events within a 50-miles radius of Bethesda, MD. Any travel over 50-miles will be reimbursed by the program.
Employment with HJF is contingent upon successful completion of a background check, which may include, but is not limited to, contacting your professional references, verification of previous employment, addresses, education, and credentials, a criminal background check, drug screening, and a department of motor vehicle (DMV) check. *
_Any qualifications to be considered as equivalents, in lieu of stated minimums, require the prior approval of the Chief Human Resources Officer._

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://careers.hjf.org/
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/HJFMilMedicine/
Work Remotely:
Yes",3.6,The Henry M. Jackson Foundation,"Bethesda, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,37,Nonprofit Organization,other_industries,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,125.5,MD,4973,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
493,493,Data Scientist (Fraud & Game Surveillance),$117k-$134k,"WHO WE ARE

NCSOFT is a premiere digital entertainment company and global publisher with worldwide locations and more than 4,000 employees focused on bringing extraordinary games to life for millions of fans around the world. Established in 1997 and headquartered in Seoul, South Korea, we quickly became a key leader in online games. Best known for critically acclaimed franchises including Lineage, Aion, Guild Wars, and Blade & Soul, NCSOFT is also one of the world's top mobile developers with Lineage 2M occupying the #1 grossing revenue slot on Google Play. Our core goal is making people in this world happier by delivering games that entertain a globally connected audience has remained the same.

We are looking for a Data Scientist to join our Fraud and Game Surveillance Unit and help us keep our games safe and fun for all our players. We are looking for someone with a burning curiosity about our players and our games, someone who can go deep to find answers and bring back actionable insights. The ideal candidate is equally passionate about machine learning and improving the player experience. This role will partner closely with design, engineering, and customer service to help create and maintain a safe and welcoming environment for all our players. You will help build tools to detect toxic chat and sift PvP match records to find cheats and bots. This is your chance to help make our games safer, friendlier, and more fun.

WHY JOIN THE CUSTOMER CARE TEAM?
You are a passionate gamer. You will join us in supporting multiple AAA titles. We are all gamers and we love helping our fellow players!
You enjoy creating positive user experiences. This is at the core of what we do. You think about how we best prevent players from having to contact us and how to make their interactions with our team seamless. You learn from negative feedback and get satisfaction from positive outcomes.
You love a challenge. You will encounter daily opportunities to overcome new challenges and problems. You thrive in a fast-pasted, high-volume work environment.
You love to share your knowledge and experience. We know our games and our player base inside and out and we leverage that knowledge to drive improvement. You are good at finding ways to best impart your knowledge to internal teams and our customers.
WHAT YOU'LL DO
Use SQL, Tableau, and other tools to query gameplay data.
Conduct quantitative and statistical analyses on gameplay and financial data.
Create and maintain accurate and comprehensible data visualizations and dashboards.
Create and deploy machine learning models to model and predict player behavior.
Work collaboratively with designers, engineers, customer service, and the community team.
Stay actively engaged in our games and develop a deep understanding of game mechanics including gameplay and economy.
WHAT YOU'LL NEED TO BE SUCCESSFUL
A passion for games and the gaming industry.
Demonstrated history of turning raw data into actionable insights.
Advanced SQL proficiency, including experience querying and visualizing large, complex data sets.
Strong quantitative skills, and experience utilizing scientific analytic methods, qualitative methods, and quantitative analysis techniques, as well as predictive modeling.
Ability to effectively communicate with people at various levels of business and technical expertise, including the ability to simplify difficult technical concepts.
Ability to translate academic research into application.
EDUCATION/TRAINING/EXPERIENCE
Bachelor's degree in statistics, analytics, data science, psychology, or related quantitative field. MS or PhD strongly preferred.
5+ years hands-on experience working with data.
Experience with natural language processing would be very useful.
PLUSES
Prior experience in fraud detection.
Experience playing NCSOFT and ArenaNet games.
Experience with big data software like Hadoop.
Experience with other Business Intelligence backend and analytics applications.",3.0,NCSOFT,"Aliso Viejo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,23,Company - Public,Video Games,Media,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,125.5,CA,3972,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
494,494,Sr Data Scientist,$117k-$134k,"Description

The Senior Data Scientist is responsible for defining, building, and improving statistical models to improve business processes and outcomes in one or more healthcare domains such as Clinical, Enrollment, Claims, and Finance. As part of the broader analytics team, Data Scientist will gather and analyze data to solve and address complex business problems and evaluate scenarios to make predictions on future outcomes and work with the business to communicate and support decision-making. This position requires strong analytical skills and experience in analytic methods including multivariate regressions, hierarchical linear models, regression trees, clustering methods and other complex statistical techniques.

Duties & Responsibilities:

• Develops advanced statistical models to predict, quantify or forecast various operational and performance metrics in multiple healthcare domains
• Investigates, recommends, and initiates acquisition of new data resources from internal and external sources
• Works with multiple teams to support data collection, integration, and retention requirements based on business needs
• Identifies critical and emerging technologies that will support and extend quantitative analytic capabilities
• Collaborates with business subject matter experts to select relevant sources of information
• Develops expertise with multiple machine learning algorithms and data science techniques, such as exploratory data analysis and predictive modeling, graph theory, recommender systems, text analytics and validation
• Develops expertise with Healthfirst datasets, data repositories, and data movement processes
• Assists on projects/requests and may lead specific tasks within the project scope
• Prepares and manipulates data for use in development of statistical models
• Other duties as assigned

Minimum Qualifications:

-Bachelor's Degree

Preferred Qualifications:

- Master’s degree in Computer Science or Statistics
Familiarity with major cloud platforms such as AWS and Azure
Healthcare Industry Experience

Minimum Qualifications:

-Bachelor's Degree

Preferred Qualifications:

- Master’s degree in Computer Science or Statistics
Familiarity with major cloud platforms such as AWS and Azure
Healthcare Industry Experience

WE ARE AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER. Applicants and employees are considered for positions and are evaluated without regard to mental or physical disability, race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, genetic information, military or veteran status, sexual orientation, marital status or any other protected Federal, State/Province or Local status unrelated to the performance of the work involved.

If you have a disability under the Americans with Disability Act or a similar law, and want a reasonable accommodation to assist with your job search or application for employment, please contact us by sending an email to careers@Healthfirst.org or calling 212-519-1798 . In your email please include a description of the accommodation you are requesting and a description of the position for which you are applying. Only reasonable accommodation requests related to applying for a position within Healthfirst Management Services will be reviewed at the e-mail address and phone number supplied. Thank you for considering a career with Healthfirst Management Services.
EEO Law Poster and Supplement

]]>",3.1,Healthfirst,"New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,27,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,125.5,NY,3389,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
498,498,Cloud Data Engineer,$117k-$134k,"Who We Are!

At Maven Wave, we are relentless in hiring the industrys top talent. Each employee is hand-picked not only for their skills, but for their personality and broad expertise. We are looking for this rare combination of talent that sets us apart in the industry.

Maven Wave helps leading companies make the shift to digital and shorten the fuse to innovation. We combine the expertise of top-tier consulting with the agility of a cutting-edge technology firm. This multidisciplinary blend of skills allows us to create unique digital advantages for our clients. Maven Waves digital solutions are agile, mobile, rooted in analytics, and built in the cloud.


Maven Wave, Google, and YOU: Help us build data driven cloud solutions.

We are looking for a skilled Cloud Data Engineer to design, build, and test data ingestion and ETL programs with a strong focus on performance and data quality management.

Your Life As a Maven:
Build and implement complex data solutions in the cloud (AWS, GCP and/or Microsoft).
Uncover and recommend remediations for data quality anomalies.
Investigate, recommend and implement data ingestion and ETL performance improvements.
Document data ingestion and ETL program designs, present findings, conduct peer code reviews.
Develop and execute test plans to validate code.
Your Expertise:
4+ years experience building complex ETL programs with Informatica, DataStage, Spark, Dataflow, etc.
3+ years experience in Python and/or Java, developing complex SQL queries, and working with relational database technologies.
Experience configuring big data solutions in a cloud environment (AWS, Azure or GCP).
Experience using cloud storage and computing technologies such as BigQuery, RedShift, or Snowflake.
Experience developing complex technical and ETL programs within a Hadoop ecosystem.
Must have a bachelors degree in Computer Science, Technology, Computer Information Systems, Computer Applications, Engineering, or a related field.
Your X-Factor:
Aptitude - You have an innate capacity to transition from project to project without skipping a beat.
Communication - You have excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordination across projects and teams.
Impact - You are a critical thinker with an emphasis on creativity and innovation.
Passion - You have the drive to succeed paired with a continuous hunger to learn.
Leadership - You are trusted, empathetic, accountable, and empower others around you.
Why Were Proud To Be Mavens!
Google Cloud North America Services Partner of the Year 2019, 2018
#21 Best Workplaces in Chicago, FORTUNE, 2018
Great Place To Work Certification, Great Place to Work, 2017 & 2018
Fast Fifty, Crain's Chicago Business
101 Best and Brightest Companies to Work For, National Association for Business Resources (NABR)
Top Google Cloud Partner, Clutch
Fastest Growing Consulting Firms in North America (#11, #37), Consulting Magazine
Top IT Services Companies, Clutch
Google Global Rising Star Partner of the Year
Ready to Learn More?
Life as a Maven
Check out the Data Team
See what Glassdoor has to say
Real Customer Stories",4.4,Maven Wave Partners,"Chicago, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,12,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,125.5,IL,3112,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
500,500,Senior Data Scientist,$117k-$134k,"Design, implement and optimize algorithms for unsupervised and supervised learning based on structured and unstructured data. Develop powerful business insights from social, marketing, industrial data and public policy using advanced machine learning techniques. Work closely with the software engineering team to productize analytic software. Collaborate with system integration and data warehouse engineers on data extraction and data cleaning. Work in a highly interactive, team-oriented environment. Requires a bachelor's degree in a STEM or related field and 5 years of experience, or a Master's degree in same with 3 years, or a PhD.",4.5,Envision LLC,"Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,26,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,125.5,MO,639,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
504,504,Data Scientist,$82k-$147k,"Responsibilities:

Managing and sifting through health care, life science, administrative and financial data sets to extract trends and find patterns
Leveraging existing publicly available databases and/or using scraping techniques to supplement the information above
Proactively discovering and exploring data that could lead to new products
Producing reports based on data extracted
Automating report generation by using SAS, SQL, or scripting languages
Validating the methods used in data extraction and data transformation
Researching and implementing state-of-the-art techniques for data modeling, analytics, and visualization
Creating intuitive and user-friendly visualizations in Spotfire, Microsoft PowerBI or other data visualization tools
Working with in-house developers for building software tools
Leverage machine learning techniques to identify/solve business and clinical problems
Leading the team throughout the machine learning life cycle from exploration to deployment and maintenance
Half of time spent on dashboard/report creation tasks and other half on machine learning tasks
Serving as a technical mentor to junior data scientists
JOB REQUIREMENTS

Requirements:

Degree in a technical or scientific field or equivalent experience (MS or PhD required)
Experience with business intelligence (3+ years preferred)
Proficiency with BI tools (2+ years preferred, e.g. Spotfire, MS PowerBI or Tableau)
Proficiency with at least one scripting language (3+ years, Python/R preferred)
Experience developing high-performing machine learning models on real-world data
Background or experience in health care or life sciences
Excellent oral and written skills, especially on technical topics
Abstract and critical thinking to work with open-ended or undefined issues
Strategic and cost-effective mindset, self-starter with proactive attitude",2.6,"Technical Resources International, Inc.","Bethesda, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,30,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,MD,1852,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
506,506,Senior Data Engineer,$82k-$147k,"With the continued impact of COVID-19 and social distancing measures, Kensho is conducting all interviews and on-boarding activities remotely. At the present time, all employees are working remotely, until further notice. When the time comes to open our offices, Kensho will fully support those employees who would like to continue working remotely and not ask anyone to return to the office until they are comfortable.

At Kensho, we hire talented people and give them the freedom, support, and resources needed to build cutting edge technology and products for our parent company, S&P Global. As a result, we produce technology that is scalable, robust, and solves the challenges of one of the world’s largest, most successful financial institutions.

We are seeking experienced Data Engineers to join our Data Engineering Team. The team is responsible for architecting, implementing, and maintaining Kensho’s data ingestion, processing, and storage solutions. They work with stakeholders across Kensho and S&P to map the data landscape, triage data requirements, and design and implement a comprehensive data strategy.

Our ideal candidate has 5+ years of experience with the tasks and skills below, has been recognized as a technical leader, and has demonstrated success:
- Designing, coordinating, and implementing production data platforms using industry standard and/or open source software
- Navigating between project management, technical leadership, and individual contributor roles
- Negotiating between new requirements, legacy systems, technical debt, and best practices
- Mentoring colleagues on data engineering best practices and systems design.

What You'll Do:
Work with industry standard and/or open source software such as PostgreSQL, Kafka, Airflow, Hive, etc.Implement and maintain a data management and governance framework.
Support machine learning and application teams by setting up custom data solutions.
Design, maintain, and scale Kensho’s data pipeline and document processing platform.
Build event and batch driven ingestion systems for stand-alone software products, machine learning R&D, and API services.
Develop and administer databases, knowledge bases, and distributed data stores.
Create and use systems to clean, integrate, or fuse datasets to produce data products.
Perform continuous and periodic studies on systems cost efficiency, performance, and overall health
Establish and monitor data integrity and value through visualization, profiling, and statistical tools.
Implement and maintain a data management and governance framework.
What You'll Need:
Experience with various data-store technologies, distributed messaging platforms, or data processing framework
Experience designing, architecting and building reliable data pipelines
Experience working with large structured and unstructured data sets
Effective coding, documentation, and communication habits
Proficient understanding of distributed computing principles
Experience integrating/fusing data from multiple data sources
Knowledge of various ETL techniques, frameworks, and best practices
Project management and organizational skills
Experience supporting and working with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment
(Bonus) Experience with Site Reliability Engineering, DevOps (CICD), and Cloud Administration.


Benefits & Perks:

At Kensho, we pride ourselves on providing top-of-market benefits, including:
Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance - 100% company paid premiums
Unlimited Paid Time Off
20 weeks of 100% paid Parental Leave (paternity and maternity)
401(k) plan with 6% employer matching
Generous company matching on donations to non-profit charities
Up to $20,000 tuition assistance toward degree programs, plus up to $4,000/year for ongoing professional education such as industry conferences
Plentiful snacks, drinks, and regularly catered lunches
Dog-friendly office (CAM office)
In-office gyms and showers (CAM, DC) or Equinox membership (LA, NYC)
Stipend towards commuter or gym reimbursement
Bike sharing program memberships
Compassion leave and elder care leave
Mentoring and additional learning opportunities
Opportunity to expand professional network and participate in conferences and events

About Kensho
Kensho uses machine learning, artificial intelligence, natural language processing and data visualization techniques to solve some of the hardest analytical problems and create breakthrough financial intelligence solutions for our parent company, S&P Global.
Kensho was founded in 2013 by Harvard & MIT alums and was acquired by S&P Global in 2018. Kensho continues to operate as a startup in order to maintain our distinct, independent brand and to promote our breakthrough, innovative culture. Our team of Kenshins enjoy a dynamic and collaborative work environment that runs autonomously from S&P, while leveraging the unparalleled breadth and depth of data and resources available as part of S&P Global.
As Kenshins, we pride ourselves on maintaining an innovative culture that depends on diversity and inclusion. We are an equal opportunity employer that welcomes future Kenshins with all experiences and perspectives. Kensho is headquartered in Cambridge, MA, with offices in New York City, Washington D.C. and Los Angeles.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",4.1,Kensho,"Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,7,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,MA,5442,1,data engineer,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
508,508,Data Engineer,$82k-$147k,"Hiretual is an AI-powered talent data system for enterprises. It is recognized as one of the best data management SaaS for talent acquisition systems in the industry and is used by 100+ Fortune 500 customers (Amazon, Nike, Paypal, Intel, etc.)
As a data engineer, you will join the core engineering team to build a scalable and robust data engine towards an AI and data-driven recruiting SaaS. You will be working with top AI researchers and infrastructure gurus to explore unlimited career space.
Responsibilities
1.Responsible for storage and update of over 750 million resumes (ElasticSearch, Cassandra, Redis)
Data scraping and cleaning from over 40 different channels (Python, Scrapy, Selenium)
Establish instant and offline for over 100 TB data
4.Provide product data decision and support for products R&D
5.Extract Eigenvalues from open-source data, documents and pdfs; Establish knowledge graph and data labels
Work with Machine Learning engineers to build the biggest talents pool and AI models, making an automated and intellectual data channel management process
Provide quantitative results for products Research, and data-driven product intelligence
The core technical skills you should have
Strong computer science fundamentals: algorithms, data structures, and object-oriented programming
Strong coding capability with Python
Experience in the data processing pipeline, including data crawling, cleaning, processing, ETL
Proficient in working variant databases: MySQL, Redis, Cassandra, Elasticsearch, graph databases.
Proficient with big data processing frameworks: Spark, Hadoop, Hive, Kafka, EMR
Writing scalable REST APIs for web services
Education Requirements
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Engineering related fields, Master’s Degree preferred.
Benefits
Unlimited growth/promotion space

Competitive salary and options

401k plan with a 3% contribution

Free daily lunch & dinner

Comprehensive medical, dental, and life insurance with 100% coverage

Generous PTO policy

Commuter benefits

Fun, collaborative, and energetic team environment with a nice office environment

Fun events for the family!",2.9,Hiretual,"Mountain View, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,6,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,2143,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,1
511,511,Senior Director of Data Science,$82k-$147k,"Job Description


Here at Discount Tire, we celebrate the spirit of our people with extraordinary pride and enthusiasm. As America’s largest independent tire retailer, specializing solely in tires & wheels, we have over 1,000 store locations, and growing by nearly 1 store per week making us the 95th largest private corporation in the U.S. (2018). Our consistent growth over the last 59 years, as well as, the loyalty of our customers and passion of our employees makes Discount Tire a great place to work.

Even more exciting, Discount Tire is predicting, embracing and driving the changes expected in the Automotive Industry. In particular, Data and Analytics are seen as our competitive advantage. The Director - Data Science role will be responsible for continuing to grow and build upon the accomplishments of the analytics team, as well as provide hands on expertise for the most complicated tasks. In this role, you will be actively involved in shaping the company strategy. We are leveraging a word class data environment, so that this position can help us to:
Develop decision support and predictive solutions for customers and staff
Leverage AI for pattern recognition and beyond
Optimize business outcomes
Gain insights from big data
General Description

The Senior Director of Data Science will report directly to the Chief Strategy and Innovations Officer and closely collaborate with an established analytics leadership team to define and deliver an analytics roadmap. The successful candidate will use their expert-level leadership and collaborative skills to influence the organization by helping implement a culture of mathematical rigor, experimentation and efficient & effective iteration that focuses on driving business performance.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Conduct advanced analytics leveraging predictive modeling, machine learning, data mining, data visualizations, simulation, and optimization; interprets disparate data/complex data sets/ structured and unstructured data and other techniques to deliver insights or develop analytical solutions to achieve business objectives
Act as a technical thought leader in collaboration with the analytics leadership team, helping to set the strategy and standards for data science and advanced analytics
Work with senior leaders from all functions to explore opportunities for using advance analytics
Provide technical leadership, coaching, and mentoring to talented data scientists and analytics professionals
Guide data scientists in the use of advanced statistical, machine learning, and artificial intelligence methodologies
Guide the work of other data scientists to provide support and assistance, while also ensuring quality
Define data science methodology for more complex business problems
Partner with the team’s Technology Manager and data engineers to enable appropriate data flow/data model, development tools/technology, rapid prototyping and inform the design of analytics products
Partner with domain experts to verify model capabilities and translate modeling outputs from statistical inferences into business language
Coach and Develop employees on all levels about data science tools and methodologies

Job Requirements


Qualifications:

Required
This position requires a minimum of 10 years of progressive advanced analytics experience, developing predictive mathematical models and algorithms.
Proven knowledge of various databases with ability to code in Python, R, and SQL is required.
Hands on experience with Machine learning and AI (ie: random forest, linear regression, cluster analysis, XG Boost, etc.) is required
Experience with data integration, profiling, cleansing and normalization: structured, unstructured, 3rd party is necessary.
Strong proficiency with data visualization techniques is necessary.
Proven knowledge of statistical inference is needed.
Ability to frame solutions to complex problems is vital.
Preferred
Image recognition and natural language processing preferred.
Experience with simulation, network optimization, and workflow analysis is preferred.
Standard
Advanced proficiency in Microsoft Office, including Word, Excel and PowerPoint is required.
Demonstrated ability to communicate across all levels of the organization is necessary; must be able to clearly articulate technical ideas to a non-technical audience both verbally and in writing.
Ability to work independently and in a team is vital.
The ability to multi-task, and manage multiple projects to meet various deadlines simultaneously is required.
The ability to work efficiently under pressure, accurately meet deadlines, present a professional demeanor and work well independently is essential.
Customer service skills, including the ability to manage and respond to different customer situations while maintaining a positive and friendly attitude are essential.
In addition, organizational and problem solving skills, a can-do attitude, and the ability to adjust to changing requirements are essential. Maintaining confidentiality, treating others with respect and upholding Company values are key attributes.
Educational Requirements:

Master’s degree in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Quantitative Economics, Statistics, Engineering, Physics, Applied Sciences or related field. PhD preferred.

Work Days:

Normal work days are Monday through Friday. Occasional Saturdays and Sundays may be necessary.

Work Hours:

Normal work hours are 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. Additional hours may be necessary.

Apply
Not ready to",4.0,Discount Tire,"Scottsdale, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,60,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,AZ,5527,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
512,512,Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations,$82k-$147k,"Guild is hiring a Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations. As the Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations you will partner with our leaders across the business and lead a team of data scientists to improve our students' Guild experience.

As Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations, you will:
Partner with stakeholders across the organization to identify opportunities to use data science solutions to drive improved outcomes.
Manage large-scale projects and prioritize the team's workload to ensure effective delivery and implementation of solutions which drive our strategies forward.
Work closely with Operations leadership to translate business needs and problems into analyses. This could include uncovering a problem, identifying data sources to quantify the problem, synthesizing findings and solutions, analyzing the business case and tradeoffs, and managing the implementation of recommendations.
Develop frameworks, approaches, solutions and recommendations that effectively and efficiently address the most impactful opportunities and challenges for Guild's Operations teams.
Lead a world-class team of analysts who are responsive to our business partners' needs, and are capable of working with data, performing complex analyses, and developing recommendations and strategies which drive our business forward.
Use data to tell a story, effectively explaining analytical findings and technical solutions to business partners.
Act as a thought partner to data scientists, helping to formulate analytical plans, prioritize initiatives, and operationalize the results of learnings from complex analyses, including A/B testing, NLP, segmentation, and other predictive models.
In this role you will report to Beth Hegland and collaborate with other Guild leaders including: Kevin Chan-A-Shing, Mae Podesta, Josh Hadden-Leggett, and Terrence Cummings.

You are a strong fit for this role if you have:
8+ years of experience in an analytics/data science environment
5+ years managing high-performing technical and analytical teams
Strong technical and analytical skills, with high attention to detail and accuracy.
Strong experience with SQL, as well as Excel/Google Sheets, BI Tools (Looker a plus)
Ability to work cross-functionally to advocate for data science solutions, develop roadmaps, and ensure effective prioritization of analytical resources.
Extreme comfort presenting to and interacting with senior leaders, with the ability to win over strong personalities and reconcile competing points of view through data-driven storytelling
Preferred Competencies:
Familiarity with Operations teams in a sales or CRM environment
Proven business experience with a scripting language like Python or R
About Guild

Guild is increasing economic mobility for working adults by partnering with the largest employers in the country to offer education as a benefit to their employees via our marketplace of nonprofit universities and education institutions. Guild's proprietary technology platform facilitates the administration of this innovative benefit and our team of coaches helps each employee navigate the path back to school, providing individualized support from day one through program completion.

We also just became the latest female-led company to hit a $1billion valuation and the only B-corp with those qualifications. Our Series D round was led by Ken Chenault, General Catalyst Partners chairman and former CEO of AMEX, and joined by Emerson Collective, LeadEdge Capital, and Iconiq.

Guild Education is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.",3.5,Guild Education,"Denver, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,5,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CO,3659,1,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
515,515,Data Scientist,$82k-$147k,"Palo Alto, California

Data Scientist

Next Insurance is a fast-growing 300+ person startup based in Silicon Valley and is led by a team of experienced entrepreneurs with a history of successful outcomes. Our mission is to transform insurance for small businesses by combining world-class technology and phenomenal customer service to offer better insurance at a lower price. Next has raised over $380 million from top tier investors and is the valley’s latest unicorn, valued at over $1 billion.

Next is well-positioned to become the leader in the $140 billion small business insurance market because we offer a 100% online experience that is tailored to unique business needs and we get customers insured in minutes – something no one else does. Despite the size of the market, the experience of buying small business insurance has not caught up with best practices instituted in other industries like banking, lending, and even personal lines insurance. There is still a lot of paper involved, purchasing a policy can take days or even weeks, and the coverage is so complex that it’s hard for entrepreneurs to understand what they are buying. We’re here to change that. Our goal is to make insurance simple, affordable, and transparent for small businesses so they can stop worrying about insurance and focus on running their businesses.

We are looking for a driven Data Scientist to help us bring machine learning to the insurance industry. As a data scientist at Next Insurance, you will work on a wide range of projects, including building predictive risk models, fine-tuning user experience, and optimizing internal operations. You will enable us to make the best use of our proprietary data, supplemented with novel data sources which you get to assemble creatively.

You’ll also have day-to-day exposure to multiple members of the company leadership team and will be joining a small, nimble team of 5+ scientists, with lots of room for growth and impact.

Responsibilities:


Research and develop predictive models (we typically start with a POC and then work with Product and Engineering counterparts to transition to production)

Iterate and pivot quickly to deliver MVP solutions. Design quick experiments to maximize learning

Understand the data and dig deep to extract actionable insights

Think creatively and outside the box to answer desired experimental questions

Work cross-functionally with engineering, product, marketing, business intelligence, insurance operations, customer support, senior management, and external partners

Desired Skills and Experience:


2-4 years of hands-on experience in data mining, machine learning and/or statistical analysis

BS/MS in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math, or related areas

Experience in writing both agile exploratory analyses as well as production-level code in a fast-paced environment

Ability to communicate the results of analyses clearly and effectively

Fluency with an analytical programming language (APL) (preferably Python) and the standard numerical packages

Fluency with data extraction/manipulation tools (preferably SQL & Pandas)

One of our core values is ‘Play as a Team’; this means making sure everyone has an equal chance to participate and make a difference. We win by playing together. Next Insurance is an equal opportunity employer and prioritizes building a diverse and inclusive workplace. We provide equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants of any type and do not discriminate based on race, color, religion, national origin, gender, age, sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, genetic information or characteristic, gender identity and expression, veteran status, or other non-job-related characteristics or other prohibited grounds specified in applicable federal, state, and local laws. Next’s policy is to comply with all applicable laws related to nondiscrimination and equal opportunity and will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training.",4.5,Next Insurance,"Palo Alto, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,4,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,4224,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
517,517,Data Scientist,$82k-$147k,"Description

Global Data and Analytics Group is a cross-functional research team within the Science and Technology Center at Guardian Glass. We are on the front lines of projects that impact the operations of Guardian Glass manufacturing assets. We focus on Machine Learning and AI, Optimization, Process Engineering and IoT technologies to improve efficiency of Guardian’s manufacturing processes. Examples of the challenges our group will be tackling are opportunities to optimize the existing operations, work closely with process research and operations teams to determine what process settings drive certain manufacturing results and to improve operations or predict future behaviors of product as it moves through the manufacturing.Glass Technology & Data Analytics team focuses on applying advanced quantitative methods to solve a wide variety of challenging operations problems.

As Operations Data Scientist,you will join a growing team dedicated to identifying, developing, refining, and deploying data analytics solutions in glass making and coating processes. As a data scientist, you will use machine learning techniques to gain new insights, develop predictive tools, and improve process control and predictability. You will be responsible for working closely with key stakeholders and data engineers to efficiently identify and implement improvements to data infrastructure for downstream analytics needs. You will determine the suitable models to use for various process applications from ideation, proof-of-concept through design of applications, as well as monitor and improve deployed operational-real-time models. You will keep Guardian current with the state-of-the-art machine learning software and hardware in the cloud and on-premise and pursue continuous self-training and train others across the organization. You will gain exposure to senior leadership as you showcase your results to key stakeholders in the business, demonstrating the superior value of your work. You will report into the R&D Group Leader of the Global Data and Analytics Group.

Our group of highly skilled, enthusiastic data scientists and operations research engineers is redefining what's possible for Guardian by utilizing the massive amount of process data to transform operations and research and development. We invest in our team by encouraging attendance at industry conferences and ongoing education opportunities enabling them to stay on the dynamic ever-changing data science landscape and bring new methods and techniques to their projects.

Responsibilities
Apply the latest machine learning algorithms to perform analysis, create predictive models, visualize data, and drive projects through to delivery toward the solution of operations problems
Review academic / industry literature, develop and test models, and gain insights from research findings
Play a key role in developing analytical solutions with the business engagement teams and business partners
Have the intellectual curiosity to research and identify new modeling technologies/methodologies/software packages to improve the current modeling processes
Continuously scan and test new data sources, tools, and analytical techniques and partner with leading institutions and experts to contribute to our portfolio of next-generation analytics projects.
Interface with key stakeholders and technical experts to ensure hardware and software support for data analytics is maintained
Maintain and enhance existing models
Analyze large complex time series datasets to extract useful patterns to deliver business insights and communicate results to key decision makers
Issue reports detailing tool development (including unsuccessful approaches), quality assurance actions performed, results, etc.
Work with data engineers to improve functionality in data systems (e.g., data reliability, efficiency, usability, and quality) and improve downstream data analysis capabilities
Work with various functional teams; owning end-to-end solution development and scaling focused on operations challenges.
Focus on building minimum viable products toward solving most of the issue instead of “perfecting” the solution, unless critical to safety.
Engage with internal customers - operations teams and process SME’s - to leverage your critical thinking skills to apply data science modeling solutions.
Qualifications:

Required:
Combination of analytical rigor and statistical methods with strong and creative problem-solving skills
Process knowledge and experience in full scale manufacturing and development using production scale equipment.
Solid technical writing and presentation skills
Strong communication skills for technical and non-technical audience
Project management and executing of projects that require multi-functional involvement for implementation
Demonstrated knowledge of concepts of power analysis, hypothesis testing, inference and DOE
M.S. degree in a quantitative field such as Operations Research, Engineering, Statistics, Mathematics, Physics, Computer Science etc.
1-2 years of experience doing quantitative research using techniques from one or more of the following areas: 1) machine / deep learning, 2) statistics / statistical modeling, 3) optimization / operations research, 4) uncertainty quantification
1-2 years of experience in data analytics, including the development of data-driven predictive models and AI algorithms and visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, R, Power BI).
Demonstrated skill at data cleansing, data quality assessment, and using analytics for data assessment
Proficiency with at least two of the following languages: Python, Java, R, Matlab, C/C++/C# and/or Scala
Fluency with SQL
Familiarity with various computing infrastructures
Desirable:
Working knowledge of glass manufacturing processes and/or vacuum coating
Familiarity with Chemical Process Engineering principles
Experience with Trans-SQL
Experience with command-line scripting
Experience in data structures
Experience working in a Linux environment
Experience in image processing
Experience with big data and cloud solutions (e.g., Hadoop, Snowflake, Amazon SageMaker and/or SAS).
TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS:

The position will require travel in the range of 20%.

LOCATION:

This position will be based in Ann Arbor Michigan at Guardian’s Science and Technology Center.

]]>",3.2,Guardian Glass,"Carleton, MI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,48,Company - Private,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,MI,6341,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
518,518,Sr. Data Scientist,$82k-$147k,"Sr. Data Scientist

El Segundo, CA

About Nexon:

Nexon, a world leader in online games, is building a workplace based on mutual respect, good humor, and the pursuit of excellence because we believe that great games can only be built by amazing people. Our vision is to create high quality, innovative online games that create unforgettable experiences for players around the world.

Nexon has an ever-expanding worldwide team of over 6,000 employees, and boasts a diverse global portfolio that includes titles like MapleStory, Dungeon Fighter Online, KartRider and many more. If you want to be part of building an exciting game company and help chart the course of online gaming, let's talk!

About the role:

The Sr. Data Scientist is responsible for developing advanced machine learning algorithms and statistical models to solve critical problems and help deliver the best customer experiences. The Data Scientist partners with Business teams, Platform team, Security team, and other stakeholders to implement data science models into live production systems. The Data Scientist brings fresh perspectives to inform decision-making toward better player experience by translating player voice into insights.

What you'll be doing:
Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, data visualization and data-mining to tell the story behind numbers and find relevant insights for partners and leadership
Research and develop state-of-the-art machine learning, data mining, and statistical modeling solutions to understand game design, system performance and key business behaviors, such as player acquisition and retention
Establish scalable, automated processes for large scale data extraction, model development, model validation and model implementation
Design, prototype, and implement new ways to effectively communicate data science findings
Effectively translate statistical findings into actionable recommendations for senior leaders on game design and business teams
Analyze player big data, developing and testing data-fueled hypotheses, extracting useful information and turning it into helpful insight that can help us improve players' experiences
Bring a fresh perspective and a new dimension of analysis to bear on the challenge of identifying


What skills you'll need:
5+ years of experience translating data to insight to recommendations
BS (MS/PhD Preferred) in quantitative discipline (e.g. Math, Physics, Statistics, Operations Research, Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Economics)
Expertise in machine learning and statistical analysis approaches such as classification, clustering, regression, statistical inference, collaborative filtering, natural language processing, experimental design, social networking analysis, etc.
Experience managing advanced analytics projects which solve complex analytical problems using data mining technologies
Expertise in automating and deploying models in production systems
Experience with Big Data technologies (AWS EMR, Spark, Presto, Hadoop, etc.)
A true passion for understanding customer behavior on-platform and in-game
Expert analytical and problem solving skills, plus the ability to innovate and work independently
Strong skills in statistical methods (e.g. hypothesis testing, time series modeling)
Strong SQL skills and strong Python or R skills; familiarity with Jupyter or RStudio
Familiar with Hadoop, Apache Spark framework, SQL/NoSQL, Snowflake
Strong skills in building dashboards and visualizations (e.g Tableau, PowerBI, Quicksight)
Bonus Points:
Online gaming experience a BIG PLUS!
Experience in marketing machine leaning project a big plus



Nexon's benefits and perks:

We offer medical, dental and vision plans for you, your spouse or domestic partner and your children. Employees who enroll in the high deductible health plan receive an annual employer contribution to a health savings account and company paid hospital indemnity benefits. We also provide company paid life, AD&D, short-term and long-term disability benefits as well as access to voluntary life and AD&D for yourself and your dependents, flexible spending accounts, a 401(k) savings plan with a company match, and pet insurance. Nexies are encouraged to take advantage of our monthly wellness credit, participate in lunchtime yoga, and enroll in language classes. We host bi-monthly catered lunches, monthly happy hours, and maintain a well-stocked snack bar. To help you maintain a good work life balance, we offer paid time off, sick days, company holidays, and a year-end break.

Nexon is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, national origin, protected veteran status, or any other basis protected by applicable law and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.

]]>",2.6,Nexon America Inc,"El Segundo, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,26,Company - Public,Video Games,Media,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,4912,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,1,0,0
521,521,Jr. Data Engineer- Data Engineering Development Program,$82k-$147k,"At MassMutual, were passionate about helping millions of people find financial freedom and this passion has driven our approach to developing highly interactive digital experiences for our customers. To help us achieve our mission, we are looking to hire junior data engineers for our Data Engineering Development Program.

What great looks like for this role:

We are seeking highly motivated individuals with backgrounds in computer science, database design, or related fields and are enthusiastic about pursuing a career in data engineering. We are looking for highly collaborative individuals who are great team players.

We are looking for individuals who are comfortable working in a challenging, fast paced environment and are extremely self-motivated. Our business challenges are often complex, so we are looking for individuals who are comfortable wrangling with unstructured, difficult problems and are comfortable thinking outside the box and taking initiative. Those who enjoy tackling complex tasks in a collaborative environment are well-suited to a position on our team. We accept applications from both early career software engineers and from students from a Computer Science Bachelor's program.

Data Engineering Development Program Highlights:

Experiential Learning

The Data Engineering Development Program (DEDP), is a hybrid experiential learning program that combines custom academic coursework with hands-on industry experience. The DEDP cultivates top recent graduates or junior software engineers and provides a talent pipeline to grow the data engineering team at MassMutual. The program offers a combination of in-house training, graduate coursework, mentorship, and participation in high-impact projects alongside senior data engineers. At the completion of the fifteen month program, participants will have demonstrated proficiency and will be capable of contributing to major data engineering efforts for the company.

This fifteen month program, based in Boston, MA, provides a unique, industry-leading experience in data engineering for top performing and promising candidates. Junior data engineers work together with MassMutuals data team to solve challenging database and data architecture challenges. Participation in the development program includes mentorship from senior professionals, exposure to real world high-impact projects, in-house training and workshops, and tuition sponsorship for graduate level certificate training at Boston University. At the conclusion of the development program, those who have successfully demonstrated proficiency will be offered a position with MassMutual with the Boston-based Data Engineering team.

Academic Training & Development

Junior Data Engineers in the DEDP are fully immersed in high-impact projects for MassMutual. Projects include data warehousing, database design, algorithms design, and machine learning. To supplement development through project work learning, Junior Data Engineers in the DEDP take graduate level certificate coursework at Boston University through a mix of online and on campus learning. Our work environment also reflects our dedication to innovation and learning. We hold weekly seminars to present technical ideas, participate in local conferences and hackathons, and sponsor monthly Meetups for data science and data engineering professionals. The team culture of working collaboratively and cross-functionally, using new technologies combined with the work/life balance provided by MassMutual are core reasons people enjoy working on the Data Engineering team at MassMutual. We offer full benefits and above-market compensation.

Volunteer & Community Opportunities

Team members have many opportunities to volunteer throughout the year. Junior data scientists volunteer at hackathons throughout the state, attend community data events, speak at external talks, and participate in community data for good efforts annually.

Objectives of this role:

Junior data engineers will have the opportunities to work on technical projects and engage in the following type of work:
Build conceptual and logical data architecture design
Develop, monitor, and manage data systems across our platform
Process disparate data sources and form a high integrity, high quality, clean data asset
Contribute to batch pipelines, data modeling, and data mart solutions
Work on collaborative project teams working to implement robust data collection and processing pipelines
Work across departments to understand data patterns
Technical training will encompass the following areas:
Data structures and databases
Designing data processing systems
Data Warehousing
Data Mining
Comprehension of distributed systems
Comprehension of Software Development Principles
Algorithms Design
Machine learning
Designing for reliability, security and compliance
Committed to Diversity and Inclusion

Our employees are the embodiment of the idea that we all are stronger and better through our support for one another. By valuing people for who they are, how they think, and what they bring to the table, weve become a stronger, more innovative company. We continue to receive external recognition for our policies and programs that seek to create a diverse and inclusive environment.
Americas Best Employer for Diversity Forbes (2019)
Score of 100 on the Human Rights Campaign Corporate Equality Index (2019)
National Association for Female Executives Top Company for Executive Women (2018)
Disability Equality Index (DEI) Best Place to Work for Disability Inclusion (2019)
Diversity Best Practices Inclusion Index Company (2018)
Basic Qualifications:
Solid computational and technical proficiency
Bachelor's Degree in computer science or a related discipline
Working proficiency in at least one programming language such as R, Python, or SQL
Demonstrated 6 month work experience through part time employment or other endeavors including internships
Commitment to data integrity
Ability to take graduate courses concurrent with a full-time work schedule
Ability to function well in unstructured environments, working with challenging problems
Self-motivated, enthusiastic learner
Authorized to work in the United States, with or without requiring sponsorship both now and in the future
Applying to the Data Engineering Development Program is a two- step process.

First you must submit your application and resume via this job posting. You will then be required to submit a portfolio documenting your interest in the program, documenting your academics, and experiences. Please visit https://datascience.massmutual.com/dedp to read more about the DEDP and the portfolio submission process.

Application deadline is January 31, 2021. Anticipated start date is June 14, 2021.",3.7,MassMutual,"Boston, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,169,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,MA,6753,0,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
522,522,Data Scientist,$82k-$147k,"Job Number: R0083303

Data Scientist, Mid

The Challenge:

Are you excited at the prospect of unlocking the secrets held by a data set? Are you fascinated by the possibilities presented by the IoT, machine learning, and artificial intelligence advances? In an increasingly connected world, massive amounts of structured and unstructured data open up new opportunities. As a data scientist, you can turn these complex data sets into useful information to solve global challenges. Across private and public sectors — from fraud detection to cancer research, to national intelligence — you know the answers are in the data.

We have an opportunity for you to use your analytical skills to improve aerospace mission solutions. You’ll work closely with your customer to understand their questions and needs, and then dig into their data-rich environment to find the pieces of their information puzzle. You’ll develop algorithms, write scripts, build predictive analytics, apply machine learning, and use the right combination of tools and frameworks to turn that set of disparate data points into objective answers to help military leaders make informed decisions. You’ll provide your customer with a deep understanding of their data, what it all means, and how they can use it. Join us as we use data science for good in aerospace mission solutions.

Empower change with us.

You Have:
2+ years of experience with one or more scripting or scientific languages, including Python, R, C++ or Java
2+ years of experience in working with a wide range of predictive and decision models, and tools for developing models
2+ years of experience with Big Data programming technologies, including Hadoop, Spark, MapReduce, Accumulo, Cassandra, HBase, R, Mahout, Pig, and Hive
2+ years of experience with applying machine learning techniques, and the key parameters that affect their performance
Experience with Microsoft Excel and Access
Knowledge of statistical measures such as confidence intervals, the significance of error measurements, development and evaluation data sets
Ability to obtain a security clearance
BA or BS degree in Data Science, Applied Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, Physics, Computer Networks, or Operations Research
Nice If You Have:
Experience with using statistical software applications, including SAS, R, Matlab, SPSS, or Stata
Experience with developing statistical and simulation models
Experience in one or more natural language processing topics: tagging, syntactic parsing, word sense disambiguation, topic modeling; contextual text mining, and application of deep learning to NLP
Experience with developing experimental and analytic plans for data modeling processes, using strong baselines, and accurately determining cause and effect relationships
Secret clearance
MA or MS degree in Data Science, Applied Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, Physics, Computer Networks, or Operations Research
Clearance:

Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.

Build Your Career:

At Booz Allen, we know the power of analytics, and we’re dedicated to helping you grow as a data analysis professional. When you join Booz Allen, you’ll have the chance to:
access online and onsite training in data analysis and presentation methodologies, and tools like Hortonworks, Docker, Tableau, and Splunk
change the world with the Data Science Bowl—the world’s premier data science for social good competition
participate in partnerships with data science leaders, like our partnership with NVIDIA to deliver Deep Learning Institute (DLI) training to the federal government
You’ll have access to a wealth of training resources through our Analytics University, an online learning portal specifically geared towards data science and analytics skills, where you can access more than 5000 functional and technical courses, certifications, and books. Build your technical skills through hands-on training on the latest tools and state-of-the-art tech from our in-house experts. Pursuing certifications that directly impact your role? You may be able to take advantage of our tuition assistance, on-site bootcamps, certification training, academic programs, vendor relationships, and a network of professionals who can give you helpful tips. We’ll help you develop the career you want as you chart your own course for success.

We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.",3.8,Booz Allen Hamilton Inc.,"Arlington, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,106,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,VA,4696,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
524,524,Senior Data Scientist (US Remote/Virtual),$82k-$147k,"What’s your mission?

IronNet’s mission is simple: To deliver the power of collective cybersecurity to defend companies, sectors, and nations. For decades, companies have been defending against cyber attacks on their own while adversaries have been organizing themselves into sophisticated hacker networks … until now, with IronNet Collective Defense. In 2014, General (Ret) Keith Alexander, former Commander U.S. Cyber Command, launched IronNet to strengthen cybersecurity defense against highly sophisticated adversaries, across all borders and sectors.

In response to cyber adversaries who increasingly collaborate for collective offense, leading organizations in our critical infrastructure are using collective defense strategies and solutions to meet these powerful and ever-changing threats. We believe that collective defense is our collective responsibility and we are leading the charge.

The Opportunity

We are looking for a senior level Data Scientist to join the Detection and Analytics team at IronNet. You will be responsible for modeling complex problems with a focus on cybersecurity and anomaly detection. Your mathematical knowledge will be translated into identifying opportunities through the use of algorithmic, statistical, machine learning, and visualization techniques. You will demonstrate initiative and creativity by proposing ways to address problems often with large or incomplete data sets and validate findings using an experimental and iterative approach. Other responsibilities include presenting findings to stakeholders and clients as needed and being able to trace results back to business requirements. You will work with an existing group of Data Scientists who have extensive experience creating and executing sophisticated algorithms on real data.

To be successful in this role, you must be able to . . .
Design and develop new algorithms for detecting and prioritizing cyber threats in conjunction with the existing data science team.
Explore and derive insights from large bodies of structured and unstructured data.
Create prototype machine learning models.
Assist in scaling detection capabilities to extremely large scale datasets using Spark and similar technologies.
Assist in writing thorough tests and documentation.
Collaborate with multi-functional teams in various physical locations.
In conjunction with the data engineering team, develop and write production quality software.
Analyze and report results from algorithms running in production.
You may be the person we need if your background aligns with the following . . .
Proven ability to apply mathematical, statistical, and machine learning techniques to deliver solutions to real-world problems.
Experience training and tuning machine learning models.
Demonstrable programming skills (such as in Python, Scala, or R)
Experience working with large scale data platforms (Spark, SQL) and cloud-based computing (particularly AWS)
Ability to visualize data and communicate results to non-technical audiences.
Familiarity with the data used in cyber security, including common types of threats and attacks.
Personal Profile:
Passion for championing projects from concept to delivery to customer.
Competitive spirit; willingness and ability to “sell” your solution during collaborative team discussions.
Desire to be the best and prove it every day.
Eagerness to learn and improve your own skills and to make those around you better.
Highly attentive to detail and a focus on improving the code base and quality of our tests.
Commitment and aptitude to proactively find solutions to ambiguous opportunities.
Bring a unique skill set or elevate the results of the teams you are a part of.
Recognition & Awards

IronNet is recognized as a representative vendor in Gartner’s “Market Guide for Network Detection and Response (NDR)”, and Forrester recently named IronNet a representative vendor in its “Now Tech: Network Analytic and Visibility, Q2, 2020” research.

Recent Awards:
CRN Emerging Vendors
Fortress Cyber Security
Hot 150 Cybersecurity Companies
Fortress Cyber Security
EMA Vendor To Watch
CRN Security100

More About IronNet:

IronNet delivers unmatched collective cyber threat detection for enterprise on-premise, cloud, and hybrid networks. We do this through the application of advanced behavioral analytics, AI, and machine learning techniques. Our team combines the tradecraft knowledge of the best offensive and defensive cyber operators in the world with world-class mathematicians and data scientists to engineer solutions that empower companies to defend against advanced threats.

Our founder and Co-CEO, General (Ret) Keith Alexander, is a recognized cybersecurity innovator and a frequent speaker about current cyberthreats and effective defenses. We have a leadership team with deep government and commercial cyber experience, and the company is advised by a board of esteemed security and venture investment professionals, including Jan Tighe Retired Vice Admiral, Former Deputy Chief of Naval Operations for Information Warfare and Director, Naval Intelligence, US Navy; and Jack Keane Chairman, Institute for the Study of War, Retired Four-Star General, Former Vice Chief of Staff, US Army.

Benefits of Working at IronNet:

IronNet strives to provide and takes pride in being able to offer comprehensive, essential and affordable benefits for our employees and their families. We offer an unlimited PTO plan, 401(k) match as well as Medical, Dental, Vision, and Disability Insurance.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or protected veteran status, or any other legally protected basis, in accordance with applicable law.",4.4,IronNet Cybersecurity,"Denver, CO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,6,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CO,5803,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
525,525,Senior Data Engineer,$82k-$147k,"About Narrativ

Narrativ is a technology platform for brands to unlock, manage, and grow their share of product reviews on the open web.

Why is this important? We've seen a decade's worth of e-commerce growth in 2020, and the emergence of a smarter consumer who demands a better way to buy than ads. They're turning to expert product reviews on trusted sources ranging from The New York Times to their favorite YouTuber. But only Amazon is reaping the benefits today, commanding a $40B monopoly on product reviews online.

Narrativ's patented technology empowers everyone to win. We build the tech and tools to turn honest reviews that tell the whole story about a product into a multibillion dollar acquisition channel for all brands. Teams at Sephora, Best Buy, L'Oreal and hundreds of others already partner with Narrativ to yield more efficient results than Facebook and Google.

Our work breaking Amazon's monopoly and fixing broken and out-of-stock links on the Internet has gotten us recognized by The World Economic Forum as a Technology Pioneer and by Fast Company as one of the best places to work for innovators.

Why you should work here:
We're growing, fast: Narrativ's platform hosts 50+ partners spending $20mm+ a year including Best Buy, L'Oreal, Sephora, Bed Bath & Beyond, Home Depot, Nordstrom, and Samsung. We've doubled revenue so far in 2020.
We have a talented team: We're a team of 50+ from places like Amazon, Facebook, Google, and Etsy with a female founder that's been awarded by the Financial Times, Forbes, and Inc. We're hiring quickly, with plans to double our team in the next year.
We're challenging the status quo: Breaking monopolies and diversifying industries is in our DNA. Come join us on our mission to democratize product recommendations for all and build a better internet for shoppers.
Come join us on our mission to build a better Internet for shoppers!

The Job:
A data engineer at Narrativ will build and scale a first-class data platform. You understand the history of batch and streaming big data systems, know when awk outperforms Hadoop map-reduce, and have spent a lot of time thinking about the best ways to handle schema drift. You care deeply about making scalable systems from simple, reliable, and correct building blocks. You can explain the advantages and disadvantages of a wide range of data structures depending on the desired use case. You can articulate when a general solution is good enough, and when a specialized solution is necessary.

You are Narrativ's Data Engineer

Mission
Build and maintain batch and streaming data systems
Enable scalability and observability for batch and realtime data streams
Collaborate and build tools so all engineers can easily ""do the right thing"" with regard to scalable batch and streaming data requirements.
Key Results
Merchant product feed can ingest datasets of 10M+
Create performant and straightforward patterns for OLTP, OLAP, streaming ingest and enrichment, creating search indexes, etc
Requirements
5+ years of experience with big data systems such as Hadoop, Spark, Flink, Kafka, Storm, Heron, NiFi, Hive, etc
Understanding of different serialization and storage formats like Avro, Parquet, Thrift, Protocol Buffers, FlatBuffers, JSON, CSV, XML
Working knowledge of relational databases (PostgreSQL, MySQL), non-relational (Redis, Cassandra/Scylla), and warehouses (Snowflake, Redshift, BigQuery
Experience with streaming data technologies and patterns
Experience with orchestration frameworks like Airflow, Oozie
Expertise in a general purpose programming language
Strong experience in SQL

Bonus
Expertise in Scala, Java, or Kotlin
Experience in Elixir
Working knowledge of probabilistic data structures and algorithms like count-min sketch, hyperloglog, bloom filters, reservoir sampling, etc
Important Notice: We are putting the health and safety of our employees first. For the balance of 2020, we'll be working from home. WIth so much uncertainty in the world, this is a decision that helped eliminate the anxiety associated with commuting and gave our teammates one less thing to worry about.

Narrativ is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, or veteran status.",3.6,Narrativ,"New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,5,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,NY,4411,1,data engineer,0,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
528,528,Aviation AI/ML Data Scientist,$82k-$147k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

The candidate will work with the FAA and international customers, leveraging one of the largest repositories of aviation data to improve the capabilities, safety, and efficiency of the aviation system. The candidate will be responsible for working both individually and with a team of data scientists in the following tasks:
Performing anomaly detection and capability development using a variety of aviation safety data
Leveraging AI/ML techniques and solutions to identify complex patterns for predicting safety hazards
Increasing the efficiency and quality of the vulnerability discovery process by tightly integrating automated processes, AI/ML techniques and human SME/analyst expertise
Develop and prototype AI algorithms and software tools.
Enhance and maintain current analysis tools, including automation of current processes using AI/ML algorithms.
Conduct quantitative data analysis using a variety of datasets, including developing retrieval, processing, fusion, analysis, and visualization of various datasets
Develop techniques that make use of both digital flight data, text-based safety reporting, and a variety of other aviation data sets both in a silo and in a fused environment to identify potential safety vulnerabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Demonstrable aerospace/aviation knowledge or experience, this is a must
Bachelor’s Degree in Aerospace Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related fields
Hands-on Software Development Skills (Python-Preferred)
Experience or educational courses/projects in Machine Learning, and/or Text Mining Algorithms.
Ability to work closely with domain experts to develop tools/algorithms needed to answer research questions
Excellent Communication Skills (with the ability to explain tools and ML algorithms to a non-technical audience)
Proven ability to work independently to learn new technologies, techniques, processes, languages, platforms, systems
Strong analytic, inferencing, critical thinking, and creative problem-solving skills
Self-starter with ability to work both independently and with a team
Preferred Qualifications:
5 years of relevant experience
Experience with Deep Learning Frameworks such as Keras, Tensorflow, PyTorch, Mxnet, etc. Ability to apply these frameworks to real problems in the ‘time -series’ domain
Experience with interpretability of deep learning models
Big Data Skills (Azure, Hadoop, Spark, recent deep learning platforms)
Visualizations/Web Development Skills (e.g. Tableau, D3, etc).
Practical experience with statistical analysis
Experience with text mining tools and techniques including in areas of summarization, search (e.g. ELK Stack), entity extraction, training set generation (e.g. Snorkel) and anomaly detection
Expert software development skills lifecycle including developing and maintaining good production quality code
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.2,MITRE,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,VA,4733,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,0
529,529,"Data Scientist, Analytics",$82k-$147k,"Next Insurance is a fast-growing 330+ person startup based in Silicon Valley and is led by a team of experienced entrepreneurs with a history of successful outcomes. Our mission is to transform insurance for small businesses by combining world-class technology and phenomenal customer service to offer better insurance at a lower price. Next has raised over $380 million from top tier investors and is the valley's latest unicorn, valued at over $1 billion.

Next is looking for explorers who are filled with curiosity, have the desire to travel the unbeaten path, and realize new heights in providing small business owners with the peace of mind to run their businesses. If you move fast, customer-focused, and willing to challenge the status quo, Next Insurance might just be your next journey.

Want to shape the future of insurance through data science? We are looking for a Data Scientist to join the growing data org that has a dedication to diving into data and thinking statistically about business problems and user behaviors. The ideal candidate is excited to own company objectives and guide their team towards success through data-driven decisions. If you have the intuition to identify important analytical questions, the technical ability for complex deep-dives, and the communication skills to help the team turn ideas into action - you belong here!

What You'll Do:
Work with cross-functional partners to determine the mission of their team, and design the right metrics and targets to communicate this mission
Create deep-dive analyses to understand customer, operations, or funnel behavior
Identify and help prioritize opportunities
Create a clear, compelling, and actionable narrative that is based on data-driven insights
Be the connecting link to data engineering to design the right data model, logging, and data-pipeline foundations
Develop dashboards to track metric progress, understand metric drivers, and answer common business questions
Guide the team on experiment design and interpretation
What We Need:
Professional experience in a quantitative analysis role
Experience influencing the strategy of a product through analyses
Comfortable in SQL and some experience with a programming language like Python a plus
Experience building clear and easy to understand dashboards
Ability to communicate clearly and effectively to cross functional partners of varying technical levels
Ability to define relevant metrics that can guide and influence stakeholders to the appropriate and accurate insights
Experience designing experiments, with knowledge of statistics a plus
One of our core values is 'Play as a Team'; this means making sure everyone has an equal chance to participate and make a difference. We win by playing together. Next Insurance is an equal opportunity employer and prioritizes building a diverse and inclusive workplace. We provide equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants of any type and do not discriminate based on race, color, religion, national origin, gender, age, sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, genetic information or characteristic, gender identity and expression, veteran status, or other non-job related characteristics or other prohibited grounds specified in applicable federal, state, and local laws. Next's policy is to comply with all applicable laws related to nondiscrimination and equal opportunity and will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training.",4.5,Next Insurance,"Palo Alto, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,4,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,3692,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
530,530,Data Scientist,$82k-$147k,"We make small businesses more successful through better banking.

Our company is looking for a Data Scientist to join our growing team as we enter a new phase of expansion We are San Francisco and Toronto-based, venture-backed startup at the heart of the FinTech movement that is shaping the way financial services are delivered.

Our product

NorthOne is a mobile, tech-powered bank account built for startups, freelancers, and small/medium-sized businesses (SMBs). Poor financial literacy has an outsized impact on the costs and failure rates amongst SMBs, and we are on a mission to eliminate these problems. We are more than a banking platform, we are the world-class Finance Department that SMBs could never afford.

Our team

We data. As a Data Scientist you'll work with our world-class Data, Engineer, Growth and Product teams. Our COO has helped build digital products used by companies like Frank And Oak, Supercell, MachineZone, BMO, and Trivago. Oh, and our CEO? 6 years at McKinsey working on digital customer experience in financial services. We're building a product that solves real pain, vs the imagined kind. Feeling it?

REQUIREMENTS

The skills required for this role:
You love using SQL and Python to answer business questions and analyze data
You live and breath report automation
World class data science experience that you can apply to product, operations, and growth marketing
You're delighted by the idea building the foundational elements of a growing data science practice
You're a strong, clear communicator who knows keep the whole team on the same page
BONUS points:
Hands on experience working with tools like Looker and Mixpanel
Financial services experience or good understanding of banking
Experience working in a startup environment or for a SaaS company
Background in management consulting
PhD or Masters degree
BENEFITS

Our mission is big and audacious, but we're assembling a team to take the challenge head-on.

As a Data Scientist you'll be joining a team that prioritizes:
People: Our company is more than just a business. We're a band of brothers and sisters supporting each other on our mission to rebuild business banking. We're really serious about mission, fit, and the people we work with. You'll be part of a rapidly scaling team that reflects these values and keeps this place special.
Diversity: You'll find yourself in an environment that values diversity and inclusivity. Excellence doesn't come in one flavor and neither should we.
Leadership: You're right in the thick of it, making critical decisions that will clear our path forward.
We offer full health/dental benefits, competitive compensation/equity, and one hell of an adventure.

If you recognize yourself in this job description, let's talk.",4.2,NorthOne,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,2757,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
531,531,Data Scientist,$82k-$147k,"Company:
Safeway Inc-001

Job Title:
Data Scientist

Address:
5918 STONERIDGE MALL RD, PLEASANTON, California 94588

Job Description:
Albertsons Companies is one of the largest food and drug retailers with 2,300+ stores. The Albertsons Companies family of brands includes some of the most prominent brands in food retailing, with a growing base of loyal shoppers. Thanks to the professionalism, diversity, spirit, and friendliness of our people, we have locations across the U.S.

The Data Science team at Albertsons Companies is looking for an experienced Data Scientist to work for the most transformational food and drug retailers in the United States. Albertsons operates over 2,300 stores under 19 well-known banners including Albertsons, Safeway, Vons, Jewel-Osco, Shaw's, Acme, Tom Thumb, Randalls, United Supermarkets, Pavilions, Star Market, Haggen and Carrs. The company reported revenue of over $60 billion from over 34 million weekly shoppers and is the third largest private company in the country.

Data Science at Albertsons is inspired to build best in class customer experience and revolutionize the food and drug retail industry. We are looking for people who are excited in re-imagining the grocery experience by harnessing the power of AI and digital technologies. The Data Science team collect and rely on big data from existing stores and customer interactions at the 2300 nationwide stores and beyond. We are a highly driven team that apply data science to delight our customers, to improve store operations, to optimize supply chain and to proactively improve product lifecycle.

You will enjoy working with one of the richest data sets in the world, cutting edge technology, and the ability to see your insights turned into business impacts on regular basis. You will work closely with other data scientists and business partners in identifying and defining data science projects, building machine learning algorithms and models on top of existing data platforms. The candidate will have a background in computer science or a related technical field with experiences working with large data sets and applying data-driven decision making. A successful candidate will be both technically strong and business savvy, with a passion to make an impact through creative storytelling and timely actions. You are a self-starter, smart yet humble, with a bias for action.

Key Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:
* Collaborate with business teams to develop production grade machine learning models on large-scale datasets and improve customers' overall shopping experience
Enhance and apply customer lifetime value models to support various business decision making
Generate sentiment analysis based on surveys and customer feedbacks in order to deliver lovable customer experiences
Identify key drivers for customer satisfaction and opportunities to delight customers through mining complex data
Apply machine learning to enhance recommendation engines and deliver personalized user experience on ecommerce website and loyalty mobile app
Build models and algorithms to fuel growth initiatives for Digital, Merchandising, Marketing and Loyalty teams
Apply predictive modeling techniques to optimize the forecasts for planning needs
Scale up prototypes and implement reliable automated production workflow for models
Collaborate with software development engineers to integrate models
Qualifications:
Masters or PhD degree in quantitative discipline: Computer Science, Engineering, Data Science, Math, Statistics or related fields
2+ years of industry experience in applying data science and modeling methodologies: regression model, survival model, ensemble modeling, NLP, recommendation algorithm, clustering, deep learning algorithm, experimental design (Multivariate/A-B testing) and nonparametric Bayesian modeling etc.
2+ years of experience and proficiency in SQL, Python and/or Spark-ML
2+ years of SQL development skills writing queries, transforming data, mining structured and unstructured data.
2+ years of hands-on experience in building data science solutions and production-ready systems on big data platforms such as Snowflake, Spark, Hadoop
Strong teamwork and communication skill
Ability to write production-level code in Python
Experience with Snowflake, Azure Databricks is a strong plus
How to Apply: Interested candidates are encouraged to submit a resume by visiting https://www.albertsonscompanies.com/careers.html

Diversity is fundamental at Albertsons Companies. We foster an inclusive working environment where the different strengths and perspectives of each employee is both recognized and valued. We believe that building successful relationships with our customers and our communities is only possible through the diversity of our people. A diverse workforce leads to better teamwork and creative thinking, as well as mutual understanding and respect.

AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER",3.1,Safeway Inc,"Pleasanton, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,105,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,4943,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,1,0,1
532,532,"Translational Data Scientist, NIBR Translational Medicine",$86k-$143k,"20-Aug-2020

Job ID
300507BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""20. That’s how many years of data we have in our informatics systems! Enriched every day by more than 1000 Translational Medicine scientists. If you like data, there is no better place to be!

Who are we?

Our team of 30 Data Scientists are leveraging this data to accelerate drug development. NIBR Translational Medicine is in charge of creating data needed for submission of all Novartis drugs: Toxicology, DMPK, Phase I and II Clinical Trials, and most clinical Omics. We have one of the richest data pool in the Pharma world.
As a Translational Data Scientist, using your knowledge of research, you will analyze the Translational Medicine data landscape, and design ways to integrate data to speed up its analysis and the project delivery. Creating new capacities for Translational Medicine teams by easing access to data, relevant algorithms, and visualizations as part of the Novartis Digital Strategy, you will make drug development faster.

Your main responsibilities will be to:
• Organize access to data via APIs, applications and textual and graphical representations of the data in close collaboration with data scientists. Build application Proof of Concepts with selected scientists, organize scale up with relevant partners and release to NIBR community.
• Push community adoption of techniques and tools crafted by supporting power users and coordinating training sessions.
• Be a liaison between partners involved: scientific teams having data intensive needs, teams crafting enterprise solutions, internal and external partners producing similar solutions.
• Maintain expertise in methodologies for data handling, visualization and User Experience
• Mentor and encourage others to tackle problems
Posting Title
Translational Data Scientist, NIBR Translational Medicine",4.0,Novartis,"Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,24,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,MA,1864,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
537,537,Data Scientist,$86k-$143k,"Data Scientist

UPS Capital (UPSC), one of the fastest growing subsidiaries within UPS offers opportunities for career development, mastering your craft, and virtually limitless professional growth. Business Intelligence and Analytics (BIA) department at UPS Capital delivers analytical information and insights for enhancing UPS Capitals marketplace competitiveness and supporting growth initiatives and is looking for a Data Scientist to join their team.

The UPSC BIA Data Scientist will apply predictive and prescriptive analytics models on organizations internal and external data to derive actionable insights for the growth of UPS Capitals risk mitigation and insurance business. As a key member of a growing advanced analytics team, he/she will operate in a fast-paced environment and take on multiple roles. He/She will have access to large volumes of structured and unstructured data as well as the ability to allocate vast computing resources, including GPUs, to speed up work. He/She will investigate, join, and analyze disparate and large data sets to build risk management analytics solutions that have direct impact to UPS Capital and its customers. He/She will also apply Statistical Theory, Machine Learning (ML) algorithms and Artificial Intelligence (Al) techniques to build UPS Capitals risk mitigation solutions, enhance customer experience, and grow customers.

This position will have the opportunity to research and experiment with innovative new techniques in machine learning, statistics, and operations research. He/She will have the freedom to attend conferences and training sessions, and collaborate with partner universities, to further skillset. The selected candidate will primarily serve in an individual contributor role with a focus on hands-on technical work. He/She may be asked to take on non-technical assignments such as business requirements gathering.

Responsibilities and Duties
Provides expertise on computational, quantitative, and algorithmic techniques applicable to data science
Performs data wrangling, ETL, and data exploration tasks
Builds predictive and prescriptive models, algorithms, and simulations
Collaborates with cross-functional teams of data scientists, data engineers, application developers, etc. to deliver measurable outcomes
Identifies and champions new initiatives aimed at delivering value to business stakeholders
Manages multiple work streams while proactively responding to competing demands
Evaluates open-source and vendor-based tools, such as applications, platforms, frameworks and programming languages
Knowledge and Skills
Passion for building analytical solutions to answer business questions and improve business processes
2+ years' industry experience in a technical role, preferably in a data science capacity
Intermediate knowledge of R or Python
Knowledge of Generalized Linear and Non-Linear Models, Time Series Analysis, Random Forest, Gradient Boosted Machines, Neural Networks, Unsupervised Methods (Dimensionality Reduction, Clustering, etc.) knowledge
Experience querying relational data systems for ETL and data integration tasks
Good communications skills with ability to present to technical and business audiences
Experience using Spark/Hadoop systems for distributed analytics and data processing
Knowledge of Natural Language Processing & Text Mining, Experimental Design, Computer Vision & Image Processing, Bayesian Networks, Reinforcement Learning, Collaborative Filtering, Network/Graph Mining, Combinatorial Optimization, Linear & Mixed-Integer Programming and Discrete-Event & Stochastic Simulation - Preferred
Knowledge of H2O.ai and TensorFlow - Preferred
Familiarity with scaling and operationalizing data science models in production settings - Preferred
Experience working in a cloud-computing environment such as AWS, Azure, GCP, etc. - Preferred
Prior exposure to the transportation or logistics industry - Preferred
Master's Degree in quantitative or computational field such as Statistics, Operations Research, Computer Science, Physics, Engineering, Mathematics, Economics, or related discipline - Preferred
PhD - Preferred
UPS is an equal opportunity employer. UPS does not discriminate on the basis of race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/age/sexual orientation/gender identity or any other characteristic protected by law",3.5,UPS,"Atlanta, GA",-1,10000+ Employees,113,Company - Public,other_industries,Transportation & Logistics,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,GA,4360,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,1,0,1
538,538,Data Scientist,$86k-$143k,"What We Do
Kalderos delivers technology that solves the challenges facing the US healthcare system. At Kalderos, we develop technology solutions with a focus on simplifying the complex coordination of drug discount programs from exhaustive data services to intelligent reporting to issue resolution.

To learn more: https://www.kalderos.com/company/about

What Data Scientists Do

The Data Science team’s mission at Kalderos is to maximize the trust of all participants in our Drug Discount Management Platform. This starts with having trust in each other as a team, then expanding it to do this work in three primary ways: building differentiated datasets, measuring what matters, and optimizing the right process transparently. If that means a model, great! If that means working with design to develop a different product approach, also great! Below are some possible day to day tasks for a data scientist at Kalderos.
Build, test, deploy, and maintain supervised or unsupervised learning models. Work with internal teams that operationalize that work to ensure their output is high quality and continually improving for end users
Create internal dashboards to monitor processes and measure impact
Participate in generating collateral that supports our sales process or creates valuable industry content that showcases Kalderos’ unique position in the industry
Work with product teams to collect forward looking data points to enable future data science solutions
Build internal tools to enable team mates to scale their knowledge and increase impact
Learn a new programming language, data science technique, or about the pharmaceutical industry - we continually build our skills and explore new things


What We Are Looking For
Some work experience as a Data Scientist in a full time role
Ability to write machine learning and data analysis code in R or Python
Some ways you may demonstrate this are:
Open GitHub Repositories or portfolios
Project descriptions of what you have accomplished
Kaggle competitions
Published or working papers that use data science methods
Ability to take complex information and communicate it clearly for different stakeholders, both technical and non-technical
Some ways you may demonstrate this are:
Talks or presentations you have given in the past
Speaking through your work history in a phone interview
High quality data visualizations that communicate complex information clearly
Candidates must be authorized to work in the US and be able to work in Chicago


What May Set You Apart
Experience in healthcare or pharmaceuticals
Open source contributions to popular data science tools
Experience with data engineering tools such as Airflow
Experience working with Azure or similar public cloud
Experience working with SQL Server or similar databases

If you think you meet some of the list of the above, but not everything, that’s perfectly fine! We encourage you to apply regardless. At Kalderos, we know talent comes in many forms, and we’re willing to look beyond a set of rigid criteria to find the right teammate.

Company Perks

401K plan with matching
Healthcare benefits
Flexible schedule and a fair PTO system that allows for a healthy work-life balance
Opportunity to work on new technologies and learn new skills
Celebration, and education stipends

To learn more: https://www.kalderos.com/company/culture

Kalderos is an equal opportunity workplace. We are committed to equal opportunity regardless of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, or veteran status.

Due to the circumstances of the COVID-19 pandemic, Kalderos has decided to protect our current and future employees by shifting to an entirely remote workforce. We will continue to operate, interview, onboard, and work remotely. Please be aware that some of our roles will not be remote long-term and will return to an office setting once we're safe to do so following the guidance of local health authorities and the CDC.",5.0,Kalderos,"Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,4,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,IL,4007,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
539,539,Head of Data Science & Analytics - Digital Health R&D Oncology,$86k-$143k,"Job Description : Head of Data Science and Analytics - Digital Health R&D Oncology

Digital health, the point at which healthcare, technology, data and analytics converge, is the subject of great promise, with the World Health Organisation believing it has the potential to improve health for everyone. At AstraZeneca, weve been working hard to make this a reality, with the years of experience we have accumulated enabling us to now embed digital health at scale across R&D. To achieve our goal of improving patient experience and outcomes AstraZeneca has Digital Health as one of top 4 strategic priorities for the company, details on digital health strategy can be found here .Oncology is the largest therapeutic area within AstraZeneca and second highest cause of death globally, with AstraZenecas ambition to eliminate cancer as a cause of death.

The Head of Data Science and Analytics for Digital Health R&D will be a key leader to drive our digital health strategy through data and analytics, helping to design and lead the data and analytic planning and implementation across Digital Health R&D Oncology programs. This includes but is not limited to: digital therapeutic analysis plans, real world evidence analysis, psychometric analysis, and ML/AI to support more efficient identification of treatment benefits vs harms (e.g. signal detection of treatment emergent adverse events, disease progression, construction of novel endpoints to characterize safety and tolerability) and Disease Management algorithms for Oncology. Responsible for building and leading a novel data science team with a global footprint through a combination of internal FTE and strategic external partnerships. Adopting a DevOps approach working with engineers and developers to release analytical models that are repeatable and scalable. Recognised externally as a thought leader and expert within own area of specialization.

Typical Accountabilities
Lead a talented technical team, working with the head of Oncology Digital health to develop the strategy for digital health solutions in Oncology and lead the implementation of data science and analytics solutions that can help patients get better outcomes in Oncology.
Design and lead both the data & analytic planning, including oversight of implementation across all Digital Health R&D programs.
This includes but is not limited to: digital therapeutics analysis plans, real world evidence analysis, psychometric analysis, and ML/AI to support more efficient identification of treatment benefits vs harms (e.g. signal detection of treatment emergent adverse events, disease progression, construction of novel endpoints to characterize safety and tolerability) as well as, disease management systems for Oncology
Design and implement ML information extraction
Probabilistic matching algorithms and models
Research and develop innovative, scalable solutions
Identify data sources and analyze large, complex datasets to extract insight
Partner with key internal stakeholder to deliver: IT, Biometrics, partner data science functions
Collaborate with R&D Data Hub leadership to ensure data is standardised, integrated and exposed in a way that facilitates the goals of the advanced analytics programme
Develop and implement a standardised framework for analytics projects, from requirements capture through to benefits demonstration
Define and implement strategies for managing analytical models and monitoring their performance over time
Championing the development of infrastructure and analytics environments that facilitate the delivery of value from the Data Science and Analytics team.
Drive key advanced analytics project delivery decisions, such as whether to buy versus build
Provides input to the Digital Health R&D Strategy and Oncology TA Strategy from a Data Science perspective
Leads, mentors, evaluates and develops the team within Data Science & Analytics to ensure that the area achieves its objectives and complies with all relevant regulations and laws
Essential
MSc/PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Data Science relevant field with experience in pharma/healthcare or other relevant area
Conceptual, analytical and strategic thinking
Creative, innovative, solution-focused
Curious, embraces new ways of problem solving, new ideas, new ways of working
Expertise and experience with development and applications of software as a medical device
Managerial experience of both data scientists and engineering teams
Strong communication skills and ability to build relationships
Ability to serve as translator between scientific problems to data science solutions
Ability to apply expertise to complex problems, problem solving and with a quality focus
Proven leadership promoting motivation and empowering others to accomplish individual, team and organizational objectives
Experience working with and architecting analytics solutions in AWS
Experience defining strategies and approaches to AI/ML model monitoring, maintenance and management
Experience delivering AI/ML models from conception, through development and into production
Desirable
Experience working with IT partners for business solutions
Able to manage to budget and productivity targets/responsibilities.
Expert problem solving and conflict resolution.
Diligence attention to detail and ability to manage a program of concurrent activities
Resilience ability to overcome and motivate others in the face of a changing environment
Knowledge of the latest technical and regulatory expectations
Significant experience with NLP problems
Experience using AI/ML to combine data from multiple modalities in the pursuit of novel insights
Understanding of and experience with developing and delivering Explainable AI solutions",4.0,AstraZeneca,"Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,107,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,MD,5732,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,1,1,0,0
540,540,Data Analyst/Data Scientist,$86k-$143k,"Role: Data Science/Analyst Duration: 6 month contract to start, long term potential

Location:
Remote due to Covid Costa Mesa Start: ASAP Skill Set
Mid-level Data Scientist/analyst with Tableau, Alteryx and Python specifically. o strong analytical mind o experience in data visualization techniques, who can independently figure out how to combine various data sources or data points to answer a business question, and do the story-telling part (visualizing so the answer can be seen?) - without too much direction or guidance
Direct, hands-on experience with Tableau o building visualizations/reports and assembling dashboards in Tableau.
Direct, hands-on experience with Alteryx o Integrating data sources into Alteryx or Apache AirFlow. ? Python coding experience for some custom API based integrations.
Good communication skills
Required Skills : Role: Data Science/Analyst Duration: 6 month contract to start, long term potential Location: Remote due to Covid Costa Mesa Start: ASAP Skill Set Mid-level Data Scientist/analyst with Tableau, Alteryx and Python specifically. o strong analytical mind o experience in data visualization techniques, who can independently figure out how to combine various data sources or data points to answer a business question, and do the story-telling part (visualizing so the answer can be seen?) - without too much direction or guidance Direct, hands-on experience with Tableau o building visualizations/reports and assembling dashboards in Tableau. Direct, hands-on experience with Alteryx o Integrating data sources into Alteryx or Apache AirFlow. Python coding experience for some custom API based integrations. good communication skills
Basic Qualification :
Additional Skills :
Rank :A3
Requested Date :2020-09-09",4.8,RICEFW Technologies Inc,"Costa Mesa, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,11,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,1758,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
541,541,Data Scientist,$86k-$143k,"RESPONSIBILITIES:

Kforce has a client in search of a Data Scientist in Oakland, CA.

Overview:
By working in our team of data scientists and engineers, you will have an opportunity to make a positive impact on many of the company's 12.5 million members. We work closely with doctors, researchers, operational leaders, other data scientists and engineers, etc., advancing care, quality and affordability. Our current pipeline of work includes work on social determinants of health, pharmacy operations, affordability, proactive care management, optimization of care settings, etc. Our example techniques include time series forecasting, natural language processing, cohort development through clustering and classification, geolocation analytics, and integration of disparate sources. You will have the opportunity to work with large datasets and complex problems, discovering and delivering on untapped potential in our data.

Responsibilities and Duties:
Understand business problems and suggest data and analytic solutions to support decision makers
Help develop and transform data sets using variety of programming languages
Develop and test analytic hypotheses using established methods
Create data visualizations that convey a clear story about what is observed in the data
Design, develop, and validate predictive and explanatory models using a wide variety of models
Communicate results to variety of audiences
REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor's degree with evidence of quantitative aptitude
2-4 years of doing analysis, model building, causal inference
2-4 years of experience programming in R, Python, or another programming language
2-4 years of experience writing SQL queries to various databases
An ideal candidate should have excellent communication skills, solid programming and problem-solving skills, and a solid grasp of statistics and/or Machine Learning
Preferred Experience:
Master's degree or Ph.D. in Computer Science, Statistics, Data Science, Mathematics, Engineering or other quantitative field in preferred
2-4 years of work experience is preferred
Analytic or operational experience and/or education in Pharmacy, Nursing, Public Health, or other relevant medicine topics is appreciated
Kforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",4.1,Kforce,"Oakland, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,54,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,2494,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
543,543,Senior Data Engineer,$86k-$143k,"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta has an immediate need for a Senior Data Engineer to join a fast-paced program in support of a government customer with a very critical national security mission. This is a multi-year program, where the successful candidate will work on an interdisciplinary project team of more than 30 highly qualified individuals with a wide array of skills that include client (reactjs), server (spring java), QA Automation Engineers, UI/UX Designers, and DevOps engineers. The team is responsible for building a next generation Mission Information System and is performing greenfield Software Development using modern technologies via an Agile DevOps approach.

This Senior Data Engineer will play a vital role collaborating as part of this cross-functional Agile team to create and enhance data ingestion pipelines and address big data challenges. The Senior Data Engineer will work closely with the Chief Architect, systems engineers, software engineers, and data scientists on the following key tasks:
Provide Extraction, Transformation, and Load (ETL) experience coupled with enterprise search capabilities to solve Big Data challenges
Design and implement high-volume data ingestion and streaming pipelines using Open Source frameworks like Apache Spark, Flink, Nifi, and Kafka on AWS Cloud
Leverage strategic and analytical skills to understand and solve customer and business centric questions
Create prototypes and proofs of concept for iterative development
Learn new technologies and apply the knowledge in production systems
Monitor and troubleshoot performance issues on the enterprise data pipelines and the data lake
Partner with various teams to define and execute data acquisition, transformation, processing and make data actionable for operational and analytics initiatives

Required Qualifications / Experience:

BS in Computer Science, Systems Engineering, or a related technical field or equivalent experience with at least 8+ years in systems engineering or administration (6+ years with a MS/MIS Degree).
Must have an active Top Secret security clearance and able to obtain a TS/SCI with Polygraph.
3 years of experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, NiFi.
3 years of experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python (preferred) and/or Java.
3 years of experience with and managing data across relational SQL and NoSQL databases like MySQL, Postgres, Cassandra, HDFS, Redis, and Elasticsearch.
3 years of experience working in a Linux environment.
2 years of experience working with and designing REST APIs.
Experience in designing/developing platform components like caching, messaging, event processing, automation, transformation and tooling frameworks.
Experience developing data ingest workflows with stream-processing systems: Spark-Streaming, Kafka Streams and/or Flink.
Experience transforming data in various formats, including JSON, XML, CSV, and zipped files.
Experience with performance tuning of ETL jobs.
Experience developing flexible ontologies to fit data from multiple sources and implementing the ontology in the form of database mappings / schemas.
Strong interpersonal and communication skills necessary to work effectively with customers and other team members.

Preferred Qualifications / Experience:

Data engineering experience in the Intelligence Community or other government agencies.
Experience with Microservices architecture components, including Docker and Kubernetes.
Experience developing microservices to fit data cleansing, transformation and enrichment needs.
Experience with AWS cloud services: EC2, S3, EMR, RDS, Redshift, Athena and/or Glue.
Experience with Jira, Confluence and extensive experience with Agile methodologies.
Knowledge about security and best practices.
Experience developing flexible data ingest and enrichment pipelines, to easily accommodate new and existing data sources.
Experience with software configuration management tools such as Git/Gitlab, Salt, Confluence, etc.
Experience with continuous integration and deployment (CI/CD) pipelines and their enabling tools such as Jenkins, Nexus, etc.
Detailed oriented/self-motivated with the ability to learn and deploy new technology quickly.

Clearance Level: TS/SCI with Poly

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,Novetta,"Reston, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,8,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,VA,6011,1,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
544,544,"Senior Data Engineer, Enterprise Data and Analytics",$86k-$143k,"How will your role impact First Command?

The Senior Data Engineer will be responsible for design and implementation of data integration and data services across the enterprise. As part of the Enterprise Data & Analytics Team, the Senior Data Engineer will have the opportunity to shape the culture of data integration practices based on the Enterprise Data and Analytics strategy and Data Governance outcomes.

The Senior Data Engineer will use new and established automation and integration tools, Enterprise Information Management Strategy (EIMS), frameworks, critical thinking, and problem-solving skills to partner with the First Command lines of business to rationalize data needs that are critical to our data transformation which includes a migration to the Azure Cloud.

The ideal candidate is outcome-focused and has a collaborative style that fosters teamwork. They will be required to work across multiple groups and initiatives.

What will you be doing?
Collaborate with business stakeholders to develop an understanding of their business requirements and operational processes;
Implement and act on the recommendations, outcomes and designs from Data Governance and Enterprise Architecture;
Develop ETL automation and integration capabilities to implement the data lifecycle, considering how data is created, transformed, stored, archived, analyzed and shared in the organization;
Contribute to process for making data architecture decisions
Complete data exploration and profiling by leveraging data analysis, design and presentation tools;
Lead the design, development, and maintenance of ongoing automation, integration, services, etc. to provide the right data to the right place at the right time;
Develop and implement automated solutions to optimize efficiency and quality of First Command enterprise data and business processes;
Partner with Information Technology and business unit groups to develop and implement comprehensive automation and business critical data which will be leveraged for solutions that provide consistent, clean and integrated data which enables business intelligence;
Implement methods to include unstructured and big data, such as social media, emails, pictures, videos, voice and sensor data, client surveys and feedback.
What skills/qualifications do you need?


Education
BS preferred; MBA or MS or equivalent a plus.
Required Qualifications
7+ years of applied experience in data integration, ETL, and data management or comparable positions that handle large/complex data sets, developing automation, and fostering business partner relationships
Excellent written communication and presentation skills
Expert in SQL with knowledge of T-SQL
Expert in ETL tools such as SSIS, Azure Data Factory and Informatica
Ability to quickly adapt to changing priorities and generating innovative solutions
Expert in transforming manual processes to industry standards and automation
Proficient in understanding of data mapping and lineage strategies
Proficient in understanding in conceptual, logical and physical data design
Proficient in understanding of data management practices, data architecture principles, and data governance process
Preferred Qualifications
Financial services industry experience or other highly regulated industry experience a plus
Certifications related to Data Integration a plus
Applied experience in Agile, SAFe, Scrum or Lean Six Sigma
Familiarity with analytics solutions and data science capabilities
Familiarity with object-oriented programming and the software development process
Familiarity with data science and analytics tools such as SPSS, SAS, Tableau, PowerBI
Disclaimer

The information of this description has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job, which may vary on the department or the assignment. The actual essential duties, responsibilities and qualifications may vary by department, reporting structure and other business needs. No inference should be drawn that a specific job duty, responsibility or qualification is non-essential by its absence from this description.

#LI-NC1

Required Skills

Required Experience

Job Location
Fort Worth, US-TX",3.0,"First Command Financial Services, Inc.","Fort Worth, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,62,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,TX,4388,1,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
546,546,Data Scientist,$86k-$143k,"The Organization

We help society’s foundational institutions—healthcare and higher education—to achieve their full potential in service to others.

We are our clients’ trusted partners in ever-changing times. For more than 30 years, Kaufman Hall has provided independent, objective insights grounded in sound data and analysis to help clients fulfill their missions, achieve their goals, and tackle their toughest problems.

Kaufman Hall provides world-class management consulting in strategic financial planning (a concept we created); performance improvement; partnerships, mergers, and acquisitions; and treasury and capital markets. Kaufman Hall’s consulting is supported by a deep foundation of benchmarking and software tools.

At Kaufman Hall, we believe that sustained success is never an accident. It is the result of sound decision making, based on data-driven analysis and disciplined thinking, and guided by the fundamental principles of corporate finance.

The Position

Kaufman, Hall& Associates, LLC, is seeking a Data Scientist with deep expertise in statistical analysis, an inherent curiosity for data and analytics, and the right business acumen to transform data into insight to help Kaufman Hall advance a variety of our practices.

Kaufman Hall is uniquely situated with both a thriving management consulting and software business, which provides access to a great deal of data assets, subject matter experts, and deep client relationships. We have recently started a data division and are looking for high-quality individuals to play a significant role in helping to build the practice.

We are currently looking for a talented and motivated individual to work on statistical analyses and business intelligence platforms to advance all of Kaufman Hall’s practices. This is an exciting opportunity to join Kaufman Hall and apply the latest tools and methods in statistics, big data, data science, and business intelligence to a variety of internal and client business problems. In this role you will be supporting and building Kaufman Hall’s data division.

Primary Responsibilities:

• Develops creative and analytically driven solutions by employing operations research, advanced statistical and mathematical science techniques such as machine learning/AI, mathematical modeling, statistical analysis, linear and non-linear regression analysis, stochastic modeling, and mathematical optimization

• Understands the benefits and limitations of various statistical and mathematical approaches and can communicate to colleagues and clients

• Utilizes advanced mathematical& statistical methodologies, to develop scenario modeling events in partnership with directors, leadership, and consultants to assist clients in transforming their enterprise

• Creates complex models and algorithms drawing from diverse, large and complex data. Translates client and consultant requirements& constraints into mathematical models

• Builds analytical/optimization models to improve the financial and patient care metrics.

• Participates in client and internal discussions to explain model output

• Participates in research to continually advance analytical, operations research, and process improvement methodologies to complex industrial problems

• Advises software developers in the creation of commercial products

• Creates reference documents as necessary to memorialize, replicate, and sustain data outputs

Qualifications

• 3+ years of progressive experience required. Healthcare finance/operations experience is preferred. Prior consulting experience preferred.

• Knowledge and experience in utilizing applied mathematics to a business setting such as machine learning/AI, linear programming, severity and risk modeling, optimization modeling, operations research, and logistics science

• Proficiency in Python. Front-end/web application experience a plus.

• Possess basic skills related to planning, budgeting, forecasting, financial, and clinical process/outcome reporting. Understands the interdependencies of these systems.

• Ability to assess client/project needs, outline project goals, define project deliverables, and establish timelines

• Proficiency with Microsoft Excel, Word, Power Point, and current business applications and software.

• Strong oral, written, presentation and interpersonal communication skills

• Self-directed learner who demonstrates intellectual curiosity, operates independently, and works efficiently in an inter-disciplinary team environment

• An entrepreneurial spirit that is inquisitive, proactive, interested in learning new tools and techniques

• Unquestionable commitment to personal and corporate integrity in every situation

• Current Permanent US Work Authorization Required

Education:

• Bachelor’s Degree in data science or analytical or business-related field required

• Master’s degree in data science, operations research, statistics or related field preferred

Kaufman, Hall,& Associates, LLC. is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will be considered without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, national origin, marital status, ancestry, citizenship, veteran status, sexual orientation or preference, or physical or mental disability or other legally protected category.",3.5,Kaufman Hall,"Chicago, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,35,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,IL,5303,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
548,548,Data Scientist - Deep Learning,$86k-$143k,"Data Scientist - Deep Learning

Verb Surgical - a Google and Johnson & Johnson joint venture!

Verb is looking for a Data Scientist with experience applying Deep Learning Methods to real world problems. In this position you will be analyzing surgical video and robotic kinematic data to help improve the performance of surgeons. You will interface directly with surgeons to better understand their needs and where machine intelligence can help improve their surgical experience and expedite their learning and improvement. You will use these insights to build both deep learning and traditional models that will build the new generation of digital surgery.

Qualifications:

Strong experience designing quantitative modeling experiments to solve fuzzy real world problems.
Good communication skills to clearly understand the problems of experts outside your field as well as collaborate with other data scientists.
Deep understanding deep learning models and methods allow you to design and redesign models to solve new applications.
Strong experimental design that will allow you to verify the utility of models in practice.
Passion for research and curiosity that calls you to go beyond good enough to create something innovative and exciting.
Experience Required:

Masters in a quantitative field such as computer science, electrical engineering, statistics, biostatistics, applied math, etc. PhD preferred
3+ years working in data science/ deep learning is required.
Experience with deep learning libraries (pytorch, tensorflow, keras, etc.) as well as statistical modeling software (scikit-learn, statsmodels, python or R)
Experience directly interfacing with customers, particularly medical professionals.
Experience turning research projects into consumer products
Ability to write beautiful, production ready code.
Physical Demands: No physical demands required.
Who is Verb Surgical?
Verb Surgical is shaping the future of surgery. A new future, a future unimagined even a few years ago, which will involve machine learning, robotic surgery, instrumentation, advanced visualization, and data analytics. A future of surgery that aims to achieve improved patient outcomes, lower costs, and greater hospital efficiency.

Verb Surgical was founded with technology, expertise, and funding from Verily (formerly Google Life Sciences) and Ethicon, a medical device company in the Johnson & Johnson family of companies. This company will continue in strong partnership with Verily and Johnson & Johnson (Google and Johnson & Johnson Team for Robotic Surgery) to advance the surgical tools and capabilities available to surgeons and OR professionals today.",3.5,Verb Surgical,"Mountain View, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,2656,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,1
550,550,Data Scientist,$86k-$143k,"Data Scientist


New York, NY | Full Time

We’re seeking Data Scientists who will help solve critical business problems and derive valuable insights for our clients. Our teams apply business intuition along with a diverse set of methods and algorithms, including but not limited to, advanced analytics, machine learning, text mining, process mining, network analysis, and data visualization to improve operations. The ideal candidate is capable of ingesting, processing and interpreting data sets that vary widely in size, structure, complexity, and dimensionality. They are quick to adapt to new technology, and passionate about data-driven business problem solving for business operations. They also thrive in cross-functional teams and can clearly communicate technical concepts to non-technical individuals.

CKM is on the forefront of leveraging data analytics to inform strategic decision-making and drive operational improvement for clients. Our number one asset is our people, who shape the uniquely creative and energetic culture at CKM. Because we’re passionate about knowledge sharing and professional development, we give our employees ample opportunity to satisfy natural curiosity, access to the firm’s expertise, plus the autonomy and authority to design and execute their own analyses.

Why we’ll love you:
Bachelors, Masters, or Ph.D.
Passion for quantitative problem solving and developing data driven solutions to difficult business questions
Demonstrated proficiency in Python, in an academic or professional environment
Skills in or familiarity with data cleaning, natural language processing, machine learning, artificial intelligence, visualization, network analysis, and distributed computing are a plus
Familiarity with database concepts and structures
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analyses clearly
Fluent oral and written English communication skills
Self-starter and team player
Ability and willingness to travel from time to time (domestic and international)
Authorized to work in the US
Why you’ll love us:


Our team is diverse and intellectually curious, made up of people that you’ll genuinely enjoy spending time with
We’re fanatical about helping clients derive value from data and work on solving challenging problems within some of the world’s largest companies
We are a meritocracy and consistently promote from within
We move fast and are not afraid of evolving our tools, technology and thinking
Compensation is competitive and commensurate with your degree and experience. At CKM, we celebrate our differences – they help our business thrive and our employees have fun. CKM Analytix is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. We are dedicated to equal employment opportunities regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national orientation, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity/expression, or veteran status.",2.9,CKM Advisors,"New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,9,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,NY,2922,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
551,551,Data Scientist,$86k-$143k,"COMPANY OVERVIEW


Proudly Farmers First℠!

What do you get when you cross the best of Silicon Valley innovation and technology with the value driven mission of Family Farmers around the world?

Farmers Business Network, Inc. (FBN℠)!

FBN℠ was created by farmers for farmers and is on a mission to power the prosperity of Family Farmers around the world by leveling the playing field through insights, commerce and community. Our goal is to enable them to make smart business decisions that maximize their farms profit potential for generations to come, helping to ensure the fundamental economic viability and sustainability of family farms and rural communities.

We are a dynamic, and innovative AgTech company that offers competitive compensation and benefits and is backed by top investors including Google Ventures, Kleiner Perkins, DBL Partners, T Rowe Price and Temasek.

THE ROLE

How can we sustainably feed the world? With the population set to reach nine billion by 2050 and available farmland decreasing, the odds are stacked against us. This problem falls squarely on the shoulders of farmers, who are increasingly working harder for less. FBN helps farmers to solve these problems.

Farmers are often forced to make key decisions in the face of significant uncertainty about their impact. FBN applies technology and data science to this challenge. We're building the world's largest agronomic dataset - made up of billions of data points, gathered from sophisticated sensors on farm equipment. The network effect of farmers sharing their data allows us to deliver unprecedented analyses that help farmers make data-driven decisions - we're not just building new technology, we're also making new agricultural scientific discoveries.

We're looking for data scientists who are enthusiastic about applying big data to help farmers!

Data science underlies every product that we build at FBN, so you'll see your work directly translate into new products for our farmers. The data science team at FBN:
Explores one of the world's most unique, interesting, and diverse datasets.
Furthers scientific understanding about what affects agricultural production.
Uncovers insights that help farmers efficiently support a growing population.
Makes meaningful improvements in the world by translating data science into products that help farmers increase yield and efficiency.
Required Skills
Deep understanding of statistical modeling concepts.
Familiarity with machine learning algorithms.
Excellent programming skills (R or Python preferred).
Preferred: understanding of agricultural systems (soil chemistry, plant physiology, entomology, etc…).
Required Experience
MS or greater in statistics or related discipline, OR MS or greater in agronomy or related discipline with strong data analysis skills.
Farmer's Business Network, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer and participates in U.S. Citizenship and Immigration's E-Verify program.",3.6,"Farmer's Business Network, Inc.","San Carlos, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,6,Company - Private,other_industries,Agriculture & Forestry,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,2944,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
552,552,Lead Data Scientist,$86k-$143k,"Lead Data Scientist

El Segundo, CA

About Nexon:

Nexon, a world leader in online games, is building a workplace based on mutual respect, good humor, and the pursuit of excellence because we believe that great games can only be built by amazing people. Our vision is to create high quality, innovative online games that create unforgettable experiences for players around the world.

Nexon has an ever-expanding worldwide team of over 6,000 employees, and boasts a diverse global portfolio that includes titles like MapleStory, Dungeon Fighter Online, KartRider and many more. If you want to be part of building an exciting game company and help chart the course of online gaming, let's talk!

About the role:

The Lead Data Scientist is responsible for developing advanced machine learning algorithms and statistical models to solve critical problems and help deliver the best customer experiences. The Data Scientist partners with Business teams, Platform team, Security team, and other stakeholders to implement data science models into live production systems. The Data Scientist brings fresh perspectives to inform decision-making toward better player experience by translating player voice into insights.

What you'll be doing:
Lead efforts to develop data science capabilities and partner with other data scientists across the Nexon organization
Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, data visualization and data-mining to tell the story behind numbers and find relevant insights for partners and leadership
Manage a portfolio of data science products and work closely with data engineers to help improve the platform in relation to data science work
Perform new research into machine learning applications that drive business value
Architect platform-level solutions for machine learning systems
Research and develop state-of-the-art machine learning, data mining, and statistical modeling solutions to understand game design, system performance and key business behaviors, such as player acquisition and retention
Establish scalable, automated processes for large scale data extraction, model development, model validation and model implementation
Effectively translate statistical findings into actionable recommendations for senior leaders on game design and business teams
Analyze player big data, developing and testing data-fueled hypotheses, extracting useful information and turning it into helpful insight that can help us improve players' experiences
Bring a fresh perspective and a new dimension of analysis to bear on the challenge of identifying


What skills you'll need:
7+ years of experience translating data to insight to recommendations
BS (MS/PhD Preferred) in quantitative discipline (e.g. Math, Physics, Statistics, Operations Research, Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Economics)
Expertise in machine learning and statistical analysis approaches such as classification, clustering, regression, statistical inference, collaborative filtering, natural language processing, experimental design, social networking analysis, etc.
Experience managing advanced analytics projects which solve complex analytical problems using data mining technologies
Expertise in automating and deploying models in production systems
Experience with Big Data technologies (AWS EMR, Spark, Presto, Hadoop, etc.)
A true passion for understanding customer behavior on-platform and in-game
Expert analytical and problem solving skills, plus the ability to innovate and work independently
Strong skills in statistical methods (e.g. hypothesis testing, time series modeling)
Strong SQL skills and strong Python or R skills; familiarity with Jupyter or RStudio
Familiar with Hadoop, Apache Spark framework, SQL/NoSQL, Snowflake
Strong skills in building dashboards and visualizations (e.g Tableau, PowerBI, Quicksight)
Bonus Points:
Online gaming experience a BIG PLUS!
Experience in marketing machine leaning project a big plus



Nexon's benefits and perks:

We offer medical, dental and vision plans for you, your spouse or domestic partner and your children. Employees who enroll in the high deductible health plan receive an annual employer contribution to a health savings account and company paid hospital indemnity benefits. We also provide company paid life, AD&D, short-term and long-term disability benefits as well as access to voluntary life and AD&D for yourself and your dependents, flexible spending accounts, a 401(k) savings plan with a company match, and pet insurance. Nexies are encouraged to take advantage of our monthly wellness credit, participate in lunchtime yoga, and enroll in language classes. We host bi-monthly catered lunches, monthly happy hours, and maintain a well-stocked snack bar. To help you maintain a good work life balance, we offer paid time off, sick days, company holidays, and a year-end break.

Nexon is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, national origin, protected veteran status, or any other basis protected by applicable law and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.

]]>",2.6,Nexon America Inc,"El Segundo, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,26,Company - Public,Video Games,Media,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,5231,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,1,0,0
553,553,Data Engineer (Python/Postgres),$86k-$143k,"Top 3 reasons our employees love working at Omicron:
We build cutting-edge technology that is literally changing how the world consumes online content.
We get to collaborate with really smart, interesting people every day.
Omicron rewards its team with really fun company events. Past events include food trucks on-site for lunch, private movie screenings, tickets to charity galas and more!
JOB SUMMARY:

As Data Engineer you will report to the EVP of Data Engineering & Analytics, and work daily with our Business Intelligence Team. You will extend, maintain, and manage large datasets in a Python + Postgres environment.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Develop queries to aggregate data considering performance and runtime.
Work with data sources that are supplied in batch or near real-time streams.
Troubleshoot and performance-tune large datasets.
Integrate with REST APIs in Python.
EXPERIENCE:
Owner-level experience with PostgreSQL – indexes, materialized views, parent/child tables.
Familiarity with Python & Pandas.
Experience in writing analytic queries in SQL.
Familiarity with some other relational database platforms such as MySQL or MS SQL Server.
Familiarity with automated workflows in Airflow, cron, or another tool.
Data analysis experience with SQL and other programming languages.
Basic quantitative skills that will allow the successful use of data in business processes.
ADDITIONAL SKILLS:
Experience in basic Linux server administration: ssh, rsync, etc.
Other scripting experience: Go, PHP, Perl
Knowledge of common Linux tools for text processing: awk, sed, grep
EDUCATION:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, Math, or related quantitative experience.
OTHER:
As Data Engineer you will report to the Business Intelligence Team in our Winter Park, FL office. The position is open to local and remote candidates.
This job description is not intended to be all-inclusive.

Omicron Media, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/AA M/F/D/V

If you are interested in this position with Omicron Media, Inc., please apply by visiting our website at https://omicronmedia.com/work-here/job-listings/

If your experience and qualifications match our current needs, a member of our Recruitment team will contact you. We look forward to hearing from you!",5.0,"Omicron Media, Inc.",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,Remote,2285,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
555,555,Data Scientist,$86k-$143k,"Classification Title:
Data Scientist

Working Title:
Data Scientist

Campus:
UNC Greensboro

Region:
Piedmont/Triad

Job Summary:
Primarily responsible for analyzing available datasets, and building visualizations that surface actionable insights (usually via dashboards) for data-informed decision making purposes, supporting the mission of the Analytics Program and the University at large. This position requires strong problem solving skills and a drive to continue learning as technology and desired outcomes change. The position is expected to align business needs with data analysis approaches and solutions, and show a deep understanding of, and desire to contribute to, standards and best practices that benefit the overall analytics mission. The position will focus on delivery and extraction of useful & actionable insights from large datasets. Management is also open to the possibility of this position being remote.

Minimum Qualifications:
Mid-career with Masters and 1-2 yrs experience; Bachelors and 2-4 yrs experience or equivalent education and experience in an developer/integrations role required.

Position Number:
998571

Posting Date:
06/05/2020

Closing Date:


American Recovery & Reinvestment Act Funded:",4.4,UNC Greensboro,"Greensboro, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,129,College / University,other_industries,Education,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,NC,1231,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
556,556,Group Manager - Data Science,$86k-$143k,"Overview


Intuit is seeking a Group Manager to join the Intuit AI Group in Mountain View, CA.
What you'll bring


· BS, MS, or PhD in an appropriate technology field (Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math, Econometrics, Operations Research, Physics, etc.), or equivalent experience5+ plus years experience as an established technical leader/Manager of data science teams that have successfully delivered data-driven software products.

· Innovative and disruptive technology leader solving long term strategic outcomes

· Expert command of AI and machine learning, statistical modeling, state-of-the-art tools, and engineering best practices

· Experience in leading teams who have expertise in data mining algorithms and statistical modeling techniques such as clustering, classification, regression, decision trees, neural nets, support vector machines, genetic algorithms, anomaly detection, recommender systems, and natural language processing.

· Impeccable attention to detail and strong ability to convert complex data into insights and action plans

· Strategic thinker, flexible problem solver, great listener and team orientation

· Able to effectively communicate a vision and inspire others to innovate
How you will lead


· Lead and create a team of data scientists

· Mentor and hire the best data scientists in the valley

· Applies artificial intelligence and machine learning techniques to solve complex questions or fuel new business opportunities

· Delivers breakthrough benefits to Intuit users/customers across small business & consumer products using individual, enriched, and aggregated data

· Provides leadership in advanced engineering, data science and analytics in the development of current or future products or technologies

· Provides technical leadership across multiple teams, by understanding a key technology space deeply enough to help guide strategy

· Provide/inspire data science innovations that fuel the growth of Intuit as a whole

· Understands and teaches proven methods and hacking skills in working with divergent data types at scale, to explore and extrapolate data-driven insights using advanced, predictive statistical modeling and testing applied to data acquired and cleansed from a range of sources

· Provides to business stakeholders the entrepreneurial guidance essential for appropriately interpreting and building on findings, and fully exploiting the insights revealed through the research

· You thrive on ambiguity and enjoy the frequent pivoting thats part of the exploration. You are extremely passionate about applying practically Machine Learning to real customer problems, powering the next generation experiences for large scale applications.",4.3,Intuit,"Mountain View, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,37,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,2716,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
557,557,Data Scientist,$86k-$143k,"ASU Job Title
Data Science Specialist

03-Sep-2020

Department Name
CHS CHIR

Campus/Location
Campus: Downtown Phoenix

Job Description
This position will lead efforts to maintain a database of health-related data and to conduct data analysis and reporting for modeling the health system and supporting efforts to improve outcomes. This position will manage data, conduct data queries and extractions, and perform statistical analysis for various projects and service requests at CHiR.

Requisition ID
62970BR

Working Environment
Use basic math
Ability to clearly communicate to preform essential functions
Regular activities require ability to quickly change priorities, may include/subject to resolution of conflicts
Use of software/computer equipment for extended periods of time
Use critical thinking to make decisions and/or analyze and report data/results of tests conducted
Adherence to all regulations pertaining to Personally Identifiable Information and Protected Health Information
Minimum Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree in Statistics, Computer Information Systems, Business Information, Economics or a related field and three (3) years of related data analysis experience, OR, any equivalent combination of experience and/or education from which comparable knowledge, skills and abilities have been achieved.

Department Statement
For over two decades, the Center for Health Information & Research (CHiR) has been a community resource and partner for organizations and individuals seeking comprehensive health information, data analytics and reporting for public, private and research uses. CHiR collects and analyzes health and social determinants data from a variety of data partners, including the Homeless Management Information System) in our secure central repository. All data are linkable, creating one of the most complete and accurate longitudinal profiles of individuals and populations over time and across providers and insurers in Arizona. Visit https://chir.asu.edu

The College of Health Solutions (CHS) is dedicated to translating scientific advances into practical interventions to improve health outcomes through education, research and service. We equip students with the knowledge and skills to influence healthier lifestyle choices; develop creative interventions to improve the health of people and populations; analyze and translate large amounts of health data into solutions; and maximize the technology, science, business and application of diagnostics. CHS research programs encompass basic/discovery science, clinical trials, intervention science and measurement of health outcomes. CHS takes an interdisciplinary approach to address the complex systems that underpin health problems. The college is highly collaborative, transparent and team-oriented with an innovative organizational structure that includes translational teams, affinity networks, and academic programs to improve the health of people and communities.

The current training programs include behavioral health, biomedical diagnostics, biomedical informatics, executive and continuing education, exercise science, health promotion, health sciences, kinesiology, medical studies, nutrition, population health, the science of health care delivery, and speech and hearing science. Our programs are offered at ASU’s Downtown Phoenix, Tempe, West and Lake Havasu campuses, as well as on Mayo Clinic’s Scottsdale campus.

For more information about ASU and the College of Health Solutions, visit http://about.asu.edu/ and https://chs.asu.edu

Category
02

VP Code
VP/EXEC VICE PROV DPC

Scope of Search
Open

Desired Qualifications
Experience working with health data
Experience in using MS SQL, data visualizations, database software and statistical programs.
Demonstrated knowledge of statistical analysis, database architecture, data mining and predictive modeling tools and techniques.
Experience in using and learning a wide variety of tools and languages to achieve results (e.g., R, SAS, SPSS, Python, Hadoop, RapidMiner, SQL, Javascript, etc.).
Experience in completing projects with evidence of creative and critical thinking.
Experience in communicating findings in a clear, accurate and user-friendly manner.
Experience in working independently and within a team.
Close Date
15-September-2020

Grant Funded Position
This is not a grant funded position and is not contingent on future grant funding.

ASU Statement

Arizona State University is a new model for American higher education, an unprecedented combination of academic excellence, entrepreneurial energy and broad access. This New American University is a single, unified institution comprising four differentiated campuses positively impacting the economic, social, cultural and environmental health of the communities it serves. Its research is inspired by real world application blurring the boundaries that traditionally separate academic disciplines. ASU serves more than 80,000 students in metropolitan Phoenix, Arizona, the nation's fifth largest city. ASU champions intellectual and cultural diversity, and welcomes students from all fifty states and more than one hundred nations across the globe.

ASU is a tobacco-free university. For details visit www.asu.edu/tobaccofree

AmeriCorps, Peace Corps, and other national service alumni are encouraged to apply.

Arizona State University is a VEVRAA Federal Contractor and an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will be considered without regard to race, color, sex, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other basis protected by law.

Notice of Availability of the ASU Annual Security and Fire Safety Report
In compliance with federal law, ASU prepares an annual report on campus security and fire safety programs and resources. ASU’s Annual Security and Fire Safety Report is available online at https://www.asu.edu/police/PDFs/ASU-Clery-Report.pdf. You may request a hard copy of the report by contacting the ASU Police Department at 480-965-3456.

Relocation Assistance – For information about schools, housing child resources, neighborhoods, hospitals, community events, and taxes, visit https://cfo.asu.edu/relocation-services.

Full-Time/Part-Time
Full-Time

Essential Duties
Oversees secure collection, cleaning, standardization, transformation and storing of data from various sources.
Maintains databases and related programs in a thorough and efficient manner, ensuring data quality.
Identifies and uses appropriate investigative and analytical technologies to identify patterns, interpret and verify results.
Uses predictive modeling, statistics, trend analysis and other data analysis techniques to explore data and to answer specific research questions.
Co-creates models that describe the current health system and sub-systems.
Evaluates the impact of innovations and interventions intended to improve health outcomes.
Utilizes effective project planning techniques to break down projects into tasks and ensure deadlines are met.
Prepares, or oversees the preparation of, reports, dashboards and presentations.
Collaborates with the team in order to improve the effectiveness of computational models through the use of data and feedback from stakeholders.
Other duties as assigned.
Employment Verification Statement
ASU conducts pre-employment screening which may include verification of work history, academic credentials, licenses, and certifications.

Fingerprint Check Statement
This position is considered safety/security sensitive and will include a fingerprint check. Employment is contingent upon successful passing of the fingerprint check.

Salary Range
$56,600 - $60,000 per year; DOE

Instructions to Apply

Application deadline is 3:00PM Arizona time on the date indicated.

Please include all employment information in month/year format (e.g., 6/88 to 8/94), job title, job duties and name of employer for each position.

Resume should clearly illustrate how prior knowledge and experience meets the Minimum and Desired qualifications of this position.

ASU does not pay for travel expenses associated with interviews, unless otherwise indicated.

Only electronic applications are accepted for this position.

IMPORTANT NOTE: What is the meaning of “equivalent combination” in the minimum qualifications? It means one year of higher education or 24 credit hours, is equal to one year of experience. For example, a four year Bachelor’s degree is equal to four years of experience.

Job Title
Data Scientist

Job Family
Business Operations",4.3,Arizona State University,"Tempe, AZ",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,135,College / University,other_industries,Education,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,AZ,8568,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
559,559,Senior Data Scientist,$86k-$143k,"Grubhub is dedicated to connecting hungry diners with our wide network of restaurants across the country. Our innovative technology, easy-to-use platforms and streamlined delivery capabilities make us an industry leader today, and in the future of online food ordering.
We strive to create a workplace that reflects the diversity of our customers and the communities we serve. When you join our team, you become part of a community that works together to innovate, solve problems, take risks, grow, work hard and have a ton of fun in the process!
Why Work For Us
We have a fast-paced environment and that is what our teams thrive on. Grubhub believes in empowering people and offering opportunities for development, as well as professional growth. We value strong, positive relationships in all areas: with each other, our customers and our greater community. Want to be a part of a team of diverse collaborators in an authentically fun culture? If so, we want to talk to you - and hear what’s your favorite restaurant for food delivery!
More About the Role:
Grubhub is looking for a data scientist to join the Pricing team. As a part of Pricing, you’ll be a member of a small team of data scientists and engineers who shape and optimize how we charge our diners, shaping hundreds of millions in revenue annually. You will work closely both with financial stakeholders as well as engineers to ship models that make Grubhub more efficient with the way in which it charges customers. You’ll construct models and A/B tests as well as write code to improve our modeling capabilities.

Prototype and ship large-scale models that help drive profit or order volume
Conduct A/B experiments to validate the effectiveness of these models
Work closely with financial stakeholders to construct models that drive business goals
Leverage big data tools to incorporate new data sources into modeling pipelines
Work closely with data scientists and backend engineers to implement and maintain your changes

MS with 5+ years of relevant industry experience or PhD in computer science, engineering, statistics, machine learning, mathematics, or in another quantitative field
Experience shipping changes to a production environment
Comfortable with using git, basic Linux commands, and object-oriented programming languages (Scala, Java, Python)
Experience performing analysis with large-scale SQL tooling (Presto, BigQuery, etc.)
Familiarity with basic AWS tools like EC2 and S3
Excellent communication and data presentation skills
Effective working in a fast-paced team environment
Preferred Qualifications
Demonstrated ability to work on cross-functional teams
Experience making high-impact decisions (multiple millions of dollars)
Ability to comprehend and debug complex systems that might cross team and tool boundaries across the company

Flexible PTO. Grubhub employees are provided a generous amount of time to recharge their batteries.
Health and Wellness. We provide programs that support your overall well-being such as generous medical benefits, employee network groups, company-wide fitness challenges, and a comfortable and casual workplace! We also support our parents by offering 8 weeks of paid parent bonding time, a 4-week returnship program, and 6-8 weeks paid medical leave.
Learning and Career Growth. Your personal and professional development is a priority at Grubhub. From day one, we empower you to lead and be an active participant in your career growth. We provide continuous learning opportunities, training, and coaching and mentorship programs.
MealPerks. Who’s ready for some lunch? We provide our employees with a weekly Grubhub credit to enjoy and support local restaurants. We also offer company-wide meals several times a year to bring our Grubhub family together.
Fun. Every Grubhub office has an employee-led Culture Crew that connects people through fun, meaningful events and initiatives. Some of our popular past events include: Wing-eating contests, Grubtoberfest, 5k Runs, Bring Your Child to Work Day, regular happy hours, and more!
Social Impact. We believe in the importance of serving the communities that support our business. In addition, employees are given paid time off each year to support the causes that are important to them.

Grubhub is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics. The EEO is the Law poster is available here: DOL Poster. If you are applying for a job in the U.S. and need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to TalentAcquisition@grubhub.com and let us know the nature of your request and contact information. Please note that only those inquiries concerning a request for reasonable accommodation will be responded to from this email address.
CA Privacy Notice: If you are a resident of the State of California and would like a copy of our CA privacy notice, please email privacy@grubhub.com.",3.9,Grubhub,"New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,16,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,NY,5093,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,1,0,0
560,560,"Data Scientist, Medical Diagnostics",$86k-$143k,"_*The Company*_
The world is facing a medical crisis, bacteria are increasingly evolving resistance to even our strongest antibiotics. The problem is already very real and immediate; for example, bloodstream infection leading to sepsis is now responsible for more than half of all deaths in hospitals and is the most expensive condition treated in hospitals. Sepsis mortality rate increases >6% every hour without effective antibiotic treatment. Yet, despite the life and death urgency, and healthcare cost impacts, current methodologies require 3 days to determine the correct antibiotic.

Specific Diagnostics has developed a breakthrough solution to rapidly determine the effective antibiotic treatment for bloodstream and other acute infections. Used for bloodstream infection Specific’s solution provides results 2 days sooner than existing methods, saving patients suffering from drug-resistant infection.

We have been funded by nearly $30 M in non-dilutive government sponsored research support and recently $17.5 M in venture capital. This is an opportunity to join us at an inflection point in our commercial growth as we bring our first key product to market and with recognition from major customers fueling an expansion of our staff.
_The Job*_
_*_*This is the job for you if want to be where your ideas to be central to a world-changing and lifesaving product. Data science and analytics are at the core of our company we are seeking an exceptional talent to join our team. You will be a key contributor and critical to the success of the company. The main analysis tasks you are expected to contribute to are:
Analytical methods and statistical analysis for processing high-volume, temporal high-dimensional data streams generated in real-time from our proprietary sensor technology.
The development of data-driven visualization tools for the explorative analysis of high-dimensional data.
The application and development of suitable pre-processing, feature-selection and dimensional reduction techniques to detect, measure and account for data artifacts.
The development and validation of applications for a medical instrument built under the guidance of a senior manager experienced in the application development discipline (so you’ll be learning the valuable skill of integrating your work into applications for medical diagnostic devices).
Algorithm development for decisions and measurements from multi-dimensional data streams.
This is not the job for a numbers only person. We want someone with a passion for and experience in the sciences that will lead you to look deeply into the sources of the data along with the scientists so that the data analysis is influenced by the science of our diagnostic technology and the science is influenced by the analysis.
_You_*
You have a proven track record of successfully developing, validating and deploying data analysis and analytical methods to solve challenging real-world applications. You are deeply familiar with a broad range of analytical models and are at the pulse of developments in the field. Ideally you have proven expertise in the analysis of spatio-temporal data. You have a strong domain knowledge in the field of statistical analysis and signal processing. You should have a track record of success in your education and projects and have these characteristics and skills:
MS degree in computer sciences, biomedical engineering, or related field and at least 5 years of interesting relevant experience.
Expert in R and proficient with C++ and Python.
Expertise in analytical methods and statistical analysis.
Proficiency in SQL as well as NoSQL database technologies a plus.
Full fluency (verbal and written) of the English language is a must.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
On call
Experience:
relavent: 2 years (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",1.0,Specific Diagnostics,"Mountain View, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,3986,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
564,564,Senior NLP Data Scientist - Telecommute,$25-$28,"Optum Payment Integrity Analytics is looking to expand and is seeking a Senior NLP Data Scientist to join our team and help us reach our goals of accurate and effortless payments of claims through advanced analytics and machine learning. You should be an exceptional disciplined and self-motivated Data Scientist with NLP, predictive modeling and advanced analytics experience and a passion for working with healthcare data, experience using various computational approaches, and a portfolio of projects you can show and talk about.

Youll enjoy the flexibility to telecommute* from anywhere within the U.S. as you take on some tough challenges.

Primary Responsibilities:
Improve and extend the analytic methods in our products, with a focus on using natural language processing
Work alongside other data scientists, engineers, and project managers to design and implement models and experiments from end to end, including data ingestion and preparation, feature engineering, analysis and modeling, model deployment, performance tracking and documentation
Conduct hands-on data analysis and predictive analytics on large datasets
Effectively communicate complex technical results to business partners
Support and drive analytic efforts around machine learning and innovation
Work with a great deal of autonomy to find solutions to complex problems
Youll be rewarded and recognized for your performance in an environment that will challenge you and give you clear direction on what it takes to succeed in your role as well as provide development for other roles you may be interested in.

Required Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree or higher in Applied Mathematics, Physics, Computer Science, Statistics, Linguistics or related technical field
3+ years in an individual contributor role as a hands-on developer, non-managerial role and executing on data science and programming projects as primary part of the job
2+ years of experience in natural language processing and applying it to practical real-world problems
Strong proficiency in natural language processing and applying it to practical real-world problems
Strong proficiency in advanced data science tools such as R, Python, SQL, Spark and H2O
Familiarity with wrangling large datasets with big data tools such as Hadoop, Hive and Spark
Experience applying computational algorithms and statistical methods to structured and especially unstructured data
Experience combining analytic methods with advanced data visualizations using, for example, Tableau, Shiny or D3
Expert ability to breakdown and clearly define problems
Strong ability to communicate highly technical results to a diverse audience
Careers with Optum. Here's the idea. We built an entire organization around one giant objective; make the health system work better for everyone. So when it comes to how we use the world's large accumulation of health-related information, or guide health and lifestyle choices or manage pharmacy benefits for millions, our first goal is to leap beyond the status quo and uncover new ways to serve. Optum, part of the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, brings together some of the greatest minds and most advanced ideas on where health care has to go in order to reach its fullest potential. For you, that means working on high performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter. Optum, incredible ideas in one incredible company and a singular opportunity to do your life's best work.SM

Youll enjoy the flexibility to telecommute* from anywhere within the U.S. as you take on some tough challenges.

Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: UnitedHealth Group is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.

UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.

Job Keywords: Senior NLP Data Scientist, telecommute, Telecommuter, Remote",3.4,Unitedhealth Group,"Eden Prairie, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,43,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10+ billion (USD),-1,Per,1,0,53.0,MN,4213,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
565,565,Principal Data Scientist,$25-$28,"Position Title: Principal Data Scientist

Responsibilities:
Build a data/stats-driven ad machine learning models, working closely with the product team
Constantly experiment and improve machine learning models for the recommendation/ad optimization system
Invent and analyze big data for given business cases and help implement them in production
Work with the product/engineering team to implement, test and deploy the solution on Google Cloud Platform
Core Competencies:
Passionate about machine learning and big data
Great communication about complex algorithmic works as easy-to-understand story telling
Motivated to test at billions scaled data and follow up machine learning models in product
Requirements:
Ph. D in Computer Science or Statistics, or 5 years or more of similar working experience in the technical field.
Must have hands-on Machine-learning related industry project experience.
Solid Python programming skills
Ability to work in a fast paced, test-driven collaborative and iterative programming environment
Understanding of major recommendation algorithms (Collaborative Filtering, Matrix factorization, Gradient Boosting, etc.)
Senior level understanding of Algorithms, Data Structures, and Machine Learning/Data Mining
Understanding of RDBMS, SQL and NoSQL alternatives
Bonus:
Domain and/or marketplace knowledge
Understanding of various ad optimization algorithms (CTR prediction, eCPM optimization, user targeting and segmentation, RTB and real-time optimization) is a plus
Experience with Hadoop/Hbase/Pig or PySpark is a plus
Tapjoy is an equal opportunity employer. We believe that diversity and inclusion lead to stronger, more innovative teams and better business results; we want to draw from the broadest talent pool possible and encourage qualified applicants. Tapjoy does not discriminate on the basis of sex, race, ethnicity, color, age, sexual orientation, gender (including identity and expression), disability (mental or physical), religion, national origin, citizenship, marital status, military or veteran status, or any other protected classification protected by applicable law; we will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities, and pursuant to applicable fair chance ordinances, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

For more information, please visit www.tapjoy.com.

]]>",3.6,Tapjoy,"San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,13,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,Per,1,0,53.0,CA,2405,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
567,567,"Senior Data Scientist, Risk",$25-$28,"Brex is building the new global standard for financial services, starting with corporate cards. We are designing the product from first principles, enabling us to have unparalleled features and a seamless, modern experience for our customers. With backing from top venture firms and industry veterans such as Peter Thiel and Max Levchin, Brex is one of the fastest-growing startups to date, and we’re looking for someone to help scale the company with incredible people across the board. As a risk scientist, you will leverage your modeling and engineering experience to mitigate risk. Based in San Francisco, our team is committed to creating a driven and diverse company with ambitious people from wide-ranging backgrounds.

We are looking for people with a strong background in machine learning and engineering who can independently solve ill-defined data challenges from end to end. You should be technical, and be able to quickly pick-up new engineering skills needed. You should also be a strong communicator who is able to work with internal stakeholders to take your projects to completion.

Responsibilities:
Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, software engineering to build scalable and robust real-time ML models.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to unravel complex problems by clearly formulating the problem statement, technical requirements, and present finding at all levels.
Build internal tools or products to enable direct user interaction with the data sets and build ML systems with human-in-the-loop components.
Design, execute, analyze, and interpret the results of experiments across our product.
Alongside business stakeholders and engineers, reconcile crucial data integrity issues.
Maintain a strong data driven culture within the company by interacting with diverse internal functions.
What We Value:


Substantial experience building mission critical systems with strong proficiencies in computer science fundamentals - Data structure / algorithm, design patterns, and testing principles.
Strong interpersonal and communication skills and having worked with different business functions.
Desire to have very high impact through evaluation of commercial risk.
Ability to devise creative workarounds to difficult project roadblocks.
Ability to relentlessly chase down data integrity issues to their root cause.
Experience initiating and driving projects to completion with minimal guidance.
Thriving in a collaborative environment, filled with a diverse group of people with different expertise and backgrounds (we currently have around 30 nationalities represented, with more than ½ the company working in a country different from the one they grew up in).
Preferred Qualification:
Experience with credit underwriting or fraud models or domain knowledge in the financial space.
Data at Brex:


We work in an environment where it matters to make the right design decisions the first time, and as a result, take on less technical debt than other companies.
Product is a highly collaborative initiative across multiple teams. Data scientists are expected to understand the business and have input towards our long term vision.
We believe in two equal track career growths between senior individual contributors and managers. We want people to contribute where they feel most impactful.
We believe in small, accountable and autonomous teams of amazing people, eager to learn, teach and constantly improve our way of working.
People have a strong sense of ownership and accountability for what they’re building. What we build today will be the foundation for dozens of other systems in the future.
We are very frank on discussing technical matters. If one disagrees with how things are being done, we encourage them to speak up and help us get to the truth faster.
Does Brex sound like home? We'd love to meet you! Please share with us details of what you've worked on and what matters to you (personally and from a technical standpoint). Don't worry too much about your resumé. Be genuine, not official.",4.0,Brex,"San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,3,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,Per,1,0,53.0,CA,4044,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
568,568,Enterprise Data Engineer,$25-$28,"Our client is searching for an experienced Enterprise Data Engineer to join their team in Chicago. Enterprise Data Engineers build pipelines that support datasets used by all investment teams and strategies across the firm. They manage the firm’s most critical data sets and focus on applying software development best practices to solve complex data challenges. The expectation is that the data engineer has sound programming skills, strong business acumen, and a strong interest in finance.
Responsibilities:
Develop solutions that enable internal analysts to efficiently extract insights from data. This includes owning the ingestion (web scrapes, S3/FTP sync, bespoke processes), transformations (Python, Perl) and interface (API, schema design, events, etc.)
Build tooling and automation around data pipelines that improve the efficiency, quality and resiliency of the data platform
Partner with internal analysts, quants and data scientists to design, develop, test and deploy solutions that answer fundamental questions about financial markets.
Take on an entrepreneurial mentality by building and selling your own ideas. The company works in an evolving space and they expect you to help design their evolution by challenging the status quo and independently identifying opportunities to improve the entire data organization.

Requirements:
A passion for working with data and developing software to address data processing challenges
Proficiency with Python, C++, Java or equivalent
Proficiency with RDBMS, NoSQL, distributed compute platforms such as Spark, Dask or Hadoop
Prior experience building data pipelines from structured or unstructured data preferably including web crawlers
Prior work developing BI tooling and/or application development for data analytics
Advanced technical communication skills
Working knowledge of statistics, predictive analytics or machine learning techniques
Strong business acumen with prior experience in investment research or direct exposure to product or data science teams AND passionate about using data for investment decisions

If you would like to be considered for the position of Enterprise Data Engineer or wish to discuss the role further then please leave your details below. Your resume will be held in confidence until you connect with a member of our team
Email: info@njf.com or call London (0207 604 4444,) New York (212 400 4845) or Chicago (312 204 72176) to speak to a member of our team. Thank you",4.2,NJF Global Holdings,"Chicago, IL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,17,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,Per,1,0,53.0,IL,2464,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
569,569,Data Scientist,$25-$28,"Job Title: Data Scientists

Job Description
Join an elite group dedicated to continuous personal improvement as GCT is currently seeking Data Scientists of all levels to support an intelligence agency with insights gained from analyzing voluminous sensor data. The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for process optimization and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. Candidates must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

Clearance: TS/SCI w/Full scope polygraph (or used within the past 24 months)

Education/Experience Requirements

Senior Positions:
Masters degree in Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field, or extensive comparable experience
10+ years of relevant experience
Junior/Intermediate Positions
Completed B.S. in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a closely related technical field
3-9 years of relevant experience
Qualifications
Experience using statistical computer languages (SAS, SPSS, R, Python, SLQ, etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights fromlarge data sets
Experience working with and creating data architectures
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Strong problem solving skills
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques
Desired Skills
Experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models
Coding knowledge and experience with several languages: C, C++, Java, JavaScript, etc.
Knowledge and experience in statistical and data mining techniques: GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, social network analysis, Bayes, etc.
Experience querying databases and using statistical computer languages: R, Python, SLQ, etc.
Experience using web services: Redshift, S3, Spark, DigitalOcean, AWS, etc.
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Google Analytics, Site Catalyst, Coremetrics, Adwords, Crimson Hexagon, Facebook Insights, etc.
Experience with distributed data/computing tools: Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Hive, Spark, Gurobi, MySQL, etc.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using: Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, etc.
The success of Great-Circle Technologies depends on the success and well-being of its employees. GCT promotes work/life balance and encourages the overall well-being of each of its contributors. A comprehensive benefits package is provided, which currently includes company paid single medical, dental, life, disability, and long-term care insurances (with contributions to family premiums,) matching 401k plan, 34 days off per year including 10 Federal holidays plus the day after Thanksgiving, Christmas and New Year’s eves!

Join us at Great-Circle Technologies, where innovation is the shortest distance between two points.

Great-Circle Technologies is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Great-Circle Technologies ensures all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to gender, race, ethnic background, religion, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, or protected veteran status.",2.2,Great-Circle Technologies,"Chantilly, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,20,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,Per,1,0,53.0,VA,4000,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
570,570,Senior Data Scientist with Top Secret,$25-$28,"What You'll Get to Do as a Data Scientist: *
Leads data science efforts, working closely with clients and data to understand mission and data.
Develops algorithms leveraging modern data science technologies including reinforcement learning systems, machine learning and more.
Provides clients with technical expertise for a project or program. Able to manage technology projects or lead technology solutioning.
Provides highly technical and specialized guidance and solutions to complex IT problems; performs elaborate analyses and studies.
Evaluates, recommends, and executes new technologies and updates existing infrastructure to ensure optimal performance and efficiency.
Develops IT strategies to ensure the systems meet existing and future requirements based on needs and regulations.
Works in a variety of environments and has excellent verbal and non-verbal communication skills. Works effectively and independently.
You’ll Bring These Qualifications: *
Must have an active TS or TS/SCI
At least 5 years of experience developing in languages commonly used for data analysis such as Python, R, Julia, or SAS
Experience working with multiple database types such as SQL, Redis and MongoDB
Experience building and integrating the at the application and database level
Experience developing REST/SOAP APIs and messaging protocols and formats
At least 2 years of theoretical and practical background in statistical analysis, machine learning, predictive modeling, and/or optimization
Experience implementing event/data streaming services such as Kafka
Experience prototyping front-end visualizations utilizing data visualization suites such as Kibana or Splunk
At least 2 years of experience developing Reinforcement learning systems utilizing at least one of the following methodologies. Finite Markov Decision Processes, Support Vector Machines, Q-Learning, Stochastic Finite State Machines, MCTS or other hybrid Deep Reinforcement Learning processes
Experience in theoretical and practical background in statistical analysis, machine learning, predictive modeling, and/or optimization.
Experience developing in languages commonly used for data analysis such as Python, R, Julia, or SAS
Experience working with databases such as SQL or MongoDB.
Experience working with large-scale data sets.
Experience producing data visualizations for a variety of different audiences.
Excellent verbal and written communications skills along with the ability to present technical data and approaches to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Professional Development Assistance
Retirement Plan
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
On Call
Experience:
SAS: 5 years (Preferred)
Data Science: 5 years (Preferred)
Machine Learning: 5 years (Preferred)
Data Engineering: 5 years (Preferred)
R: 5 years (Preferred)
Python: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Washington, DC 20016 (Preferred)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.oneglobeit.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,OneGlobe LLC,"Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,15,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,Per,1,0,53.0,DC,3291,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
571,571,Data Scientist,$25-$28,"WHO WE ARE


Postmates enables anyone to have just about anything on-demand. We pioneered the on-demand space and currently serve 80% of US households with a fleet of more than 350,000 Postmates and the largest network of merchants in the US. We're changing the landscape of commerce by making cities our warehouses, providing the delivery infrastructure, and connecting our customers to any product, anywhere, anytime. Postmates isn't just an app, it's a way of life and a part of pop culture. We are the O.G. of on-demand and we've given people a new superpower — the ability to Postmate anything from anywhere. We're building a movement to make Postmates a verb: Postmate it.

WHAT WE DO


Postmates relies heavily on our engineering team to realize this vision. Building a software platform that is reliable, scales, and stays agile under demanding product needs is a serious technical challenge. Postmates is a three-part balancing act connecting customers, merchants, and couriers in real-time. If any piece is out of whack, the whole system suffers. Working with the Postmates engineering team offers an opportunity with explosive growth, cutting-edge technology, a highly visible charter, and a cool user-focused product vision.

As a Data Scientist, you'll use your full toolkit - statistical modeling, machine learning, data mining, data visualization, and software engineering - to develop data products and models that are used by millions of users and power the growth of our business. You will collaborate with a strong team of engineers, product managers and data analysts in defining the frontier of data products and models in the three-sided marketplace. Data scientists will work on how to formulate a model from a real business problem, determine evaluation metrics, evaluate different modeling approaches, conduct data analysis, and build features and algorithms for the various challenging problems at Postmates.

YOUR RESPONSIBILITIES
Modeling and forecasting demand and supply to enable more intelligent matching, optimize the overall marketplace efficiency and provide valuable insights to our merchants and Postmates
Large scale Machine Learning algorithms that powers our Search Ranking models and Personalized Recommendation Engine
Predicting the Postmates Delivery Time (PDT) and improving the dispatching algorithm
Determining the optimal pricing strategies to help our Postmates maximize their revenue
Identifying suspicious transactions and malicious users for risk control
Natural Language Processing to understand text content on Postmates platform, including named entity resolution and recognization of reviews, descriptions and interactions between users on our marketplace
OUR REQUIREMENTS
A Bachelor's/Master's degree (or higher) in a technical field (Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Operations Research, Math, Physics, Engineering, etc.) or equivalent work experience required.
minimum of 3+ years of professional experience in Data Science or Applied Machine Learning required
A deep theoretical understanding of modern machine learning algorithms, statistical models, or optimization
Extensive experience with data tools, Python (Pandas, Scipy, Numpy, Scikit-Learn, etc), R, SAS, SQL, etc and strong skills in data analysis, data visualization, and feature engineering
Ability to own your modeling work from model development all the way to production deployment and beyond with minimal help from engineers
Strong communication skills; Explaining complex technical concepts to product managers, data analysts, and other engineers shouldn't be a problem for you
OUR PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Experience with MapReduce, Spark, Hive, HBase, Google BigQuery, and BigTable
Experience with ML frameworks like Tensorflow, PyTorch, Spark MLlib, XGBoost, and Scikit-Learn
YOUR BENEFITS

Postmates has your back. In our impact-first work environment, we value huge company vision. As you strive to build the future with us, we'll support you with a competitive salary and equity plan, along with access to our 401k plan and robust benefits including: health benefits, flexible paid time off, parental benefits, and food perks.",3.3,Postmates,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,9,Company - Private,other_industries,Transportation & Logistics,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,Per,1,0,53.0,CA,4166,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,1
572,572,Big Data Engineer - Chicago - Future Opportunity,$25-$28,"ABOUT US

Are you ready to transform an industry? At Centro we are building a comprehensive tech platform that radically increases efficiencies and impact across businesses, teams, and campaigns. Our clients can run all their digital business through Basis, with robust business intelligence, workflow automation, search and social integrations, and the number one rated DSP.
We’re taking the digital advertising world by storm and are proud to be headquartered in the rapidly growing tech hub of Chicago, with offices that span across the United States, Canada, Mexico, and London. Join us in our mission to improve the lives of everyone working in the industry!
WHY WORK WITH US?
At Centro, we believe that lasting success is achieved through continual dedication to the growth and well-being of the individual. Our people are the core of what makes Centro unique. Driven by the Centro Manifesto and our guiding principles, we look to hire the best and brightest minds—curious, passionate learners who are driven to create impact.
We are committed to building a culture of highly motivated individuals who create a positive and supportive environment together. When we work hard, stay focused, and act in service to others, we believe that anything is possible. Come grow with us!

ABOUT THE TEAM

Technology is at the core of what we do. Centro’s innovative Engineering team designs and develops new features and integrations for Basis, our industry-leading, comprehensive software solution. Our platform processes over 300 billion events per day and uses AI and machine learning to automate and simplify the entire digital campaign process.

This team is all about data—and in order to create value from the massive amount of data we collect, engineering leverages their dynamic Data Engineering, Data Science, and Business Intelligence teams to create insights that benefit the industry as a whole.

Our Tech Stack:
• Ruby, Java, Python, and React.js
• Kubernetes, Docker, Kafka
• PostgreSQL, NoSQL
• AWS

ABOUT THE ROLE

We are looking for engineers who are excited about building distributed data pipelines. We want you to help us shape our internal and external brand-new data warehouses, leveraging the latest advances of big data processing: a combination of Kafka Streams, Hadoop, and traditional RDBMS.
YOU WILL
Be a part of our Big Data team and of an overall Data Organization spanning multiple offices.
Participate in architecture discussions and bring your experience in scalable data pipelines using Kafka Streams and/or other Big Data tools.
Take ownership of design and implementation of scalable and fault tolerant projects.
Maintain and incrementally improve existing solutions.
Get to build brand new pipelines with the technology stack including Spark, Spark Structured Streaming, Kafka, Hadoop, MySql, Python.
WHAT WE ARE LOOKING FOR
Solid understanding of distributed system fundamentals.
Experience in developing, troubleshooting, diagnosing, and performance tuning of distributed data pipelines at scale.
Demonstrated professional experience working with various components of Big Data ecosystem: Spark/Spark Streaming, Hive, Kafka/KSQL, Hadoop (or similar NoSQL ecosystem), et. al, in a production system.
Strong software engineering skills with Python.
Knowledge of some flavor of SQL (MySQL, Oracle, Hive, Impala), including the fundamentals of data modeling and performance.
EVEN BETTER IF YOU HAVE
Skills in real-time streaming applications.
Knowledge of Scala.
A development workflow using Docker containers.
Compulsion for automating your day-to-day processes.
WHAT WE OFFER
Ability to see your direct impact on a high visibility project.
An opportunity to both create new projects and help improve the existing big data pipelines.
Work in a mature, private, nationally-known company with a CEO approval of 90% on Glassdoor and a positive atmosphere in our San Francisco tech team.
401K plan with employer matching.
Commuter pre-tax contributions.
Flexible working hours and work-from-home days.
Health plan.
In-office snacks.
Organized team events.
LIFE WITH CENTRO

We take care of our people. Our team has put together a thoughtful benefits package and provides a wide range of perks, including competitive 401k matching, a tax-free health savings account, tuition reimbursement, generous maternity/paternity leave, and more.

Aside from benefits, we’re always finding new ways to invest in the personal and professional growth our employees. We’re proud to support a variety of employee-led communities that enrich our culture of uniqueness, inclusivity, and empowerment. Centro is more than a workplace.

Centro is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and support an inclusive workplace diverse in thought, perspective and culture. We celebrate all team members regardless of gender/identity, sexual orientation, race or cultural background, religion, physical disability and age. We are better together.",4.0,Centro,"Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,19,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,Per,1,0,53.0,IL,4948,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
579,579,Senior Analyst/Data Scientist,$25-$28,"At Edmunds were driven to make car buying easier. Ever since we began publishing printed car guides in the 60s, the company has been in the business of trust, innovating ways to empower and support car shoppers. When Edmunds launched the car industrys first Internet site in 1994, we established a leadership position online and have never looked back. Now, as one of the most trusted review sites on the Internet, millions of visitors use our research, shopping and buying tools every month to make an easy and informed decision on their next car. For consumers, we bring peace of mind. For dealers, we make tools to help them solve their problems and sell more cars. How do we do it, you ask? The key ingredients are our enthusiastic employees, progressive company culture and cutting-edge technology. Want to join the team? Read on to find out how!

What Youre Applying For:

Edmunds is seeking a skilled, creative and enthusiastic Senior Analyst/Data Scientist experienced in generating actionable insights from large sets of data, measuring business performance, and identifying areas of growth and optimization using advanced analytical (modeling, machine learning) and experimental approaches.

The ideal candidate is also a natural problem-solver that enjoys working with large data sets and is proactive in exploring database tables and using data to make clear and convincing business cases.

The analyst will play a crucial role in supporting our Tier 1 team by developing, improving, and maintaining digital advertising revenue forecasts & models, monitoring major KPIs, and understanding impact to other areas of the business. This person will be expected to understand the details and complexity of the companys digital advertising revenue to ensure that the executive team has a clear and accurate pulse of the business, and recommend action plans to optimize against the companys revenue goals, and identifying areas of optimization and growth by extracting insights through modeling, testing and experimentation.

In addition, this person will be expected to take ownership of projects to continually improve reporting quality through automation. This person will also be expected to promote the use of self-service analytic tools across internal clients, and provide training for these tools.

This individual will be tasked to work cross-functionally with Product, Sales, Ad Operations, and Paid Media teams to optimize digital advertising products and revenue through A/B testing and experimentation, measuring and uncovering results based on changes to website traffic & consumer site behaviors, and recommending areas of paid marketing spend.

The right candidate will have experience working across business and functional boundaries, partnering with internal clients to provide decision-making support through analytic insights.

This is a great opportunity for an individual with significant business acumen that is interested in playing with the wealth of structured and unstructured data that is available within the car buying ecosystem. Curiosity and business intellect a must.

What Youll Do:
Develop, evaluate, refine, and automate analytic models using data to address business needs, and identify areas of optimization and growth
Prepare visualizations of data in order to explain and persuade
Design, conduct and lead complex analyses that mine, extract, track, report and analyze performance metrics
Provide recommendations to key stakeholders and support the business need
Create and produce forecasts, reports, ad hoc requests, dashboards, etc. utilizing our data warehouse and other data source systems and summarize your findings
Interact with multiple teams in different departments and define requirements for reporting
Challenges:
Edmunds is a fast growing and innovative company. Qualified candidate should possess strong project management skills, and an ability to multitask and balance competing priorities
What You Need:
Strong analytical and data mining skills
Excellent data extraction and manipulation skills - SQL experience required
Strong data modeling / statistical analysis / predictive modeling experience required (R and/or Python)
Excellent presentation and communication skills
Exposure to BI tools such as Tableau is a plus
Bachelors degree in a quantitative field, such as mathematics, statistics, physics, computer science, business analytics, etc. with at least 5 years of relevant and progressively complex work experience
Working @ Edmunds.com:

Employees think its a pretty great place to work and some pretty impressive publications think it is too: we have been recognized as one of the best places to work by the Fortune Magazine and Great Places to Work, LA Business Journal (for the last 6 years!), Computerworld, and Built in LA. We've also been identified as one of the best workplaces specifically in Technology and also for Diversity and Asian Americans. In fact, our CEO, Avi Steinlauf, was rated as one of Glassdoor's Highest Rated CEOs! If youre interested in learning more and joining our mission, wed love to hear from you!

Edmunds will consider for employment qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of all applicable laws.

*LI-POST",3.6,Edmunds.com,"Santa Monica, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,54,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,Per,1,0,53.0,CA,5265,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
581,581,Data Scientist,$25-$28,"Data Scientist
Mountain ViewR&D - Machine learningExperienced
Responsibilities
Are you ready to take your career to the next level with a move to a fast-paced, audacious company and massive impact to the business productivity and collaboration space using the latest technologies? If yes, this is an opportunity of a lifetime!

What you'll do:
Team up with engineers to design learning solutions.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy.
Develop company A/B testing framework and test model quality.
Mine and analyze data from company databases to drive optimization and improvement of product development, marketing techniques and business strategies.
Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, ad targeting and other business outcomes.
Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
Create custom data models and algorithms to apply to data sets.
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes.
Partner with international stakeholders in different time zones
Qualifications
- BS degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or other relevant majors with 2+ years of work experience
2+ years of industry experience in predictive analytics and/or statistical modeling role
Ability to think critically and to formulate solutions to problems in a clear, concise and timely manner
Experience building data science models (Regression, Decision Trees, K-Means, etc.)
Experience with large data sets and analytical tools (e.g. Hive, Spark)
Proficiency in scripting languages (SQL, Python, R, etc.)
Experience working with international partners in different time zones
Apply
Share to",3.8,ByteDance,"Mountain View, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,8,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,Per,1,0,53.0,CA,1779,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
584,584,Data Scientist,$25-$28,"Lead, collaborate and join integrated teams that apply advanced methods, theories, and research techniques in the investigation and solution development of complex data analysis problems. As a data scientist, you will help teams’ advance complex analysis, design, development, and testing of scalable end-to-end data pipelines from prototype to production, that include data analysis, visualization, and machine learning. At Fortego, you will embark on a journey of exciting, impactful & highly technical work with good people that treat you like family.

If that sounds like you, and you’ve got the skills and qualifications listed below with a TS/SCI with a Polygraph, we encourage you to apply.
We are looking for junior, mid-level or senior-level data scientists with the following:
Demonstrated software development experience with Python in a Unix environment.
Practical knowledge in Python Machine Learning and Data Visualization
Practical knowledge in Data ETL such as working with: Data loading from SQL, CSV, JSON, Excel, etc., Web scraping (Beautiful Soup, Scrapy, etc.) and Data Wrangling/Cleaning
Experience using the Unix command line.
Proficiency in statistical packages using any of the following: Python, R, STATA, SPSS, etc.
Candidate may have some practical knowledge in these skill sets (not required, but helpful):
Using the Atlassian Tool Suite.
Continuous integration /continuous delivery (CI/CD)
Working knowledge with other object-oriented programming languages such as Java or C++
Working knowledge with Front-end data visualization libraries (i.e., D3.js; Raphael.js, etc.)
Experience with development of any of the following; Hadoop, Pig, MapReduce, or HDFS
Requirements:
TS/SCI with a Polygraph
Looking for junior, mid and senior-level data scientists
The benefits:
Rewarding your hard work: Referrals, sign on, profit sharing, quarterly awards… need we go on?
Generous training budget: Designed by you.
PTO that has your back: For the families and the unbounded adventures, from furloughs to inclement weather, we are there.
Top notch health care and 401k package: If these drive you, this is your stop.
Something always going on: Team lunches, happy hours, fantasy leagues, game nights, homebrew competitions and monthly family events.
We support innovation: Got an idea? Want to learn something new? Whatever it is we will help see it through.
About Fortego
Fortego helps solve some of the most difficult cyber issues the world faces today. Our employees spend their working hours deep in the trenches handling the most critical and exciting challenges on the national security front. As for the other hours of the day, you will find Fortego employees kicking back and enjoying benefits that span from family activities to sporting events, supporting veterans in the community, and exploring new tech.

Fortego is an Equal Opportunity Employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",5.0,Fortego,"Columbia, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,10,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,Per,1,0,53.0,MD,3100,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
585,585,Data Scientist,$25-$28,"Do you have CPLEX/Gurobi experience? We have a great opportunity for a Data Scientist right outside of St Louis in Creve Coeur, MO. This is a contract role with long term potential. The rate is up to $65/hr., depending on experience.

Description:

PhD in Operations Research, Industrial Engineering, Computer Science or any related area
Experience in solving scheduling, vehicle routing and allocation problems using operations research techniques and heuristics (+5 years)
CPLEX/Gurobi experience (+5 years)
Java experience (+4 years)
Database knowledge (+5 years)
Ability to work in fast paced environment
Preferred skill set:
Experience in solving large scale scheduling and routing problems using operations research (column generation, B&P, etc)
Experience in IBM DOC
Experience in working with data API’s, Teradata, Oracle
Knowledge in Python or R (+3 years)The candidate will be working on developing regional and global resource allocation, scheduling, and vehicle routing models to make recommendations for field (planting, detasseling, harvest) and facility operations. The recommendations should result in operations efficiency. The candidate has to work closely with business partners to gather assumptions and scope the problem, then independently formulate, code and execute the problem. Finally, models need to be validated with and approved by the business user and technical documentation needs to be developed. Please get in touch with us today!

Syndicus NACON provides service-oriented staffing and recruiting services to small businesses, large corporations, nonprofits, and government agencies. We pride ourselves on personal service, local market knowledge and commitment to providing great job opportunities. We specialize in contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placement positions.

We are an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status

(711)",4.1,Syndicus,"Creve Coeur, MO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,13,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1,Per,1,0,53.0,MO,2052,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0
586,586,LIFE Data Scientist (2021 Permanent –,$25-$28,"LIFE Data Scientist (2021 Permanent – New York)

Munich Re, New York, United States

Entry level

Graduate and entry level positions

Type of job

Full-time

Area of Expertise

Data Analytics/Engineering

Your job


Position OverviewIn keeping with our global position as an industry leader and innovator, Munich Re is driving transformative change in the life insurance industry through data science. The role of data scientist will apply statistical techniques and...
Apply now
Open job details

Published on 08/31/2020",3.3,ERGO Group,"New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,27,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,Per,1,0,53.0,NY,521,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
587,587,Data Scientist,$25-$28,"“Streets Market” in District of Columbia is seeking a Digital Marketing Specialist, and Python Developer to join our close-knit Data Analysis team.
Streets Market is a grocery retail store located in the District of Columbia. We have about 13 branches and a headquarter, The headquarter’s business is based on B2B based distribution and logistics, and Streets Market’s business is based on offline B2C.
The talents in the two fields we are trying to hire are Python developers will use Tensorflow, Web Scarapping, etc. to analyze and collect data.
It is said that distribution and logistics are the flowers of IT. Those who apply will work together with experts in various fields (Database experts, Developers, Marketers, and Business strategists) to create our own solutions by applying new IT technologies and techniques in our team.
We’re looking for a team player who is highly motivated and organized that will assist in the execution of all digital marketing strategies based on data. This role will work closely with our digital marketer towards the ultimate goal of boosting sales and building brand awareness.
Responsibilities for “Data Scientist”
Collect and analyze data from company databases to drive optimization and improvement of product development, marketing techniques and business strategies.
Develop custom data models and algorithms to apply to data sets.
Responsible for modeling complex business problems and discovering business insights through the use of statistical, algorithmic, mining, and visualization techniques
Data Collection: Web Scrapping (Beautifulsoup, etc)
Machine Learning
Knowledge of machine learning libraries like Scikit-learn, TensorFlow, Caffe, Keras, Familiarity with the Hadoop ecosystem (Apache Hive, Pig, HBase and Kafka)
Experience using a distributed computing platform, such as OpenCV, Numpy, Pandas
Data Visualization: Domo, Looker, or others
Python
What’ll Make You Special
Experience working with cloud computing providers such as AWS or Azure
Experience developing with Python & C#
[Language]
Strong verbal and written communication skills (Bilingual preferred: English/Korean)
[Job Type]
Full-time
[Experience]
Relevant: 3 years (Preferred)
[Benefit]
VISA Sponsorship is offered (Permanent Resident)
Competitive salary with a health insurance plan with incentive
Paid vacation days provided
[Work authorization]
Can be working eligibly in US
Job Type: Full-time
Salary: $55,000.00 to $75,000.00 /year
Experience:
django: 1 year (Preferred)
sql: 1 year (Preferred)
python: 1 year (Required)
Additional Compensation:
Commission
Bonuses
Store Discounts
Work Location:
Multiple locations
Benefits:
Health insurance
Paid time off
Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available:
Yes: H-1B work authorization
Yes: Immigrant visa sponsorship (e.g., green card sponsorship)
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Aggressive -- competitive and growth-oriented
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $53,000.00 - $75,000.00 per year
Experience:
Machine Learning Library: 1 year (Required)
Web Application: 3 years (Preferred)
Python: 1 year (Required)
Language:
Korean (Required)
Additional Compensation:
Bonuses
Store Discounts
Commission
Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Paid time off
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Aggressive -- competitive and growth-oriented
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.6,Streets Market,"Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,33,Subsidiary or Business Segment,other_industries,"Restaurants, Bars & Food Services",$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,Per,1,0,53.0,DC,4553,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
590,590,Data Scientist,$25-$28,"Data Scientist
Location


Columbia, MD

Job Code

1704

# of Openings

1

Apply Now

DCCA is a veteran-owned high-technology company specializing in providing information technology services to a variety of government agencies and commercial enterprises since 1982. DCCA is proud to offer a strong, competitive compensation and benefits package. Visit our website at: www.dcca.com .

Data Scientist

Key Tasks:
Develops predictive and prescriptive analytic models in support of the organization’s, operations and business initiatives and priorities.
Data manipulation and data engineering experience involving structured and unstructured data.
Deploys solutions so that they provide actionable insights to the organization and are embedded or integrated with application systems
Supports and drives analytic efforts designed around organization’s strategic priorities and business problems
Experience in interpreting results from statistical and mathematical models.
Experience in advance data visualizations and interpretation.
Works with autonomy to find solutions to complex problems using open source tools and in-house development
Stays abreast of state-of-the-art literature in the fields of operations research, statistical modeling, statistical process control and mathematical optimization
Works with the team and business stakeholders to develop pilots so that they may be tested and validated in pilot settings
Performs analysis to evaluate primary and secondary objectives from such pilots
Assists leadership with dissemination of success stories (and failures) in an effort to increase analytics literacy and adoption across the organization.
Required Skills:

Proven experience:
7+ years in one or more technical disciplines (e.g. architecture, process re-engineering, development, verification)
3+ years in Machine Learning, Predictive Analytics and Algorithm Development
Collaborating in a multiple team environment
Exceptionally strong communication skills, verbal and written. Includes the ability to effectively communicate complex information to audiences with varying technical and system backgrounds and at multiple organizational levels
Desired Skills :

Proven experience with:
Deep learning tools: Tensorflow, Keras, Theano, PyTorch, Scikit-learn, Nvidia DIGITS
Required Education / Certifications :
Computer Science degree or Bachelor's Degree in a related major
Desired (pluses):
Master's in Information Systems or Computer Science
Ability to learn new technologies quickly
Ability to mentor team members
DCCA is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, protected veteran status, or disability status.

Apply",3.9,Data Computer Corporation of America,"Columbia, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,37,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,Per,1,0,53.0,MD,2774,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,1
596,596,Senior Data Engineer,$63k-$127k,"Senior Data Engineer

New York, NY

Who we are

DoubleVerify is the leading independent provider of marketing measurement software, data and analytics that authenticates the quality and effectiveness of digital media for the world's largest brands and media platforms. DV provides media transparency and accountability to deliver the highest level of impression quality for maximum advertising performance. Since 2008, DV has helped hundreds of Fortune 500 companies gain the most from their media spend by delivering best in class solutions across the digital ecosystem, helping to build a better industry. Learn more at www.doubleverify.com.



The Role

As a Senior Data Engineer, you own new initiatives, designs and build world-class platforms in order to measure and optimize ad performance. You ensure industry-leading scalability and reliability of mission-critical systems processing billions of real-time transactions a day. You apply state of the art technologies, frameworks, and strategies to address complex challenges with Big-Data processing and analytics.

What you'll do
Architect, design and build big data processing platforms handling tens of TBs/Day, serves thousands of clients and supports advanced analytic workloads
Explore the technological landscape for new ways of producing, processing, and analyzing data in order to gain insights into both our users and our product features
Design, develop, and test data-driven products, features, and APIs that scale
Continuously improve the quality of deliverables and SDLC processes
Operate production environments, investigate issues, assess their impact, and come up with feasible solutions.
Understand business needs and work with product owners to establish priorities
Bridge the gap between Business / Product requirements and technical details
Work in multi-functional agile teams with end-to-end responsibility for product development and delivery
Who you are
Lead by example - design, develop and deliver quality solutions.
Love what you do and are passionate about crafting clean code
Steady foundation with 5+ years of programming experience in coding, object-oriented design and/or functional programming
Deep understanding of distributed system technologies, standards, protocols
2+ years of experience working in distributed systems like Hadoop, Big Query, Spark, Kafka Eco System ( Kafka Connect, Kafka Streams), and building data pipelines at scale.
Hands-on experience building low latency, high-throughput APIs, and are comfortable using external APIs from platforms.
Excellent SQL query writing abilities and data understanding
Care about agile software processes, data-driven development, reliability, and responsible experimentation
Genuine desire to automate decision making, processes, and workflows
Experience working with dependency management tools such as Luigi/Airflow
Experience with DevOps domain - working with build servers, docker and containers clusters (kubernetes)
Experience in Mentoring and growing a diverse team of talented data engineers
B.S./M.S. in Computer Science or a related field
Excellent communication skills and a team player
Vertica or other columnar data stores
Google BigQuery
Spark Streaming or other live stream processing technology
Cloud environment, Google Cloud Platform
Container technologies - Docker / Kubernetes
Ad serving technologies and standards
Experience with Avro, Parquet, or ORC
Akka",3.8,DoubleVerify,"New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,12,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,95.0,NY,3425,1,data engineer,0,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
598,598,Data Scientist,$63k-$127k,"Data Scientist
Clearance Level Required


No active security clearance

Location


McLean, Virginia

Job Code

756

Apply Now

Why Coverent?


Coverent is a specialized consulting services firm focused on developing innovative solutions to the most challenging problems facing our nation. We are growing quickly, but focused on maintaining our commitment to fantastic results and a fair, flexible, and fun culture:
Are you interested in working for a boutique firm who sees its employees as more than just a number?
Are you intrigued by the notion of joining a small team of talented, passionate consultants with a clear vision to help our clients achieve their missions better, smarter, faster?
Does a company culture that emphasizes outcomes, fairness, and flexibility sound appealing?
Would you like to be rewarded for your contributions, via programs like annual bonuses and company profit sharing?
Would you appreciate having a choice of options from top-notch benefit providers for medical and retirement plans?
Are you interested in a learning culture that is forward-leaning regarding training, education, and professional development?
If you answer YES to these questions, Coverent could be the employer of choice for you.

Data Scientist


Coverent is seeking a Data Science Consultant to lead program evaluation activities for a client in the US Intelligence Community. On this project, the Consultant will have the opportunity to demonstrate intellectual agility by leading data collection and data analysis activities to produce key performance insights. Furthermore, they will lead the implementation of recommendations when they are adopted by the customer. This project features the opportunity to interact with a wide range of key stakeholders, including those at senior levels. This is an exciting opportunity for an intellectually curious, energetic consultant to work on a project with real impact helping our client develop ways to understand and improve performance of activities that support delivery of the mission.

Position Responsibilities
Consult with clients on the development, prioritization and implementation of process improvement and impact evaluations tasks.
Develop recommendations for changes to policy, processes, communications and training to enable achievement of vision. Develop and implement research designs with practical strategies for measuring performance of organizational units and/or unit activities to include development of performance measures and design of actionable methods for collecting and analyzing data, and implement strategies and refine as needed.
Perform a variety of research activities to include document reviews, structured interviews, and gap analyses, and involves stakeholder identification and logistical coordination for data collection activities and documentation of discussions.
Analyze both qualitative and quantitative information to provide customer with comprehensive insights into organizational strengths and challenge areas.
Prepare visual presentations of data and analysis.
Prepare reports and presentations for senior leadership based on research plans, activities, findings and recommendations.
Brief senior level customers on research plans, activities, findings and recommendations.
Required Qualifications
U.S. Citizenship
Must have a Bachelor’s degree and a minimum of 3 years' experience in a consulting role in the IC; Master’s degree in business, social science, or behavioral science preferred
Experience extracting insights from social media data using data analysis techniques
Experience developing and implementing change management strategies
Demonstrated experience designing and implementing organizational or programmatic performance measurement strategies
Proven ability to analyze data and translate analysis into meaningful insights
General understanding of data coding, data integrity, and statistical sampling and analysis concepts
Experience developing presentations and providing briefings to middle and senior management
Excellent oral and written communication skills, including visual representation of data using charts and graphs
Advanced proficiency with MS Excel and PowerPoint
Ability to perform in an individual contributor role while also excelling in a team environment
Desired Qualifications
Ability to analyze information and identify implications for policy, processes, communications and training
Demonstrated experience leading qualitative research and program evaluation activities to include experience leading structured interviews
Familiarity with SPSS
Familiarity with advanced statistical concepts
Some knowledge of Python scripting
#ZR",4.2,Coverent,"McLean, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,12,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,95.0,VA,4670,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
600,600,Data Scientist,$63k-$127k,"Barbaricum supports government clients with Integrated Communications, Mission Support, and Cyber Security/Intelligence. Our passion is innovation and we are committed to client value and effective technical solutions. We are an ISO 9001:2015-certified and CMMI Level 3 appraised, Service-Disabled Veteran-Owned Small Business (SDVOSB) located in Washington, DC. Our mission is to transform the ways the U.S. Government approaches problem sets of increasing complexity by delivering innovative solutions, particularly in support of National Security missions.
Barbaricum is one of the fastest-growing companies in our market. The company is routinely recognized by institutions like Inc. Magazine, GovCon, AMEC, PRSA, and SmartCEO for corporate growth, capabilities, and award-winning client work. Our team is dynamic and agile, providing global support to current missions across five continents. We are also focused on developing and maintaining our vibrant corporate culture, having been recently named one of the best places to work by Inc. Magazine.

Barbaricum is seeking a Data Scientist who has worked on advanced statistical analysis techniques (e.g. general linear modeling, structural equation modeling, Bayesian methods, time series, forecasting, anomaly detection, exp design).
Qualifications
Active DoD Top Secret/SCI clearance
BA or MS in Software Engineering, Science, Mathematics, or similar OR equivalent combination of education and experience
3-7 years’ experience in data science, advanced analytics, machine learning ,statistics
Experience search architecture (ex – Solr, ElasticSearch)
Big Data Frameworks such as Spark or Hadoop
Data Science frameworks such as Keras, Tensorflow, or Theano
Experience with building querying ontologies such as Zeno, OWL, RDF, SparQL
Experience with GPU processing
Experience with machine learning (e.g. decision trees, topic modeling, neural networks/deep learning, natural language processing)
Experience with optimization, simulation, modeling, network science and structured analytics
Experience with sampling, collecting, computing, analyzing statistical data and scripting and data analysis in R or Python
Additional Information

For more information about Barbaricum, please visit our website at www.barbaricum.com. We will contact candidates directly to schedule interviews. No phone calls please.",4.9,Barbaricum,"Charlottesville, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,12,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,95.0,VA,2361,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,0
602,602,Data Scientist,$63k-$127k,"What you’ll be doing...

Be a part of the team that identifies opportunities for using data analysis to enhance the Verizon Internal Audit team’s role. The team is designed to add value and improve operations within Verizon’s Internal Audit department to provide data analytics, data mining, and continuous auditing strategies and tactics. Team members provide both advisory and analytical support by identifying, developing, documenting, or executing analytics during all relevant stages of an audit.
Assists the Audit Committee of the Board of Directors and Verizon management in accomplishing their objectives by bringing a systematic and disciplined approach to evaluate and improve the effectiveness of the overall control environment, risk management, and governance processes.
Gain extensive exposure to diverse aspects of Verizon's business through audit assist and standalone projects, including reporting dashboards, process automations, continuous auditing/ monitoring and risk assessment models.
Audit assignments include increasing levels of responsibilities and presentations to senior management, making the team an excellent place to succeed for high potential employees.
What we’re looking for...

You’ll need to have:
Bachelor’s degree in Management Information Systems, Computer Science, Accounting, Business, Finance, Economics, Statistics or four or more years of work experience.
Four or more years of relevant work experience in analytics, technology, auditing, accounting, finance, or economics.
Willingness to travel.
Even better if you have:
Knowledge of predictive and prescriptive analytics, data mining and machine learning a plus (Alteryx, Python and R preferred).
Proficient in the use of Teradata SQL, MS SQL server, and Oracle SQL
Experience with Data Visualization, particularly creating dashboards and executive reporting (Tableau or other).
Knowledge of the tools, technologies and practices needed to perform in-depth analysis of both structured transactional data, and semi-structured or unstructured data.
Experience with data warehousing or analytics in a cloud environment such as AWS.
Demonstrated ability to work independently and within a team in a fast changing environment with changing priorities and changing time constraints.
Strong interpersonal skills and ability to multitask.
Ability to interpret business requests and communicate findings in an intelligible manner.
Ability to communicate technical findings to non-technical audiences.
An understanding of risk management methodology and factors.
When you join Verizon...

You’ll have the power to go beyond – doing the work that’s transforming how people, businesses and things connect with each other. Not only do we provide the fastest and most reliable network for our customers, but we were first to 5G - a quantum leap in connectivity. Our connected solutions are making communities stronger and enabling energy efficiency. Here, you’ll have the ability to make an impact and create positive change. Whether you think in code, words, pictures or numbers, join our team of the best and brightest. We offer great pay, amazing benefits and opportunity to learn and grow in every role. Together we’ll go far.

Equal Employment Opportunity

We're proud to be an equal opportunity employer - and celebrate our employees' differences, including race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, and Veteran status. Different makes us better.

]]>",3.8,Verizon,"Basking Ridge, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,20,Company - Public,other_industries,Telecommunications,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,95.0,NJ,3498,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
603,603,Staff Data Scientist – Global Payments & Fraud Management,$63k-$127k,"PlayStation isn't just the Best Place to Play —it's also the Best Place to Work. We've thrilled gamers since 1994, when we launched the original PlayStation. Today, we're recognized as a global leader in interactive and digital entertainment. The PlayStation brand falls under Sony Interactive Entertainment, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Sony Corporation.

Staff Data Scientist – Global Payments & Fraud Management

San Diego, CA

Sony Interactive Entertainment's Global Payment and Fraud Management (GPFM) teams are the guardians of both customer trust and purchase success for PlayStation and the PlayStation® Network (PSN). We provide innovative solutions to support every element of the network, various platform services, customer service teams, a diverse developer community, and more.

SIE has just launched a next generation risk platform and machine learning framework that support the global, fast growing PlayStation® Network customer base, world class PlayStation® consoles, and network entertainment services such as PlayStation® Now. In doing so, the ability to extract information from data and drive action that help achieve business goals is essential. GPFM's Data Science team is responsible for evaluating online user activity data for potential fraud across this new platform. Our job is to provide quantitative assessments of all customers and identify those individuals who pose the most risk to our businesses. We are currently looking for a high-caliber individual to join our team to demonstrate the benefits of being data driven for the Global Fraud Management, Global Payments and Account Security Teams.

Responsibilities:
The candidate will exemplify leadership qualities including, but not limited to, exploring new, cutting edge statistical techniques, serve as a go-to person for both immediate team and external partners, and own the quality of Data Science work.
Drive Data Science innovation using advanced techniques to maximize illustration of data driven decision making. Optimize use of developed Machine-Learning algorithms in conjunction with other aspects of decision making (rules, other events, other ml scores, etc.)
Experience with Data Science pipeline implementation solutions using state of the art technology for large scale, low latency, production grade systems.
Demonstrate expert knowledge of AWS tools, offerings, technologies, and design options
Work as a liaison between teams (Engineering/ML) in Europe and teams locally (Data/Engineering/ML)
Comfortable being self-sufficient while owning large scale data science/engineering projects from start to finish.
Serve as a mentor of those within the team needing DS guidance as well as those we partner with interested in learning more about the art of Data Science.
Requirements:
Master's degree (PhD preferred) in Statistics, Operations Research, Computer Science, Machine Learning or other related fields and a minimum of 12 years related work experience.
10+ years working with statistical modeling techniques (Regression, CHAID, Neural Networks, Cluster Analysis, RFs, XGBs, etc.) required.
10+ years' experience doing hands-on statistical analysis with some understanding of a statistical programming package such as SAS/SPSS/R/Python/Java/other is required.
10+ years involvement in data science solution implementation within customer impacting production solutions.
Sony is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All persons will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, pregnancy, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, legally protected physical or mental disability, covered veteran status, status in the U.S. uniformed services, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, genetic information or membership in any other legally protected category.

We strive to create an inclusive environment, empower employees and embrace diversity. We encourage everyone to respond.

We sincerely appreciate the time and effort you spent in contacting us and we thank you for your interest in PlayStation.

#LI-GD1",3.7,Sony PlayStation,"San Diego, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,26,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Video Games,Media,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,95.0,CA,4070,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,1,0,1
604,604,Data Scientist,$63k-$127k,"About Us:


We make software that anyone can mold and shape to take on every challenge from taking personal notes to running large companies. We've been building together since 2016 and are trusted by customers including Nike, Airbnb, Slack, Samsung, and more. We're excited to be growing a team as diverse and creative as the millions of people we reach worldwide, and a company where everyone can thrive.

About The Role:


Do you want to help define what data means at Notion? As one of our first Data Scientists, you'll be instrumental in setting what our data strategy looks like as we grow the business, and then doing the hands on work to execute against it. There will be significant variation from one day to the next, but whether you're exploring what a successful Notion account looks like, building out a core activity data set, or creating a model to deliver leads to the sales team, you'll absolutely be having impact on the direction of the business.

What You'll Do:
You'll set the foundation for what data means at Notion, determining how we balance product intuition with analytical rigor.
You'll build data pipelines that transform messy raw data into tables that are reliable, broadly useful, and clear. (We currently use DBT, Snowflake, Mode Analytics, Fivetran, Census, Amplitude, Segment, and more).
You'll collaborate with team leads across the business to understand and support their data needs.
You'll design and enact the process for using statistical inference to evaluate the success of changes, from product launches to marketing campaigns.
You'll build models to understand and predict things like user growth, product engagement, conversion, churn, and more.
You'll build and maintain KPI dashboards that teams rely on for making key decisions.
You'll communicate your findings with the rest of the company, and drive and verify change in our product and business (Insights are useful. Impact is even better!)
What We're Looking For:


You've spent meaningful time as a data scientist.
You are a SQL expert. You have no problem regularly leveraging window functions, UDFs, self-joins, and other complex SQL functions to accomplish your data analysis goals.
You have expertise in at least one scripting language (ideally Python or R).
You know how to use statistical inference to drive product and business recommendations.
You have experience building predictive models, and you know how to evaluate their effectiveness.
You have a bias for using the right tools to get a job done with maximum efficiency. You have experience making tradeoffs between speed and accuracy.
You have strong product sense and user intuition which inform the questions you ask of the data you are analyzing.
Bonus Points:


You have led or managed a Data Science team.
You have led initiatives across multiple product areas and communicated findings with leadership and product teams.
You have worked at a fast-growing start-up.
You have experience building out data infrastructure that facilitates speed, reliability, and scalability.
You have prior experience with data-distributed tools (Scalding, Hadoop, Pig, etc) and statistical libraries.",5.0,Notion,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,4,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,95.0,CA,3156,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
606,606,Data Scientist,$63k-$127k,"Create visual stories and business cases from data that helps leadership make quick and effective decisions
Build out predictive modeling using R and Python that harnesses customer and competitive analysis data to spot emerging trends and areas of opportunity
Work closely with teams inside the Global Connectivitys groups to develop metrics and visualizations that will highlight inefficiencies, transaction volumes, and track process improvement initiatives as well as uncover revenue opportunities.
Identify undeveloped data and extract insights that will help guide and influence effective business decisions
Partner with business process experts and owners to build BI and leading indicators of operational benchmarks.
Deliver ad hoc business data analyses using Python, R, and SQL, creating dashboards/reports/insights in multiple visualization tools like Tableau and Power BI
Work with various corporate stakeholders and the business intelligence community to understand data integrity and differences across enterprise-wide systems
Requirements:
Required - 3+ years equivalent experience in modeling, forecasting, data architecture (Analytics/Business Intelligence preferred)
Ability to take ambiguous sets of data and decipher meaning to tell a story or business case that drives business decisions is required. Should be strong in AWS suite; certification preferred.
Strong ability to communicate both written and verbally to internal and external clients is important
Strong ability to create and deliver effective presentations to multiple audiences is key
Advanced expertise using data analytic software such as R, Python, SQL is essential
Expert knowledge of Microsoft productivity tools: Excel, Word, and Visio and other software is necessary.
Willingness and ability to work in a collaborative environment is important.",2.7,Panasonic Avionics Corporation,"Lake Forest, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,41,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,95.0,CA,1835,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
607,607,Data Scientist,$63k-$127k,"Who We Are!

At Maven Wave, an Atos Company, we are relentless in hiring the industrys top talent. Each employee is hand-picked not only for their skills, but for their personality and broad expertise. We are looking for this rare combination of talent that sets us apart in the industry.

Maven Wave helps leading companies make the shift to digital and shorten the fuse to innovation. We combine the expertise of top-tier consulting with the agility of a cutting-edge technology firm. This multidisciplinary blend of skills allows us to create unique digital advantages for our clients. Maven Waves digital solutions are agile, mobile, rooted in analytics, and built in the cloud.

Maven Wave, Google, and YOU: Drive and deliver business results with data-based insights.

We are looking for a Data Scientist who will utilize their analytical, statistical, and programming skills to develop data-driven solutions to complex business challenges.

Your Life As a Maven:
Leverage data to drive business solutions for enterprise clients.
Assist clients in building Data Science ML/AI Capabilities in the Cloud (GCP, AWS, Azure)
Handle the life cycle of Machine Learning including: Data Transformation, EDA, Feature Engineering, Model Trial Pipelines, Measuring Performance, Retraining, and Deploying models for Inference hosting.
Develop custom or improve existing data science models Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, ad targeting, and other business outcomes.
Work on hybrid Engineering, Data Science, Cloud Architecture teams to delivery business value.
Your Expertise:
3-5 years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models.
Cloud experience in a major platform, such as AWS, GCP, or Azure.
Experience using Data Science languages (Python) to manipulate data and draw insights.
Knowledge of a variety of Machine Learning and advanced analytical techniques and their real world advantages/drawbacks.
Familiarity with the following software/tools: Python, C, Java, Jupyter Notebooks, SQL, ML platforms (GCP AI Platform, AWS Sagemaker, H2O, DataRobot), Data Pipelines and orchestration (Spark, Airflow, CI/CD), and visualization (Looker, Tableau, qlikview)
Must have a Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Technology, Computer Information Systems, Computer Applications, Engineering, or a related field.
Your X-Factor:
Aptitude - You have an innate capacity to transition from project to project without skipping a beat.
Communication - You have strong communication skills for coordination across projects and teams.
Impact - You are a critical problem solver with an emphasis on creativity and innovation.
Passion - You have the drive to succeed paired with a continuous hunger to learn.
Leadership - You are trusted, empathetic, accountable, and empower others around you.
Why Were Proud To Be Mavens!
Google Cloud North America Services Partner of the Year 2019, 2018, 2017
#21 Best Workplaces in Chicago, FORTUNE
Great Place To Work Certification, Great Place to Work
Fast Fifty, Crain's Chicago Business
101 Best and Brightest Companies to Work For, National Association for Business Resources (NABR)
Top Google Cloud Partner, Clutch
Fastest Growing Consulting Firms in North America (#11, #37), Consulting Magazine
Top IT Services Companies, Clutch
Google Global Rising Star Partner of the Year
Ready to Learn More?
Digital Transformation at Atos
Check out the Data Team
See what Glassdoor has to say
Real Customer Stories",4.4,Maven Wave Partners,"Detroit, MI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,12,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,95.0,MI,3510,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
609,609,Data Scientist,$63k-$127k,"Requisition ID: 255385
Work Area: Software-Research
Expected Travel: 0 - 10%
Career Status: Professional
Employment Type: Regular Full Time
Career Level: T2
Posting Date : 6/10/2020

COMPANY DESCRIPTION

SAP started in 1972 as a team of five colleagues with a desire to do something new. Together, they changed enterprise software and reinvented how business was done. Today, as a market leader in enterprise application software, we remain true to our roots. That’s why we engineer solutions to fuel innovation, foster equality and spread opportunity for our employees and customers across borders and cultures.
SAP values the entrepreneurial spirit, fostering creativity and building lasting relationships with our employees. We know that a diverse and inclusive workforce keeps us competitive and provides opportunities for all. We believe that together we can transform industries, grow economics, lift up societies and sustain our environment. Because it’s the best-run businesses that make the world run better and improve people’s lives.

Purpose and Objective:

Ariba Inc. seeks a Data Scientist at Palo Alto, CA location to execute the mathematical modeling of our customers’ business problems, develop algorithms, data mining flows and applications to solve these problems, and help our customers directly to understand and implement the results of the analysis.

Expectations and Tasks:

Work with industry experts and technology experts to translate our customers’ business needs into mathematical models and present and deliver a solution to the client. Integrate or implement data mining/ mathematical methods into products. Evaluate and test data mining methods and maintains a high level of quality. Work with the senior data scientist to prototype new innovations and eventually get them into the product. Contribute to data definitions, data storage infrastructure for data mining purposes and to Data Mining architectures. Resolve data mining performance issues and monitor data mining system performance and implements efficiency improvements. Implement data mining algorithms if required. Work with product management, application developers, information developers and end users. Performs functional and empirical analysis on data mining topics. Conduct research on data mining tools and algorithms, implement prototypes and data mining algorithms and validates them on real data. Contribute to best practices for data mining topics and collaborate with development, universities and research institutes. 5% travel required.

Education and Qualifications/Skills and Competencies:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, or a related field and 5 year of experience required. The company will also accept a Master's degree and 1 years of experience.

Work Experience:

Experience must include 1 year with: Databases; Data exploration including data discovery, data cleansing, data analysis, and feature engineering, including key performance indicators (KPIs); Model discovery including model exploration, model development, including training and validation, and model implementation; Modelling, including univariate and multivariate regression, logistic regression, natural language processing, machine learning and clustering & classification methodologies; preparation of design documents and functional requirements documents (FRDs); Familiarity with at least two of the following languages – Python, R, Java, C++, SQL. 5% travel required.

Travel:5% travel required.

Internal use only: reference code lhrs0000

EX:OUT

SAP'S DIVERSITY COMMITMENT

To harness the power of innovation, SAP invests in the development of its diverse employees. We aspire to leverage the qualities and appreciate the unique competencies that each person brings to the company.

SAP is committed to the principles of Equal Employment Opportunity and to providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with physical and/or mental disabilities. If you are interested in applying for employment with SAP and are in need of accommodation or special assistance to navigate our website or to complete your application, please send an e-mail with your request to Recruiting Operations Team (Americas: Careers.NorthAmerica@sap.com or Careers.LatinAmerica@sap.com, APJ: Careers.APJ@sap.com, EMEA: Careers@sap.com). Requests for reasonable accommodation will be considered on a case-by-case basis.

EOE AA M/F/Vet/Disability:

Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their age, race, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status or disability.

Additional Locations :",4.6,SAP,"Palo Alto, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,48,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,95.0,CA,4692,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
610,610,Data Scientist,$63k-$127k,"Chandler, Arizona
Skills : Python ,Conda
Description :

Title: Data Scientist

Location: Chandler, AZ and Minneapolis, MN

Duration: 12 - 24 Months

Must haves:
Data Scientist & Big Data experience
Must have Enterprise level experience working with Big Data in Spark/Data Ingestion and Devops on Cloudera/Hortonworks
ML/AI experience building Conda environments
This resource must understand Conda environments and building packages
Experience working with Unix/Pyspark
Must have Knowledge of Jupyter & JupyterLab
Must have strong communication skills – this resource will be working closely with business partners
Plusses:
HIGHLY prefers banking experience
Day to Day:
Deploy Python packages
Create Anaconda environments
Compile/build packages from source
Work with Jupyter Lab Kernels, R Studio and H20
Python ,Conda",4.1,Collabera,"Chandler, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,29,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,95.0,AZ,818,0,data scientist,1,1,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
611,611,Senior/Staff Data Scientist (Recommendations),$63k-$127k,"Change.org is searching for a Senior/Staff Data Scientist to help us build Intelligent content understanding, personalization and recommendation services within our scalable machine learning platform, that leverages adaptive exploration, text-based embeddings, high-level of automation and contextual bayesian bandits.

We’re a social impact business (a public benefit company), and the largest tech platform focused on civic action in the world with 80m monthly users, 50,000 campaigns launched on the site every month, 150 staff, and a new revenue model that has grown by 500% in 2 years. We’re growing quickly, and our users win campaigns for change once every hour. From strengthening hate crime legislation in South Africa; fighting corruption in Indonesia, Italy, and Brazil; to fighting violence against women in India.

We are looking for a Senior/Staff Data Scientist who is great at prototyping, developing and tuning custom machine learning models on big data using a distributed computing framework, designing experiments & developing embeddings from textual data for modeling semantic meaning and transfer learning at scale and has a passion for expanding our platform to mobilize hundreds of millions of people to take deeper civic action.

You will be based out of our San Francisco headquarters and report to our Head of Machine Learning and AI. As a key member of our Data Intelligence pack, you’ll help us enable adaptive personalized user experiences on our site, recommend the best petitions to our altruistic supporters & enable staff-level support for petition starters beyond human scale.

You’re a perfect fit for this role if your superpower is creating signals from a combination of data sources, a critical eye for introspective data analysis and experiment design, and customizing machine learning models towards solving a unique petition recommendation and inventory optimization problem.

A Senior Data Scientist at Change is someone who can work effectively and independently, manage their own priorities and make appropriate progress with minimal supervision. Typically, Senior Data Scientists have 3-5 years of relevant industry experience as well as a mastery of one skill, such as developing machine learning models using a distributed event interaction data, designing new online experiments and novel signals on live time series data, or inventing processes and hooks for data collection and enrichment, etc.

A Staff Data Scientist at Change is not only able to work effectively and efficiently at scale, but they also set direction and priorities for a small number of adjacent data scientists and machine learning engineers.

When we get busy, it’s likely that we’re making headline news somewhere. It is a distinct pleasure to know we are providing a personalized experience that is empowering people all over the world. Our team takes great pride in using AI powers for good.
Key responsibilities:
Deep analysis, and deriving insights from our rich user interaction and petition data
Designing and owning experiment shots for tuning our live recommendation pipelines
Defining specs, prototyping and developing ML models for our live pipelines, that improve the engagement
Designing processes for collecting, enriching and inferring data on our users and our petitions
Designing and developing content embeddings and additional context signals, as well as creating labeled datasets for ML modeling
Participate in design discussions to improve our existing machine learning frameworks and recommendation pipelines
The most important capabilities for the role are:
Experience with big data interactive analysis in Zeppelin/Spark notebooks
Good coding skills using one language of choice (python or Scala) and excellent SQL knowledge
Strong Statistics and Machine Learning foundations
3+ years experience with productizing and deploying machine learning pipelines on industry tasks and in production environments, using a large scale distributed computation framework such as Spark (pyspark or Scala) and various ML and NLP libraries
Business oriented hypothesis testing and experiments design, a creative mindset for designing loops for data collection and signal generation
Additional capabilities we’ll consider:
Experience creating embeddings from text and combined data
Experience with building recommendations for B2C line of products
Speaking or understanding multiple languages (ES, RU, FR, etc)
A good communicator with a pragmatic attitude for meeting business needs
Interested? Great! Here's what you should know:
This is a full-time role based in San Francisco. Our team is high impact, low ego, and has an amazing culture to be part of.

We are accepting applications until 30th of August, 2020

We especially encourage applicants of different backgrounds, cultures, genders, experiences, abilities and perspectives to apply. We’re actively working to increase the diversity of experience and perspectives on our team and are looking for someone who can help continue to lead that process.

Change.org is committed to being a diverse and inclusive workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, age, physical disability, or length of time spent unemployed.",4.2,Change.org,"San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,13,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,95.0,CA,5341,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,1
612,612,Associate Director/Director RWE Data Scientist,$63k-$127k,"Do you have expertise in, and passion for Medical Affairs in Oncology? Would you like to apply your expertise to impact the Associate Director/Director RWE Data Scientist role in a company that

follows the science and turns ideas into life changing medicines? Then AstraZeneca might be the one for you!

At AstraZeneca, we put patients first and strive to meet their unmet needs worldwide. Working here means being entrepreneurial, thinking big and working together to make the impossible a reality. If you are swift to action, confident to lead, willing to collaborate, and curious about what science can do, then youre our kind of person.

AstraZenecas vision in Oncology is to help patients by redefining the cancer-treatment paradigm, with the aim of bringing six new cancer medicines to patients between 2013 and 2020. A broad pipeline of next generation medicines is focused principally on four disease areas - breast, ovarian, lung and hematological cancers. As well as other tumor types, these are being targeted through five key platforms -immunotherapy, the genetic drivers of cancer and resistance, DNA damage repair, HER2 and antibody drug conjugates, underpinned by personalized healthcare and biomarker technologies.

The Role

The ideal candidate for this role will bring a proven track record of delivering value through the leverage of routinely collected data from healthcare settings to provide health analytics and insights in a range of contexts including Public Health, Pharmaceutical Research and Development and Commercial/ Payer. They will collaborate with colleagues in Epidemiology, Statistics and Payer, giving scientific and technical guidance on study design, RW data selection and best practice in RW data utilization. In addition, they will assist in advancing and shaping AZs Real World Science data strategy through the due diligence on new data providers/vendors, informatics support for data acquisitions in a range of Therapeutic Areas. The role will promote best practice in Real World Data Science across multiple domains, and/or stakeholder groups.

Typical Accountabilities
Collaborate with Payer and Epidemiology teams to maximise the value derived from large observational research data
Deliver analyses of data from EMR, claims and primary observational data required by TA RWE strategies
Support the development of IVS strategies and selection of optimised contact models for prioritised markets through analysis of RWD
Provide scientific guidance on the application of Real World Evidence and observational research data to address issues across the Oncology and Biopharmaceuticals business units
Provide technical input, options and directions to strategic decisions made by AZ observational study teams on study design, data partner selection and best practices in RWE data utilization
Support technical teams to provide access to analytical tools and develop visual analytics to enable self-serving applications for end customers
Provide clear technical input, options, and direction to strategic decisions on RWE platform and capability build
Provide support for strategic decisions on AZ Medical Evidence and Observational Research external collaborations in the US and other markets
Assist in building a capability that becomes a source of sustained competitive advantage for AZ in identifying, acquiring, integrating and mining diverse RW data from multiple geographic and healthcare system sources to support evidence generation and real-world studies
Evaluate and assess strengths and weaknesses of external RW data sources, and potential partners for advancing the data strategy for specific therapeutic areas
Maintain a strong insight into the capabilities of potential external partners in RWE, especially for US and emerging markets.
Education, Qualifications, Skills and Experience

Essential
PhD or MS in data science or other advanced degree in life sciences with post doctoral or other training/work in Medical/Health Informatics or related field
Experience in real-world evidence and familiarity with health economics/epidemiology, and quantitative science such as health outcome modelling
Expertise in EMR/Health IT, disease registries, and insurance claims databases
Expertise in clinical data standards, medical terminologies and controlled vocabularies used in healthcare data and ontologies (ICD9/10/ReadCode)
Experience in supporting pharmacoepidemiology studies with proven track record of advancing approaches with data science
Experience in Statistical Analysis Plan (SAP) generation and execution for observational studies
Expertise in methods development and application using statistical languages such as R/Matlab/SAS/SQL/Hadoop/Python
Experience in advanced visualisation and visual analytics of routinely collected healthcare data
Desirable
Expertise in data mining approaches within healthcare settings generating insight from routinely collected healthcare data
A history of patient care or equivalent background of working at a patient care setting that allows the candidate to bring medical perspective into real-world evidence generation and observational studies
Demonstrated ability to build long-term relationships with stakeholders at senior levels, understand relevant scientific/business challenges at a deep level and translate into a programme of informatics activities to deliver defined value
Ability to lead & manage multi-disciplinary data science projects
Strong track record of delivering large, cross functional projects
Experience working in a global organization and delivering global solutions
Use of Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence in the generation of hypotheses within Real World Data
Why AstraZeneca?

At AstraZeneca when we see an opportunity for change, we seize it and make it happen, because any opportunity no matter how small, can be the start of something big. Delivering life-changing medicines is about being entrepreneurial - finding those moments and recognizing their potential. Join us on our journey of building a new kind of organization to reset expectations of what a bio-pharmaceutical company can be. This means were opening new ways to work, pioneering cutting edge methods and bringing unexpected teams together. Interested? Come and join our journey.

Are you already imagining yourself joining our team? Good, because we cant wait to hear from you.

Where can I find out more?

Our Social Media, Follow AstraZeneca on LinkedIn https://www.linkedin.com/company/1603/

Follow AstraZeneca on Facebook https://www.facebook.com/astrazenecacareers/

Follow AstraZeneca on Instagram https://www.instagram.com/astrazeneca_careers/?hl=en",4.0,AstraZeneca,"Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,107,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,95.0,MD,6671,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
613,613,Data Scientist,$63k-$127k,"POSITION SUMMARY

The Data Scientist participates in the design and prototyping of cutting edge algorithms for analysis of genetic data.

PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES
Analyze next-generation sequencing data ranging from single research experiments to commercial data sets of hundreds of thousands of samples.
Develop Python software infrastructure to support algorithm testing and simulation studies.
Contribute to research and product development efforts in the statistics group.
Produce correct conclusions based on rigorous mathematical analysis and principles of statistics and probability.
Produce high quality technical documentation including research reports and algorithm specifications.
QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelors degree in engineering, applied math, statistics, or similar, Masters degree preferred
At least 1 year practical experience in scientific data analysis using software such as Python
KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES
Strong foundation in probability theory and/or statistics including concepts like joint and conditional probability distributions, parameter estimation and hypothesis testing
Excellent verbal and written communication skills and the desire to work in a dynamic and collaborative environment.
Desire to learn about human genetics and sequencing technologies.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS AND WORK ENVIRONMENT
Duties are typically performed in an office setting.
This position requires the ability to use a computer keyboard, communicate over the telephone and read printed material.
Duties may require working outside normal working hours (evenings and weekends) at times.
OUR OPPORTUNITY

Driven by the passion for elevating the science and utility of genetic testing, Natera is committed to helping families identify and manage genetic diseases. Natera is a rapidly-growing diagnostics company with proprietary bioinformatics and molecular technology for analyzing DNA. Our complex technology has been proven clinically and commercially in the prenatal testing space and we are actively researching its applications in the liquid biopsy space for developing products with oncology applications.

The Natera team consists of highly dedicated statisticians, geneticists, doctors, laboratory scientists, business professionals, software engineers and many other professionals from world-class institutions, who care deeply for our work and each other. When you join Natera, youll work hard and grow quickly. Working alongside the elite of the industry, youll be stretched and challenged, and take pride in being part of a company that is changing the landscape of genetic disease management.

WHAT WE OFFER

Competitive Benefits. Healthy catered lunches, Premium snacks and beverages, Onsite gym with cardio and weight-training equipment, Game room with satellite TV, Onsite dry cleaning and alteration service with pick-up and delivery, Employee-organized sport leagues, Happy hours and BBQs, Generous Employee Referral program.

For more information, visit www.natera.com.

Natera is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. We are committed to ensuring a diverse and inclusive workplace environment, and welcome people of different backgrounds, experiences, abilities and perspectives. Inclusive collaboration benefits our employees, our community and our patients, and is critical to our mission of changing the management of disease worldwide.

All qualified applicants are encouraged to apply, and will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, age, veteran status, disability or any other legally protected status. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with applicable laws.",4.1,Natera,"San Carlos, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,16,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,95.0,CA,3745,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
616,616,Data Scientist,$63k-$127k,"Data Scientist


at Brightidea
San Francisco

The Role

We are seeking machine learning developers with natural language processing experience.

In general, we are looking for people who are self-motivated and passionate about the field of machine learning and the vast applications of it. These folks will have the ability to work with / understand / and build on top of an existing code base using their deep knowledge of various machine learning algorithms (e.g. neural networks, bayesian methods, etc).

Key responsibilities include, but not limited to:
Build on top of an existing text processing/classification system
Write, maintain, and develop python machine learning modules & repos
Run hyperparameter optimizations + collect, analyze, visualize, and present results
What You Need to Succeed
BS or MS in computer science, mathematics, physics or other hard science/engineering discipline
Programming in Python ~ 2+ years
Numpy, scipy, pandas, Jupyter, and scikit-learn background
Data visualization (e.g. matplotlib, seaborn, bokeh, mpld3, etc)
Ability to implement machine learning algorithms from scratch
Experience with full machine learning pipeline: from data preprocessing, to building/training various models, to hyperparameter optimization, testing, and visualization of results.
Background in deep learning preferred but not required
In Your Application Please Include
A past machine learning project you worked on in which highlights your skills, including: What tools/models did you use? What were some problems you encountered along the way, and how did you solve them?
What Brightidea Offers
Market competitive salary and significant equity in a well-funded, growing company
A chance to impact human creativity
Generous vacation and holidays
Top-notch benefits (healthcare, vision, dental, maternity, paternity, retirement)
A unique opportunity to use your leadership skills, experience, and contacts to build a team and shape the culture of the company.
An incredible team of fun, humble but brilliant co-workers
Background

Helping large companies innovate isn’t easy, but it is vital. Vital to creating new jobs, vital to igniting growth, vital to ensuring a safe, healthy and prosperous future for billions around the globe.

But, innovation at large companies is a mess. Employees often have lots of ideas to improve the business, but, with no formal process, their ideas go unheard, and they eventually give up trying to make a difference. Corporate innovation teams are expected to support a growing list of activities but have historically lacked strong tools designed for the job. Executives, despite having millions to invest, live in fear of disruption, and still have no idea where their “next big idea” will come from, or if it will come at all.

At Brightidea, we’ve built a software platform that’s solving these problems. We’ve been helping organizations be more efficient with the 1.5 trillion dollars invested in R&D annually.

Our Company & Culture

We are a tight-knit, entrepreneurial minded team of self-starters who show up every day with a singular mission: to create a world where the best ideas win. Our primary focus this year is to continue to add exceptionally talented and motivated individuals to the Brightidea team. We are ambitious, bold, highly-collaborative, focused, and we aim to win. We take a humble approach to changing the way corporate R&D teams run innovation challenges.

Anyone joining our company will have the opportunity to shape the culture and be an integral part of setting it up for long term success. If you identify with being humble, T-shaped, and relentlessly resourceful then this could be the perfect team for you to shine in.

Brightidea believes that everyone has the ability to make a difference and that a diverse team generates more innovation and bigger ideas. Just as our product invites organizations to crowd source innovation across their workforce, Brightidea is inclusive and does not discriminate. We accept everybody.",4.3,Brightidea,"San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,20,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,95.0,CA,4013,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
619,619,Data Scientist,$63k-$127k,"Why Should You Join First Advantage?

First Advantage is in the midst of a technology revolution, and the best time to join us is right now! We are developing incredible solutions, working with amazing customers, and we would love to see how your skills could help get people back to work. Our brand new Data team is recruiting several passionate people in greater metropolitan areas across the Central and Eastern time zones (namely Chicago, Atlanta, Charlotte, Austin, Boston, Houston, Columbus, Tampa, etc) in the US! This opportunity is for remote work, with occasional travel to our Atlanta office.

First Advantage has over 4000 employees across the world and does over 71 million background screens a year, so if you’re looking for opportunities working with advanced technologies to produce awesome user experiences and securely process high-volume transactions leveraging massive amounts of data, then this is the place for you!

We work with Fortune 100 and Global 500 hundred companies, so your work will directly impact some of the largest enterprises in the world!

We need talent that is Informed, Insightful, Transformational, and Progressive

We’re looking for a Data Scientist! You’re our ideal candidate if you have 8+ years of experience and strong expertise with SQL/Oracle PLSQL, and 3+ years of experience working with data modelling tools like Python, RStudio, TensorFlow, etc. The Data Scientist will be working with business and technical teams to develop machine-learning models for FADV’s background screening products. We’re looking for someone who can do the deeply analytical work, while also presenting their work to internal and external customers. If you meet those requirements, and have experience working with Business Intelligence tools, you could be a perfect fit!

Our brand new Data team have the opportunity to build a game-changing solution from the ground up, and that solution will drive the next generation of background screening. Joining our team right now is an incredible opportunity to be on the ground floor of our technology transformation, and will give you a chance to make a real difference!

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor degree in Engineering or equivalent is required
Minimum of 8 years of strong experience and expertise with SQL/Oracle PLSQL
Minimum of 3+ years of experience working with Data Modelling tools using Pyton, RStudio, TensorFlow etc
Strong data analytics and data science skills
Experience with Analytical programming languages using R/Python libraries
Strong experience in Relational Databases and Big Data analytics in the cloud is preferred
Knowledge of other BI tools like Qlik, Oracle Business Intelligence, SQL Server Reporting, Cognos would be a plus
Candidate must have Strong communication skills and creative skills
Education:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering or related technical field or equivalent relevant work experience
Experience:
Minimum of 8 years of strong experience and expertise with SQL/Oracle PLSQL , Perl, Shell scripting
Minimum of 5+ years of experience working with data modelling & database designs
Other Knowledge, Skills, Abilities or Certifications:
Strong data analytics and data science skills
Strong experience with end to end automation
Experience with bulk data loading & data cleansing
Experience working with Oracle, MySQL databases and Linux environments
Experience with Analytical programming languages using R/Python libraries would be a plus
Strong experience in Relations Database and Big Data analytics preferred
Candidate must have Strong communication skills and creative skills",3.5,First Advantage Corporation,Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,17,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,95.0,Remote,3618,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
620,620,Data Scientist,$63k-$127k,"Excited by using massive amounts of data to create sophisticated security analytics? Does pushing the envelope with user and entity behavior analytics (UEBA) including developing statistical, stochastic and machine learning models for security excite you? Want to help the largest global enterprises operate safely & securely in the cloud at an unprecedented scale?

You will enhance real-time proactive and preemptive systems using data driven techniques. The analytic techniques are applied at each stage from detection to response mitigation. This job will challenge you to dive deep and understand the unique challenges in operating this platform at a scale unrivaled in the industry. Our scale provides unique opportunities that simply dont exist elsewhere, but these opportunities can only be revealed by a scientific thinker with a curious mind, who is committed to improving every single day.

This is an opportunity to operate in a truly groundbreaking manner given the sheer scale, breadth, and fast pace of the AWS environment. Data scientists are collaborative and highly determined, working backward from threats to create new and innovative ways to detect, assess and react to malicious activity.

Your job is distilling meaningful insights from large volumes of data to address the constantly evolving threat and attack space from sophisticated adversaries. This role will give you an opportunity to use and grow a broad range of skills in data science, analytic development, and information security all using and creating cloud services in large scale computing environments. Considering the scale and the magnitude of the technical challenge, this role is a great opportunity to make a meaningful contribution to an extremely important area. Operating in the cloud at our scale enables activities that have never before been possible, providing new advantages and opportunities for innovative work.

Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have ten employee-led affinity groups, reaching 40,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and we host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences. Amazons culture of inclusion is reinforced within our 14 Leadership Principles, which remind team members to seek diverse perspectives, learn and be curious, and earn trust.

The preferred location for this position is Baltimore, MD, but it can also be located in Herndon, VA or Arlington, VA (HQ2).








Basic Qualifications

· MS + 4 yrs experience or BS + 6 yrs experience in predictive modeling, data science, machine learning, or user and entity behavior analytic development.
· At least 2 years focused on applications of Data Science/Analytics
· A minimum of 1 years experience in applying Data Science/ Analytics to security related problems.
· A minimum of 2 years experience introducing automation and operating within a fast paced prototyping environment.
· Able to work in a diverse team

Preferred Qualifications

· An M.S. in Mathematics, Computer Science, Electrical and Computer Engineering, or equivalent degree.
· A post graduate degree in a scientific field is preferred but successful development and deployment of security analytics count. The right candidate has a background in probability and statistics, applied mathematics, or computational science and a history of solving difficult problems using a scientific approach.
· Experience with analytic development for endpoint and network security
· Experience with one or more cloud services
· Analytic development - streaming and a Hadoop ecosystem (Hive, Spark, etc.)
· Analytic development - SQL, NoSQL, graph-based, Key/Value stores, document stores, Python and/or R
· Experience applying machine learning to real-world production systems, analytic development based on SparkML and other ML libraries such as scikit-learn, caret, mlr, MLlib
· Excellent written and oral communication skills, strong sense of ownership, urgency, and drive
· Meets/exceeds Amazons leadership principles requirements for this role
· Meets/exceeds Amazons functional/technical depth and complexity for this role

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workforce. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",3.9,Amazon,"Baltimore, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,26,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,95.0,MD,4693,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
622,622,Data Scientist,$107k-$173k,"Overview


Southern California-based Karma is more than just a car company. Although we are best known as a creator of soul-stirring luxury electric vehicles, Karma has emerged as a high-tech incubator offering innovators a perfect platform to prove their emerging technologies. Every Revero is designed at our Headquarters in Irvine and created with great individual care and world-class craftsmanship at the Karma Innovation and Customization Center in Moreno Valley, CA.

The Data Scientist, reporting to the Manager, Data Sciences and Innovation, is responsible for data collection,analyze, extract, normalize, and label relevant data from multiple sources to provide interpretation andVisualizations reports around key data-driven projects.

Responsibilities
Design and build new data set processes for modeling, data mining, and production purposes.
Determine new ways to improve data and search quality, and predictive capabilities.
Perform and interpret data studies and product experiments concerning new data sources or new uses forexisting data sources.
Develop prototypes, proof of concepts, algorithms, predictive models, and custom analysis.
Create visualizations and reports to show insights obtained from data mining efforts.
Interact with multiple internal and external sources in support of ongoing and proof of concept projects.
Ensure timely, accurate and credible information is provided and interpreted and distilled into actiondriven information for diverse audiences.
Attend trade shows, conferences and learning opportunity to familiarize with the industry-leading trendsin data sciences and predictive analytics to help drive Karma’s Data sciences and technology departmentdevelopment.
Other duties, as assigned.
Qualifications


Education
A Bachelor’s degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, OperationalResearch, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.) or equivalent experience.
Required Skills
3+ years’ experience in data preparation, model creation and feature tuning.
Familiar with AWS Cloud based tool set for data storage, ETL, modelcreation and code repository.
Advanced ability to code in Python and SQL and related libraries.
Vehicle and automotive industry knowledge preferred but is not required.
Experience in implementing data sets into BI and Visualizations (PowerBi)would be preferred but is not required.
Must be energetic, self-motivated and self-organized. Willing to do whatever is requiredto get the job done.
Comfortable with working in a small team in daily activities in a fast-paced environment.
Possesses a strong work ethic and high level of professionalism.
Passionate about luxury, technology and innovation
Experience working with SAP applications Fiori, C4C, and Hybris is a plus.
Proficiency in MS Office Suite (Outlook, Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Teams, and relevant system software.
Basic knowledge of Quality Management Systems (ISO 9001:2015) and Environmental ManagementSystems (ISO 14001:2015), as applicable
NO 3rd Parties, Principals Only, Please

Join Karma as we transform transportation and mobility with innovative team work.

Karma Automotive offers a complete benefits package including medical, dental, vision, life, STD, LTD; paid vacation, holidays and personal days; and a 401K with matching contributions. Relocation assistance may be available.

Karma Automotive LLC is an equal employment opportunity (EEO) employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of age, race, gender identity and expression, color, sexual orientation, marital status, pregnancy or related conditions (including breastfeeding), national origin/ancestry, religion, military/veteran status, genetic information, citizenship status or any other characteristic and group protected by applicable law. Karma Automotive LLC complies with the Americans with Disabilities Act to ensure equal access to all qualified individuals with a physical or mental disability. Valid driver’s license may be required based on essential duties.",2.0,Karma Automotive,"Irvine, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,6,Company - Private,manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,CA,3998,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
624,624,Data Scientist,$107k-$173k,"Data Scientist

Job Code : PS10052B Job Type : Contract
Discipline : IT And Software Engineering Experience Req : 10+ year(s)
Company : Northwest Software, Inc. Education Req : Bachelor
Location : USA-North Carolina-Raleigh Salary Range : Not Avaliable
Job Description:
Data Scientist
Long Term
Raleigh, NC

Description:

Our client requires the supplier to provide a Data Scientist to join the Service Management Office in the form of service level management, problem resolution and management by ensuring that processes
are in place to identify root cause and anomalies of issues and corrective actions needed are tracked through resolution.

Activities will include:

• Analyze and Model Incident, Problem and Change trends to identify opportunities for service improvements
• Performs and interprets data studies and experiments concerning new data sources or new uses for existing data sources
• Develops analytics using data mining, statistical, forecasting, and modeling techniques
• Develops prototypes, proof of concepts, algorithms, predictive models, and custom analysis
• Determines new ways to improve automation through machine learning leveraging data output, aggregation, analytics, algorithms, orchestration, machine learning and visualization.
• Assists in identifying right tools for improvement to support of automation and predictive
learning external to the organization
• Provides guidance and technical support to executives, contractors and employees in other
functional areas

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS

• Experience in building large scale Machine Learning systems from scratch.
• Ability to think abstractly and deal well with ambiguous/undefined problems.
• Experience taking a leading role in defining models for complex data lakes, and making that information useful at various level, from operations to senior stakeholders.
• Strong object-oriented design and coding skills.
• Experience with distributed (multi-tiered) data processing models and algorithms.
• Ability to effectively articulate technical challenges and solutions.

Education:

Bachelor's or master’s degree in Mechanical Engineering, Mathematics, Computer Science or
related field.
Skill Requirements :
Machine Learning

The desired candidate must have experience in building large scale Machine Learning systems from scratch. Please briefly describe your related experience.
Object-oriented design and coding skills

The desired candidate must have Strong object-oriented design and coding skills.. Please briefly describe your related experience.",4.1,Northwest Software Inc.,"Raleigh, NC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,32,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,NC,2547,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
625,625,Geospatial Data Engineer (TS/SCI-Full Scope Polygraph),$107k-$173k,"Clearance: Current TS/SCI ISSA (Full-Scope Polygraph) required*
Description: Provide data flows and transformations to automate, script, visualize, and modeling subnational wealth. Day to day technical tasks include meeting with the customer to understand and refine the requirements. The data engineer will use Nifi and Python to create data flows and transformations and understand the workflow of the project. They will work with the customer to implement any requested updates, move data storage to RDS, and work with security to ensure the entire system is compliant. They will compile security controls and artifacts and contribute to the Standard Operating Procedures and other related documents.

Other Technical Skills:
Experience scripting in Python and using NiFi
Some knowledge of geospatial software such as ArcGIS, QGIS (or willingness and ability to learn)
Experience with SQL, PostGreSQL/PostGIS
Knowledge of best practices for data standards, data management, data quality
Core Competencies:
Conceptual, quantitative, organizational, research, writing, verbal communication, and graphical representation skills.
Sound judgment and creative problem solving and independent working skills.
Sound interpersonal and teamwork skills to work with individuals and organizations, to include varying levels and types (Government, industry, and academia).
Facilitation skills to bring diverse groups together on issues and reach consensus across stakeholders.
The ability to perform complex analyses and to communicate its results using accurate, concise, and effective writing and through descriptive and graphical representations.
Technical understanding of the systems supporting aspects of the functional areas.
Knowledge of standard tools [e.g., the Agency Data Services Network (ADSN), iCE workstations, Microsoft Office, the Agency Internet Network (AIN), and the Microsoft Office software applications], as appropriate; and a demonstrated ability to learn to use and support other tools that may be added or developed as the program evolves.
Flexibility in assisting with ad hoc tasks and in adjusting as tasks are re-prioritized.
Travel: Minimal CONUS travel may be required.

Company Information: New Light Technologies (NLT) provides comprehensive Information Technology, Geospatial Information Systems (GIS) and Remote Sensing technology consulting and staffing solutions for government, commercial, and non-profit organizations. NLT employs a cadre of experienced project managers, infrastructure experts, system architects, data scientists, web developers, geospatial experts and software engineers who work across a broad range of COTS, Open Source, and custom technologies to devise the best solutions. NLT specializes in DevOps enterprise-scale Systems Design, Integration, Development, and Management, and offers exceptional capabilities in Infrastructure Modernization, Cloud Migration & Management, Virtualization, Microservices, & Containerized Computing, and the development of High-Performance Mobile Computing solutions.

NLT has a diverse customer base and is looking to bring on team members to work on-site, virtually, and embedded with our customers to help them reach, meet, and exceed their mission goals in every engagement. NLT offers competitive salaries and benefits including PTO, Healthcare, access to a vast network of group benefits such as commuter benefits and retirement plan access. NLT is an equal opportunity employer.

Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Pay: $80,000.00 - $110,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
On call
Weekends
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Commission pay
Signing bonus
COVID-19 considerations:
While most of our work is done remotely during the COVID-19 Pandemic, this job in the National Security Sector requires physical presence on site.

Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
Please list any presentations, repos, or other online content that is publicly available if you have them. For proper consideration, please make sure to take our skills tests in this indeed posting.
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Required)
Contract Length:
1 year
More than 1 year
Varies
Contract Renewal:
Likely
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://NewLightTechnologies.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",5.0,"New Light Technologies, Inc.","McLean, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,other_industries,Accounting & Legal,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,VA,4906,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
626,626,Data Scientist,$107k-$173k,"viagogo is an industry-leading entertainment marketplace dedicated to helping people attend their favorite live events. We are expecting rapid growth after acquiring Stubhub.

Our team of data scientists uses data to automate manual processes and human decisions. This function is crucial to scaling our business across all geographies, languages, and currencies. You'll mine rich data sets and find insights that will drive the decisions that power our platform. Every piece of work you complete will tie directly into a business goal so you can measure the impact you have on viagogo.

About You:
Love to have an impact, learn from the best, and help people access unforgettable experiences
Currently pursuing or recently completed a degree in a quantitative field like statistics, mathematics, computer sciences, or engineering
Have familiarity with using tools like Python, SQL, or R
Initially, you'll learn:
How to present findings and make decisions with a real commercial impact
How to explore and find meaning in extremely high volumes of data
How we use tools like Python, SQL, and R to analyze, visualize, and present data
How to optimize coverage and efciency of ad campaigns through search engines and social media platforms
Best practices for designing, running, and analyzing feature experiments (A/B tests)
What your team's goals are and how to achieve them
Your Growth Path:
Receive mentorship and a clear path for growing your technical and leadership skills
Be given autonomy to make decisions regarding experiments and tests
Demonstrated results and increasing ownership are rewarded
What we offer:
An environment where you can quickly grow your skills, autonomy, and knowledge
A+ Compensation Package, including stock incentives
Paid Time Off, 401k, Health, Vision, and Dental Insurance
Dog friendly office, weekly lunches, office snacks, and team events
About Data Science at viagogo:
Rather than having a compartmentalized team of data scientists, our data scientists are embedded into cross-functional groups. viagogo's agile teams consist of data scientists, engineers, analysts, and product managers who achieve success through their collaborative culture and entrepreneurial mindset.

We are a multicultural, diverse team that values a coactive approach to making data-driven decisions.

About viagogo:
viagogo is the leading global marketplace for music, sports, and entertainment tickets. We have acquired StubHub and look forward to our continued market leadership.

Despite our rapid growth while revolutionizing a 100-billion-dollar industry, we maintain our start-up ethos and data-driven, collaborative culture. We believe that small, cross-functional teams can achieve extraordinary results. Fans from nearly every country in the world can find millions of tickets to their favorite events in the language, currency, and with the device of their choice.

We provide the widest possible choice of tickets to events around the world and help ticket sellers reach a global audience. viagogo has partnered with many of the world's leading brands in sports and entertainment while helping fans access unforgettable experiences.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity on our team. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",2.9,viagogo,"New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,14,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,NY,3393,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
627,627,Senior Data Engineer,$107k-$173k,"BigCommerce is disrupting the e-commerce industry as the SaaS leader for fast-growing, mid-market businesses. We enable our customers to build intuitive and engaging stores to support every stage of their growth.

BigCommerce named a ""Best and Brightest"" place to work in San Francisco 2020 is looking for a Senior Data Engineer. This is an exciting opportunity to build a real time big data pipeline and SaaS analytics platform using latest cloud technologies for the #1 e-commerce SaaS platform.

An ideal candidate will have a background in Computer Science or a related technical field and possess extensive experience in building distributed scalable data pipelines and working with large data stores. You will be working with cross-functional teams in a highly visible role. You are gritty, focused on results, a self-starter and have demonstrated success in using engineering and analytics to drive the understanding, growth and success of a product.

What you'll do
Build scalable and reliable near real time data pipeline on cloud that collects, transforms, loads and curates data from various internal and external data sources
Build a scalable distributed data store that will be central source of truth
Experience in developing high performance, scalable and available web services
Own data quality for the pipelines you build and make them auditable
Evaluate new technologies and build prototypes for continuous improvements in Data Engineering
Build integrations with external systems for transmitting and receiving event data
Partner with Infrastructure and Engineering teams to ensure instrumentation, logging and monitoring is in place
Who you are
Experience in using big data technologies such as Kafka, Spark, Hadoop, HBase or their equivalents
Experience with AWS and/or GCP
5+ years of experience with Java, Scala and/or Python
5+ years of experience with SQL
3+ years of experience in building and monitoring near real time scalable ETL pipelines
Experience with shell scripting
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Bachelor's degree in CS, EE or MIS; or equivalent experience
Nice to have
Experience with tools such as AirFlow for scheduling and monitoring of data workflow will be a plus
Experience with managed data processing services of cloud platforms such as GCP and/or AWS
Experience working with a team distributed over time zones
Knowledge of Google Kubernetes Engine, Cloud Composer
Diversity & Inclusion at BigCommerce

We have the opportunity to build not only a great business, but a great company, with soul. Our beliefs and commitment to diversity and inclusion are a central part of achieving that.

Our dedication to diversity and inclusion is grounded in two things: a moral belief in the dignity, value, and potential of every individual, and a practical belief that diverse, inclusive teams will create the best outcomes for our customers, partners, employees, and company. We welcome everyone to be a part of our journey.

Current BigCommerce Employees: Please use the internal job board to apply for openings",4.1,BigCommerce,"San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,11,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,CA,3066,1,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
628,628,Data Scientist-Senior,$107k-$173k,"Business Group Highlights

Defense

The Defense group supports the Department of Defense (DoD) mission to keep our homeland and its citizens safe. We provide solutions to improve the Nation's defense by providing software, systems engineering, IT, training and logistics and fleet management solutions.

Responsibilities

This position is for a large contract for the Army, providing leadership and support existing systems, processes, and policies as well as working to implement new technologies and processes in support of the client’s mission to provide Intelligence training and technologies to military personnel.

Provides data science and data engineering support to targeting activities that bring in large datasets. Data science and data engineering support is needed to help manage and execute the ingest (extract, transform and load (ETL) operations), parsing, data normalizations, database design, as well as performing data analysis at scale and implementing algorithms to find impactful operational and finished intelligence in large data streams. Involved in the analysis of unstructured and semi-structured data. Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases. Handles processing against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams. Has the ability to make discoveries in the world of big data. Requires strong technical and computational skills coupled with the ability to code, design, develop, and deploy sophisticated applications using advanced unstructured and semi-structured data analysis techniques. Has the ability to utilize advance tools and computational skills to interpret, connect, predict and make discoveries in complex data and deliver recommendations. Develops documentation to support objectives of operationally-focused team members.

Qualifications

Over 10 years of experience and a MA/MS degree.

Typically works on high-visibility or mission critical aspects of a given program and performs all functional duties independently.

Oversee the efforts of less senior staff and/or be responsible for the efforts of all staff assigned to a specific job.

Current TS/SCI clearance

Bachelor of Science Degree or higher computer science, statistics, or other related STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math)

Desired qualifications:

Strong understanding of data engineering, structure, formatting, conditioning and analysis.
Knowledge of database tools and current data science processes.
Full-stack development experience.

Desired Skills:

Thorough/Working knowledge of Python and some of the following software/tools: SQL, R, Hadoop, Spark, Java, C/C++, Git Bash, Tableau, ArcGIS, Unix commands.
Thorough/Working knowledge of research designs.
Thorough/Working knowledge of collection methods, capabilities and tasking process.
Familiarity with project management concepts and principles.
Intellectual curiosity; creativity and innovation to go beyond current tools to deliver the best solution to complex problems.
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.2,Perspecta,"Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,2,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,DC,4816,1,data scientist,1,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
629,629,DATA SCIENTIST,$107k-$173k,"JOB SUMMARY

The position will focus on building products to democratize machine learning and consequently improve the cost and quality of patient care. This position involves development of tools that accelerate analytics and machine learning for the organization. Developing models that encompass all aspects of hospital operations, including clinical, operational, and financial data. Also responsible for teaching data analysts and software engineers how to work effectively with vast quantities of data
This position requires full understanding and active participation in fulfilling the Mission of Blessing Health System. It is expected that the employee demonstrate behavior consistent with the Core Values while supporting the strategic plan, goals and direction of the Performance Improvement Process (PIP) at Blessing Health System.

JOB QUALIFICATIONS

Education/Training/Experience:
REQUIRED:
Graduate or post graduate university degree in the field of computer science, mathematics, or statistics,
Minimum of 5 years’ experience in healthcare analytics
Fluency with at least one scripting language such as Python, Perl, etc.
Expert knowledge of statistical analysis tools such as R, Matlab, etc.
Experience with very large datasets
Proficient with Microsoft Word, Excel and other office projects required.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Pay Status:
EXEMPT

IND0

Blessing Health System provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, Blessing Health System complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.

Blessing Health System expressly prohibits any form of workplace harassment based on race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status. Improper interference with the ability of Blessing Health System’s employees to perform their job duties may result in discipline up to and including discharge.

19437

Location: Blessing Hospital · DECISION SUPPORT
Schedule: Full-Time, Days, Monday-Friday, 8:00am-5:00pm, 40 hours weekly",3.8,Blessing Hospital,"Quincy, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,145,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,IL,2541,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
631,631,"Associate Director, Data Science",$107k-$173k,"About Veracyte


Veracyte (Nasdaq: VCYT) is a leading genomic diagnostics company that improves patient care by providing trustworthy and actionable answers to challenging clinical questions. The company's products uniquely combine advanced genomic technology, clinical science and machine learning to provide answers that give patients and physicians a clear path forward, informing both diagnosis and treatment decisions without the need for costly, risky surgeries that are often unnecessary. Since its founding in 2008, Veracyte has commercialized seven genomic tests and is transforming the diagnosis of thyroid cancer, lung cancer, idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis and breast cancer.

The Position


We are seeking a strong technical leader to serve as the Data Science Associate Director who will lead the algorithm development and all analytical aspects of our machine-learning based diagnostic products. This person will lead a team of data scientists to bring analytical rigor and statistical methods to the challenges of modeling large, diverse and complex data sets. This leader position will focus on computational biology with an emphasis on deep genomic sequencing analysis and machine learning within Research and Development. More specifically, the role will work on cross-disciplinary integrative data analytics and modeling. This individual will report to the SVP of Bioinformatics & Data Science.

This is a hands-on role that will apply expertise in cutting-edge computational technologies as well as leverage extensive data on deep genomic sequencing, biomedical imaging, clinical features, and demographic factors to deepen our understanding of complex diseases. This effort will enhance our power in machine learning and data mining towards the diagnosis of important medical conditions. This position is a core team member of discovery leadership and participates in portfolio and stage gate reviews, shaping and implementing strategies that support R&D growth. In an intensely collaborative and fast-paced environment, this individual will experience the swift implementation of their hard work towards products that will transform patient lives.

Roles / Responsibilities
Provide strategic input and leadership to help build analytical capabilities in diagnostic development
Build and manage a team of 3-4 computational scientists, including recruiting/hiring, motivation, performance management, and maintaining a high level of technical excellence and positive teamwork
Lead algorithm development for feature extraction, classification, and model evaluation. Sources of data will include deep next generation sequencing, demographic, clinical, and imaging data from patients.
Near term goals include:
Develop algorithms to extract, process, and combine the most relevant features from expression signals, DNA alterations, biomedical imaging, clinical information, and demographic characteristics to reach high-performance classification of the nasal product development.
Maintain keen awareness of advances in the field and evaluate applicability of new machine/deep learning methods while continuously expanding our computational technologies to most efficiently utilize available data and develop the optimal diagnostic tools.
Provide mentoring and guidance to team members on computation and machine learning development. Mentor and manage junior members.
Who You Are

The successful candidate should be motivated by the opportunity to contribute to clinically vital diagnostic tests that dramatically improve patient outcome. You should be a creative problem solver who loves working in a multidisciplinary team of statisticians, bioinformatics scientists, BioIT staff, and wet lab biologists. You are a pragmatic leader with a focus on value-creating activities and a track record of creativity, innovation, and delivery of real-world value. You are skilled in active listening, welcome feedback from others, and constantly strives for improvement to better serve the team’s needs. As a senior leader you demonstrate a positive “can-do” attitude and fast adaptation to change.

The incumbent should be familiar with emerging approaches for analyzing and modeling clinical, molecular, and other complex data types. These include traditional bioinformatics and statistical methods as well as data mining and machine learning approaches. We are looking for a leader who can collaborate effectively across multiple domains internally and externally to drive our diagnostic development strategy forward.

Technical Requirements
A Ph.D. degree in statistics, c omputational biology, bioinformatics, computer science or equivalent field with a minimum of 10 years applicable professional experience, with five of those years in an industry setting
3 years of people management experience leading teams of computational biologists/statisticians/bioinformatics/data scientists in industry
Technical proficiency in languages such as R, Matlab, Python, Java, JavaScript, and C++
Hands-on advanced proficiency in handling and analyzing large data sets such as next-generation sequencing data
Experience with medical imaging analysis such as usage of CAFFE and other deep learning methodologies on GPU operating system is a plus
Highly experienced with the information technology aspects of data collection, organization, and integration
Deep knowledge in optimal computational environment required for data processing, mining, and machine learning
Experience with big data technologies and HPC such as the Hadoop ecosystem
Expertise in dimensionality reduction techniques
Excellent written and verbal communication and presentation skills are required. Highly experienced in writing peer-reviewed scientific manuscripts
Ability to translate complex computational concepts in such a way that scientifically trained individuals in other disciplines can readily understand their significance
Experience with the development of IVD molecular diagnostics and regulatory requirements are highly desired
What We Can Offer You

Veracyte is a growing company that offers significant career opportunities if you are curious, driven, customer-oriented and aspire to help us build a great company. We work collaboratively, offering you the opportunity to constantly learn from your colleagues – even those outside of your area of expertise. Here at Veracyte, we find fun, little ways to make it a great place to work – participate in our annual Halloween costume contest, treat yourself to the endless supply of PB&J sandwiches, and toast with colleagues as we celebrate milestones. We also offer conveniences such as an on-site workout room and free shuttle service from both BART and CalTrain. We are a company with a heart and believe in positively impacting the world beyond our doors by providing our product to those who cannot afford it through a financial assistance program. Veracyte seeks the best employees and works to create an environment where they can thrive, expand their knowledge and contribute at the highest level.
About Veracyte

Veracyte, Inc. is a leading genomic diagnostics company that is fundamentally improving patient care by resolving diagnostic uncertainty with evidence that is trustworthy and actionable. The Company’s products uniquely combine genomic technology, clinical science and machine learning to provide answers that give physicians and patients a clear path forward without risky, costly surgery that is often unnecessary. Since its founding in 2008, Veracyte has commercialized three genomic tests, which are transforming the diagnosis of thyroid cancer, lung cancer and idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis and collectively target a $2 billion market opportunity.

At Veracyte, we are more than just a diagnostics company. We are redefining diagnostic truth and changing patient care as we know it. We are improving the lives of patients by enabling the evolution of evidence-based clarity from scientific discovery. Our team embraces challenges - the more complex, the better. We are laser-focused and know how to prioritize. We act with a sense of urgency, because when it comes to advancing patient care, every minute matters. We take ownership of our work and are deeply committed to the success of our team. And, above all, we value integrity - in our work and how we treat all of our stakeholders, including each other.

Our accomplishments and innovation have earned us widespread recognition, from appearing on The Wall Street Journal Next Big Thing list to receiving the 2016 Edison Award, which honors product innovation and excellence. Yet the honor we are proudest of is being named a Top Workplace by the Bay Area News group four years in a row, based solely on feedback from our employees.

Veracyte affords equal employment opportunities to all qualified persons, regardless of race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, disability, sexual orientation, gender expression, veteran or marital status. Veracyte participates in E-Verify in the United States",3.5,Veracyte,"South San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,12,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,CA,9022,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
632,632,Data Scientist,$107k-$173k,"Dataiku is allowing enterprises to create value with their data in a human-centered way while breaking down silos and encouraging collaboration. One of the most unique characteristics of our product, Data Science Studio (DSS), is the breadth of its scope and the fact that it caters both to technical and non-technical users. Through DSS, we aim to empower people through data and democratize data science.

We're looking for a Data Scientist to join Dataiku in our Denver office.

Dataiku’s promise to our customers is to provide them with the software and support needed to accelerate their Data Science and Machine Learning maturity. Dataiku’s Data Science team is responsible for delivering on that promise. Internally, we call the team the DataFab, ask us about it!

As a Data Scientist at Dataiku, you will have the opportunity to participate in our customer's journey, from supporting their discovery of the platform, it's installation and configuration, to training users and co-developing data science applications, from design to deployment. You will get hands-on experience coding in multiple languages and applying the latest big data technologies to business uses cases. Our ideal candidate is comfortable learning new languages, technologies, and modeling techniques while being able to explain their work to other data scientists and clients.
Responsibilities:
Co-develop data science projects with our customers
Crunch, analyze and investigate various kinds of data, across industries and use cases
Explore new machine learning algorithms, and apply them to real-world business applications
Deploy Machine Learning models to production, and develop its integration or front-end (e.g. a predictive webapp)
Help users discover the Dataiku platform and to master its use by providing trainings to users with a wide range of backgrounds and skill levels (data science, IT, analysts, managers, etc…)
Communicate results to non-technical colleagues and clients
Provide data science expertise to customers and internally to Dataiku’s sales, marketing, and R&D teams
Requirements:
Curiosity and a desire to learn new topics and skills
Empathy for others and an eagerness to share your knowledge and expertise with your colleagues, Dataiku’s customers, and the general public
2+ years of experience with R or Python
2+ years of experience with predictive modeling
Familiarity with data visualization in Python, R or JavaScript
Understanding of relational data structures and SQL
Bonus points:
Experience with PySpark, SparkR or Scala
Experience developing WebApps
Experience building APIs
Experience with cloud infrastructures, especially Kubernetes
Passion for teaching or public speaking
Benefits:
Exposure to a wide range of enterprise customers across industries. Examples of Dataiku’s hundreds of customers include GE, Unilever, Comcast, Ubisoft, OVH, Santander, and Capgemini.
A wide diversity of projects and tasks ensures that no two days will be alike
Opportunity to contribute to the core vision of our company and product: simplify and democratize the way people work with data and use Artificial Intelligence
Exposure to the latest, open source technologies that Dataiku integrates. See our release notes for our latest developments: https://doc.dataiku.com/dss/latest/release_notes/index.html
Competitive compensation package, equity, health benefits, and paid vacation
Trips to Paris (our European HQ) and other locations worldwide for company-wide and team summits
Opportunity to work with a smart, passionate and driven team in hypergrowth mode
Dataiku has a strong culture based on key values: Transparency, Ambition, Excellence, Humility, and Empathy
To fulfill its mission, Dataiku is growing fast! In 2019, we achieved unicorn status, went from 200 to 400 people and opened new offices across the globe. Spanning from Sydney to Frankfurt, Denver to London, geography doesn’t stop Dataikers from working closely together and sharing experiences. Collaboration is key within our product and culture. We strive to create a sense of belonging and community while fostering diverse thinking by encouraging cross-team, cross-office interactions like our annual company offsite or Paris onboarding. Fly over to Twitter, LinkedIn, and Instagram to read stories about our culture, people, and success.

Dataiku believes that a diverse identity is a source of strength and allows us to optimize across the many dimensions that are needed for our success. Therefore, we are proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All employment practices are based on business needs, without regard to race, ethnicity, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, religion, age, neurodiversity, disability status, citizenship, veteran status or any other aspect which makes an individual unique or protected by laws and regulations in the locations where we operate. This applies to all policies and procedures related to recruitment and hiring, compensation, benefits, performance, promotion and termination and all other conditions and terms of employment.",4.9,Dataiku,"Denver, CO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,7,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,CO,5067,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
633,633,Data Scientist,$107k-$173k,"JOB DESCRIPTION

AccruePartners values our contract and consulting employees. We offer a competitive benefits package to meet the diverse needs of all of our contractor and consulting employees and their family members. Here is a listing of what our company offers: 401(k) Medical, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, Employee Assistance Program, Medical and Prescription Drug, Short and Long-Term Disability Insurance.

THE TEAM YOU WILL BE JOINING:

Fortune 500 Company
World leader in commercial data and insight
Constantly expanding the size and improving the quality of their global database; currently exceeding 280 million businesses worldwide
Focus on valuable relationships allowing customers to succeed

WHAT THEY OFFER YOU:

Culture: Energetic, forward thinking individuals, passionate about compliance, risk assessment and management
Growth: Partake in a learning program with robust curriculum that will enhance the value you bring to your team and the company
Opportunity: Extensive international network with offices on five continents
Stability: A storied and commanding brand with almost two centuries of experience

WHERE THE POSITION IS LOCATED:

Reston, VA

THE BACKGROUND THAT FITS

Undergrad degree in a Risk related field (Accounting, Business, Economics, Finance, Math/Stat, Operations Research, etc.) with 1 to 3 years of applicable experience
Strong programming skills with the ability conduct research utilizing R, and Python to manipulate data and conduct statistical analysis
Strong SQL skills and experience
Ability to effectively communicate complex ideas to both a technical and non-technical audience
Willingness to travel to client locations as needed

Essential Responsibilities

Engage clients with the colleagues to identify their business needs and develop, implement, and manage solutions
Participate in all aspects of a modeling engagement, including design, development, validation, calibration, documentation, approval, implementation, monitoring, and reporting
Strong SAS programming skills with an ability to apply common procedures and data manipulations, write macro functions and learn new procedures when necessary

Preferred Qualifications

Experience implementing text analytic techniques (including NLP) to create structured fields from unstructured datasets
Experience working with very large datasets
Experience working with outside clients on statistical engagements
Experience with graph databases and visualizations
Experience applying modern machine learning techniques
Experience applying data and analytics for capital markets use-cases",2.6,AccruePartners,"Reston, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,18,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,VA,2591,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,1,0
637,637,Data Scientist (4960U,$107k-$173k,"At the University of California, Berkeley, we are committed to creating a community that fosters equity of experience and opportunity, and ensures that students, faculty, and staff of all backgrounds feel safe, welcome and included. Our culture of openness, freedom and belonging make it a special place for students, faculty and staff.

The University of California, Berkeley, is one of the world’s leading institutions of higher education, distinguished by its combination of internationally recognized academic and research excellence; the transformative opportunity it provides to a large and diverse student body; its public mission and commitment to equity and social justice; and its roots in the California experience, animated by such values as innovation, questioning the status quo, and respect for the environment and nature. Since its founding in 1868, Berkeley has fueled a perpetual renaissance, generating unparalleled intellectual, economic and social value in California, the United States and the world.

We are looking for equity-minded applicants who represent the full diversity of California and who demonstrate a sensitivity to and understanding of the diverse academic, socioeconomic, cultural, disability, gender identity, sexual orientation, and ethnic backgrounds present in our community. When you join the team at Berkeley, you can expect to be part of an inclusive, innovative and equity-focused community that approaches higher education as a matter of social justice that requires broad collaboration among faculty, staff, students and community partners. In deciding whether to apply for a position at Berkeley, you are strongly encouraged to consider whether your values align with our Guiding Values and Principles, our Principles of Community, and our Strategic Plan.
Application Review Date
The First Review Date for this job is: August 18, 2020
Departmental Overview
UC Berkeley Extension is the continuing education branch of the University of California, Berkeley. Extension offers more than 2,000 courses per year in a variety of subjects both online and in the classroom. Extension’s administrative departments and units include student records (transcripts), registration, scheduling, international student services, facilities, financial services, and the cashier’s office. In addition to the main Berkeley center, it has responsibility for the maintenance and operation of regional centers in San Francisco (Spear Street), and Belmont and other leased facilities in the San Francisco Bay Area.

UC Berkeley Extension administrators work to ensure that Extension is meeting the rapidly changing educational needs of our world, while maintaining the high academic standards consistent with the University of California, Berkeley.

The University of California, Berkeley, is accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges (WASC). UC Berkeley Extension—like all other UC Berkeley schools, colleges and departments—is accredited by WASC through the University.
Responsibilities
Consults with end users to identify data and reporting needs.
Creates queries and generates reports.
Develops, prepares and tests reports using different Data Visualization tool such as Tableau, Google Data Studio, and Excel, among other tools.
Performs comprehensive data analysis for business decision making. Implements MAchine Learning algorithms to help buisness decisions by achieving high accuracy forecasts.
Assists in identifying and resolving data and system errors and discrepancies.
Performs segments of quality assurance planning and testing.
Participates in end user training ensuring user competence, data access, and optimal performance of BI tools and processes.
Participates on cross-functional teams to address business intelligence processes and services.
Performs marketing research within different subjects to assess market demand, ideal price, competitor analysis.
Required Qualifications
Working knowledge of business intelligence functions and analytics.
Working knowledge of relevant internal databases, BI applications and tools.
Ability to produce reports and documentation.
Demonstrated analytical and problem-resolution skills.
Education/Training:
Bachelor's degree in related area and/or equivalent experience/training.
Preferred Qualifications
Detail oriented, with demonstrated organizational skills.
Demonstrated written and verbal communication skills with the ability to convey complex information in a clear, concise manner.
Demonstrated interpersonal skills for effective collaboration with professional and technical staff.
Ability to train staff at a variety of technical skill levels.
Knowledge of database design and management (SQL experience a plus).
Advanced proficiency with Python or R and working knowledge of both.
Experience with statistical software.
Experience applying data science methods – including machine learning, natural language processing, web scraping, or big data platforms
Salary & Benefits
This is an exempt, monthly paid position. Annual salary is commensurate with experience.

For information on the comprehensive benefits package offered by the University visit:

https://ucnet.universityofcalifornia.edu/compensation-and-benefits/index.html",4.1,University of California Berkeley,"Berkeley, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,338,College / University,other_industries,Education,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,CA,5246,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
639,639,Senior Data Engineer,$107k-$173k,"Who makes a great addition to our team:
Curious doers. We look for people who get sh*t done, but not at the risk of doing the wrong thing. We want people who ask questions, challenge, and engage in egoless debate to get to the right end goal.
Rigor, not ruthlessness. We look for people who enjoy working hard and pushing themselves and each other, but this works for us only as much as we are kind and supportive of one another.
Big picture leadership. We expect all of our teammates to be leaders and for them to step back and step forward at the right time for the harmony of the greater team and the big picture.

What we're looking for:
Strong educational background in Computer Science, Math or a related field
A minimum of five years experience working with data warehouses
A minimum of two years experience working with object oriented languages
A minimum of two years experience with schema design and dimensional data modeling
A minimum of of experience writing SQL statements

As a Senior Data Engineer you will tackle:
Managing the dtx data warehouse and data lake and own data quality for allocated areas of ownership, including defining and managing SLA for all data sets.
Partnering with the Data Science and Analytics team to investigate and implement advanced statistical models and machine learning pipelines.
Assisting client support and sales with client integrations.",4.7,the dtx company,"New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,NY,1388,1,data engineer,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
641,641,Senior Big Data Engineer,$107k-$173k,"Analytics
Senior Big Data Engineer - QuantumBlack

Chicago

Apply Now

Qualifications

Degree educated in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, or equivalent experience
Previous commercial experience in a data-driven role
Ability to write clean, maintainable, and robust code in Python, Scala, Java or similar languages
Knowledge of software engineering concepts and best practices
Familiarity with the latest OSS, cloud, container, query and database technologies as well as query languages
Confirmed experience building data pipelines in production and ability to work across structured, semi-structured and unstructured data
Experience preparing data for analytics and following a data science workflow
Commercial client-facing or senior stakeholders management experience

Who You'll Work With


You will be part of a global Data Engineering community and you will work in cross-functional and Agile project teams alongside Project Managers, Data Scientists, Machine Learning Engineers, other Data Engineers, and industry experts.

You will work hands in hands with our clients, from data owners and users to C-level executives.

Who you are

You are a highly collaborative individual and enjoy solving problems that focus on adding business value. You have a sense of ownership and enjoy hands-on technical work. Our values resonate with yours.

What You'll Do


As a Senior Data Engineer in Chicago, you will...
Partner with our clients, from data owners and users to C-level executives, to understand their needs and build impactful analytics solutions
Design and build data pipelines to support data science projects following software engineering best practices
Use state of the art technologies to acquire, ingest and transform big datasets
Own and have accountability for the delivery of technical work streams
Mentor and guide more junior colleagues
Map data fields to hypothesis, curate, wrangle and prepare data to be used in advanced analytics models
Create and manage data environments in the cloud or on premise
Ensure information security standards are maintained at all time
Contribute to cross-functional problem-solving sessions with your team and deliver presentations to colleagues and clients
Be flexible to travel to our clients' offices to deliver presentations, gather information or share knowledge
Have the opportunity to contribute to R&D and internal asset development projects
Our tech stack

While we advocate for using the right tech for the right task, we often leverage the following technologies: Python, PySpark, SQL, Airflow, Databricks, our own OSS called Kedro, container technologies such as Docker and Kubernetes, cloud solutions such as AWS, GCP or Azure, and more!

What you'll benefit from
Real-World Impact– No project is ever the same. We work with top-tier clients across multiple sectors, providing unique learning and development opportunities internationally.
Fusing Tech & Leadership– We work with the latest technologies and methodologies and offer first class learning programmes at all levels.
Multidisciplinary Teamwork- Our teams include data scientists, engineers, project managers, UX and visual designers who work collaboratively to enhance performance.
Innovative Work Culture– Creativity, insight and passion come from being balanced. We cultivate a modern work environment through an emphasis on wellness, insightful talks and training sessions.
Striving for Diversity– With colleagues from over 40 nationalities, we recognise the benefits of working with people from all walks of life.
Visit our Careers site to watch our video and read about our interview processes and benefits.

Industries
High Tech

Functions
Technology

Apply Now
FOR U.S. APPLICANTS: McKinsey & Company is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender
identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected Veteran
status, age, or any other characteristic protected by applicable law.

FOR NON-U.S. APPLICANTS: McKinsey & Company is an Equal Opportunity employer. For additional details
regarding our global EEO policy and diversity initiatives, please visit our
McKinsey Careers and
Diversity & Inclusion sites.",5.0,QuantumBlack,"Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,11,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,IL,4294,1,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
644,644,Engineering Team Lead - Data Engineering,$107k-$173k,"Squarespace is looking for experienced data engineering team leaders. As a member of our Data Engineering team, you’ll sit with a cross-functional team of software engineers, data scientists and business analysts, working closely with your team to turn complex sources into understandable data. The data sets, pipelines and tools that you build will be involved in pivotal, company-level decisions for years to come. Not only that, but you’ll work on a team where constant learning and team-wide knowledge sharing is a core part of our culture. You will report to our Engineering Manager, Data Engineering in our NYC Headquarters.

RESPONSIBILITIES
Build and maintain data processing services
Write, test, and review primarily microbatch or streaming ETL
Continuous improvement of our system, tests, and data quality indicators
Influence our technical decisions
Keep yourself informed and up-to-date with technologies
Encourage the technical growth of your teammates
Lead other engineers and collaborate with designers to provide strong customer-focused experiences
Have regular 1-1 with team members, and take an active role in code reviews for junior members
Mentor junior team members
QUALIFICATIONS
You love working directly with the people whose problems you're solving
You are deeply skilled at data modeling, storage, security, and retrieval
You're motivated and driven. You naturally take responsibility for a project and ask for help when needed
You enjoy working with dynamic programming languages, relational databases, and distributed systems. Our platform is ever-evolving, but currently is a combination of Python, Java, Postgres, Kubernetes, Spark, Presto, Kafka, and Mongo
You gain a deep understanding of the products and tools you work with
You check your work and stand behind what you’ve built
Experience managing a team of 3-5 engineers
5+ years of industry experience
ABOUT SQUARESPACE

Squarespace makes beautiful products to help people with creative ideas succeed. By blending elegant design and sophisticated engineering, we empower millions of people — from individuals and local artists to entrepreneurs shaping the world’s most iconic businesses — to share their stories with the world. Squarespace’s team of more than 1100 is headquartered in downtown New York City, with offices in Dublin and Portland. For more information, visit www.squarespace.com/about.

BENEFITS & PERKS
Health insurance with 100% premium covered for you and your dependent children
Flexible vacation & paid time off
Up to 20 weeks of paid family leave
Equity plan for all employees
Retirement benefits with employer match
Fertility and adoption benefits
Free lunch and snacks at all offices
Education reimbursement
Dog-friendly workplace in New York office
Commuter benefit in the form of reduced tax (Ireland) and pretax (US)
Today, more than a million people around the globe use Squarespace to share different perspectives and experiences with the world. Not only do we embrace and celebrate the diversity of our customer base, but we also strive for the same in our employees. At Squarespace, we are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender, gender identity or expression, or veteran status. We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",3.2,Squarespace,"New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,17,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,NY,3393,1,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
645,645,"Data Scientist, Senior",$107k-$173k,"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking a Data Scientist (Senior)) in the role of the Maritime Safety Office.This position is to provide both digital and hardcopy maritime products, services, and data to support worldwide Safety of Navigation. Without accurate and up-to-date nautical products, military platforms are at increased risk when they conduct operations, transport personnel and deliver material. The U.S. Navy has made it clear to NGA that it will continue to require both digital and hard copy maritime products for the foreseeable future. Services procured under this contract will primarily support the production and maintenance of Maritime GEOINT at NCE facilities.

Responsibilities include:
Strong data management skills, including SQL, NoSQL (MongoDB), and triplestore/graph
databases
Experience createing and managing ETL processes using Ni-Fi or similar software using both
structured and unstructured data
AWS experience, particularly with EC2, S3, Cloudwatch, RDS
Experience with data visualization tools
Experience with or working knowledge of ElasticSearch or similar
Perform ad-hoc analysis and present results in a clear manner
Conduct undirected research and frame open-ended industry / customer questions
Recommend cost-effective changes to existing procedures and strategies
Create / maintain tools to extract features from a variety of sources including raster to vector,
vector to vector, text to vector, and text to database.
Write / maintain Python Scripts in ARCGIS to improve efficiency of the production process.
Support Business Processing Re-Engineering
Perform Data Conversion/migration
Perform Business Analytics
Work with the Government on new production capabilities / services
Strong data management skills, including SQL, NoSQL (MongoDB), and RDF
(triplestore/graph) databases
Linux experience
Basic Qualifications:
Strong data management skills, including SQL, NoSQL (MongoDB), and triplestore/graph databases
Experience createing and managing ETL processes using Ni-Fi or similar software using both structured and
unstructured data
AWS experience, particularly with EC2, S3, Cloudwatch, RDS
Experience with data visualization tools
Experience with or working knowledge of ElasticSearch or similar
Perform ad-hoc analysis and present results in a clear manner
Desired Skills:
Experience with combining digital cartography, computer technology, GIS, cartographic and geospatial
production techniques, remote sensing, photogrammetry, and digital data formats.
Ability to clean / prune data to discard irrelevant information
Ability to examine data from a variety of angles to determine hidden value, weaknesses, trends, and / or
opportunities
Advanced knowledge of ESRI ArcGIS and ArcServer.

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.


Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality, and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.


Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,Novetta,"Fort Belvoir, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,8,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,VA,4486,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
646,646,Data Scientist,$107k-$173k,"Open to locations in: San Francisco CA, Louisville CO, U.S. Remote, Braga Portugal

At Kelvin our mission is to create autonomous industrial systems that deliver a safe and sustainable world. Our products focus on how to create, build, and manage advanced automation applications. We care about building applications that are secure, safe and hardware agnostic, using industry leading standards. In short, Kelvin enables control and automation systems to learn and evolve. With our team being distributed around the world with offices in California, Colorado, Australia, and Portugal, we are empathetic to changing operational environments and challenges.

As a Data Scientist at Kelvin you will enable our customers to develop, test, and deploy machine learning applications at scale to drive efficiency and contextualize data in their operations. You will collaborate with multidisciplinary teams of control engineers and subject matter experts to scope, build and deploy applications. You will play a significant role in defining the application strategy, acting as a focal point for both customers and internal teams through the planning, development, orchestration, and configuration stages of Kelvin solutions.

Job Responsibilities
Define the scope of machine learning applications across industrial and manufacturing settings
Identify constraints and risks to potential solutions by working with subject matter experts and control engineers
Build applications that solve real world problems by implementing different modeling approaches and techniques
Deploy and manage applications in remote production environments
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy
Shape data science strategy, solution definition, & internal/ external application roadmaps
Capture user stories and business requirements as product requirements and work with engineering leadership to translate into prioritized engineering requirements
Work with Sales and Marketing to define the target market and enable commercial teams
Qualifications

Required:
Bachelors degree in a STEM field or equivalent practical experience; PhD or Master of Science preferred
3+ years’ experience in applying machine learning techniques to real-world problems
Strong programming skills in python or other object oriented programming with a deep understanding of agile methodologies and best practices
Comfortable working with source version-control systems, APIs and command-line interfaces
Excellent verbal and written communication and presentation skills
Strong problem-solving skills and the ability to simplify complex constraints
Time-management and prioritization – you are comfortable simultaneously working across many projects, both collaboratively across diverse teams (including customer-facing and internal teams) and self-starting initiatives
Demonstrated intellectual curiosity and self-driven learning
NICE TO HAVE:
Experience collaborating with a globally distributed development team
Knowledge & understanding of an industrial area of focus
Benefits

Kelvin believes in putting its employees first. We offer a generous compensation package that includes medical, dental, vision, FSA, unlimited PTO, and 401(k) benefits with a match.

Opportunity Employer

Kelvin is deeply committed to building a diverse and inclusive team. We believe that different backgrounds and life experiences make our team better. We do not discriminate against qualified employees or applicants because of race, color, religion, gender identity, sex, sexual preference, sexual identity, pregnancy, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, marital status, physical disability, mental disability, medical condition, military status, or any other characteristic protected by local law or ordinance.",3.3,Kelvin Inc,Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,7,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,Remote,3800,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
647,647,Data Scientist - Global Business Operations,$107k-$173k,"Are you innately curious, passionate about building impactful analyses and a truth seeker using data? Splunk is looking for an Data Scientist to join its dynamic Global Business Operations (GBO) team to boost Spunk’s fast growing business. The GBO team ensures data driven decision-making throughout the company. As a member of the team, you'll be detail-oriented and conscientious, analytical and curious. You're a strong problem-solver, who uses both quantitative and qualitative methods to get things done. And most importantly, you are an individual who wonders ""What if?"" and are relentless in seeking out the solution.

You will play an important role in how we “bring data to everything” with your expertise and passion to help address the data and analytical needs of teams and the business across the globe. Your knowledge of data, along with deep business context, will enable you to provide actionable analysis to ensure our GBO organization and Business Leaders are well-informed and able to make thoughtful, data backed decisions.

Location: San Jose, CA


Responsibilities: I want to and can do that
You will work with cross functional teams to optimize Splunk’s operations practices according to your findings
You will apply operations research and statistic methods to solve challenges related to scaling Splunk operations
You will work with the finance team on multiple efforts, including
Scenario Modeling Tool
Bottoms up revenue forecast model
Analytics Portal, daily automation of income statement
Market testing analysis & methodology
Work with large and complex data sets. Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed. Conduct analysis that includes requirements specification, data collection, processing, analysis, ongoing deliverables, and presentations
Build and prototype analysis pipelines iteratively to provide insights at scale
Interact cross-functionally, making business recommendations (e.g., cost-benefit, forecasting, experiment analysis) with effective presentations of findings at multiple levels of partners through visual displays of quantitative information.
Requirements: I’ve already done that or have that!
This role is for doers; be able to get into the details and get the job done while at the same time being able to see the forest for the trees
Articulate with excellent verbal and written communication skills. Capable of communicating complex information in an easy to understand format. Able to interact comfortably with the cross functional leadership
Ability to think creatively; Builder who is ambitious. Highest standards of accuracy and precision; highly organized.
Collaboratively-focused and able to work well with others in a fast-paced and ever changing business.
NetSuite, Workday, Anaplan, SAP, Salesforce experience a plus.
Experience owning complex projects involving multiple teams
Experience with stats software (e.g., R, Python) and database languages (e.g., SQL)
Education: Got it!
Master's degree in a quantitative field (e.g., Stats, Operations Research, Bioinformatics, Economics, Computational Biology, Computer Science, Mathematics, Physics) or equivalent practical experience.
6 years of relevant work experience, including experience applying advanced analytics to operations and finance
Excellent problem-framing, problem-solving and project management skills.
We value diversity at our company. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or any other applicable legally protected characteristics in the location in which the candidate is applying. For job positions in San Francisco, CA, and other locations where required, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.",4.1,Splunk,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,17,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,CA,3864,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
648,648,Principal Data Engineer,$107k-$173k,"Our Technology team is the backbone of our company: constantly creating, testing, learning and iterating to better meet the needs of our customers. If you thrive in a fast-paced, ideas-led environment, you’re in the right place.

Why this job’s a big deal?

Enjoy working with big data? We do too! In fact, data lies at the very core of our business! As a data engineer you will be working on data systems that serve and generate billions of events each day. With the most advanced big data technologies at your fingertips, you will leverage data to understand, meet, and anticipate the needs of our customers.

In this role you will get to:
Work with state-of-the-art data frameworks and technologies like Kubernetes, Kafka, Terraform, Dataflow, Cloud Dataproc, and others.
You will work cross-functionally with various teams, creating solutions that deal with large volumes of data.
You will work with the team to set and maintain standards and development practices.
You will be a keen advocate of quality and continuous improvement.
You will modernize the current data systems to develop Cloud enabled Data and Analytics solutions
Drive the development of cloud-based data lake and hybrid data warehouses & business intelligence platforms
Improve upon the data ingestion models, ETL jobs, and alarming to maintain data integrity and data availability.
Build Data Pipelines to ingest structured and Unstructured Data.
Gain hands-on experience with new data platforms and programming languages
Analyze and provide data supported recommendations to improve product performance and customer acquisition.
Design, Build and Support resilient production grade applications and web services
Who you are:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Engineering/Computer Science or equivalent
10+ years of work experience in Software Engineering and development
Experienced with Data transformation, ETL and Data Analytics using Cloud Native technologies
Strong experience with the big data technologies like Hadoop, Spark, Hive, Presto
Experience working with large, disconnected and/or unstructured datasets
Subject matter expertise building and optimizing data pipelines , architectures and data sets using Cloud native technologies
Strong experience with Containers, Kubernetes, Docker
Proven expertise with throughput batch processing and/or streaming systems (Kafka, Spark)
Strong experience with Relational SQL and NoSQL databases
Experience designing, building and maintaining RESTful APIs
Experienced in code / design reviews and familiar with Git, Jenkins, common CI/CD tools
Meticulous with strategies such as indexing, machine-learned rankings, clustering and distributed concepts
Demonstrated history of living the values important to priceline: Customer, Innovation, Team, Accountability and Trust. Unquestionable integrity and ethics.
Who we are:

WE ARE PRICELINE.

Our success as one of the biggest players in online travel is all thanks to our incredible, dedicated team of talented employees. Priceliners are focused on being the best travel deal makers in the world, fueled by our passion to help everyone experience the moments that matter most in their lives. Whether it’s a dream vacation, your cousin’s graduation, or your best friend’s wedding - we make travel affordable and accessible to our customers.

Our culture is unique and inspiring (that’s what our employees tell us). We’re a grown-up, startup. We deliver the excitement of a new venture, without the struggles and chaos that can come with a business that hasn’t stabilized.

We’re on the cutting edge of innovative technologies. We keep the customer at the center of all that we do. Our ability to meet their needs relies on the strength of a workforce as diverse as the customers we serve. We bring together employees from all walks of life and we are proud to provide the kind of inclusive environment that stimulates innovation, creativity and collaboration.

If you want to be part of something truly special, check us out!

Priceline is part of the Booking Holdings, Inc. (Nasdaq: BKNG) family of companies. Our sister companies include Booking, BookingGo, Agoda, Kayak and OpenTable.

Priceline ensures equal employment opportunity to all employees and applicants without discrimination or harassment based on race, religious creed, color, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, religion, marital status, medical condition, disability, military service, pregnancy, childbirth and related medical conditions, or any other classification protected by federal, state, or local law.

We're excited that you are interested in a career with us. For all current employees, please use the internal portal to find jobs and apply.

External candidates are required to have an account before applying. When you click Apply, returning candidates can log in or new candidates can quickly create an account to save/view applications.",3.5,Priceline.com,"Norwalk, CT",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,23,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,CT,4917,1,data engineer,0,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
650,650,Senior Data Engineer,$107k-$173k,"Job Description


Here at Discount Tire, we celebrate the spirit of our people with extraordinary pride and enthusiasm. As America’s largest independent tire retailer, specializing in tires & wheels, we have over 1,000 store locations and continue to grow every year. Our consistent growth over the last 60 years, the loyalty of our customers and passion of our people makes Discount Tire a great place to work.

We recognize that to remain the industry leader we must continue to grow and evolve our business in a rapidly changing industry. We are achieving this, not only by opening new stores, but by transforming our technological landscape and making data a central component of our strategy. The Business Analytics team, one of the fastest growing teams in the company, is leading this change. We are responsible for driving the insights, recommendations, and developing the decision support tools that influence the strategic direction of the company.

Responsible for the design, build and implementation of cloud-based analytics platform which includes an MPP Enterprise Data Warehouse and other Big Data technologies.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Designs and develops high performance distributed data warehouse, distributed analytic systems and cloud architecture
Develops, launches and maintains efficient and fault tolerant, batch and streaming, data pipelines (ETL/ELT) to populate databases and object stores from multiple disparate data sources
Performs complex data calculations through data integration tools and scripting languages
Designs and implements data quality metrics, standards, guidelines; automates data quality checks / routines as part of data processing frameworks; validates flow of information
Determines Data Warehousing and Big Data infrastructure needs, including but not limited to, automation of system builds, security requirements, performance requirements and logging/monitoring in collaboration with DevOps engineers
Troubleshoots complex data and performance related issues; implements adjustments, documents root cause and corrective measure; transfers knowledge to operations support team
Documents technical specifications and participates with peers in design and code review sessions
Develops complex cross application architectures in collaboration with cross functional teams
Stays current on the latest industry technologies, trends and strategies
Assists employees, vendors or other customers by answering questions related to Data Warehousing and Big Data processes, procedures and services
Completes work in a timely and accurate manner while providing exceptional customer service
Other duties as assigned

Job Requirements


Qualifications:
This position requires a minimum of eight years of progressive database development and integration experience.
Proven understanding of logical and physical data modeling is imperative.
Ability to translate a logical data model into a relational or non-relational solution is necessary.
Understanding of multiple relational (RDMS) and non-relational (NoSQL) data platforms is needed.
Expert level SQL experience is required.
Scripting knowledge with SQL, Python, Java or R is necessary. Proven experience in SQL tuning, indexing, partitioning, data access patterns and scaling strategies is needed.
Proven experience with data integrations and data processing for business intelligence and analytics workloads is required.
Experience with AWS S3 or other distributed object stores, AWS Redshift, Elastic MapReduce a plus.
Hands-on experience in database development using views, SQL scripts and transformations is needed.
Proficient with Microsoft office, including skills with Word and Excel, is necessary.
Experience working with large complex data sets.
Understanding of Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) methodologies such as Agile and Waterfall is needed. Proven analytical problem solving and decision-making skills is critical.
Demonstrated ability to communicate across all levels of the organization is necessary; must be able to clearly articulate technical ideas to a non-technical audience both verbally and in writing.
Ability to work independently and in a team is vital.
Customer service skills including the ability to manage and respond to different customer situations while maintaining a positive and friendly attitude is essential.
The ability to multi-task and manage multiple projects to meet various deadlines simultaneously is required.
The ability to work efficiently and accurately under pressure, meet deadlines and present a professional demeanor is essential.
In addition, troubleshooting and organizational skills with a can-do attitude and the ability to adjust to changing requirements are essential.
Educational Requirements:

This position requires a Bachelors Degree in Computer Science, Computer Information Systems or related or equivalent experience. Data or cloud related certifications are a plus.

Work Days:

Normal work days are Monday through Friday. Occasional Saturdays and Sundays may be necessary.

Work Hours:

Normal work hours are 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. Additional hours may be necessary.

Apply
Not ready to",4.0,Discount Tire,"Scottsdale, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,60,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,AZ,5174,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
651,651,Data Scientist,$107k-$173k,"At CCRi, our clients look to us to solve their hardest problems, and we have a long history of exceeding their expectations. With clients in both the private sector and the US government, we provide a variety of advanced analytical techniques, and we render our solutions in software that our clients can apply immediately.

We are currently not expecting openings until after August 2020.

The Role

You'll help create machine learning analytics that will be integrated into streaming data processing pipelines and appealing user interfaces that provide real-time situational awareness and expose advanced analytics to end users. As a data scientist, your technical responsibilities will include design, research, and development. You will also be expected to contribute to the data science culture and ecosystem at CCRi through opportunities like design reviews and shared learning opportunities.

Who You Are
Curious: You enjoy peeling apart a problem and examining the interrelationships between data and how they can be used to form a solution.
Creative: You try new approaches to solving problems, looking for ways to apply techniques across domains and in new contexts.
Practical: You explore theories with an eye to their real world applications and their potential for improving performance for clients.
Collaborative: You work well on a team and can explain your work to your peers and source ideas and improvements from them.
Determined: You enjoy the challenge of finding solutions to difficult problems, testing them to discover what is successful and what should be optimized further, to develop industry-leading tools. You learn from failure and trying again.
Organized: You know how to keep track of both high-level goals and the tasks required to meet those goals. You take personal ownership of your team’s success.
Our Data Scientists have some combination of the following skills:
Understanding of structure and theory of common machine learning models
Familiarity with common machine learning libraries for implementation (sklearn, weka, tensorflow, torch, …)
Proficiency in one or more of: Python, Scala, Java, R, Julia, Matlab
Ability to understand and implement new models from the literature
Experience with distributed analytics and processing (Spark, Hadoop, …)
Experience with geospatial data and analytics
Requirements
US citizenship required
We DO NOT offer sponsorships or contracting work. This position is for Charlottesville only.
Prior Work experience in a related field and/or a working portfolio that clearly demonstrates your abilities
Benefits

The Company:

CCRi is a small engineering firm located in Charlottesville, Virginia. We develop and deploy novel machine-learning approaches to real problems at massive scale. Since 1992, we’ve been stopping bombs, predicting piracy, and guiding disaster relief.
Intellectually Challenging Work
Health Insurance
Short Term Disability Insurance
Generous Defined Benefit Retirement
Very Flexible Vacation Policy
Want to know more? Check out our recruitment video and blog.

The job description above is not intended to be comprehensive list. Responsibilities, activities, duties, and/or tasks may change or be assigned at any time.

CCRi is committed to a diverse and inclusive workforce because we know that our differences benefit our employees, our customers, and our community. We are proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, status as a an individual with a disability, status as a protected veteran, or any other applicable legally protected characteristics.",4.5,CCRi,"Charlottesville, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,31,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,140.0,VA,3703,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,0
652,652,Data Scientist,$149k-$234k,"About ConcertAI

ConcertAI is the leading provider of precision oncology solutions for biopharma and healthcare, leveraging the largest collection of research-grade Real-world Data and the only broadly deployed oncology-specific AI solutions. Our mission is to improve translational sciences; accelerate therapeutic clinical development; and provide new capabilities for post-approval studies to accelerate needed new medical innovations to patients and to improve patient outcomes.
ConcertAI has emerged as one of the highest growth technology companies in Real-world Data and AI, backed by industry leading private equity companies: SymphonyAI, Declaration Partners, Maverick Ventures, and Alliance|Bernstein.

Role Summary

As a Data Scientist at ConcertAI you will be responsible for data exploration, analysis, and predictive/descriptive modeling on patient data for various stakeholders in the oncology and healthcare domain. You will report to the Vice President of Data Products. You should have a good mix of programming/CS, visualization, stats/math, and ML skills (with a particular strength in at least 2 of those areas), and ideally, you have been applying those skills in in healthcare. You will design methods and models around client driven needs and you will collaborate with various subject matter experts to inform those methods. You will assist the client delivery team with insights, dashboards, and ad-hoc analytics. You will also work with the engineering team to build prototypes and models for new product development.
Responsibilities
Understand client / product needs and translate them into tactical R&D initiatives with defined goals and timelines.
Reason about healthcare specific problems to analyze visualize, interpret, and contextualize results.
Run a variety of analytics from data QA to complex models.
Understand the differences and tradeoffs between various ML/Stats techniques and be able to select them appropriately, and apply them in a meaningful way.
Implement models using high level software packages (SKlearn, R, TensorFlow, Spark).
Collaborate on software projects with engineers, providing analytical guidance and contributing to codebase.
Requirements
B.sc or higher in a STEM field, with formal training in CS, stats, and math.
Strong programming abilities in at least one high level language (python, stata, R).
Knowledge of statistical methods- regression, ANOVA, EDA, PCA, etc.
Knowledge of machine learning methods- un/supervised, non/parametric, ensemble.
Basic visualization skills- matplotlib/seaborn/plotly/etc, tableau.
Experience with big data – Cloud data warehouses, cluster computing, Spark, MapReduce/Hadoop.
Intimate familiarity with the python data science stack (pandas, sklearn, numpy/scipy, pyspark).
Knowledge of advanced computational techniques and AI: neural networks, bayesian networks, mixture models, NLP, stochastic. optimization, HMMs, MCMC, search, NLP, image processing.
Advanced visualization skills- interactive custom visualizations in d3.js, plotly, etc.
Learn More About ConcertAI

ConcertAI is transforming how healthcare is delivered and dedicated to improving patient outcomes in oncology by offering innovative solutions on how data and intelligence is used to solve healthcare problems. We are creating something special in our culture, by building a collaborative, engaged, patient focused, team approach to our mission. Our high-performance teams are looking to add great talent to the mix and we are hiring for the right mix of new skills and diverse mindset. Learn more about ConcertAI at www.concertai.com or on LinkedIn .",3.8,ConcertAI,"New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,NY,3617,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,0
653,653,Senior Data Scientist - Experimentation Platform,$149k-$234k,"Data influences all of the decisions we make at Tinder. As a senior data scientist working on Tinder’s Experimentation Platform, you will help conceive novel ideas, manage experience rollouts and interpret experimentation results. You will have tons of responsibility, freedom, and opportunity to have a direct and immediate impact on exploring new ideas to drive user satisfaction and company growth. You will help Tinder to evolve relentlessly through rapid iterations on product features, revenue, user growth and advanced matching algorithms. We would love to talk to you if you are interested in helping Tinder users achieve stronger matches, engage more effectively, and create more love, at a truly global scale.
In this Data Science role, you will:
Help and guide all three stages of experimentation: ideation, experience delivery and results interpretation
Support and improve existing experimentation analytics pipelines and systems in production
Design and develop new data pipelines and streaming processes that are highly available, scalable, and reliable for our KPI anomaly and alert system
Partner with engineering, analytics, and product stakeholders to define experimentation standards, guidelines and best practices

We're looking for:

BS/MS in Mathematics, Statistics or related technical discipline
5+ years experience working on and maintaining large scale analytics systems
5+ years programming experience in SQL or SQL like query language
Experience with NoSQL or RDBMS platforms - DynamoDB, Redis, or Postgres
Bonus points for exposure to scala, spark and AWS
As part of our team, you’ll enjoy:

· The hustle of a startup with the impact of a global business
· Tremendous opportunity to seek some of the industry’s most exciting problems
· Working with an outstanding team of creative, fun and highly motivated people
· Comprehensive health coverage, competitive salary, and 401(k) match

At Tinder, we don’t just accept difference — we celebrate it, we support it, and we thrive on it for the benefit of our employees, our products, and our community. Tinder is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",3.9,Tinder,"San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,8,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,CA,2132,1,data scientist,0,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
654,654,Data Scientist,$149k-$234k,"Data Scientists at VISIMO work as Subject Matter Experts, in collaborative teams and directly with our clients. When you join VISIMO as a Data Scientist, you are joining a firm that will challenge you and invest in your professional development. In this role you will work withthe best and brightest people to help organizations – in private, public, and social sectors – solve their most complex problems. You will also work with corss-functional experts, from data scientists and researchers to software and app designers.
Typical teams consist of 1-3 members, playing an active role in all aspects of the client engagement. You will collaborate with the Vice President of Partnerships and Strategy as well as our Grants and Contracts Manager as we pursue potential public sector engagements. You will also lead technical aspects of our projects with our Vice President of Data Science and Software Design.
Qualifications
Expertise/Experience in Computer Science, Artificial Intelligence, or Machine Learning is preferred
Masters Degree in relevant field with published research work is required, PhD is preferred
Ability to obtain a United States secret level security clearance as per the guidelines by the State Department is required (https://www.state.gov/security-clearances)
Experience coding in Python is preferred
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Computer Science, Machine Learning, or AI: 2 years (Preferred)
Python: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Master's (Required)
Location:
Coraopolis, PA 15108 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
Are you able to obtain a Secret Security Clearance as defined by the State Department?
Security Clearance Required:
Secret (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.visimo.ai
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",5.0,VISIMO,"Coraopolis, PA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,5,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,PA,2171,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
655,655,Data Scientist,$149k-$234k,"Role: Data Scientist.
Location: Foster City, CA
Hire Type: 12 Months Contract

Job Description:
Advanced degree in Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, or similar.
Extensive experience as a Data Scientist.
Proficiency in R or Python, where the former is preferred.
In-depth understanding of SQL.
Competent in machine learning principles and techniques.
Demonstrable history of devising and overseeing data-centered projects.
Ability to relay insights in layman's terms, such that these can be used to inform business decisions.
Outstanding supervision and mentorship abilities.
Capacity to foster a healthy, stimulating work environment that frequently harnesses teamwork.",4.2,Centraprise,"Foster City, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,CA,679,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
657,657,Data Scientist,$149k-$234k,"Do you love developing creative solutions to challenging problems?

Are you passionate about providing real impact to the countrys toughest national security problems?

Are you searching for engaging work with an employer that prioritizes continual innovation?

If so, we are looking for someone like you to join our team at APL.

The Large-Scale Analytics Group (QAS) develops software systems that incorporate artificial intelligence (AI) and machine learning (ML) algorithms on big data platforms and graph databases as well as visual analytics to find details hidden deep within large and complex data sets. We support multiple agencies within the US Government by applying innovative analytics to uncover activities such as epidemic hotspots, illegal activities, international trade fraud, illicit manufacturing of weapons of mass destruction, and cyber-crime. You will implement and apply computationally tractable solutions and corresponding data architectures to address the needs of our sponsors. We are seeking a confident leader, creative thinker, motivated problem solver, standout colleague, and life-long learner that wants to strengthen the safety and security of our country. You will join a hardworking team in an inclusive environment that cultivates intellectual curiosity, innovation and creativity.

As a Data Scientist you will...
Primarily design creative AI and ML algorithms as well as analytic pipelines for analyzing large-scale and complex data.
Develop data architectures using technologies like Hadoop, Spark, and distributed graphs to support analytic algorithms.
Build software applications and perform analytics on complex data.
Clearly present results to both JHU/APL and Sponsor leadership.
Potentially travel locally to sponsor sites on an occasional basis.
You meet our minimum qualifications for this position if you
Possess a B.S. in Computer Science, Information Science, Mathematics, Physics, Operations Research, or a related discipline. 1-5 years of experience.
Have experience with statistics, machine learning algorithms, or general algorithm development.
Have a knowledge of modern large-scale data systems and architectures.
Possess solid software development skills.
Exhibit excellent social skills, the ability to work independently, excellent written and oral communications skills, and good organizational skills.
Are able to obtain a Secret level clearance. If selected, you will be subject to a government security clearance investigation and meet the requirements for access to classified information. Eligibility requirements include U.S. citizenship.
Youll go above and beyond our minimum requirements if you
Have a M.S. or Ph.D. in the disciplines listed above, and have working knowledge of state-of-the-art large-scale data approaches and architectures. e.g. experience with quantum algorithms.
Are experienced with software engineering processes and techniques.
Why Work at APL?

The Johns Hopkins University Applied Physics Laboratory (APL) brings world-class expertise to our nations most critical defense, security, space and science challenges. While we are dedicated to solving complex challenges and pioneering new technologies, what makes us truly outstanding is our culture. We offer a vibrant, welcoming atmosphere where you can bring your authentic self to work, continue to grow, and build strong connections with inspiring teammates.

At APL, we celebrate our differences and encourage creativity and bold, new ideas. Our employees enjoy generous benefits, including a robust education assistance program, unparalleled retirement contributions, and a healthy work/life balance. APLs campus is located in the Baltimore-Washington metro area. Learn more about our career opportunities at www.jhuapl.edu/careers.",4.6,Johns Hopkins University Applied Physics Laboratory,"Laurel, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,78,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,MD,3781,0,data scientist,0,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
658,658,Data Scientist,$149k-$234k,"Thomas is looking for a Data Scientist to help build a world-class data team that will support and guide Thomas’ business strategy and operations. The right candidate will be a problem solver who is obsessive about all things data, and is enthusiastic about working with cutting-edge techniques, technologies and applications.

The Thomas Data Analytics team uses data-driven insights to fuel strategic growth for clients. You will apply your knowledge and skills in driving insights across our product platforms to come up with data powered solutions for our clients. We believe that our data should be put to work to bring the best ideas and stories to our clients!

You’ll solve complex marketing and business challenges – from cross-channel media and customer experience optimization, targeting and business strategy – by accessing, integrating, manipulating, mining, modeling a wide array of data sources.

This is an opportunity to work with a newly assembled team of data analysts, engineers and architects to establish best practices and processes as we transition to a data-focused organization, and will involve working with petabyte-scale data across a diverse set of data platforms. A key goal in the near future is creation of a data lake across our industry platforms to facilitate deeper analysis and bring sophisticated data tools and methods to bear in order to more effectively anticipate industry trends and events.

Requirements:


Technical
Bachelor’s or Master’s Degree preferably in Computer Science, Information Systems, Statistical Analysis or Economics
Familiarity with statistical analysis/modeling, data science and/or data design and development of actionable advanced analytical solutions that provide insights to decision makers
Hands-on experience mining data for decision focused insights
Ability to design complex systems and translate user requirements into business solutions
Background in predictive modeling and machine learning
2 years of experience with open source machine learning or statistical analysis tools
Experienced in at least one programming language (Java, Python, Scala, R)
Guru level experience with query tools and languages including SQL
Experience with NoSQL databases and related tools
Experience with Amazon AWS big data and machine learning technologies a plus (RedShift, Sagemaker, Comprehend etc.)
Non-technical
Strong communication skills – oral and written
Ability to guide and lead a data analytics team of 5 – collaborate with both technical and non-technical colleagues in product management and executive leadership groups
Ability to gauge the complexity of machine learning problems and a willingness to execute simple approaches for quick effective solutions as appropriate
Sharing knowledge, debating techniques, and conducting research to advance collective knowledge and skills of our practices
Demonstrated self-starter who thrives in a fast paced environment",3.4,Thomas,"New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,122,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,NY,2933,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
660,660,Data Scientist,$149k-$234k,"Our Opportunity:

Chewy's Supply Chain Team is seeking a Data Scientist to join the growing Supply Chain Analytics team in Dania Beach, FL. Combining a background in Supply Chain with a deep understanding of analytics and data science, you will be a part of a team responsible for strategic planning and research initiatives centered around our inventory and fulfillment network. This includes optimizing the way that we predict customer demand; and purchase, position, transport, store and ship inventory to our customers. The Supply Chain team operates in a fast-paced environment where every day brings new challenges and new opportunities. You will be responsible for designing and implementing solutions and technologies which will handle the growing business needs and play a key role in redefining what it means to be a world-class Operations Research organization.

What You'll Do:
Deep dive big Supply Chain data to explain change, find hidden opportunity, and provide recommendations
Predict, simulate and optimize Supply Chain operations
Partner with Supply Chain's functional areas (with Demand Planning, S&OP, Transportation, and Supply Planning) to develop to optimize our Supply Chain across the board
Work with IT and Data Warehousing teams to develop and enhance systems
Be a subject matter expert for Supply Chain Analytics
Implement process improvement initiatives that drive improvements to the metrics and streamline the Supply Chain
What You'll Need:
An advanced degree (M.S., PhD, or equivalent experience) in Operations Research, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Engineering, Computer Science or related field or 5+ years' experience designing optimization and machine learning solutions for large scale applications
Ability to understand and apply advanced mathematics
R or Python mastery
Experience working with Predictive Models (Time Series and Regression), Linear Programming, and Classification
Ability to translate complex data sets and research into simple business recommendations
Ability to manage multiple projects
Ability to use collaborative programming tools (Git, Confluence, etc.), and assist and support junior colleague's use of those tools
Position may require travel
Bonus
Strong leadership skills and outgoing
Ability to effectively operate both independently and as part of a team
E-com, Retail or startup experience is a plus
If you have a disability under the Americans with Disabilities Act or similar law, or you require a religious accommodation, and you wish to discuss potential accommodations related to applying for employment at our company, please contact HR@Chewy.com.

To access Chewy's Privacy Policy, which contains information regarding information collected from job applicants and how we use it, please click here: Chewy Privacy Policy (https://www.chewy.com/app/content/privacy).",2.9,Chewy,"Fort Lauderdale, FL",-1,10000+ Employees,9,Company - Public,other_industries,Retail,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,FL,2844,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
661,661,Data Scientist,$149k-$234k,"As a Data Scientist, you’ll work directly with our customers to solve challenging problems at the intersection of materials science and machine learning.

About Citrine

At Citrine, we’re changing the way new materials are developed.

We are the industry leader in materials informatics, the application of data-driven methods to materials and chemicals development. Our platform provides data management and AI tools that help our customers rapidly develop better, more sustainable materials. Our users are scientists and engineers at huge manufacturing and materials companies, and researchers at leading universities and government labs. Our platform enables our users to accelerate the development of new materials.

In 2020 Citrine was recognized for technology innovation by the Global CleanTech Group and was named one of the most promising AI startups by CB Insights. As a team, we are ambitious with our goals, passionate about our vision, and eager to grow and learn from each other. Our team is growing fast and looking for the best to join us.

Though our technology was originally built by materials scientists, our team now consists of professionals trained in a diverse set of fields, including data science, physics, biology, and computer science. We have offices in the San Francisco Bay Area, Chicago, and Pittsburgh, and our customers include Fortune 1000 materials and product companies.

About the Role
Citrine is building the future of data and AI in the materials industry; as a member of the Data Science team, you will play a core role in developing that future and implementing it with our customers. As a Data Scientist, you’ll work directly with our customers to solve challenging problems at the intersection of materials science and machine learning. We provide outstanding data science training and support to our customers to help them understand how to use Citrine tools and how to integrate machine learning into their workflows. We are involved in the data science pipeline end-to-end: scoping out deliverables with the customer, prototyping solutions in code, working with Citrine’s product and engineering teams to develop platform solutions, and working with the customer to put the solution into practice.
Responsibilities
Applying Citrine's machine learning framework to solve problems in materials science, chemistry, and manufacturing.
Frequent and empathetic communication with customers to provide unparalleled, domain-aware data science support.
Providing technical training to empower customers to use the platform effectively and integrate data-driven decision-making into their workflows.
Partnering with Citrine's machine learning team to prototype and build algorithmic capabilities to meet customer needs and push the envelope on how machine learning can provide value to materials scientists and engineers.
Engaging with Citrine’s product and engineering teams, bringing a unique perspective from direct customer interactions and deep technical expertise to inform the development of platform solutions to meet market needs.
Engaging with the academic community by writing papers, giving seminars, and leading workshops to grow the Citrine user community.
Skills and Qualifications
Degree in materials science, chemistry, physics, or a related field
Strong programming skills (Python preferred)
Experience or coursework in machine learning and/or statistics
Demonstrated ability to work autonomously to scope out new projects, prioritize, manage time effectively, and execute to aggressive deadlines
Enthusiasm to own projects end-to-end: from data clean-up to model refinement to delivery to the customer
Exceptional communication skills
Preferred Skills and Qualifications
Knowledge of uncertainty quantification methods (Bayesian methods, confidence intervals, probabilistic graphical models)
Experience applying machine learning to real use cases
Teaching experience
Experience in the materials and chemicals industry
Equal Opportunity

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, creed, color, or national origin.

Our Benefits (for exempt, full time employees based within the United States)

401k with matching up to 4% of salary
Medical, vision, dental insurance (we pay 100% of your premium and 75% of your dependents)
Equity options within the company
Parental leave
Flexible PTO on top of our 14 paid company holidays (includes your birthday!)
Free financial counseling
$250 tech allowance",4.6,Citrine Informatics,"Redwood City, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,6,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,CA,4499,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
662,662,Data Scientist,$149k-$234k,"JOB DESCRIPTION

AccruePartners values our contract and consulting employees. We offer a competitive benefits package to meet the diverse needs of all of our contractor and consulting employees and their family members. Here is a listing of what our company offers: 401(k) Medical, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, Employee Assistance Program, Medical and Prescription Drug, Short and Long-Term Disability Insurance.

THE TEAM YOU WILL BE JOINING:

Fortune 500 Company
World leader in commercial data and insight
Constantly expanding the size and improving the quality of their global database; currently exceeding 280 million businesses worldwide
Focus on valuable relationships allowing customers to succeed

WHAT THEY OFFER YOU:

Culture: Energetic, forward thinking individuals, passionate about compliance, risk assessment and management
Growth: Partake in a learning program with robust curriculum that will enhance the value you bring to your team and the company
Opportunity: Extensive international network with offices on five continents
Stability: A storied and commanding brand with almost two centuries of experience

WHERE THE POSITION IS LOCATED:

Reston, VA

THE BACKGROUND THAT FITS

Undergrad degree in a Risk related field (Accounting, Business, Economics, Finance, Math/Stat, Operations Research, etc.) with 1 to 3 years of applicable experience
Strong programming skills with the ability conduct research utilizing R, and Python to manipulate data and conduct statistical analysis
Strong SQL skills and experience
Ability to effectively communicate complex ideas to both a technical and non-technical audience
Willingness to travel to client locations as needed

Essential Responsibilities

Engage clients with the colleagues to identify their business needs and develop, implement, and manage solutions
Participate in all aspects of a modeling engagement, including design, development, validation, calibration, documentation, approval, implementation, monitoring, and reporting
Strong SAS programming skills with an ability to apply common procedures and data manipulations, write macro functions and learn new procedures when necessary

Preferred Qualifications

Experience implementing text analytic techniques (including NLP) to create structured fields from unstructured datasets
Experience working with very large datasets
Experience working with outside clients on statistical engagements
Experience with graph databases and visualizations
Experience applying modern machine learning techniques
Experience applying data and analytics for capital markets use-cases",2.6,AccruePartners,"Reston, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,18,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,VA,2591,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,1,0
663,663,Data Scientist,$149k-$234k,"Department


Quality
Location


San Diego, CA
Job Type


Full Time
ID #


1234642
Apply
Cue Health Inc. is seeking a Full-time Data Scientist who will work closely with the Leading Data Scientist to understand business objectives and participate to data science processes that can be used to achieve business goals. The Data Scientist will acquire and preprocess data, perform ad hoc analyses and modeling processes, assist creating algorithms and predictive models to achieve business objectives, then help analyze the data, collaborate and share insights with peers.

Responsibilities:
data science methods and techniques, such as machine learning, statistical modeling, and data mining techniques
Ensure data quality throughout all stages of data acquisition, processing and visualization, including data collection, cleaning, normalization, transformation, integration and storage
Uses statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies to identify trends in large data sets
Make adjustments based on feedback
Present final results to stakeholders
Responsible for assisting the data science team and performing functional duties under the supervision of the leading data scientist
Additional duties as assigned
Requirements:
Bachelor of Science Degree or higher in computer science, physics, mathematics, engineering, statistics or other related STEM discipline with strong analytical and computing skills
1-3 years of hands on experience building, deploying and evaluating ML techniques and advanced analytics (e.g., regression, classification, clustering, time series)
Minimum of 1 year of highly developed skills in Python and relational and non-relational databases (e.g., SQL, MongoDB)
Strong ETL, statistical and data visualization skills
Knowledge of Shell programming (Bash) on Mac/Linux OS
Knowledge and experience using software version control systems (e.g., Git)
Experience working in a team environment and ability to communicate results in an efficient and timely manner
Hands-on experience with cloud computing technologies such as AWS or GCP is a plus
Physical Requirements:
Remaining in a stationary position, often standing or sitting for prolonged period of time
Adjusting things with precision
Adjusting, moving or lifting objects up to 25 pounds
Repeating motions that may include the wrists, hands and/or fingers
As part of Cue, you will:


Work closely with the Leading Data Scientist to understand business objectives and participate to data science processes that can be used to achieve business goals
Where you’ll work


You will work in a modern open office located in Sorrento Valley in San Diego, CA, with a lot of natural light. As an early employee your contribution will set the pace and have an impact in Cue’s future. Your work and ideas will be valued and respected, and we hope you will find enjoyment working with a great team on such an innovative device.
Perks within Cue culture
Unlimited snacks
Competitive salary
Stock options
Robust Health/Dental/Vision benefits, including optional HSA",4.2,Cue,"San Diego, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,10,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,CA,3037,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
664,664,Data Scientist,$149k-$234k,"Social Sentinel is looking for a Data Scientist responsible for creating, maintaining, and deploying the advanced analytics and statistical models vital to the success of our proprietary products. The Data Scientist will be an integral member of the Product Team, responsible for propagating our data-driven culture and continually improving the intelligence and autonomy of our product suite.

The Data Science team is small, values open discussion and curiosity while encouraging people to challenge the status quo. Thus, a commitment to collaborative problem solving, product quality, and adaptability is essential.

Responsibilities:
Properly apply advanced statistical and predictive modeling techniques in order to continually improve the product offering
Develop innovative approaches to extract insights and advance product intelligence
Collaborate with the greater Data Science team to design effective work plans
Design, build, and maintain efficient, reusable, and reliable statistical code
Communicate results and insights with the greater Data Science team as well as the company as a whole
Process, cleanse, and verify the integrity of data used for analysis and modeling
Analyze internal and external data sources to help determine which are relevant and useful additions to the product suite
Proactively mine and analyze data in order to find meaningful signals
Delegate tasks to Data Science Interns, when applicable
Speak to completed projects across a wide range of audiences
Adapt to new technologies and situations
Skills:
Understanding of a wide range of statistical models (classification, regression, and clustering)
Expertise in SQL-based query languages
Proven ability to write clean, readable, and reproducible code
Organization and version control (e.g., Github)
Experience creating and maintaining complex networks desired
Experience with Natural Language Processing (NLP) desired
Experience with infrastructure tools, including working closely with computer engineers
Amazon Web Services experience preferred (EC2, S3, Athena, SageMaker)
What You Will Bring to the Team:
Advanced Degree in Mathematics, Statistics or related field
2+ years of Data Science or Analytical experience
Proficient coding ability in statistical language(s) of your choice (e.g., R, Python, SAS)
Strong oral and written communication skills
Ability to quickly learn new technologies
Ability to work well with a team-oriented environment
Strong work ethic and impeccable attention to detail
About Social Sentinel: Social Sentinel protects people where they learn, work and gather with help from data scientists, linguists, and software engineers who develop our scalable AI-powered Language Engine. This technology searches for digital signals indicating threats to people and communities. We have a talented, experienced, and dedicated staff who are committed to this mission and to making the amazing technology that enables it.

Qualified individuals should apply by submitting a cover letter and resume. You also will need to provide 3 references upon request.

In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.

Social Sentinel, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",4.8,Social Sentinel,"Burlington, VT",-1,1 to 50 Employees,4,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,VT,3348,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
665,665,Data Scientist,$149k-$234k,"Thanks to our 15+ million users -- and our network of schools and learning applications -- Clever is a hub of rich, complex data. We use this data every day to help inform product and business decisions, but we know we could be doing so much more. We're looking to you as our first data science hire to join the data team and set the strategy for taking our analytics to the next level. You'll discover actionable insights that directly benefit our customers. This is a hands-on role that will work cross-functionally with stakeholders across the organization to have exceptional impact on our business.

You will:
Create a compelling vision and strategy for how we will use data as we continue to grow
Teach and mentor others around best practices, and help to foster our data-informed culture at Clever
Proactively conduct quantitative research and analysis of Clever's data that results in actionable insights and recommendations
Partner with product managers, engineers, and marketers to translate business insights into decisions and action
You should have:
Minimum 5+ years experience in data science and business analytics with a deep understanding of how data can be used to propel a business forward
Expert in SQL and proficient in programming (R, Python, etc)
Experience using data visualization tools (Tableau, Looker, Chartio, etc)
Ability to communicate clearly and effectively to cross functional partners of varying technical levels
Knowledge of statistics and experimental design
A desire to work in a diverse, highly collaborative team environment
Clever Perks:


A competitive salary and equity package in a well-funded, high-growth company
Unlimited Paid Time Off
Top-notch healthcare, vision, and dental coverage for you and your family
Best-in-class mental healthcare service that supports employees' mental and emotional wellness
Unlimited credits for learning on amazon.com and small, local bookstores
Annual company retreat and quarterly team events
An incredible team of fun, bright coworkers",4.6,Clever,Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,8,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,Remote,2017,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
667,667,Data Scientist,$149k-$234k,"Â

Data Scientist

NYC NY

Long Term

Â

Key responsibilities:

As a Senior Data Scientist, you will be required to:

Â Use machine learning and financial quantitative modeling to generate insights for alternative data sets like geo special, text etc.

Â Design and build model execution pipeline with model validation, model monitoring, model scoring, model decay and retraining

Â Help design and construct the data processing and analytics infrastructure necessary to perform advanced analytical research within a global enterprise.

Â Create original insights from data by executing applied empirical research in a timely manner.

Â

Key Requirements:

Â A PhD, or Masters with equivalent work experience, with a solid background in machine learning, statistical analytical techniques, quantitative social science research or experimental physical science.

Â Knowledge of financial modelling, factor investing, risk modelling (CFA / FRM certification is a plus)

Â Advanced Knowledge of Python, Scala and Java

Â 3+ years of profession experience and discipline in building Machine Learning models

Â 3+ years of experience in Statistics and Data Science techniques like exploratory analysis, feature engineering and ML techniques like clustering, regressions, classifications etc.

Â Experience with machine learning packages such as zipline, pyfolio, fbprophet, pysf, pyFlux, pyramid, TensorFlow, PyTorch, Keras, Scikit-Learn, NumPy, SciPy, Pandas, StatsModels, Spark ML

Â Experience in Machine Learning techniques like hyper parameter tuning, model validation, model serving, model monitoring, retraining etc. (Machine Learning pipeline)

Â Experience with machine learning lifecycle tools (i.e. mlflow, kubeflow)

Â Excellent written and spoken English, with ability to work collaboratively and communicate well within a highly skilled team, with a wide range of backgrounds and skillsets.

Â Innovative mindset-thinks beyond the status

Â

Preferred Skills/Experience:

Â Relevant hands on work with unclean, semi-structured or unstructured data sets

Â Experience working in teams of analysts, data engineers, statisticians, and data scientists

Â Experience in analytics (a.k.a. decision sciences) in the financial industry;

Â Proficient analytical and math background

Â Demonstrated success in performing within a functional organizational environment

Â Innovative mindset-thinks beyond the status quo

Â Knowledge of BERT, AllenNLP, Spark, Hadoop, H20 and/or cloud computing

Â

Â

Â",4.7,Unicom Technologies INC,"New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,NY,2501,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,1,0,1
668,668,Marketing Analytics Data Scientist,$149k-$234k,"Tinder brings people together. With tens of millions of users and a presence in every country on earth, our reach is expansive and rapidly growing. Tinder’s Analytics Team is looking for a Data Scientist with expertise in Marketing.

The Marketing Analytics team takes ownership of the decisions being made from our data – we develop a deep understanding of both the business and its data and establish close working relationships with all teams - starting with Marketing but also including Product, Engineering, and Finance – so that we can provide recommendations and make proposals regarding prioritization of initiatives, product launches, A/B tests, and company performance.

As a Data Scientist in this role, you will be a partner to the Marketing team, you will be :
Interpreting data and analyzing results using statistical techniques,
Developing and implementing data analyses, data collection systems and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality
Acquiring data from primary or secondary data sources and maintaining databases

Additionally, you’ll be providing support for A/B test design and analysis as well as data-driven insights through ad-hoc analyses, presentations, and automated reports and dashboards. This role will require experience with SQL, data wrangling, statistics, and A/B testing as well as the ability to work in cross-functional teams to drive actionable insights. Experience with user growth and acquisition across consumer products is a plus.
Key Roles and Responsibilities:
Find the “story” in the data and communicate insights and opportunities with executive and other internal teams
Master and own the analytical understanding of customer behavior and business performance
Analyze models to better understand the value and churn behavior of our users
Perform ongoing ad-hoc analyses to evaluate the efficiency of our marketing spend, building reporting infrastructure, and assisting in making budgeting recommendations to optimize growth
Integrate captured event data with other sources of customer data, such as surveys, ad publishers and app store data
Support reporting and business intelligence needs of the entire Marketing team.

Skills Required:

2+ years of relevant experience
Ability to think objectively and interpret meaningful themes from quantitative and qualitative data
Ability to build constructive and effective relationships with a broad and diverse group of business partners
Ability to execute on complex analytics projects where you have to determine salient questions in a complex ecosystem and present action-oriented conclusions
Proficiency with SQL requiredScripting skills, preferably in Python.
Strong Python/NumPy/PANDAS skills a plusKnowledge of statistics, specifically experimental design and analysis
Proficiency in Microsoft Excel and Microsoft PowerPointFamiliarity with common marketing KPIs, metrics, and growth experiments
As part of our team, you’ll enjoy:

· The hustle of a startup with the impact of a global business
· Tremendous opportunity to seek some of the industry’s most exciting problems
· Working with an outstanding team of creative, fun and highly motivated people
· Comprehensive health coverage, competitive salary, and 401(k) match

At Tinder, we don’t just accept difference — we celebrate it, we support it, and we thrive on it for the benefit of our employees, our products, and our community. Tinder is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",3.9,Tinder,"Los Angeles, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,8,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,CA,3470,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
669,669,Data Scientist - Seller Risk,$149k-$234k,"Who we are


Fueled by a fundamental belief that having access to financial services creates opportunity, PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL) is committed to democratizing financial services and empowering people and businesses to join and thrive in the global economy. Our open digital payments platform gives PayPal’s 305 million active account holders the confidence to connect and transact in new and powerful ways, whether they are online, on a mobile device, in an app, or in person. Through a combination of technological innovation and strategic partnerships, PayPal creates better ways to manage and move money, and offers choice and flexibility when sending payments, paying or getting paid. Available in more than 200 markets around the world, the PayPal platform, including Braintree, Venmo and Xoom, enables consumers and merchants to receive money in more than 100 currencies, withdraw funds in 56 currencies and hold balances in their PayPal accounts in 25 currencies.

When applying for a job you are required to create an account, if you have already created an account - click Sign In.

Creating an account will allow you to follow the progress of your applications. Our system does have some requirements that will help us process your application, below are some guidelines for creation of your account:
Provide full legal First Name/Family Name – this is important for us to ensure our future hires have the right system set up.
Please Capitalize first letter of your First and Last Name.
Please avoid using fully capitalized text for your First and/or Last Name.
NOTE: If your name is hyphenated or has multiple capitalization, please use the same format as your government ID.
Job Description Summary:

About the Role
As an data scientist, you will apply your strategic and analytical skills to major company challenges. You will team with world-class professionals to identify actionable insights that ultimately impact the bottom line. We work in a space that looks deeply into emerging fraud trends and the business enablement opportunities that help the business in fuelling growth and strategic decisions.

You will be able do it all in a collaborative environment that values your insight, encourages you to take on new responsibility, promotes continuous learning, and rewards innovation with a global team that is multi-disciplinary with broad spectrum of industry experiences, deep analytical and quantitative expertise.

The ideal candidates are problem solvers, equipped with strong analytical skills suited to approach varied challenges in complex environments. Adept at creative and critical thinking, they are able to deconstruct the problem and transform personal insights into large scale, state-of-the-art solutions.

Job Description:

Your Day-to-day Will Involve
Using data and analytics to understand how business decisions impact our bottom line. This may include assessing risks of new products, determining fraud policies
Ensuring the team is delivering on our KPIs by using various data mining and data visualization tools to monitor portfolio performance and identify improvement opportunities
Work closely with business partners and stakeholders to determine how to design analysis and measurement approaches that will significantly improve our ability to understand and address emerging business issues
Bringing data to life and making it actionable and relevant to stakeholders through exploratory analysis of internal and external data sources using advanced and innovative analytical techniques, algorithms, and tools
Creating new solutions rooted in empathy and research that assist all customers as they work to better manage their finances.
Collaborating in a team environment. As part of our crew, you will learn to energetically rally diverse groups in pursuit of a common goal.
Providing regular updates to leadership, peers and other stakeholders that will simplify and clarify complex concepts and the results of analyses effectively with emphasis on the actionable outcomes and impact to business
The Ideal CandidateIs
Innovative & Curious - You have the desire and ability to connect and empathize with our customers. You have an entrepreneurial spirit and get excited about creating new businesses and reinventing current ones. You ask why, explore, and bring your unique perspective to the table.
Analytical & Action-Oriented - You are data driven and outcome focused. You grow comfortable with ambiguity, fueled by a hunger to learn and constantly seeking out new challenges. You have a desire to take action, try new things, and sometimes fail. You persevere but know when to change course and are up for juggling multiple deliverables.
Collaborative & Team-Oriented - You always keep the people around you in the loop and are excited to communicate complex ideas clearly to make sure your co-workers understand the “why” behind their work and their key priorities.
Inclusive - You will empathize with those around you and care about their success, as you bring people together around what’s possible.
Required Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree in a quantitative discipline (Economics, Engineering, Computer Science, Math, Statistics, etc. )
At least 4 years’ experience in analytics or management consulting
Proficiency using SQL and querying relational databases
Experience in at least one statistical programming language (SAS, R, Python)
Experience in at least one data visualization tool (Tableau, Qlikview)
Experience with project management
Preferred Skills:
Strong communication skills
Quick learning
Out-of-box Problem Solving
Subsidiary:

PayPal

Travel Percent:

0

Primary Location:

San Jose, California, United States of America

Additional Locations:

We're a purpose-driven company whose beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We hold ourselves to our One Team Behaviors which demand that we hold the highest ethical standards, to empower an open and diverse workplace, and strive to treat everyone who is touched by our business with dignity and respect. Our employees challenge the status quo, ask questions, and find solutions. We want to break down barriers to financial empowerment. Join us as we change the way the world defines financial freedom.

PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at paypalglobaltalentacquisition@paypal.com.",3.9,PayPal,"San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,22,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,CA,6947,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
670,670,eCom Senior Data Scientist,$149k-$234k,"Auto req ID: 216454BR
Job Description


PepsiCo operates in an environment undergoing immense and rapid change, driven by eCommerce and emergent retail technologies. To ensure continued success in the food and beverage space, PepsiCo has assembled a dedicated eCommerce team – tasked with optimizing eCommerce operations and developing innovations that will give PepsiCo a sustainable competitive advantage. While tied closely to broader PepsiCo, the eCommerce group more closely resembles a start-up environment; embracing the core values of having bias for action, being results oriented, maintaining a community-focus, and prioritizing people.

PepsiCo’s Data Science and Analytics group is a team of data scientists, technology specialists, and business innovators who operate within eCommerce to build industry-leading systems and solutions. By focusing on machine learning and automation, the Data Science & Analytics group is pushing the bounds of possibility for PepsiCo and its strategic partners.

What PepsiCo Data Science & Analytics does:
Build machine learning systems to understand the cross-channel grocery ecosystem
Perform statistical analysis across diverse datasets to drive and measure performance
Work with PepsiCo’s strategic partners to expand their technical capabilities, thereby creating a more robust data environment
Utilize natural language understanding techniques to uncover insights from contextual data
Develop scalable tools to drive automation and optimize business operations
As a Senior Data Scientist, you will play a critical role in executing the global ecommerce growth agenda. You will be tasked with identifying, designing, and implementing data science/machine learning solutions to business problems. You will collaborate with the larger data science and analytics teams to create a robust, shared codebase; on which PepsiCo will build automated eCommerce systems. You will work with internal business stakeholders and strategic partners to identify opportunities for collaborative development and foster a data-driven culture between relevant teams.

Responsibilities:
Work with the larger data science team to analyze large data sets and develop custom models/algorithms to uncover trends, patterns and insights
Write clean, organized machine learning code using standard software engineering methodologies
Provide critical thought leadership to enhance organizational capabilities by utilizing big and small data; work with DSA team members to identify and execute on opportunities for enhancement
Qualifications/Requirements


Qualifications:
Master’s Degree in Data Science or equivalent experience
Advanced experience in developing cloud-native docerized Python applications
Experience and familiarity with NumPy, Pandas, Pytorch, and Snowflake
Comfort in lower-level API's in an accelerated linear algebra framework that supports automatic differentiation with expansive experience in regularization.
Experience using Tensorflow to design custom deep learning systems
Expert in mathematical models underlying data science methods, understanding the trade-offs between different solutions
Experience in designing systems to solve business problems
Demonstrated ability to effectively and concisely communicate with both business and technical audiences
Relocation Eligible: Not Applicable
Job Type: Regular

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, or disability status.

PepsiCo is an Equal Opportunity Employer: Female / Minority / Disability / Protected Veteran / Sexual Orientation / Gender Identity

Our Company will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, and all other applicable laws, including but not limited to, San Francisco Police Code Sections 4901 - 4919, commonly referred to as the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance; and Chapter XVII, Article 9 of the Los Angeles Municipal Code, commonly referred to as the Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance.

If you'd like more information about your EEO rights as an applicant under the law, please download the available EEO is the Law & EEO is the Law Supplement documents. View PepsiCo EEO Policy

Please view our Pay Transparency Statement",3.7,PepsiCo,"New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,55,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,NY,4420,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,1
671,671,Data Scientist,$149k-$234k,"Albertsons Companies is one of the largest food and drug retailers with 2,300+ stores. The Albertsons Companies family of brands includes some of the most prominent brands in food retailing, with a growing base of loyal shoppers. Thanks to the professionalism, diversity, spirit, and friendliness of our people, we have locations across the U.S.

The Data Science team at Albertsons Companies is looking for an experienced Data Scientist to work for the most transformational food and drug retailers in the United States. Albertsons operates over 2,300 stores under 19 well-known banners including Albertsons, Safeway, Vons, Jewel-Osco, Shaw's, Acme, Tom Thumb, Randalls, United Supermarkets, Pavilions, Star Market, Haggen and Carrs. The company reported revenue of over $60 billion from over 34 million weekly shoppers and is the third largest private company in the country.

Data Science at Albertsons is inspired to build best in class customer experience and revolutionize the food and drug retail industry. We are looking for people who are excited in re-imagining the grocery experience by harnessing the power of AI and digital technologies. The Data Science team collect and rely on big data from existing stores and customer interactions at the 2300 nationwide stores and beyond. We are a highly driven team that apply data science to delight our customers, to improve store operations, to optimize supply chain and to proactively improve product lifecycle.

You will enjoy working with one of the richest data sets in the world, cutting edge technology, and the ability to see your insights turned into business impacts on regular basis. You will work closely with other data scientists and business partners in identifying and defining data science projects, building machine learning algorithms and models on top of existing data platforms. The candidate will have a background in computer science or a related technical field with experiences working with large data sets and applying data-driven decision making. A successful candidate will be both technically strong and business savvy, with a passion to make an impact through creative storytelling and timely actions. You are a self-starter, smart yet humble, with a bias for action.

Key Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:
* Collaborate with business teams to develop production grade machine learning models on large-scale datasets and improve customers' overall shopping experience
Enhance and apply customer lifetime value models to support various business decision making
Generate sentiment analysis based on surveys and customer feedbacks in order to deliver lovable customer experiences
Identify key drivers for customer satisfaction and opportunities to delight customers through mining complex data
Apply machine learning to enhance recommendation engines and deliver personalized user experience on ecommerce website and loyalty mobile app
Build models and algorithms to fuel growth initiatives for Digital, Merchandising, Marketing and Loyalty teams
Apply predictive modeling techniques to optimize the forecasts for planning needs
Scale up prototypes and implement reliable automated production workflow for models
Collaborate with software development engineers to integrate models
Qualifications:
Masters or PhD degree in quantitative discipline: Computer Science, Engineering, Data Science, Math, Statistics or related fields
2+ years of industry experience in applying data science and modeling methodologies: regression model, survival model, ensemble modeling, NLP, recommendation algorithm, clustering, deep learning algorithm, experimental design (Multivariate/A-B testing) and nonparametric Bayesian modeling etc.
2+ years of experience and proficiency in SQL, Python and/or Spark-ML
2+ years of SQL development skills writing queries, transforming data, mining structured and unstructured data.
2+ years of hands-on experience in building data science solutions and production-ready systems on big data platforms such as Snowflake, Spark, Hadoop
Strong teamwork and communication skill
Ability to write production-level code in Python
Experience with Snowflake, Azure Databricks is a strong plus
How to Apply: Interested candidates are encouraged to submit a resume by visiting https://www.albertsonscompanies.com/careers.html

Diversity is fundamental at Albertsons Companies. We foster an inclusive working environment where the different strengths and perspectives of each employee is both recognized and valued. We believe that building successful relationships with our customers and our communities is only possible through the diversity of our people. A diverse workforce leads to better teamwork and creative thinking, as well as mutual understanding and respect.

AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER",3.3,Albertsons Companies,"Pleasanton, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,81,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,CA,4809,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,1,0,1
677,677,Data Scientist,$149k-$234k,"This is Us:
We have a bold vision to connect 25 million vehicles by 2025.
Our customers come first. We lead through innovation. We win as one. We act with integrity.
We adhere to our brand promise – to make the complex simple, the future predictable, and our customers successful.
With nearly 4 million connected vehicles today, Spireon is an exciting player in the growing Connected Car and Internet of Things (IoT) technology categories. We help people and businesses track and protect their most important assets with vehicle intelligence solutions that gather Big Data and provide the critical insights with easy-to-use dashboards and apps.

This is You:

We are looking for a Data Scientist -Machine Learning Engineer to design and build Convolutional Neural Networks for Smart Sensors. Spireon develops computer vision based smart sensors to detect environment and reports for the transportation sector. As a Machine Learning Engineer, you will implement CNN algorithms to run on smart sensors.. You must be able to work across multiple teams to ensure project objectives are met.

Responsibilities:
Design and develop algorithms for challenging vision classification and detections problems
Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis
Implementation of Computer Vision and ML algorithms
Collect data and analyze real world data
Deploy ML systems (inference at the edge), monitor metrics
Prototyping ML algorithms
Collaborate with Product Management and Engineering departments to understand company needs and devise possible solutions
Keep up to date with latest technology trends
Communicate results and ideas to key decision makers
Requirements:
Must have solid foundation general machine learning systems
Must have experience in Convolutional Neural Networks Classification, Object Detection, Segmentation.
Must have experience in Computer vision, image processing.
Must have Programming / scripting experience with languages such as Python
Must have experience working with machine learning frameworks and libraries (TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch, scikit-learn)
Highly Desired: Programming language experience with C / C++
Highly Desired: Experience with Embedded systems
Highly Desired: Experience with OpenCV
Experience working with AWS Sagemaker
Experience working with AWS S3
Rewards:
Winner of 2019, 2018 IoT Innovator Awards & 2017, 2018 Stevie Award for Customer Excellence
Work with the Best and Brightest Technical Talent
Stable, High Growth and Profitable Company
Comprehensive Benefits (Medical, Dental, Vision, 401K Plan)
Wellness, Professional Development and Spireon University
Virtual Happy Hours, Team Building Events, Hackathons
Employee Discounts on Spireon Products and Services",3.5,Spireon,"Irvine, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,18,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,CA,2728,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
678,678,Lead Data Scientist,$149k-$234k,"Position: Lead Data Scientist

Location: Cincinnati, OH

Full-time, exempt

Join the PatientPoint Business Intelligence & Data Science team in our new Kenwood Cincinnati headquarters office space. Work for a growing entrepreneurial organization where you can apply your critical thinking skills and your ideas and suggestions are valued. Be a part of a team that implements emerging technology and applies the latest quantitative methods to solve complex problems.

What you will be doing

Far beyond just executing analysis, this key role collaborates, designs and creates statistical models and case study designs that fundamentally change the way we do business. See your greatest works appear in downstream dashboards, mission critical predictive models and processes that are based on successful machine learning.

Work on a team with data engineers that will build data ingestion & transformation processes to support your industry leading data science applications in predictive modeling and machine learning deployments. Design, create and deploy analytics solutions leveraging billions of log records from digital interactive touchscreen devices.

This position offers you a great opportunity to help build out an entire data science roadmap with the flexibility and the responsibility to develop accurate and reliable data products. This person plays an important role in selecting statistical methodologies and therefore must have a passion for staying current on the newest developments in the data science space.

As a data scientist, you will apply your critical thinking skills to understand and, sometimes, reframe high level business questions, prototype new ideas, run experiments, and iterate to better design data driven solutions to business problems. On other projects you might create advanced data queries and scripts for creating useful model features - including leveraging data from multiple external APIs.

There are opportunities to lead client-facing presentations, communication, and overall project ownership. Moreover, there are opportunities for data science thought leadership to lead the data science strategy and execution for large programs.

Plus, there will be minimal travel, we have a new office space, you will have career growth opportunities, you will get interesting projects and can enjoy free coffee!

What you need to be successful

A college degree and several years of work experience. Your experience should include direct hands-on work using analytics to establish and change business policy. MS degree preferred in applied statistics, computer science or engineering.

You must have strong statistical modeling skills. The ideal candidate will have advanced knowledge of machine learning and predictive modeling techniques. You will be asked to provide an example from your experience leading predictive modeling initiatives. You will need these and other skills to mine large amounts of data and perform data analysis to extract actionable insights for a wide range of topics including internal operations, product development, campaign performance, market dynamics, etc.

This position requires that you have mastery and experience with statistical programming in R and Python. You must be very proficient with Python including Pandas, NumPy and Scikit-learn. In R, you must be comfortable with the tidyverse (dplyr and ggplot2) but also specific libraries for training linear and non-linear models, survival analysis, time series forecasting, etc.

Mastery of SQL programming and relational data extract. Data definition, transformation and preaggregation techniques helpful.

Ability to break down complex business and technical problems into opportunities for analytical study. Particularly, you should have experience with and know when to apply regression analysis, A/B testing, power analysis, anomaly detection, model validation and selection, building of ensemble models, network analysis, simulation, conducting inferential analysis with spatial and time series data, nearest neighbor, deep learning methods, etc.

Experience with data visualization tools (ex: Microsoft PowerBI)

Excellent verbal, written, and presentation skills demonstrating an ability to ""tell a story"", listening and persuasion.

Experience with storage and retrieval of data in NoSQL databases helpful.

Visa sponsorship is not available for this position.

Kudos if you have:

Working knowledge of graph databases.

Experience with Microsoft SQL Server Integration Services (SSIS 2012 and higher).

Experience with geospatial analysis.

Experience with reporting using SalesForce Wave or Einstein Analytics

This is an excellent opportunity and includes a competitive pay and benefits package, including health, dental, vision, disability, and life insurance as well as 401(k) retirement plan with matching company contribution, paid time off, and holidays. No relocation is available.

PatientPoint® is a patient engagement solutions company passionately committed to making every doctor-patient engagement better. By harnessing the power of technology, our omnichannel platform more effectively educates and empowers patients, caregivers and staff to deliver improved health outcomes and an enhanced patient experience. For 30 years, hospitals, health systems, physician offices and sponsoring brands have trusted PatientPoint and its more than 450 team members to provide a uniquely integrated experience across care settings. Learn more at patientpoint.com.

Employer is EOE/M/F/D/V",3.8,PatientPoint,"Cincinnati, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,33,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,OH,5526,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
679,679,Data Scientist 1,$149k-$234k,"Who we are


Fueled by a fundamental belief that having access to financial services creates opportunity, PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL) is committed to democratizing financial services and empowering people and businesses to join and thrive in the global economy. Our open digital payments platform gives PayPal’s 305 million active account holders the confidence to connect and transact in new and powerful ways, whether they are online, on a mobile device, in an app, or in person. Through a combination of technological innovation and strategic partnerships, PayPal creates better ways to manage and move money, and offers choice and flexibility when sending payments, paying or getting paid. Available in more than 200 markets around the world, the PayPal platform, including Braintree, Venmo and Xoom, enables consumers and merchants to receive money in more than 100 currencies, withdraw funds in 56 currencies and hold balances in their PayPal accounts in 25 currencies.

When applying for a job you are required to create an account, if you have already created an account - click Sign In.

Creating an account will allow you to follow the progress of your applications. Our system does have some requirements that will help us process your application, below are some guidelines for creation of your account:
Provide full legal First Name/Family Name – this is important for us to ensure our future hires have the right system set up.
Please Capitalize first letter of your First and Last Name.
Please avoid using fully capitalized text for your First and/or Last Name.
NOTE: If your name is hyphenated or has multiple capitalization, please use the same format as your government ID.
Job Description Summary:

PayPal's Global Fraud Risk team is responsible for partnering with global business units to manage a variety of risk types including identity fraud, account takeover, stolen financial fraud, and credit issues. This is an exciting department where the contributions by the team members can really help PayPal's bottom line and create experiences that our customers love. This particular opportunity is within the PayPal Global Fraud Risk BI team who develops advanced models and drive next level insights and strategies about PayPal users and translate them into actionable processes designed for large scale risk assessment/decision for various PayPal products.

Responsibilities include:
• Design, develop and manage real-time end-to-end buyer risk decisioning strategies while balancing customer experience, risks and rewards
• Apply advanced statistical techniques and algorithms on complex dataset to build deep learning models on prediction and management for fraud risk associated with PayPal products and accounts
• Mine data covering a wide range of information from user profile to transaction history details for various problems inclusive of classification, clustering, pattern analysis, sampling, simulations
• In addition to existing AI deep learning models, build an additional on top layer of framework to produce best Financial scenarios and results for Business Growth balancing business enablement vs. risk mitigation efforts
• For each decisioning strategy project, design its best structure and select the most appropriate techniques which may include a combination of several approaches
• Conduct on-going strategy performance analytics and communicate strategy design and result to senior management
• Work with product managers and engineering team in deploying risk decisioning strategies, designing new product capabilities, enhancing systems
• Carry out independent research and innovation in new content, ML and technological domains. Trouble shooting any data, system and flow challenge while maintaining flawless strategy execution

Job Description:

Requirements include:
BA/BS/MA/MS degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Operations Research, Economics or related quantitative discipline
Strong code writing skills in key programming language (Python, R, Java, etc.) as well as data manipulation domain and familiarity with relevant ML Packages
Hadoop data experience (PIG, Hive, Spark)
Proven experience in employing mathematical, statistical, data mining and machine learning algorithms on real world problems
Must be an intuitive, organized analytical thinker, with the ability to perform detailed analysis
Strong written, oral, and interpersonal skills a must, including the ability to explain and/or present analyses
Must have good business judgment with demonstrated ability to think creatively and strategically
Subsidiary:

PayPal

Travel Percent:

0

Primary Location:

San Jose, California, United States of America

Additional Locations:

We're a purpose-driven company whose beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We hold ourselves to our One Team Behaviors which demand that we hold the highest ethical standards, to empower an open and diverse workplace, and strive to treat everyone who is touched by our business with dignity and respect. Our employees challenge the status quo, ask questions, and find solutions. We want to break down barriers to financial empowerment. Join us as we change the way the world defines financial freedom.

PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at paypalglobaltalentacquisition@paypal.com.",3.9,PayPal,"San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,22,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,CA,5917,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
680,680,Data Scientist,$149k-$234k,"This role entails an opportunity to understand search core-ranking algorithms, search experimentation and most importantly, drive innovation in search metrics that are foundational to informing the Search roadmap. The candidate will have ample exposure to product analytics/data science senior leadership through weekly insights forum and to search engineering/product leadership through bi-weekly search insights forums. The candidate is be expected to partner closely with the search product development team and mine insights to influence the search roadmap. Search is a vast domain that involves ad hoc projects ranging from listing optimization to shipping. The candidate will get to witness close collaboration between search and other product domains and will be expected to get data science methodologies peer reviewed by specialists within the product data science group (not limited to search).

Perform statistical modelling with R/Python programming for language data manipulation, missing value treatment, outlier detection, anomaly detection, data mining, data modeling and validation.
· Utilize extensive knowledge in algorithms to analyze Sojourner (user related) data to test search portfolio related modifications for making business decisions on product launch.
· Utilize statistical data tools including Big Data, Tableau, Teradata, Hive, and Hadoop to analyze data and build dashboards.
· Setup, conduct, analyze, and deep dive into A/B tests and provide recommendations on improving the search features.
· Develop metrics to analyze feature performance during testing phase, monitoring and mitigating errors, and taking the final decision regarding the launch of the feature to the entire population.
· Perform statistical analysis and modelling of customers behavioral data to identify opportunities to build new search features solving for key pain-points in search user journey, identify new growth opportunities and provide actionable recommendations by leveraging insights across behavioral data, customer research and data science.
· Work with finance colleagues to incorporate analytics insights and approaches into finance processes (forecasting, planning, media-mix), and the experimentation platform team to design and execute A/B test to measure impact of launches/changes.

Our ultimate customers are eBay buyers and sellers, and we partner closely with internal stakeholders in the Product and Global Growth organizations to improve decision-making and to deliver value for eBay customers. In totality-

1) We leverage our analytical skills combined with a deep understanding of eBays business, customers, and data to deliver unique insights and opportunities to better serve our customers.
2) We partner with the business and product teams to support evidence-based decision-making and execution at each stage in the business decision lifecycle related to how we invest our resources through ad hoc analysis, reporting, developing algorithms and data-driven tools.

3) We facilitate inspection of the business to ensure quality of execution and implementation to optimize business performance and resolve customer-facing issues with speed.

This website uses cookies to enhance your experience. By continuing to browse the site, you agree to our use of cookies

View our privacy policy

View our accessibility info

eBay Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and disability, or other legally protected status. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at talent@ebay.com. We will make every effort to respond to your request for disability assistance as soon as possible.

For more information see:

EEO is the Law Poster

EEO is the Law Poster Supplement",3.6,eBay,"San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,25,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,CA,3956,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
681,681,Data Analyst/Data Scientist,$149k-$234k,"Role: Data Science/Analyst Duration: 6 month contract to start, long term potential

Location:
Remote due to Covid Costa Mesa Start: ASAP Skill Set
Mid-level Data Scientist/analyst with Tableau, Alteryx and Python specifically. o strong analytical mind o experience in data visualization techniques, who can independently figure out how to combine various data sources or data points to answer a business question, and do the story-telling part (visualizing so the answer can be seen?) - without too much direction or guidance
Direct, hands-on experience with Tableau o building visualizations/reports and assembling dashboards in Tableau.
Direct, hands-on experience with Alteryx o Integrating data sources into Alteryx or Apache AirFlow. ? Python coding experience for some custom API based integrations.
Good communication skills
Required Skills : Role: Data Science/Analyst Duration: 6 month contract to start, long term potential Location: Remote due to Covid Costa Mesa Start: ASAP Skill Set Mid-level Data Scientist/analyst with Tableau, Alteryx and Python specifically. o strong analytical mind o experience in data visualization techniques, who can independently figure out how to combine various data sources or data points to answer a business question, and do the story-telling part (visualizing so the answer can be seen?) - without too much direction or guidance Direct, hands-on experience with Tableau o building visualizations/reports and assembling dashboards in Tableau. Direct, hands-on experience with Alteryx o Integrating data sources into Alteryx or Apache AirFlow. Python coding experience for some custom API based integrations. good communication skills
Basic Qualification :
Additional Skills :
Rank :A3
Requested Date :2020-09-09",2.9,Vensoft Inc,"Costa Mesa, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,191.5,CA,1758,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
712,712,Data Scientist - Risk,$77k-$109k,"Job Title: Data Scientist (Risk)

Location: Orlando, Florida

Manager: Head of Data Science

About LSQ

LSQ is a technology-driven provider of accounts receivable financing to companies who need working capital but may not be able to obtain sufficient financing from their bank. Our focus is to help businesses release the liquidity tied up in their accounts receivable. With financing from LSQ, a business can purchase more inventory, fill more orders, and take advantage of new growth opportunities. Our technology and data driven approach to providing working capital, along with our accounts receivable management services, allows our clients to driving business success.

Job Overview

LSQ is searching for a Data Scientist (Risk) to join our growing team of analytics experts. The hire will be responsible for building data driven tools to automate and scale risk decisions decision points include, fraud detection, commercial credit analysis, and invoice payment behavior. The ideal candidate is an experienced researcher and data wrangler who enjoys applying complex theories to solve real world business problems. The Data Scientist will need to collaborate effectively with both technical (engineers, data experts) and non-technical (business users) colleagues to bring the data to life.

Responsibilities of Data Scientist (Risk)
We have 20+ years of real-world commercial data weve observed businesses and their interactions with other businesses across market cycles, industries, and catastrophic events. Build risk tools that optimize for velocity and scale.
Build risk tools that optimize science & art you will work with risk experts who have been in the trenches (and learned from losses). Augment human decisions with machine.
Lay the foundation for scale. A data science framework for optimal data acquisition, model training and deployment. Dont take short-cuts. Bring quantitative and statistical rigor to your body of work.
Lead by example. You are joining a data team at ground-level. Building and inserting a data team, into a 20+ year old company (organism) will be hard, but rewarding.
Qualifications for Risk Data Scientist
Curiosity, Grit, and Humility
5+ years of experience of hands-on data science role
Previous experience of building commercial finance risk tools should be beneficial, but not required
Bachelor or Masters degree in Data Science, Operations Research, Computer Science, Industrial Engineering, Statistics, or another quantitative field
A toolkit of modern data science techniques
Experience with any data science tools/packages: Python, R, SAS, XGBoost, TensorFlow, NLTK
Experience with any big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, Data Bricks
Experience with any reporting tools: Tableau Server, Power BI, SSRS, Excel
Experience with any AWS cloud services: EC2, EMR, RDS, Redshift, Aurora, S3
Experience with any Stream-processing systems: Storm, Spark-Streaming
Position Type and Expected Hours of Work:

This is a full-time position. Days and hours of work are Monday through Friday, 8:00 a.m. to 5 p.m. Occasional evening and weekend work may be required as job duties demand.

Physical Demands:

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit and use hands to finger, handle, or feel. The employee is frequently required to reach with hands and arms and talk or hear. The employee is occasionally required to stand; walk and stoop, kneel, crouch.

Travel:

There will be minimal travel required for this position.

LSQ is an Equal Opportunity Employer that does not discriminate on the basis of actual or perceived, race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy and gender identity), sexual orientation, parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service, any other non-merit based factor or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws. Our leadership team is dedicated to this policy with respect to recruitment, hiring, placement, promotion, transfer, training, compensation, benefits, employee activities and general treatment during employment. If youd like more information about your EEO rights as an applicant under the law, please click here http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/poster.cfm",4.3,LSQ,"Orlando, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,24,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,FL,4301,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,1
713,713,Data Scientist,$77k-$109k,"COMPANY OVERVIEW:

This is a data analytics company founded with a mission of making
profitable use of the millions of data points that clients
capture every day. Their expertise lies in an ability to uncover
hidden patterns, trends and inconsistencies in data from all
sources allowing them to build predictive models that can then be
used to improve profit and operational effectiveness across an
organization.

POSITION OVERVIEW:

Are you passionate about leveraging data to deliver actionable
insights that impact daily business decisions? Does the prospect
of dealing with massive volumes of data excite you? Do you like
digging into data to answer challenging operations and customer
behavior questions? Then this job is for you.

We are seeking an outstanding Data Scientist. This company is
committed to showcasing the power of data and delivering value
back to clients by answering the most difficult questions. The
insights they develop will enable clients to build the next
generation of services and strategies that will give their
business a competitive edge. They need your help to create and
curate data assets, apply the statistical analysis necessary to
derive insights from those assets and develop and effectively
communicate recommended strategies for turning those insights
into data-driven actions.

The ideal candidate thrives in a fast-paced environment, relishes
working with large, varied data sets, enjoys the challenge of
highly complex business contexts (that are typically being
defined in real-time), and, above all else, is passionate about
data, analytics and delivering measurable results. In this role
you will be expected to work with business leaders to understand
the problems they need to solve and design the appropriate
solution. You will work closely with your peers to leverage the
teams expansive expertise in analytics and data-driven decision
making to guide the client deliverables. Often, the ideal set of
data will not be available, and you'll have to think creatively
about what is available to drive results.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Analyze and solve problems at their root, while also stepping
back to understand the broader context.
Learn and understand a broad range of data resources and know
when, how, and which to use and which not to use.
Interface with and lead (where appropriate) internal resources
to deliver analytics projects.
Continually improve ongoing reporting, query performance,
scoring and analysis processes. - Report results in a manner
which is both statistically rigorous and compellingly relevant.
Provide data manipulation, exploratory data analysis, modeling,
scoring, dashboard and report development.
Apply advanced statistical analysis and modeling techniques
using both standard and non-standard methods including machine
learning techniques.
Value and contribute to a culture of learning, knowledge
sharing, teamwork, delivering excellence, exceeding expectations,
being respectful of others and having fun.
TECHNICAL QUALIFICATIONS:
Bachelor's degree in Analytics, Statistics, Economics, Math or
other related fields from an accredited university (Masters
degree preferred).
At least 3 years experience leveraging quantitative analytics
to provide operational or marketing performance analysis.
Experience performing statistical analysis, regression
modeling, time series analysis, data mining, and financial
analysis.
Experience utilizing statistical software packages such as R,
SAS or SPSS and data visualization tools such as Tableau, Qlik,
Shiny or Power BI.
Ability to write SQL scripts for analysis and data manipulation
a plus.
Experience assimilating, cleansing, validating and presenting
large quantities of complex data.
PROFESSIONAL QUALIFICATIONS:
Passionate about data and discovering new trends, tools, and
techniques to leverage for the betterment of our clients and to
expand the capabilities of our team.
Proactively seeks to gain understanding and buy-in from all
parties involved and to ensure the delivery of commitments.
Excellent communication (verbal and written) and interpersonal
skills and an ability to effectively converse with both business
and technical teams.
Experience translating analysis results into business
recommendations.
LOCATION: Remote

Job ID# 464392

Artemis Referral Bonus $500! If you know someone for this job,
please join our Referral Bonus Program
( https://www.artemisconsultants.net/referral/ ) and submit them.

Artemis invites you to subscribe to our free Job Alerts
( https://www.artemisconsultants.net/job-alerts/ ) to be notified
about career advancement opportunities. You can also join our
monthly Talent Connection
( https://www.artemisconsultants.net/talent-connection-newsletter/ )
newsletter to receive free resources designed to help progress
your career.",4.4,Artemis Consultants,Remote,-1,1 to 50 Employees,15,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,Remote,4800,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
714,714,Data Scientist,$77k-$109k,"Type: Full Time
Clearance: TS/ w Polygraph
Experience: All Levels of Experience Acceptable
Location: Columbia, MD

JOB SUMMARY:


Visionist, Inc. has opportunities for Data Scientists with interest in data analytics support across a variety of areas, from the development of advanced data analytics to understanding, evaluating, and implementing customer requirements. Visionist can offer opportunities to stay current with the latest trends, technologies, and future industry movement in relation to data analytics. You will be able to develop, design, maintain, and enhance data analytic solutions for our customers.

SAMPLING OF DESIRED SKILLS:
Experience with Python, R, Scala, or Julia. Java experience is preferred. Large dataset experience (Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Spark, Flink).
Strong familiarity with data science applications such as association analysis, graph/network analytics, clustering, text analytics, classification and regression (multivariate and logistic).
Training in the design and implementation of static and dynamic visualizations in R, Python, Tableau, or similar visualization software.
Knowledge of machine learning methods (neural networks & deep learning) and platforms (TensorFlow, H20).
Experience or exposure to Natural Language Processing (NLP).
QUALIFICATIONS:


Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field preferred.
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise, and actionable manner.
Capable of building conceptual, knowledgeable, and physical data models.
Produce innovative and creative solutions to analytic problems.
Comfortable with various data structures and common methods in data transformation.
Interested in this position? Send us a resume today.
Due to government contract and security clearance requirements, US citizenship is required.

Visionist, Inc. is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy and gender identity), sexual orientation, parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service, or any other non-merit based factor. These protections extend to all management practices and decisions, including recruitment and hiring practices, appraisal systems, promotions, and training and career development programs. Visionist, Inc. will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics.",4.9,"Visionist, Inc.","Columbia, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,10,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,MD,2688,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,0
717,717,Data Engineer,$77k-$109k,"StarsHR has the following contract opportunity available with our client in St. Louis.

Data Engineer

Required
5 years or more experience in Java, Scala or Python.
Ability to perform complex data analysis with large volumes of data.
Experience with stream processing, e.g. Kafka, Spark Streaming, Akka, Flink, etc..
Expert level proficiency in SQL.
Experience data modeling for large scale databases, either relational or NoSQL (graph, key:value, document, etc.) • 5+ years experience with developing ETL/Data Pipeline solutions.
Proven experience (2 years) with distributed systems, e.g. Mesos, Kubernetes, Spark, Hadoop, distributed databases, grid computing
Desired:
Experience developing and utilizing Data Lakes.
Experience with data privacy concerns
Ability to build and maintain modern cloud architecture, e.g. AWS, Google Cloud, etc.
Experience contributing to open source projects
• Knowledge of data science practices, to better steer our efforts to support them through the infrastructure we create",4.6,StarsHR,"Saint Louis, MO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,13,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,MO,1010,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
718,718,Data Engineer,$77k-$109k,"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking multiple Data Engineers to support a new requirement in/around Springfield, VA. The selected candidates may be required to deploy forward up to 10% of the time into operational areas or other remote sites.

Responsibilities include:
Responsible for extracting, loading, and transforming a variety of data types, formats, and sources in order to cultivate accessible relational, document store, and graph databases.
Develops logical and physical data models, database creation, data optimization, and implementation.
Work side-by-side data scientist to make use of the collected data.
Deploy sophisticated analytics programs, machine learning, and statistical models.
Document all work in a code base, and other Install, Operations, and Maintenance artifacts per government direction
Basic Qualifications:
Requires in-depth knowledge of distributed systems, computer science, programming, and mathematics. Works with warehouses across multiple databases; responsible for developing table schemas.
Ability to manage and organize data while identifying trends and inconsistencies that will impact government missions.
Experience preparing data for predictive and prescriptive modeling; uses data to discover tasks that can be automated; delivers updates to stakeholders based on analytics.
Experience/certifications in Mongo DB, Python, Cypher Query Language, R, Apache Spark / Hadoop, Linux, ETL, data warehouse, data modeling, and MS Azure, and Amazon Web Services.
Experience adhering to Information Technology processes, polices, and procedures for entering changes and new products into the production environment.
Experience in cloud, containerization, indexing, scaling databases, and graph analysis to build in automation, efficiency, and implementation of security controls.
Desired Skills:
Prior experience supporting US Special Forces
Prior deployment to OCONUS locations
AWS and/or Azure certifications
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SCI security clearance required.
Willing to undergo polygraph examination
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.

For more details, or to submit a referral: bit.ly/NovettaReferrals

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,Novetta,"Springfield, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,8,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,VA,3796,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
719,719,Data Scientist,$77k-$109k,"Need local to Bay Area, CA or Seattle, WA only

Job Description for Data Scientist
5 to 7 years of experience as a data scientist.
Strong skills for mining data, assessing the accuracy and insights from new data sources.
Work with stakeholders to understand data challenges and opportunities
Experience building Machine Learning models for predictive analytics, and NLP. Understanding of Deep Learning models is a plus
Experience with SQL
Master in Statistics, Computer Science, or other STEM field. Ph.D. is a plus.
Knowledge of advanced statistics and hypothesis testing
Python, Pandas, Numpy, Scikit coding skills
Data visualization with Matplotlib, and Seaborn
Experience with at least one cloud data technology GCP, AWS, Azure
Experience with Spark, and Hadoop is a plus.
Effective at telling stories with data.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Creative drive to try data tools, and explore and discover insights from data
NLP experience is MUST
Â

Â
Sl.No

Skill

Years Of Experience
1

Â

Â
2

Â

Â
Â

Â

Â
Â

Â

Â

Â",4.0,New York Technology Partners,"Seattle, WA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,21,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,WA,1041,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
721,721,Data Scientist,$77k-$109k,"Who we are


Fueled by a fundamental belief that having access to financial services creates opportunity, PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL) is committed to democratizing financial services and empowering people and businesses to join and thrive in the global economy. Our open digital payments platform gives PayPal’s 305 million active account holders the confidence to connect and transact in new and powerful ways, whether they are online, on a mobile device, in an app, or in person. Through a combination of technological innovation and strategic partnerships, PayPal creates better ways to manage and move money, and offers choice and flexibility when sending payments, paying or getting paid. Available in more than 200 markets around the world, the PayPal platform, including Braintree, Venmo and Xoom, enables consumers and merchants to receive money in more than 100 currencies, withdraw funds in 56 currencies and hold balances in their PayPal accounts in 25 currencies.

When applying for a job you are required to create an account, if you have already created an account - click Sign In.

Creating an account will allow you to follow the progress of your applications. Our system does have some requirements that will help us process your application, below are some guidelines for creation of your account:
Provide full legal First Name/Family Name – this is important for us to ensure our future hires have the right system set up.
Please Capitalize first letter of your First and Last Name.
Please avoid using fully capitalized text for your First and/or Last Name.
NOTE: If your name is hyphenated or has multiple capitalization, please use the same format as your government ID.
Job Description Summary:

This role will be responsible to design and build state-of-art solutions for merchant portfolio modeling.

Job Description:

Ideal Candidate should be:
A strong problem solver, equipped with strong mathematical, analytical, and programming skills, and being able to connect complex business problem with viable technical solutions.
A fast learner to quickly ramp up and explore in new domains, identify problems/opportunities and come up with solutions.
A versatile modeler to take on end to end solution building, including data analysis, data processing, model experiment, implementation and live support.
Must have:
Proficient coding capability in at least one of the major programming languages such as Python, R, Java.
Proficient in data analysis, model building and data mining.
Ability to work effectively in a fast-paced, changing environment.
Highly organized and detail oriented, with a strong ability to coordinate and track multiple deliverables, tasks and dependencies.
Ability to work independently and proficiently. Accountable for own results and is seen as clear subject matter expert within group / geography.
Ability to identify typical problems and issues during normal course of work and take proactive actions to solve them with minimum guidance.
Demonstrates excellent verbal and written communication skills on a broad set of technical topics.
Asks open-ended questions and contribute to brainstorming and design discussions.
Communicates effectively on general business issues.
Nice to have:
Experience in Big Data such as MapReduce, PIG, HIVE, Spark is a big plus.
Experience in natural language processing, text mining, web intelligence would be very helpful.
Basic Qualifications:
Master’s degree in machine learning, computer science, statistics, or similar with 3+ year relevant experience; or PhD with 1+ year relevant experience.
Subsidiary:

PayPal

Travel Percent:

10

Primary Location:

San Jose, California, United States of America

Additional Locations:

Masters Degree or Equivalent

We're a purpose-driven company whose beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We hold ourselves to our One Team Behaviors which demand that we hold the highest ethical standards, to empower an open and diverse workplace, and strive to treat everyone who is touched by our business with dignity and respect. Our employees challenge the status quo, ask questions, and find solutions. We want to break down barriers to financial empowerment. Join us as we change the way the world defines financial freedom.

PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at paypalglobaltalentacquisition@paypal.com.",3.9,PayPal,"San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,22,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,CA,4964,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,1,0,1
722,722,Lead Data Engineer,$77k-$109k,"Locations: TX - Plano, United States of America, Plano, Texas
At Capital One, were building a leading information-based technology company. Still founder-led by Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Richard Fairbank, Capital One is on a mission to help our customers succeed by bringing ingenuity, simplicity, and humanity to banking. We measure our efforts by the success our customers enjoy and the advocacy they exhibit. We are succeeding because they are succeeding.

Guided by our shared values, we thrive in an environment where collaboration and openness are valued. We believe that innovation is powered by perspective and that teamwork and respect for each other lead to superior results. We elevate each other and obsess about doing the right thing. Our associates serve with humility and a deep respect for their responsibility in helping our customers achieve their goals and realize their dreams. Together, we are on a quest to change banking for good.
Lead Data Engineer
Responsibilities:
- Lead and develop sustainable data driven solutions with current new gen data technologies to meet the needs of our organization and business customers
- Design robust systems with an eye on the long term maintenance and support of the application
- Leverage reusable code modules to solve problems across the team and organization
- Exhibits mastery over multiple domains
- Has an intrinsic knowledge of standards and languages
- Leverage and establish standards across the team and organization
- Provide technical guidance to team members
- Develop a framework of a significant complexity
Basic Qualifications:
- Bachelors Degree
- At least 5 years coding in data management, data warehousing or in unstructured data environments
- At least 2 years experience in big data technologies (Cassandra, Accumulo, HBase, Spark, Hadoop, HDFS, AVRO, MongoDB, or Zookeeper)
Preferred Qualifications:
- Master's Degree
- 2+ years of experience with Agile engineering practices
- 5+ years in-depth experience with the Hadoop stack (MapReduce, Pig, Hive, Hbase)
- 5+ years experience with NoSQL implementation (Mongo, Cassandra)
- 5+ years experience developing Java based software solutions
- 5+ years experience in at least one scripting language (Python, Perl, JavaScript, Shell)
- 5+ years experience developing software solutions to solve complex business problems
- 5+ years experience with Relational Database Systems and SQL
- 5+ years experience designing, developing, and implementing ETL
- 5+ years experience with UNIX including basic commands and shell scripting
- 5+ years of experience providing technical leadership on relevant applications
Capital One will consider sponsoring a new qualified applicant for employment authorization for this position.",3.9,Capital One,"Plano, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,26,Company - Public,financial_related,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,TX,2760,1,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,1
723,723,Data Engineer,$77k-$109k,"Data Engineer

Chevy Chase, MD OR Austin, TX

WHAT WE DO MATTERS:

Here at The Knot Worldwide, we believe in doing work that matters. In 15 countries around the world, our leading family of brands (The Knot, WeddingWire, Bodas, GigMasters, The Bump, How They Asked, Lasting, and more) inspire, inform, and celebrate our communities as they move through life's milestones. From the proposal to creating a home, and starting a family together, we're there for every step of the journey. Our couples and business partners depend on us. They're all in. So are we.

ABOUT THE ROLE:

The Data Engineer plays a key role in developing the data warehouse infrastructure that is used by the entire organization. Our mission is to provide reliable, performant, timely and understandable centralized data services to TKWW. This is a multi-disciplinary role that involves managing infrastructure resources as well as utilizing technologies ranging from low level python and shell coding to enterprise ETL and Business Intelligence reporting tools. The Data Engineer assists in providing the data and information needed for The Knot WorldWide to be the leading data-driven software product company in the wedding events industry.

KEY RESPONSIBILITIES:
Extract, load and transform data from The Knot Worldwide and other sources to our DataWarehouse for the consumption of our end users.
Design and develop solutions for integration between disparate systems which include cloud-based sources such as Salesforce and Salesforce Marketing Cloud.
Maintaining current ETL processes and resolve daily ETL job failures as they arise.
Resolve Ad-hoc data questions from the organization in a timely and accurate manner.
Continuous improvement on current ETL processes to ensure accuracy, timeliness and scalability as data volumes grow.
Document built processes and data content and publish needed information to our data dictionary
REQUIRED SKILLS/EXPERIENCE:
A Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, or a related field is preferred. An advanced degree or professional licensing is a plus.
Programming experience and a demonstrated interest in statistical analysis, informatics, analytics, or business intelligence
Minimum of 5+ years experience with SQL and Data Warehouse development and ETL
Hands-on experience with at least one of the following Databases (MYSQL, PostgreSQL, Snowflake, MSSQL, Redshift)
Scripting skills using shell, python or ruby
Experience with standard warehousing concepts like Data Marts and Dimensional Modeling
Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written.
Present ideas, expectations and information in a concise, well-organized way.
Conduct research and make recommendations on BI requirements, products, and services.
Manage time well, correctly prioritizing tasks.
DESIRED SKILLS/EXPERIENCE:
Knowledge of data warehouse schema design and architecture.
Experience with at least one Business Intelligence tool such as Qlik and Metabase
Experience with Big Data Solutions such as Snowflake, Redshift, Google BigQuery or Hadoop.
Experience with ETL tools such as Matillion, Boomi, Informatica, SSIS,, etc.
Programming experience with Ruby, Python, Shell Scripting.
WHAT YOU LOVE ABOUT US:

The Knot Worldwide offers a unique employee experience and we are deeply proud of our award-winning culture. From flexible vacation and generous parental leave benefits to promoting wellness and giving back to our community, we believe in happiness above all else—in and out of the office.

----

The Knot Worldwide provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, or disability. In addition to federal law requirements, The Knot Worldwide complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. The Knot Worldwide expressly prohibits any form of workplace harassment based on race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status.",3.4,The Knot Worldwide,"Austin, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,TX,4160,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
724,724,Data Scientist,$77k-$109k,"TransVoyant is seeking a Data Scientist to drive live and predictive data analytics and development for our patented Continuous Decision Intelligence Platform. The ideal candidate will structure data and create the analytics needed to provide insights into our customer domainsranging from predicting customer demand to forecasting port disruptions to getting in front of risks to national security. This position will do data discovery, interpret, craft models and build streams for Insights in TransVoyant CDI.

RESPONSIBILITIES
Become an expert on TransVoyant CDI Platform solutions and how they solve pressing customer challenges within Supply Chain and National Security arenas
Identify, retrieve, manipulate, relate and exploit multiple TransVoyant structured and unstructured data sets from thousands of various sources (ex. tweets, live aircraft, forecast weather), including building or generating new data sets as appropriate
Create methods, models and algorithms to understand the meaning of streaming live data, translating it into insightful predictive output for customer applications and data products
Educate internal staff (ex. development, sales, marketing) on how data science and resulting predictions can be productized for key industry verticals
Represent TransVoyant and our solutions to customers and prospects at industry networking events and tradeshows
Keep up to date on competitive solutions, products and services
May need to travel up to 10% of time
DESIRED SKILLS & EXPERIENCE
2+ years of cloud-based data parsing and analysis, data manipulation and transformation, and visualization experience
Understanding of Hadoop and Apache based tools to exploit massive sets of TransVoyant data
Programming and scripting experience with Scala or Java is considered a plus
Experience with Spark considered a plus
Experience with Kafka or other streaming architecture frameworks considered a plus
Ability to explain technical and statistical findings to non-technical users and decision makers
Experience in technical consulting and conceptual solution design
Domain knowledge in Supply Chain, and/or transportation management and visibility technologies is a plus
Bachelors degree is required
ABOUT TRANSVOYANT

TransVoyant delivers our customers continuous insights to increase revenues, reduce costs and manage risks by combining the current and future behavior of their enterprises, their ecosystems and they dynamic world around them. We are innovative, creative, focused on customer success and love what we do. Team members enjoy highly competitive compensation, a fast-growing and flexible work environment, comprehensive benefits, 100% 401k matches, unlimited vacation days and professional development opportunities.

We respect your personal information. Please review our Privacy Policy to find out more.

Powered by JazzHR",3.2,TransVoyant,"Alexandria, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,8,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,VA,2856,0,data scientist,0,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
725,725,Data Scientist,$77k-$109k,"The ideal fit is an engineer with some business sense and Data Science experience. However, the vast majority of the role will involve working with various aspects and levels of the business to identify business needs and predictive features. Then, through data extraction from the warehouse, work within the ML framework to develop and deploy predictive models.

Responsibilities
Work with key executives from multiple teams to understand problems, identify opportunities and present findings.
Identify predictive features for those problems/opportunities and run them through ML algorithms within a predictive analytics framework, Data Robot.
Extract the data required from the Data Warehouse (Snowflake) or other systems as needed, either through direct SQL extracts or other frameworks provided such as Looker, Tableau, SnapLogic, etc.
Deploy, deliver and monitor production level models.
Perform other tasks as needed within the broader Data and BI teams. Examples include, visualization tasks, BI meta data model development, data loading, data cleansing, etc.
Qualifications
BS or MS degree in Data Science.
A minimum of 2 years work experience within Data Science.
Highly proficient in SQL.
Comfortable working within a Predictive Analytics Framework.
Excellent communication skills.
Marketing or Advertising Technology background preferred.
Comfortable with shifting priorities and a fast pace work environment.
Powered by JazzHR",4.0,"Latitude, Inc.","Baltimore, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,MD,1438,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
726,726,"Intern, Data Science",$77k-$109k,"Dover is a diversified global manufacturer with annual revenue of over $7 billion. We deliver innovative equipment and components, specialty systems, consumable supplies, software and digital solutions, and support services through five operating segments: Engineered Products, Fueling Solutions, Imaging & Identification, Pumps & Process Solutions and Refrigeration & Food Equipment. Dover combines global scale with operational agility to lead the markets we serve. Recognized for our entrepreneurial approach for over 60 years, our team of approximately 24,000 employees takes an ownership mindset, collaborating with customers to redefine what's possible. Headquartered in Downers Grove, Illinois, Dover trades on the New York Stock Exchange under ""DOV."" Additional information is available at dovercorporation.com.

Dover is in the midst of large digital transformation and we recently opened up Dover digital labs in Watertown, MA. As Jr. Data Scientist Intern, you will be expected to understand integration of application-based solutions onto various platforms. You will deploy these solutions to solve problems for our customers within large-scale manufacturing environments with a balanced execution of speed and solid collaborative skills.

Ideal candidate for this position is an ambitious, disciplined, quantitative individual with excellent communication skills to collaborate with cross-functional colleagues on projects. The individual must have strong desire to become a leading authority on subject matter and integration techniques relevant to Dover Corporation. Projects will include solutions relating to time-series analysis, physics-based systems, statistical analysis, operations research, machine learning, deep learning, and high performance computing for data science.

This will be an internship position for fall 2020, with opportunity to pursue full-time hire after depending on performance.

Roles & Responsibilities:

• Lead the team’s integration efforts in moving data science applications from development to deployment environments.

• Assess and configure resource requirements (CPUs, GPUs) for projects and work with vendors to secure these computing resources.

• Write Dockerfiles and documentation for containerization of applications as required by end-users.

• Contribute to design, development, and especially to integration of the data science solutions ranging from IoT and sensor data to enterprise information systems.

• Understand the design and development of new Data Science / Analytics based solutions and applications that fundamentally impact the business in terms of revenue growth and / or efficiency gains.

• Work with world-class engineering talent and Technical Product Managers within Dover operating companies and its customers to identify and validate strong Value Propositions.

• Communicate with internal stakeholders on project updates.

• Work closely with US and off shore teams to provide on-time delivery.

Technical Competency:

• Bachelor's degree completed or expected in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, related, or equivalent experience. Minor or knowledge in Statistics, Mathematics, or Data Science is valuable.

• Strong experience in R/Python/other application deployment on Windows and/or Linux. Familiarity with system administration concepts and Docker for Windows critical. Scripting / command prompt skills also useful.

• Strong knowledge of troubleshooting errors stemming from incompatible package dependencies.

• Strong knowledge of containerization and computing requirements for deep learning based solutions.

• Basic knowledge of statistical modeling, data analysis, operations research, time series analysis, machine learning libraries, deep learning frameworks to understand application purposes.

• Strong analytical, written, verbal, and interpersonal skills required.

• Ability to travel to company locations or customers when needed. Additional Skills: (Nice to have)

• Experience with deep learning application development using Keras, Tensorflow.

• Familiarity with IoT solutions.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, disability, age, genetic information, or any other factors prohibited by law.",3.7,Dover Corporation,"Watertown, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,65,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,MA,4388,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
727,727,Data Scientist,$77k-$109k,"At Koneksa Health, we are focused on using new technologies to improve clinical research and drug development. We help leading life sciences companies and research hospitals remotely capture real-world data from patients. Our projects deploy digital health technologies such as FDA approved activity trackers, wearable vital sign monitors, and other emerging monitoring devices that capture data outside the clinical and laboratory setting. We are developing digital biomarkers that help our customers make faster decisions, often using smaller studies, with technologies that enhance the experience of the patients who participate. We're on a constant quest to improve the tools and endpoints that are used to get the right new therapies to patients who need them.

As a Data Scientist at Koneksa, you will be a part of the Data Science team that delivers real-world data from patients to our customers and develops digital biomarkers that enable faster decisions and improve patient experience. You will communicate and collaborate closely within and across internal departments (data science, client ops, business development, sales, operations and technology), as well as with external stakeholders. So its essential to have excellent written and verbal communication skills. Aside from technical competencies, the role also requires a persistent attention to detail, initiative, and curiosity which together drive a willingness to find solutions instead of problems.

Responsibilities
Write prototype and production code to extract, process, QC (quality control) large datasets (in house and cloud) of various frequencies and sample rates
Produce clinical datasets in timely manner to transfer to clients and support analysis
Effectively and proactively communicate and collaborate with external and internal teams to gather information and contribute to data transfer specification contracts
Troubleshoot, resolve data quality issues, and own resolution of open items
Tabulate, visualize and analyze data, and produce and present reports to the clients
Meticulously document project progress, data quality control, analysis findings
Requirements
MS in scientific discipline
3+ years experience in an industry role focused on data science or data manipulation
Expert in Python (pandas, numpy, pymongo, etc.)
Experience in extracting data from databases using programs such as MongoDB and platforms like Amazon S3
Experience in using version control and code repositories tools such as Git and GitHub
Commercial experience in generating and working with SDTM and ADaM format data
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Highly organized with a keen attention to detail
Ability to work independently and collaboratively
Ability to work on multiple projects and manage competing deadlines
Critical thinking and problem solving
Benefits
Competitive salary
Bonus scheme (subject to company and individual performance)
Stock option scheme eligibility
100% covered employee healthcare
50% dependent covered healthcare
Employer 401(k) matching
Choice of computer equipment
Weekly team lunches
Healthy office snacks
Koneksa Health, Inc. provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, Koneksa Health Inc. complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training.

Learn more about us by visiting www.koneksahealth.com and https://www.linkedin.com/company/koneksa-health/.

Powered by JazzHR",-1.0,Koneksa Health,"New York, NY",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,NY,3860,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
729,729,Data Scientist - Regional Merchandising Strategy,$77k-$109k,"Company Description

Wish is a mobile e-commerce platform that flips traditional shopping on its head. We connect hundreds of millions of people with the widest selection of delightful, surprising, and—most importantly—affordable products delivered directly to their doors. Each day on Wish, millions of customers in more than 160 countries around the world discover new products. For our over 1 million merchant partners, anyone with a good idea and a mobile phone can instantly tap into a global market.

We're fueled by creating unique products and experiences that give people access to a new type of commerce, where all are welcome. If you’ve been searching for a supportive environment to chase your curiosity and use data to investigate the questions that matter most to you, this is the place.

Job Description

We are looking for a Data Scientist who will work cross-functionally with technical and non-technical teams to mine internal and external semi-structured data to understand consumer demand in individual markets, drive sales through feed optimization, influence supply, design and deploy long-term merchandising strategies.

The ideal candidate should be passionate about Wish and e-commerce, be able to conduct market research independently, has a strong analytical and consultative mindset, deep understanding of databases, visualization, and modeling techniques, and the ability to thrive in a dynamic, fast-paced environment delivering against tight deadlines, and a passion for scaling data-driven regional merchandising strategies.

What you'll be doing:
Conduct quantitative market research for each market, by analyzing external e-commerce web data, understand regional consumer demand, through various text and image mining techniques
Analyze internal behavior tracking data and forecast Wish users’ demand
Identify high potential but underexposed product candidates, propose strategies to increase their exposure and boost sales
Implement the strategies and set up A/B test experiments to gauge the impact, and reiterate
Establish scalable, efficient, and automated processes for data-driven regional merchandising strategies
Qualifications
Bachelor's or advanced degree in an analytical field (e.g. Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Economics or similar)
3+ years of hands-on experience in predictive modeling and analysis
2+ years Python, R, or Matlab experience
2+ years work experience including business analytics and project management
2+ years experience writing complex SQL queries in a business environment
2+ years experience with Tableau, OBIEE or other visualization tools
2+ years experience operating in a Unix/Linux environment
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience in e-commerce companies working on mining product listing data
Text mining and image mining experience
Feed ranking experience
A/B test experience
Analytical mindset and ability to see the big picture and influence others
Detail-oriented and must have an aptitude for solving unstructured problems
Ability to work effectively in a multi-task, high volume environment
Ability to be adaptable and flexible in responding to deadlines and workflow fluctuations
#LI-BD1

Additional Information

Wish values diversity and is committed to creating an inclusive work environment. We provide equal employment opportunity for all applicants and employees. We do not discriminate based on any legally-protected class or characteristic. Employment decisions are made based on qualifications, merit, and business needs. If you need assistance or accommodation due to a disability, please let your recruiter know. For job positions in San Francisco, CA, and other locations where required, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Individuals applying for positions at Wish, including California residents, can see our privacy policy here.",3.5,Wish,"San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,9,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,CA,3905,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
730,730,Data Scientist,$77k-$109k,"Open Date 02/21/2020
Requisition Number PRN23285B
Job Title Data Scientist
Working Title
Job Grade H
FLSA Code Computer Employee
Patient Sensitive Job Code? No
Standard Hours per Week 40
Full Time or Part Time? Full Time
Shift Day
Work Schedule Summary
VP Area U of U Health - Academics
Department 00847 - Hematology
Location Campus
City Salt Lake City, UT
Type of Recruitment External Posting
Pay Rate Range 36.49 to 71.20
Close Date
Open Until Filled Yes
Job Summary

We are looking for a data scientist to accelerate scientific cancer related research. A strong candidate will join us in our use of big data in cancer research and patient care to discover better therapies for cancer patients, improve patient outcomes, reduce health care disparities, and optimize precision medicine. A strong candidate will have experience leading the data wrangling and design of algorithms and models to predict and solve healthcare related problems. Experience working with natural language processing algorithms for the purpose of data extraction is a desired skill. A strong candidate will be able to work with different departments across the university to leverage various data sources stored at the university’s data warehouse and huntsman cancer institute and develop a framework that can be reused for ML related cancer research.
Responsibilities

Collaborate with multidisciplinary team to develop and design algorithms such as predicting outcomes, treatment responses, and patient phenotype classification (cohort identification).
Minimum Qualifications

Bachelor’s Degree and 6-8 years of related experience in the field or related area is required.

This position has no responsibility for providing care to patients.

Applicants must demonstrate the potential ability to perform the essential functions of the job as outlined in the position description.
Preferences

• Master’s Degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Data Science, Medical Informatics, Applied Mathematics or related field, or a bachelor’s degree in those fields plus substantial data science work experience.
• Strong knowledge of machine learning algorithms.
• Demonstrate knowledge of medical informatics, data warehouse
• Experience with data analytic and machine learning environments R, Python.
• Experience with Big Data and data warehouse infrastructures
• Demonstrate experience in devising complex algorithms
• Strong written and verbal communication skills.
• Apply deep learning and other machine learning techniques to various research problems in cancer research.
• Demonstrate experience programing to clean and transform data and build predictive modeling with measured results programming in R or python
• Self-motivated individual will be able to discuss and plan execution of subtasks to complete milestones in an agile environment.
• High performance computing and parallel computing experience is desirable
• Excellent SQL query skills querying healthcare databases.
• Strong knowledge of medical terminologies used for billing, lab results and, patient phenotyping.
Type Benefited Staff
Special Instructions Summary
Additional Information


The University of Utah is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity employer and is committed to diversity in its workforce. In compliance with applicable federal and state laws, University of Utah policy of equal employment opportunity prohibits discrimination on the basis of race or ethnicity, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, veteran’s status, status as a qualified person with a disability, or genetic information. Individuals from historically underrepresented groups, such as minorities, women, qualified persons with disabilities, and protected veterans are strongly encouraged to apply. Veterans’ preference is extended to qualified applicants, upon request and consistent with University policy and Utah state law.
To inquire about this posting, email: employment@utah.edu or call 801-581-2300. Reasonable accommodations in the application process will be provided to qualified individuals with disabilities. To request an accommodation or for further information about University AA/EO policies, please contact the Office of Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action, 201 S. Presidents Cr., Rm 135, (801) 581-8365 (V/TDD), email: oeo@umail.utah.edu.

The University is a participating employer with Utah Retirement Systems (“URS”). Eligible new hires with prior URS service, may elect to enroll in URS if they make the election before they become eligible for retirement (usually the first day of work). Contact Human Resources at (801) 581-7447 for information. Individuals who previously retired and are receiving monthly retirement benefits from URS are subject to URS’ post-retirement rules and restrictions. Please contact Utah Retirement Systems at (801) 366-7770 or (800) 695-4877 or University Human Resource Management at (801) 581-7447 if you have questions regarding the post-retirement rules.

This position may require the successful completion of a criminal background check and/or drug screen.",4.4,Huntsman Cancer Institute,"Salt Lake City, UT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,UT,5109,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
731,731,Data Scientist,$77k-$109k,"SummaryProvide data management and statistical analysis in Big Data environment. Assist in development of tools and processes to manage, integrate and synthesize large data sets and deliver business rules and recommendations to functional business units and product managers

Responsibilities and Duties

Perform analyses, development and provide data mining in a large data warehouse environment which includes data design, database architecture, Meta data and repository creation.

Extensive use data mining and data analysis tools.

Review and validate data loaded into the data warehouse for accuracy

Provide technical consulting to users of data warehouses and advises users on conflicts and inappropriate data usage

Gather and assess business information needs and prepare system requirements

Interact with user community to develop and produce reporting requirements

Responsible for prototyping solutions, preparing test scripts, and conducting tests and for data replication, extraction, loading, cleansing, and data modeling for data warehouses

Maintain knowledge of software tools, languages, scripts, and shells that effectively support the data warehouse environment in different operating system environments

Make recommendations towards the development of new code or reuse of existing code.

Responsibilities may also include participation in component and data architecture design, performance monitoring, product evaluation and buy versus build recommendations

#LI-JS1

Requirements

7+ years of programming/systems analysis experience

5+ years of experience with business intelligence and stat tools and systems

Strong experience in Relational Database Management Systems (RDBMS) and data warehouse front-end tools

Extensive knowledge of data warehouse and data mart concepts

Experience in systems analysis and design

Solid understanding of development, quality assurance and integration methodologies

BS in Computer Science, IS, or other related field. Or equivalent work experience

Technical Skills Required

Stat & Data Tools "" Python, Machine Learning, SQL, Spark, Data Visualization
Data & Cloud Tools "" Hadoop, AWS Big Data Stack (S3, Spark, Lambda, Presto, Athena, Kinesis, Redshift)
Scripting Tools "" Linux/Unix, Shell Scripts",3.2,"Numeric, LLC","Philadelphia, PA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,20,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,PA,2266,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
732,732,UX Data Scientist (Python),$77k-$109k,"JOB DESCRIPTION:
Summary
As the Data Scientist on the Experience Research Team you will bring the power of our data to our team.
The analytics you deliver will strategically advance how Client ideates, builds, measures, and improves its own products.
You will use your quantitative skills to analyze disparate user data sources (e.g., NPS, Social Media, Behavioral data, Product feedback, User reported data) to present comprehensive views of user experience.

What Success Looks Like in the Role
You inspire those around you to be obsessed with data and the stories you can tell. You love turning data into insights. You thrive when people take-action on the insights you provide. You work effectively cross-team and you understand the importance of building strong relationships and earning trust and credibility. You have successfully helped this organization harness the power to tell our own stories with our own data.
Ideal years of Experience: 3-5 years

Responsibilities
Designs, develops and programs methods, processes, and systems to consolidate and analyze unstructured, diverse “big data” sources to generate actionable insights and solutions to support our own programs.
Interacts with product and teams to identify questions and issues for data analysis and experiments.
Develops and codes software programs, algorithms and automated processes to cleanse, integrate and evaluate large datasets from multiple disparate sources.
Identifies meaningful insights from large data and metadata sources; interprets and communicates insights and findings from analysis and experiments.
Be an internal leader in basic statistics including descriptive statistics, correlation and regression.

Must have skillsets:
• 3+ years work experience
• Strong quantitative analytical skills; with statistical analysis competence in techniques such as correlation, regression, KPI metric development, segmentation modeling and algorithms
• Fluent in either Python or R, able to query data using SQL, has experience working with cloud based computing platforms and big data tools.
• Experience in data mining, advanced data manipulation, machine learning and statistical analysis.
• Experience with data visualization and communication projects using software like Tableau
• Strong verbal and written communication skills to present analysis and insights including trends and opportunities to stakeholders and the business
• Believes in eating one's own dog food and using that experience to drive the creation of exceptional customer facing products
• High standard of detail, excellence, professionalism, and role model behavior
• Master’s Degree in Business Analytics, Data Analytics, or Data Science, with a BA/BS in Economics, Finance, Management, Marketing or Social Science

CONTACT INFORMATION:
Alan Bui
Alan@OSIengineering.com
408-550-2800 x 106
OSIJOBS",4.6,OSI Engineering,"San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,10,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,CA,2854,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
733,733,Data Scientist,$77k-$109k,"We are looking for a Data Scientist to analyze large amounts of raw information to find patterns that will help improve our company. We will rely on you to build data products to extract valuable business insights.
In this role, you should be highly analytical with a knack for analysis, math, and statistics. Critical thinking and problem-solving skills are essential for interpreting data. Your goal will be to help our company analyze trends to make better decisions.

Key Roles:
Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis

Define and measure intangible business metrics

Communicate research and ideas to leadership

Implement new statistical or other mathematical methods as needed for specific models

Work with team to develop solutions through appropriate database use and system parameters

What you need to Know:
Robust pattern recognition

Predictive modeling skills

Statistical analytics

Data analytics

Programming languages: VB/C#/T-SQL recommended

Extensive (5+ years) data mining experience",4.0,Better Hire,"Birmingham, AL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,AL,1033,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
734,734,Data Scientist,$77k-$109k,"Tiger Analytics is looking for experienced Data Scientists to join our fast-growing advanced analytics consulting firm. Our consultants bring deep expertise in Data Science, Machine Learning and AI. We are the trusted analytics partner for multiple Fortune 500 companies, enabling them to generate business value from data. Our business value and leadership has been recognized by various market research firms, including Forrester and Gartner. We are looking for top-notch talent as we continue to build the best global analytics consulting team in the world.

As a Data Scientist, you will apply strong expertise in AI through the use of machine learning, data mining, and information retrieval to design, prototype, and build next generation advanced analytics engines and services. You will collaborate with cross-functional teams and business partners to define the technical problem statement and hypotheses to test. You will develop efficient and accurate analytical models which mimic business decisions and incorporate those models into analytical data products and tools. You will have the opportunity to drive current and future strategy by leveraging your analytical skills as you ensure business value and communicate the results.

Key Responsibilities
Collaborate with business partners to develop innovative solutions to meet objectives utilizing cutting edge techniques and tools.
Effectively communicate the analytics approach and how it will meet and address objectives to business partners.
Advocate and educate on the value of data-driven decision making; focus on the “how and why” of solutioning.
Lead analytic approaches; integrate solutions collaboratively into applications and tools with data engineers, business leads, analysts and developers.
Create repeatable, interpretable, dynamic and scalable models that are seamlessly incorporated into analytic data products.
Engineer features by using your business acumen to find new ways to combine disparate internal and external data sources.
Share your passion for Data Science with the broader enterprise community; identify and develop long-term processes, frameworks, tools, methods and standards.
Collaborate, coach, and learn with a growing team of experienced Data Scientists.
Stay connected with external sources of ideas through conferences and community engagements
Requirements
Bachelors Degree in Data Science, Computer Science, or related field
2-5 years of Data Science and Machine Learning experience required
Proficiency in Python or R. Ability to write complex SQL queries
Proficiency with Machine Learning concepts and modeling techniques to solve problems such as clustering, classification, regression, anomaly detection, simulation and optimization problems on large scale data sets.
Ability to implement ML best practices for the entire Data Science lifecycle
Ability to apply various analytical models to business use cases (NLP, Supervised, Un-Supervised, Neural Nets, etc.)
Exceptional communication and collaboration skills to understand business partner needs and deliver solutions
Bias for action, with the ability to deliver outstanding results through task prioritization and time management
Experience with data visualization tools — Tableau, R Shiny, etc. preferred
Benefits

This position offers an excellent opportunity for significant career development in a fast-growing and challenging entrepreneurial environment with a high degree of individual responsibility.",4.6,Tiger Analytics,"Hartford, CT",-1,201 to 500 Employees,9,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,CT,3473,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
738,738,Data Scientist,$77k-$109k,"About Datadog:

We're on a mission to build the best platform in the world for engineers to understand and scale their systems, applications, and teams. We operate at high scale—trillions of data points per day—providing always-on alerting, metrics visualization, logs, and application tracing for tens of thousands of companies. Our engineering culture values pragmatism, honesty, and simplicity to solve hard problems the right way.

The team:

The Cloud Cost Optimization team works directly with the CTO and is responsible for identifying and executing on cost-saving opportunities, providing engineering teams actionable visibility into spend, and empowering finance to understand and incorporate the complexities of cloud costs.

The opportunity:

As a Data Scientist on the CloudOps team, you’ll work with and analyze usage and billing data generated from cloud applications. Datadog operates in sophisticated multi-cloud, multi-region, classical, containerized, and serverless environments, and you will be responsible to unify these disparate sources and disentangle their primary cost drivers. You will share your work directly with the highest levels of leadership at Datadog and it will have an impact on the direction of the engineering organization.

You will:
Build marginal cost models using cloud usage and cost data, and use these models to discover trends and build forecasts
Own and refine cloud provider billing data ingestion pipelines
Develop new ways to understand the relationship between cloud resource consumption in complex containerized environments and business drivers
Think deeply about what data and actionable views to surface from CxO down to individual engineers deploying new projects
Develop metrics that bring clarity too complicated environments including containers, shared resources, and bespoke cost variables.
Requirements:
You’ve worked with leadership to define a problem space, select questions to be answered, and created repeatable compelling reporting to “solve” stakeholder understanding
You have experience creating and maintaining data ETL pipelines using Spark, Luigi, Airflow, and other open-source technologies using programming languages like Python, Scala, SQL
You’re comfortable spending the day in notebooks (Zeppelin, Jupyter, Observable, etc) and have frequently used notebooks to share findings and create insight for yourself and others
You enjoy getting to the bottom of arcane data sets; and creating logic to make those same datasets understandable to the masses
You’re comfortable with ambiguity in the early stages of a project; and appreciate the work needed to determine the how in reaching an objective
You’re familiar with cloud infrastructure; and what an engineers may consider when deciding on a serverless solution, or a particular cloud server.
You have a BS/MS/PhD in a scientific/quantitative field or equivalent experience
Bonus points:
Have previously worked with cloud provider billing data
Interested in business outcomes, high impact projects that have a tangible result on business metrics. You’ve worked on these projects in the past and are eager for more.
You’ve faced a tradeoff between increasing infrastructure cost or increasing the cost to team time. You’ve been woken up by infrastructure alarms.
You hold some strong opinions on the features in AWS Cost Explorer, the GCP billing console, or Azure Cost Management + Billing",4.2,Datadog,"New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,10,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,NY,3419,0,data scientist,1,0,0,1,0,1,1,0,0
740,740,Data Scientist,$77k-$109k,"Job Description

EIA Strategic Consultancy Roles- Job Description

1) Data Scientist

 5+ years of machine learning/ Data Science experience in developing and implementing large scale algorithms impacting business revenues and customer experience

 Degree (MS or PhD) in either Maths / Statistics / Computer science / Other quantitative field

 Preferred Certification: Certified Analytics Professional

 Great communication skills for storytelling, data visualization and presentation across stakeholders and functional teams.

 Strong experience in the data mining / data analysis methods

o Predictive modeling and running simulations to increase and optimize business outcomes.

o Analysis and processing of large complex data sets for product and process optimization.

o Advance statistical techniques and concepts

o Machine learning algorithms like Decision trees, Regression, Support vector Machines, Kernel methods, Neural networks, K-Means Clustering

 Languages: R, Python, SAS, Matlab, SQL

 Frameworks/ Libraries: Keras, Caffe, Theano, TensorFlow,

• Visualizing tools : Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, etc

• Distributed data/computing tools: Haddop, Map/Reduce, Hive, Spark, MySQL, etc.

• NoSQL databases-: MongoDB, Cassandra, HBase

Job Function

TECHNOLOGY

Role

Developer

Job Id

162490

Desired Skills

Data scientist",3.7,Tata Consultancy Services (North America),"Pleasanton, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,52,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,CA,1356,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,1,0,0
743,743,Data Scientist,$60k-$133k,"Summary:

The Data Scientist functions with a high degree of autonomy and is responsible for building and optimizing data systems, creating Machine Learning models, analyzing Big Data for Toyoda Gosei (TG) North America Corporation (TGNA), and TG Americas Manufacturing Companies (AMCs).

Primary Duties and Responsibilities:
Design and select the most appropriate modeling techniques and data visualization for Big Data analysis
Perform analysis to determine functional/user, and conceptual/logical/physical design requirements for system and user interface design and functionality
Design and implement Reports and Dashboards using BI tools
Participate in projects aimed at improving prediction, driving optimization, and developing processes via advanced statistical / mathematical methods in an enterprise production environment
Maintain up-to-date algorithms and methods for Machine Learning and Analytics
Consistently engage in learning activity to stay abreast of mathematical and technical methodology as it applies to data visualization Provide expertise and support to AMCs on data quality and software process improvement (SPI)
Assist in the development of a proprietary IOT system, ensuring machine interoperability and centralized data aggregation
Collaborate with AMCs to centralize & ensure horizontal deployment (Yokoten) of data modeling knowledge/standards
Software programming on an as-needed basis to ensure system stability, usability, and functional requirements are met utilizing ASP.Net and C# languages
Collaborate cross functionally to ensure effective system deployment, including training, for all AMCs
Drive optimization by being actively engaged in continuous improvement efforts (kaizen)
This role requires the completion of other duties as assigned
Qualifications and Competencies:
Minimum of Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math (or other related areas) or equivalent years of relevant experience is required; Master degree preferred
Able to understand various data structures and common methods in data transformation
Experience in statistical modeling, machine learning, or data mining practice
Experience in SQL, relational databases, database concepts, dimensional modeling and database design
Experience with BI tools
Proficient in one or more programming languages such as C#, Python, .NET
Strong analytical and quantitative problem solving ability
Ability to consistently meet deadlines is required
Effective verbal, non-verbal, negotiation and written communication skills are required
Ability to sustain a high degree of professionalism in interacting with internal and external customers is required
Effective attention to detail, problem solving, analytical and organizational skills is required",2.9,Toyoda Gosei North America Corporation,"Troy, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,71,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,MI,2765,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
744,744,"Data Scientist, Commerce Platform",$60k-$133k,"Company DescriptionSquare builds common business tools in unconventional ways so more people can start, run, and grow their businesses. When Square started, it was difficult and expensive (or just plain impossible) for some businesses to take credit cards. Square made credit card payments possible for all by turning a mobile phone into a credit card reader. Since then Square has been building an entire business toolkit of both hardware and software products including Square Capital, Square Terminal, Square Payroll, and more. We’re working to find new and better ways to help businesses succeed on their own terms—and we’re looking for people like you to help shape tomorrow at Square.Job Description

Data Scientist at Square are embedded within product teams and use engineering and analytics to empower data-driven decision-making in the full life cycle of product development. As a member of the Commerce Platform team, you will lead experimentation and growth projects, develop automation solutions to personalize product experiences, provide insights to our sellers about their business, and promote strategic decisions with data. Squares mission is economic empowerment, and our team supports this by using data to understand and empathize with our customers, thereby helping us build a remarkable product experience.

You will:
Work with product partners across the organization by applying descriptive and predictive analytics where it will have material impact
Apply a diverse set of tactics including statistics, quantitative reasoning, and machine learning to produce applicable insights
Manage and solve complex problems that extend beyond the traditional boundaries of product domains, analytics, and data science
Communicate analysis and decisions to high-level partners and executives
Lead the data strategy of embedded product engineering by helping them make well-informed architecture and design decisions
Provide comprehensive analytics support to partner teams, develop tools to empower data access and self-service so your expertise can be used where it is most needed
Qualifications

You have:
2+ years of analytics experience or equivalent
Experience leading cross-functional projects that depend on the contributions of others in many disciplines
Fluency with data, analytics and visualization technologies (We primarily use SQL, Looker, and Python)
Experience in applying both data-backed heuristics and machine-learning techniques to solve practical product problems such as predicting churn, cross selling, clustering user archetypes, and more
Familiarity with data warehouse design, development and best practices
Additional InformationAt Square, we value diversity and always treat all employees and job applicants based on merit, qualifications, competence, and talent. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. We will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance. Applicants in need of special assistance or accommodation during the interview process or in accessing our website may contact us by sending an email to assistance(at)squareup.com. We will treat your request as confidentially as possible. In your email, please include your name and preferred method of contact, and we will respond as soon as possible.

Perks

At Square, we want you to be well and thrive. Our global benefits package includes:
Healthcare coverage
Retirement Plans
Employee Stock Purchase Program
Wellness perks
Paid parental leave
Flexible time off
Learning and Development resources",4.0,Square,"Atlanta, GA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,11,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,GA,3739,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
745,745,"Data Scientist, Apple Pay Marketing Analytics",$60k-$133k,"Posted: Sep 1, 2020
Role Number:
200189417
We are looking for a talented, hardworking and results-oriented individual to join our team and develop new insights to help craft the future of Apple Pay. You are skilled analytically as well as have a good business mind. You will be a thought partner to the business, understand their goals and then use your analytics powers to surface actionable insights in support of these goals. You will collaborate with partners across marketing, product, and business teams to drive your recommendations thru fruition. Our culture is about getting things done iteratively and rapidly, with open feedback and debate along the way; we believe analytics is a team sport, but we strive for independent decision-making and taking smart risks.
Key Qualifications
You have 5+ years of progressive work experience in marketing analytics
Expertise in building sophisticated models to improve relevancy of our marketing efforts. Help ensure we send the right message to the right person at the right time!
Prior experience with measuring the efficacy of various marketing programs using Fixed/Random effects or Mix Modeling
Prior experience with forecasting and/or market sizing for new initiatives
Proficient with SQL. Experience with big data technologies such as Hadoop and Spark preferred.
Familiarity with Python or R and data visualization tools such as Tableau for full-stack data analysis, insight synthesis and presentation.
Experience with large, complex and fragmented datasets and breaking them down into easy to consume insights.
Must be able to synthesize complex analytics into simple and straightforward presentations to senior executive.
You are comfortable with ambiguity and have a proven ability to prioritize between multiple priorities to lead high quality work to tight deadlines
Prior experience working with financial products desirable
Description
You will play a key role in improving the Apple Pay marketing experience. You will engage with the marketing team thru the entire customer lifecycle of acquire, develop, deepen, retain and reactivate and use your analytics expertise to uncover new opportunities as well as guide in the tuning of existing programs. Your Day to Day Activities will Include:

Deep dives in large-scale data to identify key insights and opportunities,

Supervised and unsupervised learning.

A/B testing, creation of synthetic controls, and causal inference. Define how best to measure and monitor Apple Pay marketing initiatives.

Build and maintain positive relationships with key partners across the company to optimally deliver actionable insights. Partner with other Apple organizations on data gathering, data governance, democratizing data with reporting tools and evangelizing critical metrics.
Education & Experience",4.2,Apple,"Austin, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,44,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,TX,2805,0,data scientist,1,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
746,746,Computer Vision Data Scientist,$60k-$133k,"Enlitic is on the verge of transforming patient care by bridging human and artificial intelligence to identify medical issues earlier and more accurately. We were founded in San Francisco in 2014 and our team has since expanded to New York, Vancouver, Canada, and Melbourne, Australia.

We believe that our ground-breaking work will help save time, money, and most importantly, lives - a belief shared by our investors who have fueled our work with $55 million to date. We have also garnered the attention of CNN, The Wall Street Journal, The New York Times, Inc. and Fortune among other global media outlets, and we were named one of the smartest AI companies by MIT Tech Review.

At Enlitic, our Deep Learning Research Engineers are both Researchers and Engineers. We’re a highly collaborative and as part of our growing team, you will play a key role in building and developing our tools from the ground up.
The exciting things you will get to do:
Your primary mission is to put deep learning algorithms into practice, while growing your own expertise in deep learning
Run experiments to test hypotheses with the team members including MDs, Researchers and Engineers
You will get to participate in writing and crafting research publications and share-out in reading groups
Attend, and sometimes speak or present at, some of the best medical and tech conferences in the world
You will have independent responsibility for one or two modeling projects
Participate in a feedback loop to figure out the ways we can use deep learning to maximize the impact on patient care
The experience and qualifications we hope you bring to the position:
Bachelor's Degree in related field - Masters, PhD, or MD highly preferred
Math background (calculus, linear algebra, statistics)
Prior deep learning experience is required
Must have experience in computer vision
Project experience, either from industry or research (not course project, but paper making project)
You have strong coding skills, and can work in languages ranging from Python to C++ in a team development environment
You are familiar with scientific computing and systems and have quick model prototyping experience in TensorFlow (preferred)/PyTorch/Theano with GPUs
Travel up to 50%.
Major Bonus: Medical imaging background, clinical or healthcare experience, publications (ICML, NeurIPS, ICLR, CVPR, ICCV, MICCAI, MIDL), a developed Github to share, awards in healthcare related competitions
We celebrate diversity at our company and are proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, gender identity, or disability status. We understand that to hire the best talent, we need to search the globe. We encourage our employees to be themselves and require tolerance and acceptance among our diverse talent.",4.8,Enlitic,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,CA,2897,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,1
747,747,Principal Data Scientist 200000CC,$60k-$133k,"Principal Data Scientist 200000CC
Work Location: Columbus, IN (During Covid19 duration, remote work highly probable)

No, this isnt one of those ordinary jobs.
We are a team of dependable, innovative thinkers, who are empowered to generate and deliver solutions for customers, community, and environment. Our employees develop their careers through the challenges only a diverse, global innovator can promise. This is a collaborative culture where thinking beyond your desk is more than part of the job. It is the job.

Description
Technology. Flexibility. Diversity. At the center of it all are the Digital Accelerator and Advanced Analytics teams and working together as a high-energy startup within a Fortune 500 organization. At this Midwestern technology hub, todays sharpest, most curious minds transform what-ifs into realities.
Youll have global opportunities to develop your career and make your community a better place - to break ground professionally and be your best personally.
This is an exciting opportunity in Columbus, IN for a Principal Data Scientist
Manages and Implements advanced analytics projects which solve complex analytical problems using quantitative approaches through a combination of analytical, mathematical and technical skills
Researches, designs, implements and validates cutting-edge algorithms to analyze diverse sources of data to achieve targeted outcomes by leveraging complex statistical and predictive modeling concepts, machine-learning approaches, clustering and classification techniques
Liaises with business stakeholders and leverages business knowledge to industrialize and monetize insights from advanced analytics projects
Leads key objectives and business goals through the use of data science methodology
Leverages data science methodology to more complex business problems
Creates algorithms using more complex statistical methodologies through the use of statistical programming languages and tools
Partners with domain experts to verify model capabilities and translate modeling outputs from statistical inferences into business language
Partners with IT resources to enable appropriate data flow/data model, development using appropriate tools/technology, rapid prototyping and informs the design of analytical products
Trains and mentors less experienced employees on data science tools and methodologies.
Experience
Minimum of 7 years of professional experience
Skills
Abstract Reasoning - Envisions a solution before implementation by analyzing data, extracting patterns and relationships to establish a problem or solution's feasibility; develops new algorithms and analytical models using process diagrams, flow charts, and textual documentation to explain or conceptualize a complex problem.
Data Mining - Identifies relationships and patterns in data by using a suite of data exploration and data visualization techniques using tools such as PowerBI, R Shiny, SAS JMP, and extracts insights into multivariate data by applying principles of multivariate data mining, small sample statistical inferential tests, dimension reduction techniques to understand the underlying structure of the data and enable sound conclusions upon model building.
Predictive Modeling - Develops statistical and machine learning models using appropriate variable transformations, feature selection strategies, imputation strategies, class rebalancing, resampling strategies and performance metrics to generate descriptive, explanatory or predictive models.
Statistical Foundations - Builds statistical explanatory models for regression, classification, outlier detection, anomaly detection, time series forecasting using knowledge of foundational statistics such as Null Hypotheses Significance Tests, regression models, generalized linear modeling, time series analysis, rank statistics, probability distribution fitting survival analysis, etc. to validate hypotheses or generate predictions for any given statistical or business question.
System Simulation - Creates models of interconnected systems under dynamic operating conditions using mathematical models for physical and mechanical systems (such as Markov chains and Monte Carlo methods) and various simulation packages to reproduce the behavioral characteristics of the system(s) being simulated and to gain insight into how the system(s) reacts under different operating conditions.
Requirements Analysis - Evaluates relationships and interdependencies between requirements based upon their complexity and value to the business in order to determine feasibility and prioritization.
Strategic Roadmap Planning - Produces a high-level, multi-year product and capability roadmap utilizing internal and external business resource, asset and market knowledge and experience to communicate the organization's focus and priorities to internal and external stakeholders.
Customer focus - Building strong customer relationships and delivering customer-centric solutions.
Manages complexity - Making sense of complex, high quantity, and sometimes contradictory information to effectively solve problems.
Balances stakeholders - Anticipating and balancing the needs of multiple stakeholders.
Directs work - Providing direction, delegating, and removing obstacles to get work done
Drives results - Consistently achieving results, even under tough circumstances.
Education, Licenses, Certifications
College, university, or equivalent degree in statistics, information systems or related field required.
PhD or Masters degree in Statistics, Econometrics, Computer Science, or equivalent experience preferred.
Compensation and Benefits
Base hourly rate commensurate with experience . Additional benefits vary between locations and include options such as our 401(k) Retirement Savings Plan, Cash Balance Pension Plan, Medical/Dental/Life Insurance, Health Savings Account, Domestic Partners Coverage and a full complement of personal and professional benefits.
E-verify
We are an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer dedicated to diversity in the workplace. Our policy is to provide equal employment opportunities to all qualified persons without regard to race, gender, color, disability, national origin, age, religion, union affiliation, sexual orientation, veteran status, citizenship, gender identity and/or expression, or other status protected by law. Cummins validates right to work using E-Verify.
We will provide the Social Security Administration (SSA) and, if necessary, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS), with information from each new employees Form I-9 to confirm work authorization. To learn more about E-Verify, including your rights and responsibilities, please visit www.dhs.gov/E-Verify .",2.0,Tech-Connect,"Denver, CO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,CO,6717,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
750,750,Data Scientist,$60k-$133k,"Job TITLE: Data Scientist

Location: Santa Clara, CA

Term: Full Time

Skill: We are looking for a Data Scientist who has passion for data and can help us make smarter decisions to deliver even better products by discovering hidden information in vast amount of data. Primary focus will be on improving customer business outcomes through optimization and applying data-mining techniques, doing statistical analysis and building high quality prediction systems. Strong verbal and written communication, thoroughness and self-check personality are critical for success in this role.

• Build statistical & predictive analytics models that can be translated into various product strategy and marketing decisions
• Deep dive into data, understand hidden patterns and trends, build prediction models.
• Perform data analysis, gap analysis and drive to enhance data collection procedures by coordinating with the product team
• Coordinate with the infrastructure team for prediction model integration and to establish feedback loops thru machine learning and recalibration.
• Perform various analyses: sentimental analysis, market bucket analysis, cohort analysis, churns analysis.
• Build & monitor visually appealing real-time dashboards, as well as, develop Splunk queries & Splunk custom inputs.
• Drive for success across teams and customers
• Maintain and manage SLA
• Analyze individual issues in the context of overall platform to proactively identify larger problems
• Documentation of issues, resolutions and processes
• Contribute in data engineering efforts
• Coordinate and collaborate with development team to remain current on code and technology

Experience: • 4+ years of strong experience in Predictive Analysis, Machine Learning & Statistical Modeling using languages like Python, R, Ruby
• 5+ years of strong SQL and RDBMS experience
• 2+ years of strong experience of programming in languages like Python, C++, Java, Ruby
• 2+ years of experience working with AWS including services like RDS, Redshift, DynamoDB, Postgress, data pipeline
• 2+ years of experience in data visualization such as D3.js etc.
• 1+ years of experience working with cloud and web technologies including XML, JSON, HTML5, Web frameworks (Django, Flask), Elastic Search
• Experience with Splunk
• Experience with data analysis
• Desire and ability to learn new technologies
• Good applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression, etc.
• Strong written and verbal communications skills
• Experience working with off-shore teams
• Passion of data and data driven decisions

Education: BIG PLUS:

• Experience with map-reduce paradigm with hadoop-hive environment
• Experience with NoSQL databases, MongoDB, Cassandra, HBase, Redis, Unstructured data
• Any type of contribution to open source community
• Experience with reporting tools Tableau, Pentaho BI
• Experience with ETL and Data-Warehouse",4.1,Flexton,"Santa Clara, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,13,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,CA,2917,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
751,751,Data Scientist,$60k-$133k,"Analytica is seeking a Data Scientist to support long term federal client engagement across health or federal financial regulatory environments. The position will apply statistical programming, modeling, visualization techniques, data mining, and forecasting skills to analyze public sector use cases. The ideal candidate will enjoy engaging with stakeholders, learning their business problems, providing technical guidance, and evangelizing the teams data science capabilities. This position is supporting clients in the DC Metro area.

Requirements:
Feature Engineering and Attribute Evaluation - Candidate must demonstrate experience with identifying the key determinants for modeling that exist in the business process and within existing data sets, as well as selecting evaluation protocols (model techniques).
Pre-processing - Demonstrate the skills and experience to collect, clean, and prepare data sets for input into a computational model using technologies such as Python, SAS, SQL or R. Candidates will explain various methods you have applied using common pre-processing functions.
Modeling - Candidates will have practiced skills and experience selecting and applying modeling techniques to fit the business problem. Ideal candidates should be able to apply machine learning (ML) supervised and unsupervised learning, regression, neural networks and deep learning, natural language processing, etc.
Validation - Candidates will have experience investigating, testing, reporting, and justifying model results.
Visualization Candidates should be comfortable presenting the results of their modeling activities, depicting the insights realized, and explaining the relevance of their results to the organizations business challenges
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Physics, Computer Science, or another quantitative field; Master's degree or PhD a plus
One (1)+ years in data science, data engineering, as a statistician, or a related quantitative field
Strong problem-solving skills, leveraging domain knowledge, information technology, and data science techniques
High degree of experience utilizing SAS, R, or Python to support the development of complex statistical use cases
Experience implementing unsupervised (e.g., clustering), semi-supervised (e.g., label propagation) and supervised learning (e.g., ensemble classifiers) algorithms, and when it is appropriate to use each is a strong plus
Experience querying data from relational databases using SQL
Experience with development of predictive analytics models
Experience working in an Agile project management environment
Must be a U.S. Citizen and be able to obtain and maintain a security clearance
About ANALYTICA: Analytica is a leading consulting and information technology solutions provider to public sector organizations supporting health, civilian, and national security missions. Founded in 2009 and headquartered in Bethesda, MD, the company is an established SBA certified HUBZone and 8(a) small business that has been recognized by Inc. Magazine each of the past three years as one of the 250",3.7,Analytica,"Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,11,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,DC,3105,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
752,752,Data Scientist,$60k-$133k,"Performs advanced data design and analysis using the Electronic Medical Record (EMR) to create new knowledge useful to KP and outside organizations. Extracts and cleans large volumes of healthcare data across dozens of sources. Applies expert statistical methodologies to clinical outcomes. Partners effectively with physicians, other clinicians, software engineers and business managers to communicate findings using data visualization techniques.

Essential Responsibilities:
Works with physicians, epidemiologists, statisticians, business managers, and software engineers, to formulate and scope questions and translate knowledge into care transformation
Develops algorithms and predictive models to solve critical health service problems
Influences a general audience to understand the quality, completeness, and appropriate use of data
Provides advice about choice of statistical approaches, perform statistical analysis
Develops tools and libraries to create efficiencies for future work
Develops systematic approaches to assure data validity.
Identifies new sources of data within the electronic medical record that will improve information about target diseases and clinical processes.
Establishes links across existing data sources; process large volumes of data needed for complex research/operational studies
Trains Data Consultants and other data workers.
Kaiser Permanente conducts compensation reviews of positions on a routine basis. At any time, Kaiser Permanente reserves the right to reevaluate and change job descriptions, or to change such positions from salaried to hourly pay status. Such changes are generally implemented only after notice is given to affected employees.

Basic Qualifications:
Experience
Minimum eight (8) years of experience with multivariate data analysis commonly used in epidemiology (e.g. logistic regression, linear regression, cluster analysis, Cox proportional hazard analysis, GEE, and hierarchical models).
Minimum eight (8) years of experience writing and executing complex queries to extract/process data (e.g. SQL), including linking tables and variables from very large datasets.
Minimum eight (8) years of programming experience to build and validate machine language and statistical algorithms and to perform statistical analysis (e.g. R, Python, SAS)
Education
Master's degree required in a quantitative health field (epidemiology, math/statistics, bioinformatics) or computer science.
License, Certification, Registration
N/A

Additional Requirements:
Demonstrated understanding of data systems and architecture.
Experience using data science, AI, and machine-learning platforms to build and deploy supervised and unsupervised models.
Demonstrated ability to create and execute solutions to complex data science problems.
Demonstrated ability to lead project efforts, communicate effectively with team members, and guide decision making.
Advanced knowledge of data visualization tool principles, theories, and concepts.

Preferred Qualifications:
Experience working with electronic medical record, to conduct health research and analytics.
Experience using novel open source software for analytic and non-analytic processing.
Experience with health record standards, including HL7 and other interchange and coding standards highly desirable.
Advanced training in biostatistics and/or statistics (degree or continuing education).
Demonstrated scholarly activities to advance the field (e.g., teaching, presentations at conferences, lead or co-authorship of scientific manuscripts).
Demonstrated understanding of clinical workflows.
Demonstrated proficiency with Natural Language Processing.
Well versed in open source libraries and methodologies for creating data workflows composed of most appropriate technologies, including command line tools, containerized tools, microservices, etc.

Kaiser Permanente is an equal opportunity employer committed to a diverse and inclusive workforce. Applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy), age, sexual orientation, national origin, marital status, parental status, ancestry, disability, gender identity, veteran status, genetic information, other distinguishing characteristics of diversity and inclusion, or any other protected status.

External hires must pass a background check/drug screen. Qualified applicants with arrest and/or conviction records will be considered for employment in a manner consistent with federal and state laws, as well as applicable local ordinances, including but not limited to the San Francisco and Los Angeles Fair Chance Ordinances.",4.0,Kaiser Permanente,"Oakland, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,75,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,CA,4643,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
755,755,Data Scientist,$60k-$133k,"Junior Data Scientist

DEFINITION 6

Atlanta, GA

THE POSITION:


At DEFINITION 6 were plugged into change across markets, industries, and technologies and were on a mission to keep our clients ahead of the curve. Our powerhouse team is actively seeking a Junior Data Scientist to join our rapidly growing agency. This role will be responsible for managing all aspects of our advanced analytics platform including building out the data pipeline, performing in-depth analysis using statistical modeling and machine learning techniques, and communicating results to clients, helping them make more informed decisions to drive their business forward.

KEY RESPONSIBILITIES:

Applies in-depth analytical and machine learning knowledge, to filter, prioritize and validate potentially complex and dynamic data from multiple sources, contributing to the development of new techniques and the improvement of processes and work-flow for D6 Clients
Enhancing data collection procedures to include information that is relevant for building analytics and machine learning workflows including processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis.
Conducts strategic data analysis, identifies insights and implications and makes strategic recommendations, develops data displays that clearly communicate complex analysis
Integrates subject matter and industry expertise within client domain
Regularly assumes informal/formal leadership role within teams
Involved in coaching and training of new recruits
Extending clients data with third party sources of information when needed
Deliver analytics initiatives to address business problems with the ability to determine data required, assess time & effort required and establish a plan
Considers the business implications of the application of technology to the current business environment; identifies and communicates risks and impacts
Drives communication between business leaders and IT; exhibits sound and comprehensive communication and diplomacy skills to exchange complex information
REQUIRED SKILLS & QUALIFICATIONS:

B.S. in Computer Science, Math, Engineering, Finance, or related quantitative field
5-8 years experience in business and data analysis. Ability to effectively use complex analytical, interpretive and problem solving techniques. Experience using tools for statistical modeling of large data sets
2-4 years work experience in machine learning, data engineering, data mining, statistical analysis, auditing, and/or forecasting
Professional experience with MS Excel, SQL Server
An intermediary understanding of SQL and some knowledge of one other scripting/compiled/statistical programming language (e.g. Python, R)
Experience building reports/analyses with analytical tools (e.g. Excel, QlikSense, Tableau, etc.)
Experience with Salesforce Ecosystem a plus
Experience with machine learning platforms like SageMaker, DataBricks a plus
SOFT SKILLS:

Strong presentation and communications skills
Critical thinking skills to identify the strengths and weaknesses of alternative solutions; ability to understand and foresee implications of new information for current and future problems solving
An intellectual curiosity for getting at the underlying story being told within the data
Respectful, passionate & open-minded
ABOUT:


DEFINITION 6 is a full-service agency that has delivered award-winning strategy, storytelling, and solutions for more than 20 years. Our clients dont hire us for more of the same thats why were laser-focused on building a culture of thinkers, creators and adapters. From our open-door policy to dog-friendly offices (and company-wide parties) workplace well-being isnt a throwaway phrase. Its how we do business.

TL;DR
We are always polished, always thinking, and always ready for a good time.

Plus:
• Flexible PTO

• Comprehensive benefits plans

• Endless growth & career opportunities",4.1,DEFINITION 6,"Atlanta, GA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,23,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,GA,3898,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
756,756,Data Scientist (Entry Level),$60k-$133k,"Why Work With Us

Strike is a leader in the fast-growing marketing technology sector. We're not just succeeding, we're kicking butt. Come help build the next generation of advertising and marketing technology using the latest technologies including Machine Learning, Real-time Analytics, and Experimental Modeling on the Strike Marketing Cloud/Data Warehouse. Strike has offices in Chicago, San Francisco, Los Angeles, New York, Singapore, Australia, the Philippines and Poland.

Data Scientist (Entry Level)

Who you are:

You are someone who takes pride in your work, seeks order in chaos, and wants the opportunity to work with like-minded individuals. You are a leader, not a follower, with an innovative spirit who wants to collaborate with a team of brilliant minds in our quest to generate amazing insights.

What youll do:

We are working on some challenging problems that require bright minds and grit to help us solve. We work in an agile environment with lots of cool toys. Our Data Scientists research and create our learning infrastructure using Python and then work with Data Engineering to build micro services into our data lake.

A career at Strike is an exciting journey where you will:
Partner with product development teams to research, design and implement learning systems that recommend, optimize, and predict marketing campaign performance for top brands across multiple advertising platforms including YouTube (Adwords and DV360), Facebook/Instagram, LinkedIn, Snapchat, Pinterest and more
Develop algorithms and models that inform customer activities
Participate in the architecture and development of a closed-loop learning system reading and feeding our private data warehouse
Play a key role architecting and building our Marketing Data Warehouse
Report progress, issues and status at daily and weekly stand-ups
Stay abreast of emerging technologies and new design approaches
Provide technical leadership both within and outside the technology team
What you need:
Bachelors degree or higher - Quantitative field such as Computing Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Physics, or Engineering
2+ years of strong mathematical and statistical data analysis experience
2+ years of experimental data / modeling experience
2+ years of Machine Learning experience including black box and bespoke solutions
2+ years of Python development experience
Agile software development methodology experience and test-driven development experience
Take pride in writing clean dependable algorithms
Strong ability to analyze problems and formulate effective solutions
Sharp critical thinking skills, including systems and business analysis, problem analysis and resolution, and sound judgment/decision making ability
Proven ability to work in a rapid release product environment
Impress us with:
Masters or PhD - Quantitative field such as Statistics, Mathematics, Physics, or Engineering
Experience with Database optimization and maintenance
Experience to develop and deploy Machine Learning and Algorithmic micro services
Working at Strike Social

Strike is a close-knit, work-hard/play-hard environment. If you want a fun, challenging and rewarding experience, apply to join our team! Aside from standard (and generous) employee benefits, Strike offers an open office environment, casual dress code, a spectacular Loop location and frequent team outings.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status or disability status.

Direct inquiries only, no recruiters please.

Powered by JazzHR",4.3,Strike Social,"Chicago, IL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,7,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,IL,3667,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,1,0,1
757,757,Data Scientist,$60k-$133k,"About Us:

Cityblock Health is the first tech-driven provider for communities with complex needsbringing better care to where it's needed most, block by block. Founded in 2017 on the premise that ""health is local"" and based in Brooklyn, we are backed by Alphabet's Sidewalk Labs along with some of the top healthcare investors in the country.

Our mission is to improve the health of underserved communities. Importantly, our solutions are designed specifically for Medicaid and lower-income Medicare beneficiaries, and we meet our members where they are, bringing care into the home and neighborhoods through our community-based care teams and Virtual Care offerings.

In close collaboration with community-based organizations, local providers, and leading health plans, we are reorganizing the health system to focus on what matters to our members. Equipped with world-class, custom care delivery technology, we deliver personalized primary care, behavioral health, and social services to deliver a radically better experience of care for every member and community we serve.

Over the next year, we'll grow quickly to bring better care to many more members and their communities. To do this, we need people who, like us, believe that everyone should have good care for what matters to them, in their community.

Our work is grounded in a belief in the power of a diverse community. To close gaps in care and advance equity in the communities we serve, we have to start with making our own team diverse and inclusive. Our ways of working are characterized by creativity, collaboration, and mutual learning that comes from bringing together a community from diverse backgrounds and perspectives. We strive to ensure that every person on the Cityblock team, and every Cityblock member, feels supported and included as a part of our community.

Our Values:
Aim for Understanding
Be All In
Bring Your Whole Self
Lean Into Discomfort
Put Members First
About the Role:

We are looking for a data scientist to join the Cityblock data science team.

In this role, you collaborate with Cityblock market leadership, operations, actuarial, and clinical leadership in order to identify opportunities to use experimentation, evaluation, and causal inference. You help evaluate the strategies and health programs we use to interact with, and care for, our members. Across teams, you identify opportunities for improvement that integrate with, extend, or modify our operations. You help prepare material to ground partner and investor conversations in the demonstrated effectiveness of our operations.

You also collaborate with our data analytics and product teams to leverage experimentation and evaluation to identify successful components of our product for targeted, data-informed product evolution. You contribute to Cityblock's strategy on 1st and 3rd party data collection and in-housing to enable increasingly more sophisticated experimentation, evaluation, and causal inference.

In this role, you have the opportunity to make a tremendous contribution to the organization by identifying what works, and what does not, for targeted investment in our business, care model, and product to best serve our members. In the process, you help guide the development of Cityblock's experimentation platform from the ground up as we scale experimentation across the company.

We are looking for an experienced, curiosity-driven, insight-oriented team player with a keen interest in helping others make decisions informed by data. You are eager to partner with people to help understand aspects of our business, care model, and product that could benefit from rigorous insight and strategic guidance rooted in experimentation. You know how to apply a product mindset in the development of your solutions with a focus on reusability as a path towards the development of Cityblock's experimentation platform. You are ready to get and prepare data, to design experiments, to evaluate outcomes, and to share insights with stakeholders... you have experience taking on projects end-to-end, and you love it!

We value a question-oriented and hypothesis-driven approach to data. We look for an ability to make pragmatic decisions about trade offs in a fast-paced environment. We believe that clear communication and the ability to connect with people are key to success. You will contribute to evangelizing the meaningful use of experimentation, evaluation, and causal inference across the organization.

If you're inspired by such a challenge and are an amazing teammate, we'd love to hear from you!

Requirements for the Role:
You have a PhD in an empirical, scientific field (psychology, social science, neuroscience) and 2+ years of industry experience OR you have 5+ years of industry experience in a data science role with 2+ years of experience in a role focused on experimentation, evaluation, and causal inference.
You can flexibly choose the right approach to derive insights from data, from experimentation (e.g., A/B testing) to observational studies, and you have experience deriving insight from small and large data, and everything else in between.
You have experience applying frequentist or Bayesian approaches to inference, and eager to deepen your knowledge of whichever approach you are less familiar with.
You are fluent in SQL and either R or python, and excited to learn whichever language you might be less familiar with.
You have strong analytical and problem-solving skills. You take a critical approach to data and are mindful of the responsibilities that come with technologies that drive scale.
You are curious and playful with an ability to handle ambiguity. You enjoy identifying, scoping, and developing solutions with limited guidance, you have good product sense.
You enjoy explaining complex concepts to technical and non-technical audiences in verbal and written form, and you are excellent at it.
How We Define Success:
You partner with and identify effective ways to use experimentation to provide strategic guidance to market leadership, actuarial, operations, clinical, and product teams on an ongoing basis.
You flexibly choose the right approach to derive insight from data. You deliver and provide strategic guidance in a timely fashion to drive decisions.
You excel at communicating complex concepts and deep insights, your credibility and insights inform strategic decision making across the organization.
You take an active role in shaping our strategy for 1st and 3rd party data collection and in-housing in order to enable increasingly more sophisticated causal inference.
You take an active role in developing Cityblock's experimentation platform rooted in your understanding of experimentation and evaluation needs from across the organization.
You help communicate the effectiveness of Cityblock's care model and other interventions in in verbal and written form in support of partner and investor conversations.
Nice to Have, But Not Required:
You have experience working in healthcare and/or public health or population health management.
You have experience preparing materials for publications (blogs, peer-reviewed journals, etc.).
You have experience in survey design.
What We'd Like From You:
A resume and/or LinkedIn profile
A short cover letter, please!
Cityblock values diversity as a core tenet of the work we do and the populations we serve. We are an equal opportunity employer, indiscriminate of race, religion, ethnicity, national origin, citizenship, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, veteran status, disability, genetic information, or any other protected characteristic.

-

We do not accept unsolicited resumes from outside recruiters/placement agencies. Cityblock will not pay fees associated with resumes presented through unsolicited means.",3.8,Cityblock Health,"New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,3,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,NY,7808,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0
760,760,Data Scientist,$60k-$133k,"LOCATION: Remote (home based) with some travel to New York, Washington DC, Boston.

About Us VIDEO

Founded in 2013, Pivotal Software, Inc. combines our leading cloud-native platform, tools, and methodology to empower the world's largest organizations to adapt to change and build great software. Our technology unleashes developer productivity, while fulfilling our mission to transform how the world builds software.

You

As a data scientist on Pivotal's Data Science team, you'll be working on a wide variety of data problems for a diverse range of clients. You will often be asked to learn new technologies and domains on the fly. You should be comfortable working under deadlines and making tough decisions. Consequently, you will frequently have to balance achieving an immediate goal with scalability and productionalizability.

The role offers room for personal and professional growth, and you won't be working in isolation. Data Science at Pivotal is an encouraging and supportive team, where ideas and challenges are addressed collaboratively. We're looking for the kind of person who will try and solve a problem on their own first, but isn't afraid to ask for help or say ""I don't know.""

Us

The Data Science team at Pivotal is primarily a consulting practice; we are tool agnostic, working with our customers to solve real world problems. Our customers, like us, are cross-disciplinary. We service engagements with use cases running from customer churn to optimization to detecting fraud and misconduct. We are not just doers, we are also educators and enablers.

Your Day

While there is no such thing as a ""typical day"", these are activities we frequently find ourselves doing:
Working with clients to uncover and frame new opportunities for data science. Clients often come to us without a clear understanding of what we can do, so this is our chance to open their eyes to new possibilities for their businesses.
Exploring client datasets, looking for actionable insights we can present.
Engineering features, training models, tuning hyperparameters and evaluating the results. We emphasize rigor, because data science done right at this stage leads to models that shine in production.
Taking the models we build into production. This is an exciting stage for anyone who likes collaborating with engineering teams and seeing their model become real when users interact with it.
Helping our clients develop their internal data science practices, from hiring and recruiting to data capturing, so that they can be successful when we hand off the project.
Required Skills / Experiences
Clear and empathetic communicator. You'll be the one sharing your insights with clients and stakeholders at check-ins, documenting your work, and even explaining your model to client data teams as part of a handoff. As such, communication and empathy are essential parts of your toolkit.
Advanced knowledge of statistical modeling and/or machine learning methods. These are the tools we need to go from analysis to prediction.
Strong programming skills. Left to our own devices most of us work in Python, but learning the client's tech stack is an important part of the job.
Strong exploratory data analysis skills. Every engagement starts with an investigation of the data, and thorough EDA saves us a lot of headaches in the long run.
Some travel is expected, depending on location and skillset. We mostly work out of the Pivotal office closest to the client, but sometimes we have to be on site for an extended period of time.
At least a bachelor's degree in an analytical or technical field. This could be applied mathematics, statistics, computer science, operations research, economics, etc. Higher education welcome and encouraged.

This role will support US government clients that require US citizenship. Given this, US citizenship is required for you to apply.
Desired Skills / Experiences
2+ years of work in a data-centric field (data science or data engineering).
Experience with relational databases.
Exposure and experience working in a Linux environment.
You have a specialization in an area like NLP, optimization, or image processing.
Hands-on experience working in a distributed computing environment or proven theoretical understanding of parallelism.
Pivotal is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer that will consider all qualified applicants, regardless of race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, gender identity or expression, national origin, genetics, age, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable law.",4.4,Pivotal Software,"Washington, DC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,7,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,DC,4615,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
761,761,Data Scientist,$60k-$133k,"Watchful is a platform that makes machine teaching easy, scalable, and automated. The biggest blocker to delivering ML models in production is no longer the algorithms, but the data (or lack thereof) to train the models. Currently, this has been solved by scaling-out human annotators or labelers and there are a number of managed services that have risen to meet this need. However, for use cases that require specific context (intelligence, legal, cyber, etc.) and/or is based on sensitive or classified data, these solutions are untenable.

Watchful is a disruptive automated annotation platform that puts the power back in the hands of data scientists and subject matter experts to label orders of magnitude more data, in orders of magnitude less time.

We are backed by some of the best investors in tech - Foundation Capital, Quest Venture Partners, FF VC, and Haystack. We are currently hiring engineers and data scientists to join our focused team. We have a number of pilot customers and are currently working towards launching a private beta in Q1 2020, with a wider release slated for Q2/Q3 2020. Engineers and Data Scientists who join us can expect to work with an extremely interesting technology stack (ClojureScript/Rust/Python), touch exotic environments, and solve deep pains for our users across a number of verticals.

We're looking for qualified Data Scientists to help us build the next evolution of our ML stack. Specifically, you might work on our ""Statistical label model"", Explainability & Feedback Loop, Data Exploration functionality, and other core areas of our product. We use Unsupervised, Active, Transfer, and Weakly Supervised learning in various capacities throughout our product so you'll have an opportunity to touch many different forms of machine learning across our stack.


As a company, we focus on having a healthy work-life balance and supporting an environment where the best ideas win, regardless of who came up with them. Our team is passionate about both self and team improvement, and we’ve cultivated a supportive culture that gets results.
About You
You have 3+ years of experience working on Machine/Deep Learning systems in a professional capacity
You have real-world experience using PyTorch, Tensorflow, or some other framework
Bonus: You have a PhD/MS with relevant experience in the field of Machine Learning or Deep Learning
Bonus: You have a deep background in Statistics or Probability Theory
Bonus: You have experience with one (or more) of: Active, Transfer, or Weakly Supervised learning
Bonus: You know Clojure, Rust, or Python
This is a role at an early stage startup, so you'll have opportunities to work on very high-impact projects and have significant ownership of the product. You'll work with our founding team members who all hail from marquee tech companies (i.e: Facebook/LinkedIn/Splunk) and were previously in senior positions.



This is a role at an early stage startup, so you'll have opportunities to work on very high-impact projects and have significant ownership of the product. You'll work with our founding team members who all hail from marquee tech companies (i.e: Facebook/LinkedIn/Splunk) and were previously in senior positions.",-1.0,Watchful,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,CA,3217,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,0
764,764,"Data Scientist, Product Analytics",$60k-$133k,"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started.Were looking for Data Scientists to work on our core and business products (ex. Instagram, Messaging, Growth, Engagement, Ads) to help shape the future of what we build at Facebook. You will enjoy working with one of the richest data sets in the world, cutting edge technology, and the ability to see your insights turned into real products on a regular basis. The perfect candidate will have a background in a quantitative or technical field, will have experience working with large data sets, and will have some experience in data-driven decision making. You are focused on results, a self-starter, and have demonstrated success in using analytics to drive the understanding, growth, and success of a product.The mission of Community Integrity is to minimize bad experiences for people on Facebook. We build complex measurement systems, reporting interfaces, classifiers, tools to facilitate human review, and checkpoints to help identify and remediate offensive content and abusive behavior.

Responsibilities:

Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, data mining, and the presentation of data to see beyond the numbers and understand how our users interact with both our consumer and business products
Partner with Product and Engineering teams to solve problems and identify trends and opportunities
Inform, influence, support, and execute our product decisions and product launches
The Data Scientist Analytics role has work across the following four areas:
Product Operations
Forecasting and setting product team goals
Designing and evaluating experiments
Monitoring key product metrics, understanding root causes of changes in metrics
Building and analyzing dashboards and reports
Building key data sets to empower operational and exploratory analysis
Evaluating and defining metrics
Exploratory Analysis
Proposing what to build in the next roadmap
Understanding ecosystems, user behaviors, and long-term trends
Identifying new levers to help move key metrics
Building models of user behaviors for analysis or to power production systems
Product Leadership
Influencing product teams through presentation of data-based recommendations
Communicating state of business, experiment results, etc. to product teams
Spreading best practices to analytics and product teams
Data Infrastructure
Working in Hadoop and Hive primarily, sometimes MySQL, Oracle, and Vertica
Automating analyses and authoring pipelines via SQL and Python based ETL framework
Mininum Qualifications:

4+ years experience doing quantitative analysis within a large-scale company or fast-paced environment
BA/BS in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics or other technical field
Experience in SQL or other programming languages
Development experience in any scripting language (PHP, Python, Perl, etc.)
Experience communicating the results of analyses with product and leadership teams to influence the strategy of the product
Knowledge of statistics (e.g. hypothesis testing, regressions)
Experience manipulating data sets through statistical software (ex. R, SAS) or other methods
Preferred Qualifications:

Advanced degrees
Experience with distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop)
Experience working within the tech sector preferred
Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.

Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,Facebook,"Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,16,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,DC,4752,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
765,765,Data Scientist,$60k-$133k,"Data Scientist

01-Sep-2020

Job Description
Participates in the development, validation and delivery of algorithms, statistical models and reporting tools. Solves moderately complex analytical problems.

Req#
72764BR

Job Group
Data & Analytics

Full or Part Time
Full Time

Supervisory Responsibilities
No

Percent of Travel Required
0 - 10%

Posting Job Title
Data Scientist

Additional Locations
NY-New York

Primary Location (City, State)
NY-New York

EEO Statement
Aetna is an Equal Opportunity, Affirmative Action Employer

Resource Group
2

Fundamental Components
Develops, validates and executes algorithms and predictive models to investigate problems, detect patterns and recommend solutions.
Explores, examines and interprets large volumes of data in various forms.
Performs analyses of structured and unstructured data to solve moderately complex business problems. utilizing advanced statistical techniques and mathematical analyses.
Develops data structures and pipelines to organize, collect and standardize data that helps generate insights and addresses reporting needs.
Uses data visualization techniques to effectively communicate analytical results and support business decisions.
Creates and evaluates the data needs of assigned projects and assures the integrity of the data.
Explores existing data and recommends additional sources of data for improvements.
Documents projects including business objectives, data gathering and processing, detailed set of results and analytical metrics.
Background Experience
Demonstrates good written and verbal communication skills.
Able to present information to various audiences.
Effectively resolves problems and roadblocks as they occur.
Demonstrates proficiency in several areas of data modeling, machine learning algorithms, statistical analysis, data engineering and data visualization.
Ability to work with large data sets from multiple data sources.
3 years of relevant programming or analytic experience.
Masters degree preferred.
Bachelor's degree or equivalent work experience in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Business Analytics, Economics, Physics, Engineering, or related discipline.
Benefits Program
Benefit eligibility may vary by position.

Candidate Privacy Information
Aetna takes our candidate's data privacy seriously. At no time will any Aetna recruiter or employee request any financial or personal information (Social Security Number, Credit card information for direct deposit, etc.) from you via e-mail. Any requests for information will be discussed prior and will be conducted through a secure website provided by the recruiter. Should you be asked for such information, please notify us immediately.

Clinical Licensure Required
N/A",3.3,Aetna,"New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,167,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,NY,2734,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
766,766,Associate Data Scientist,$60k-$133k,"Job Description

As an Associate Data Scientist, you will apply modern data storage, movement, and transformation architectures and techniques to extract and engineer features from any scale structured or unstructured data in health, IT system, business processes, or external data. You will also access, cleanse, compile, and transform disparate data sets to conduct exploratory and pre-defined analyses using scientifically valid techniques and generate meaningful insights as well as assist with feasibility studies to identify data availability, quality and modeling requirements, and dependencies.

Qualifications

Basic Qualifications
Master’s Degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Analytics, Biostatistics, Applied Mathematics, Software Engineering, Data Science, or related field, or equivalent relevant work experience
At least 1 year of statistical programming and applied programming work experience
At least 1 year Data mining, quantitative analysis, and/or statistical modeling including predictive performance and algorithm optimization work experience
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with relational databases and SQL; NoSQL databases (hBase, Cassandra, MongoDB, Couch DB, Riak) and unstructured data; Spark; Pig and Avro
Experience with agile software development methodologies
Expectations
Willing to travel up to 20% of the time as needed
Must be currently residing in or willing to relocate to the Kansas City metro area",3.9,Cerner,"North Kansas City, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,41,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,MO,1445,0,data scientist,0,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,1
767,767,Senior Data Scientist,$60k-$133k,"About Life 360


Life360 brings families closer with smart tools designed to protect and connect the people who matter most.

Known for first-to-market solutions for modern family challenges, Life360 recently reached #1 in Apple's US App Store's list of free social networking apps. Nearly 1 in 10 US families with kids use Life360 an average of 12 times a day, and global membership is growing exponentially, with over 28 million active users in over 140 countries as of March 31, 2020 making Life360 the largest mobile service for families in the world.

This reach gives us the opportunity to do unprecedented good for families through our valued core offerings: advanced location sharing, private messaging, driver monitoring, help alerts, 24/7 roadside assistance, and Crash Detection with emergency response. On average we respond to 1,000 roadside assists and dispatch 200+ ambulances each month to those in need.

Offering both free and paid memberships. In addition, the company has raised over $200 million in equity financing, and recently completed an IPO on the ASX exchange giving our employees the liquidity of a public company with the upside of a private growth stage business.

Life360's rapidly growing team of 150+ employees is headquartered in San Francisco, with offices in San Diego, and Las Vegas.

About our culture and benefits


Life360 has embraced a work from home (WFH) philosophy for at least the duration of the COVID-19 crisis, along with most of our peers. During this WFH period, the organization remains connected and engaged with virtual team events, weekly all hands meetings and regular open zoom sessions with leadership. While we believe that the work world has likely permanently changed, we have yet to make any decisions about our long-term split between WFH and being in the office

We always offer:
Competitive pay and benefits
Health, dental and vision insurance plans
401(k) plan
$200/month Quality of Life perk
Flexible PTO
Free Life360 platinum membership for your family circle
Whatever makes you stronger makes us stronger. We buy you the things you need to improve yourself and get your job done.
All open positions are remote opportunities and when the time comes to return to our offices, we offer the following:
A great office with plenty of light in the heart of the SOMA district in beautiful San Francisco; a 5 minute walk to CalTrain
An amazing office location within walking distance to the beach in Encinitas
In person team building activities, celebratory company outings and fun events
About the Job


Life360 is seeking a Senior Data Scientist who is motivated to solve real world problems, comfortable working in a fast-paced entrepreneurial environment, and able to help our company grow. You will be part of a small team that is developing new insights, product features, and scalable services using data from our mobile and cloud platform. This includes data visualization, predictive modeling, user segmentation and understanding, anomaly detection, and other advanced insights. You'll work with all sorts of data, including inertial sensors, location, structured and free-form text, event streams, and third-party datasets (think demographics, and more). You'll work closely with data analytics, data engineering, product owners, customer service, and leadership teams on projects from concept to completion.

Examples of Data Science at Life360
Reduce the number of false geofence notifications using ML models to predict real trips from random location noise
Recommend places of interest to families based on historical location and POI data
Improve the accuracy of collision detection models using supervised ML models
Predict premium subscriptions based on onboarding, app usage, and marketing touch points
Optimize drive detection for battery use, latency, and accuracy
Provide advanced insights on user driving behavior, places visited, app usage, and more
Categorize customer feedback and app store reviews and identify trends
Learn normal behavior patterns and identify anomalies
Desired experience
Master's in data science, computer science, or related discipline
Amazon Web Services (S3, Athena, Redshift, Lambda, SageMaker, QuickSight)
solid understanding of statistics and ML algorithms
Digital event, transaction, clickstream data behavioral experience
Data collection, storage, extraction, transformation, analysis, and visualization
Programming and scripting, including Python
SQL, relational and non-relational databases
ability to work independently and on cross-functional teams
GitHub, Jira, peer reviews, unit testing, and other software development best practices
Nice to have experience
mobile location data (GPS, WiFi)
inertial sensor data
scikit-learn
structured and unstructured data
NLP
Apache Spark
Amplitude
Tableau, Plotly, etc.
CoreML, TensorFlow
#LI-Remote",3.8,Life360,Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,12,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,Remote,4858,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,1
768,768,Data Scientist,$60k-$133k,"Jacobs is looking for a Data Scientist in McLean with an active TS/SCI with Poly. This role is responsible for improving analyst's collaborative workflow by developing tools and capabilities that enhance the ability to use and produce identity intelligence data.
Responsibilities:
Working independently and collaboratively in a team, on strategic projects to develop complex data models and solutions.
Analyzing, interpreting, and extracting data to support decision-making, engaging with customers to understand changing requirements, and recommending solutions based on quantitative analysis.
Independently compiles and reviews often disparate and inconsistent data to address complex intelligence issues or problems for internal/external customers.
May require constructing and performing complex statistical, mathematical, and data analysis independently, or in partnership with other data scientists or analysts.
Provides recommendations for the development of tools and applications that improve process effectiveness and efficiency.
Qualifications:
Experience supporting complex data science and analytic projects
Proficiency with Python or R
Experience using SQL to query large relational databases
Experience/knowledge of computer science concepts including programming/algorithm development, statistics, data architecture, data analytics, data science including visualization techniques
Experience with quantitative and qualitative analytics
Experience constructing and performing complex database search queries across multiple databases
Ability to effectively communicate complex technical findings to non-technical audiences in both written and verbal formats
Experience identifying, recommending, and implementing continuous improvement approaches
Degree in BA/BS or MA/MS degree in a technical field such as mathematics, engineering, economics, or computer science with 3-10 years of experience
TS/SCI with Polygraph security clearance
Desired Skills:
Experience in modern machine learning, biometrics, social network analysis, or geospatial analysis
Experience/knowledge of link analysis tools ( e.g. Palantir, i2 Analyst’s Notebook)
Experience with cloud architectures including AWS
Experience with distributed computing and storage technologies
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Location:
McLean, VA (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Required)
Company's website:
https://www.jacobs.com/
Work Remotely:
No",3.7,Jacobs,"McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,73,Company - Public,other_industries,Business Services,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,VA,2629,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
769,769,Sr. Lead Master Data Engineer,$60k-$133k,"Overview


As a Sr. Lead Master Data Engineer, you will be responsible for leading complex role-specific project work as a part of a larger cross-functional team in support of one or more lines of business during the implementation of our master data management initiative. Sr. Lead Master Data Engineers will design and implement necessary master data infrastructure on technically complex projects, focusing on developing solutions to master data management and technology needs based upon business requirements. They must be able to quickly develop mastery of the master data lifecycle across any line of business for which they are responsible. Our Sr. Lead Master Data Engineers will work with wide latitude for action or decisions on projects that are more complex or cross-functional in nature. They act as a subject-matter-expert and resource on master data management and technology issues for the larger community of analysts, and they may represent EA in external conversations and may assist with the selection or oversight of outside vendor partners. They are expected to influence the project execution of IT and analyst teams. Successful candidates for this role must have strong analytical and data modeling skills, a deep understanding of database technology and data use within analytic platforms, and they must have strong programming skills with SQL and/or Python. We expect our Sr. Lead Master Data Engineers to have demonstrated fluency and competency in both the technology language of IT and the analyst language of departmental analysts. They should have experience developing and implementing master data management platforms and a moderate level of experience with cloud database architecture. They will need to be fast learners with a keen eye for detail, systems thinking, and process design. They must be team players who work steadfastly to create impactful change. This is a professional track role.

Responsibilities


The person who fills this role will be expected to do the following as a part of their regular work responsibilities:
Exhibits wide latitude in aligning business stakeholders and IT to translate business logic into scalable data and analytic solutions on complex projects.
Partners with the business to design data management process and workflows that provide the highest quality for the most critical data elements for the organization.
Develops ETL pipelines, data quality rules, and data management/exception workflows for domain specific master data management.
Designs and develops tool, data, and process best practices for the lines of business on their integration into operational practices.
Designs specific master data domain implementations, understanding platform performance and cloud compute performance requirements and expectations.
Helps design patterns for efficient use of cloud compute resources.
Owns and is accountable for data model and code quality and any relevant documentation.
Implements data governance principles across specific project execution.
Act as a subject-matter-expert and resource on master data assets and platform issues for the larger COPA community.
Drives complex projects to success and enables others to own the impact.
Minimum Qualifications
Has strong analytical and data modeling skills
Has a deep understanding of database technology
Has a deep understanding of analytic platform data use
Has strong programming skills in SQL and/or Python
Has experience managing/implementating master data management platforms (i.e. Informatica, Stibo Systems, etc.)
Has experience developing and implementing data models for analytic use
Has moderate experience with cloud database architecture
Has the skill to partner with cross-functional teams using strong written and verbal communication
Fast learner and proven problem solver
Keen eye for system thinking and process design, especially with respect to scalability and automation
Keen eye for detail and thoughtful investigation of data
Has a steadfast focus on creating impactful change
Preferred Qualifications
Has some experience using the AWS big data technology stack
Has extensive experience with Alteryx or similar ETL platforms
Has some experience implementing data governance principles
Minimum Years of Experience
5
Travel Requirements
10%
Required Level of Education
Bachelor's Degree
Preferred Level of Education
Masters Degree
Major/Concentration
MIS, Decision Sciences, Engineering, Business Analytics, Computer Science or other similar fields",3.9,Chick-fil-A,"Atlanta, GA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,74,Company - Private,other_industries,"Restaurants, Bars & Food Services",$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,GA,4505,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
770,770,Data Scientist,$60k-$133k,"Job Description

Amsted Rail has an immediate opening for the position of Data Scientist. The suitable candidate will function as the lead in projects related to data science and advanced analytics from the shop floor to the back office space. The Data Scientist will work with domain experts and operators in the plants to understand products and processes.

Position Responsibilities:

The suitable candidate will be part of a cross-functional team of Data Scientists that will be responsible for:
Communicating highly technical concepts to both technical and non-technical individuals
Providing new insight into existing data using predictive analytics and machine learning
Recommending new data streams and ensuring data integrity
Identifying new projects and opportunities, and the associated data requirements
Delivering a range of reports suggesting improvements, data visualization and processing tools that can be used by floor workers, technicians, and engineers
Leveraging the solutions implemented at various locations and sharing across other business units
Working with domain and subject matter experts
Assist in implementing tools and processes to sustain data collection and reporting
Create dashboards and visualizations to communicate insights in the form of storytelling.
Partner with Data Engineer to design and build new data set processes for modeling, data mining, and production purposes.
Determine new ways to improve data quality and predictive capabilities.
Perform and interpret data studies and experiments concerning data sources or new uses for existing data sources.
Fostering a data culture
The position requires willingness to visit plants and foundries to observe the processes, and requires proper use of personal protective equipment (PPE).

Professional skills:
Willingness and ability to lead and take data science projects end-to-end
Must be able to work with all relevant technical and non-technical parties to ensure that quality results are obtained, and that proper action is taken throughout the organization to improve products and processes
The ability to identify questions independently and recognize new projects and new applications. This requires understanding of data requirements (sources, rates, storage, processing, etc.)
Deep theoretical and practical understanding of predictive analytics, machine learning, and artificial intelligence algorithms, including, but not limited to: Bayesian classifiers and techniques, support vector machines, neural networks, decision trees, regression methods, unsupervised learning and clustering
Skilled in math: calculus, linear algebra, numerical methods, optimization
Skilled in statistics: statistical/ inference-based models, data visualizations
Skilled in programming: Python, R, Tableau
Database management and query languages: SQL, etc.
Basic knowledge of instrumentation, sensors, and data acquisition systems
Ability to understand a variety of applications and domains (embedded sensors, plant processes, etc.)

Skills and Qualifications:
Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Ability to work with others who do not possess a background in data science
Desire to work in a dynamic environment and have a continuous improvement and development mindset
Willingness to travel as much as 25% of the time. The Data Scientist will have exposure to all business units, plants, processes, and products in order to work with local experts and technician engineers
B.S. in Computer Science, Statistics, Math, Engineering
All interested applicants please apply online at www.amstedrail.com.

EOC M/F/D/V

All interested applicants please apply online at www.amstedrail.com.

Amsted Rail is an equal opportunity employer. Applicants are considered for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sex, age, disability, genetic information, or any other basis prohibited by applicable federal, state, or local law. Federal law requires that there be no discrimination against any applicant for employment because of the individual's

disability, with respect to hiring, compensation, or other terms, conditions or privileges of employment. Title I of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA), prohibits private employers from discriminating against qualified individuals with disabilities in job application procedures, including pre-employment, post-offer medical exams, hiring, compensation, and other terms, conditions, and privileges of employment. Amsted Rail is committed to compliance with the ADA in all respects and does not base employment decisions upon an applicant’s or an employee’s disability, record of a disability and/or perceived disability. Should you feel as though you have been discriminated against while employed by or applying for employment with Amsted Rail, you may seek assistance from Chris Dockery, Amsted Rail Company, Inc., 1700 Walnut St., Granite City, IL 62040, (618) 452-2111, cdd@amstedrail.com.",3.3,Amsted Rail,"Granite City, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,other_industries,Transportation & Logistics,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,IL,4970,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
771,771,Data Scientist,$60k-$133k,"***ONLY W2 CONSULTANTS*****
MUST HAVE EXPERIENCE (MACHINE LEARNING, PYTHON, CLINICAL DATA)
Job Title: Data Scientist
Location: Minneapolis,MN
Duration: 12+ months contract or contract to hire
Job Description:
Possess a Master’s in a science or engineering discipline or higher (completed and verified prior to start) from an accredited institution
Must have experience with Machine Learning.
Experience developing software Python.
Experience in machine learning sub-disciplines such as: deep learning, signal processing and time series analysis, natural language processing, dimensionality reduction, data wrangling, and statistical methods
Strong scientific and technical acumen, with demonstrated interest and ability to make connections between science/technology and real-world constraints
Ability to manage the ambiguity of early-stage evaluation of new opportunities – flexibility to change direction as additional information becomes available – help architect new business opportunity areas
Demonstrated scientific excellence as evidenced by publications and presentations
Collaborative, self-motivated, self-directed, entrepreneurial, and business savvy
Thanks and Regards,
Surya Prakash | Sr. Recruiter | CS Solutions Inc | 3440 Federal Dr,Ste #100,Eagan,MN USA,
Phone: (512) 234-6638(D)
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Pay: $40.00 - $80.00 per hour
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Full Time Opportunity:
Yes
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.0,CS Solutions Inc,"Minneapolis, MN",-1,1 to 50 Employees,24,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,96.5,MN,1556,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
772,772,Sr. Lead Master Data Engineer,$81k-$129k,"Overview


As a Sr. Lead Master Data Engineer, you will be responsible for leading complex role-specific project work as a part of a larger cross-functional team in support of one or more lines of business during the implementation of our master data management initiative. Sr. Lead Master Data Engineers will design and implement necessary master data infrastructure on technically complex projects, focusing on developing solutions to master data management and technology needs based upon business requirements. They must be able to quickly develop mastery of the master data lifecycle across any line of business for which they are responsible. Our Sr. Lead Master Data Engineers will work with wide latitude for action or decisions on projects that are more complex or cross-functional in nature. They act as a subject-matter-expert and resource on master data management and technology issues for the larger community of analysts, and they may represent EA in external conversations and may assist with the selection or oversight of outside vendor partners. They are expected to influence the project execution of IT and analyst teams. Successful candidates for this role must have strong analytical and data modeling skills, a deep understanding of database technology and data use within analytic platforms, and they must have strong programming skills with SQL and/or Python. We expect our Sr. Lead Master Data Engineers to have demonstrated fluency and competency in both the technology language of IT and the analyst language of departmental analysts. They should have experience developing and implementing master data management platforms and a moderate level of experience with cloud database architecture. They will need to be fast learners with a keen eye for detail, systems thinking, and process design. They must be team players who work steadfastly to create impactful change. This is a professional track role.

Responsibilities


The person who fills this role will be expected to do the following as a part of their regular work responsibilities:
Exhibits wide latitude in aligning business stakeholders and IT to translate business logic into scalable data and analytic solutions on complex projects.
Partners with the business to design data management process and workflows that provide the highest quality for the most critical data elements for the organization.
Develops ETL pipelines, data quality rules, and data management/exception workflows for domain specific master data management.
Designs and develops tool, data, and process best practices for the lines of business on their integration into operational practices.
Designs specific master data domain implementations, understanding platform performance and cloud compute performance requirements and expectations.
Helps design patterns for efficient use of cloud compute resources.
Owns and is accountable for data model and code quality and any relevant documentation.
Implements data governance principles across specific project execution.
Act as a subject-matter-expert and resource on master data assets and platform issues for the larger COPA community.
Drives complex projects to success and enables others to own the impact.
Minimum Qualifications
Has strong analytical and data modeling skills
Has a deep understanding of database technology
Has a deep understanding of analytic platform data use
Has strong programming skills in SQL and/or Python
Has experience managing/implementating master data management platforms (i.e. Informatica, Stibo Systems, etc.)
Has experience developing and implementing data models for analytic use
Has moderate experience with cloud database architecture
Has the skill to partner with cross-functional teams using strong written and verbal communication
Fast learner and proven problem solver
Keen eye for system thinking and process design, especially with respect to scalability and automation
Keen eye for detail and thoughtful investigation of data
Has a steadfast focus on creating impactful change
Preferred Qualifications
Has some experience using the AWS big data technology stack
Has extensive experience with Alteryx or similar ETL platforms
Has some experience implementing data governance principles
Minimum Years of Experience
5
Travel Requirements
10%
Required Level of Education
Bachelor's Degree
Preferred Level of Education
Masters Degree
Major/Concentration
MIS, Decision Sciences, Engineering, Business Analytics, Computer Science or other similar fields",3.9,Chick-fil-A,"Atlanta, GA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,74,Company - Private,other_industries,"Restaurants, Bars & Food Services",$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,GA,4505,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
773,773,Data Scientist,$81k-$129k,"***ONLY W2 CONSULTANTS*****
MUST HAVE EXPERIENCE (MACHINE LEARNING, PYTHON, CLINICAL DATA)
Job Title: Data Scientist
Location: Minneapolis,MN
Duration: 12+ months contract or contract to hire
Job Description:
Possess a Master’s in a science or engineering discipline or higher (completed and verified prior to start) from an accredited institution
Must have experience with Machine Learning.
Experience developing software Python.
Experience in machine learning sub-disciplines such as: deep learning, signal processing and time series analysis, natural language processing, dimensionality reduction, data wrangling, and statistical methods
Strong scientific and technical acumen, with demonstrated interest and ability to make connections between science/technology and real-world constraints
Ability to manage the ambiguity of early-stage evaluation of new opportunities – flexibility to change direction as additional information becomes available – help architect new business opportunity areas
Demonstrated scientific excellence as evidenced by publications and presentations
Collaborative, self-motivated, self-directed, entrepreneurial, and business savvy
Thanks and Regards,
Surya Prakash | Sr. Recruiter | CS Solutions Inc | 3440 Federal Dr,Ste #100,Eagan,MN USA,
Phone: (512) 234-6638(D)
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Pay: $40.00 - $80.00 per hour
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Full Time Opportunity:
Yes
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.0,CS Solutions Inc,"Minneapolis, MN",-1,1 to 50 Employees,24,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,MN,1556,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
774,774,Data Scientist,$81k-$129k,"Job Description

Amsted Rail has an immediate opening for the position of Data Scientist. The suitable candidate will function as the lead in projects related to data science and advanced analytics from the shop floor to the back office space. The Data Scientist will work with domain experts and operators in the plants to understand products and processes.

Position Responsibilities:

The suitable candidate will be part of a cross-functional team of Data Scientists that will be responsible for:
Communicating highly technical concepts to both technical and non-technical individuals
Providing new insight into existing data using predictive analytics and machine learning
Recommending new data streams and ensuring data integrity
Identifying new projects and opportunities, and the associated data requirements
Delivering a range of reports suggesting improvements, data visualization and processing tools that can be used by floor workers, technicians, and engineers
Leveraging the solutions implemented at various locations and sharing across other business units
Working with domain and subject matter experts
Assist in implementing tools and processes to sustain data collection and reporting
Create dashboards and visualizations to communicate insights in the form of storytelling.
Partner with Data Engineer to design and build new data set processes for modeling, data mining, and production purposes.
Determine new ways to improve data quality and predictive capabilities.
Perform and interpret data studies and experiments concerning data sources or new uses for existing data sources.
Fostering a data culture
The position requires willingness to visit plants and foundries to observe the processes, and requires proper use of personal protective equipment (PPE).

Professional skills:
Willingness and ability to lead and take data science projects end-to-end
Must be able to work with all relevant technical and non-technical parties to ensure that quality results are obtained, and that proper action is taken throughout the organization to improve products and processes
The ability to identify questions independently and recognize new projects and new applications. This requires understanding of data requirements (sources, rates, storage, processing, etc.)
Deep theoretical and practical understanding of predictive analytics, machine learning, and artificial intelligence algorithms, including, but not limited to: Bayesian classifiers and techniques, support vector machines, neural networks, decision trees, regression methods, unsupervised learning and clustering
Skilled in math: calculus, linear algebra, numerical methods, optimization
Skilled in statistics: statistical/ inference-based models, data visualizations
Skilled in programming: Python, R, Tableau
Database management and query languages: SQL, etc.
Basic knowledge of instrumentation, sensors, and data acquisition systems
Ability to understand a variety of applications and domains (embedded sensors, plant processes, etc.)

Skills and Qualifications:
Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Ability to work with others who do not possess a background in data science
Desire to work in a dynamic environment and have a continuous improvement and development mindset
Willingness to travel as much as 25% of the time. The Data Scientist will have exposure to all business units, plants, processes, and products in order to work with local experts and technician engineers
B.S. in Computer Science, Statistics, Math, Engineering
All interested applicants please apply online at www.amstedrail.com.

EOC M/F/D/V

All interested applicants please apply online at www.amstedrail.com.

Amsted Rail is an equal opportunity employer. Applicants are considered for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sex, age, disability, genetic information, or any other basis prohibited by applicable federal, state, or local law. Federal law requires that there be no discrimination against any applicant for employment because of the individual's

disability, with respect to hiring, compensation, or other terms, conditions or privileges of employment. Title I of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA), prohibits private employers from discriminating against qualified individuals with disabilities in job application procedures, including pre-employment, post-offer medical exams, hiring, compensation, and other terms, conditions, and privileges of employment. Amsted Rail is committed to compliance with the ADA in all respects and does not base employment decisions upon an applicant’s or an employee’s disability, record of a disability and/or perceived disability. Should you feel as though you have been discriminated against while employed by or applying for employment with Amsted Rail, you may seek assistance from Chris Dockery, Amsted Rail Company, Inc., 1700 Walnut St., Granite City, IL 62040, (618) 452-2111, cdd@amstedrail.com.",3.3,Amsted Rail,"Granite City, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,other_industries,Transportation & Logistics,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,IL,4970,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
775,775,Data Scientist,$81k-$129k,"Position Overview:

Deep Labs is seeking an experienced, enthusiastic Data Scientist to join our growing Deep Labs AI team that is designing & building solutions for some of our client's most challenging problems. The ideal candidate will have a strong background working with data, experience applying machine learning and deep learning techniques to real-world problems, and a natural curiosity and desire to experiment, evaluate and solve problems as part of a fast-paced and growing, product-driven technology team. The role reports to the VP, Data Science & Engineering.

Responsibilities:
Build regression, classification and clustering models using Machine Learning and/or Deep Learning algorithms and techniques (e.g. CNN, LSTM, GAN, transfer learning, reinforcement learning, graph learning)
Identify opportunities to enrich and integrate data from multiple, diverse sources
Build, train and evaluate prototype models, using a tool or framework of choice
Work closely with engineering/infrastructure teams to help transition models from development to production
Follow a methodical, analytical approach and have a natural curiosity to understand and get the best from data
Collaboration across teams: communicate effectively across a variety of technical and non-technical audiences
Experience:
Minimum of 3 years of experience in a dedicated Data Scientist role modeling fraud/risk, in one or more of the following industries: finance, payments, banking, risk, fraud, identity or behavioral analytics
Knowledge and experience of Python (preferred) or R, and associated data manipulation/analysis libraries
Working knowledge of open-source machine/deep learning tools and frameworks (e.g. Tensorflow, pytorch, h2o.ai, Databricks, scikit-learn)
Experience using data mining & descriptive analytics to explore and profile new datasets, perform feature selection and extraction, and develop ethical and interpretable models
Knowledge and/or work experience of public cloud environments (e.g. Google GCP or Amazon AWS)
Education: Masters or PhD level qualification in computer science, mathematics, or related discipline

Specific Skills:
Knowledge and experience of good software engineering practices
Keen interest and desire to stay abreast of the latest developments in AI research and industry
Demonstrated ability to take initiative and interact within a global team environment
Strong analytical and quantitative skills; strong attention to detail
Why Deep Labs?

At Deep Labs there is tremendous potential to learn and grow, while also contributing to policies, decisions, and the direction of the company. We offer competitive compensation and benefits, and provide a highly open, honest, and fun work environment.

Our company is committed to equal employment opportunity. We will not discriminate against employees or applicants for employment on any legally-recognized basis [""protected class""] including, but not limited to: age, race, gender, pregnancy, religion or creed, color, national origin, sexual orientation, disability, genetic characteristics, military or veteran status, uniform service member status or any other protected class under federal, state or local law.",3.7,Deep Labs,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,5,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,CA,3195,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,1,0,1
777,777,Data Scientist,$81k-$129k,"Data Scientist, Chicago, IL

Smarter Thinking. Real Results. Technology consulting has been our story for over 14 years. Companies from all industries partner with us for our innovative mindset to help them digitally transform to create market advantages, become resilient, and prepare for whats next. With us, the possible becomes actual.

We provide strategic and innovative consulting services focused on digital experiences, engineering, automation, data and analytics, and salesforce solutions. Saggezza consultants work as part of a global team, and throughout their tenure, have the opportunity to work on a variety of different projects across various clients and industries. We are chartered to do one thing, and one thing only to bring enabling technology to our clients that allow them to move their business forward.

We are currently looking to hire a Data Scientist to join our team.

What Youll Definitely Need
BA degree in a closely related field with data analysis orientation. Analytical background with a creative approach to problem solving
4+ years experience with Python worked in building analytical solutions using Statistical, Machine Learning, Deep Learning etc. Proficiency with 3rd-party data visualization tools (Tableau, Power BI, etc.)
Good working experience in Data Analysis, Data Wrangling, Data Cleaning and Data Transformation.
Excellent working experience of machine learning on technology stacks such as Python, NumPy, SciPy, Scikit-Learn, Apache Spark and R using libraries such as e1071 and Caret
Excellent fluency in data manipulation tasks using frameworks. such as pandas, plyr, Spark
Good understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Forests, Random Forest etc.
Knowledge of some common data science toolkits, such as Weka, NumPy, MATLAB, etc.
Broad business perspective with the ability to articulate meaningful ROI and financial impacts.
Worked on projects in the Retail, Banking & Finance and Insurance Industries.
Working from Chicago office and requires visits to customer location if needed.
From a cultural perspective, we look for individuals who possess the following qualities that will contribute to our success and the success of our clients:
Entrepreneurial spirit: We seek individuals who enjoy contributing to the growth of an organization and who show commitment to the success of their team.
Problem-solving skills: Individuals at our company have well-honed analytical skills coupled with business acumen to structure problems, deliver solutions, and communicate insights.
Drive: Our team sets ambitious goals and seeks energetic professionals, enjoy a fast pace environment, and thrive in taking on responsibility.
What We Would Love to See
Consultative application of analytic solutions to solve business issues
Able to engage in a consultative manner across multiple levels (c-suite to end user) with a strong executive presence, demonstrating strong
Demonstrated leadership, communication and interpersonal skills: the ability to manage and mentor functional experts and lead cross- functional teams
Dont tick all the boxes? Dont worry about it: we still want to hear from you if you think

youre the right person for the job.

Why Join Our Team?
Diverse culture, experiences, and skills.
Our nurturing and supportive environment fosters collaboration across the entire organization.
We are not hierarchical but operate as a flat surface where every opinion matters, ideas are cultivated and innovation is encouraged.
At Saggezza, we are fortunate to have a strong mentorship program that provides every one of our employees the ability to thrive professionally and personally.
We are only as good as our people. Saggezza, Italian for wisdom, is rooted from the perspective that knowledge is power. We create thought-leaders who are constantly exposed and trained in different technologies in the ever-evolving world of software development.
We welcome innovators with entrepreneurial spirits to grow with our team.
Consulting Magazine - Fastest Growing Firms 2019
Built-In Top Places to Work in Chicago 2020
Best and Brightest Companies in the Nation 2019 and 2020, Best and Brightest Companies in Milwaukee 2020 and Best and Brightest Companies in Chicago 2020
Saggezza is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer: We believe in treating each employee and applicant for employment fairly and with dignity. We base our employment decisions on merit, experience, and potential, without regard to race, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, age, religion, disability, veteran status, or any other characteristic prohibited by federal, state or local law.

Powered by JazzHR",4.2,Saggezza,"Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,14,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,IL,4739,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
778,778,AWS Senior Data Engineer - Customer Insights & Analytics,$81k-$129k,"Company Information

Solid reputation, passionate people and endless opportunities. That's Travelers. Our superior financial strength and consistent record of strong operating returns mean security for our customers - and opportunities for our employees. You will find Travelers to be full of energy and a workplace in which you truly can make a difference.

Target Openings

2

Job Description Summary

Are you a Senior Data Engineer who wants to build enterprise data solutions to support better serving our customers? As an AWS Sr. Data Engineer on the CODIE Team, you will be responsible for data acquisition and data preparation in AWS. This position will work with data across many Travelers' systems to create data products that provide a holistic view of our customers' interactions with us. In this unique position, you will have the opportunity to work as part of a cross-LOB project team. Prior Data Engineering experience in AWS required.

Primary Job Duties & Responsibilities
Data Acquisition, Prep and Exploration:Reviews unfamiliar data sources. Connects to value for business. Able to link to systems.
Develops process to acquire and integrate data.
Independently reviews, prepares, designs and integrates complex (type, quality, volume) data correcting problems and recommends data cleansing/quality solutions to major issues.
Works within Travelers standards, processes, and protocols.
Develops moderate and applies complex data derivations, business transformation rules, and data requirements.
Leads medium scale projects and coordinates aspects of larger projects with limited supervision.
Performs analysis of complex (type, quality, volume) sources to determine value and use. Determines and recommends data to include in analytical projects.
Creates moderate (technology and features) data visualization techniques to help support data exploration.
Utilizes business knowledge to explain technical activities in business terms.
Actively seeks opportunities to expand technical knowledge and capabilities.
Develops and maintains relationships across the enterprise.
Analytic Data Discovery:Operationalizes and automates more complex (more systems, data sets and streams, size of data sets more substantial) products into business.
Proactively looks to improve and optimize data products.
Builds, tests, and implements complex analytic business products, including pilots and proof of concept.
Applies knowledge of current industry trends and techniques to formulate solutions within the context of assigned projects and/or enhancements.
Analytic Support:Independently train business users on data products/analytic environment.
Ensures customer satisfaction through professional communication, follow-up, and responsiveness to issues.
Consultation:Shares knowledge with users on data or analytic products.
Builds effective relationships with stakeholders.
Provides guidance and mentorship to lower level technical employees.
Minimum Qualifications
4 years of relevant experience with data tools, techniques, and manipulation required.
Education, Work Experience, & Knowledge
College Degree in STEM related field
5 years of relevant experience with data tools, techniques, and manipulation preferred.
Job Specific Technical Skills & Competencies
Python programming skills
Experience building data products
Experience building data pipelines
Strong SQL skills
Experience in code repository tool GitHub
Experience with AWS
Experience putting applications in Production at Travelers, preferred.
Must demonstrate a proactive nature with willingness to contribute, collaborate and work in an Lean-Agile team environment.
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement

Travelers is an equal opportunity employer.",4.1,Travelers,"Hartford, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,167,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,CT,3722,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
779,779,Java/Data Engineer,$81k-$129k,"Java Developer – Contract – Buffalo, NY

We have a very hot opportunity! One of our clients is looking for an experienced Java Developer. This person will be helping with implementing Client Data Synchronization workflows.

Example:

We have a bunch of client data files and need to use our framework to ETL them into our platform database models. Tech stack would be:

Java
Spring (Spring Boot, Spring Cloud Data Flow)
SQL Experience – strong Relational Database knowledge
Web services creations

IND123",4.1,Systems Personnel,"Buffalo, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,24,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,NY,504,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
781,781,Data Scientist,$81k-$129k,"Solve important and challenging problems


We're looking for someone that can help us to solve the data challenges that we know we have, as well as help to identify new opportunities to leverage our data. You'll be working with a variety of teams across the company: engineering, business development, sales, and design to explore exciting and meaningful problems.

Strong candidates can leverage a wide array of machine learning and statistical techniques at scale, to address challenges with semi-structured and multilingual international trade data. Responsibilities will include helping us develop the next generation of our product, as well as analysis of our internal metrics to assist the company in making a wide variety of data-driven decisions. Our team uses a range of tools including python, R, Ruby, and SQL to communicate and visualize results.

At Panjiva, you'll work on:
Fuzzy matching and clustering of data, at scale
Natural language processing, robust to messy text and multiple languages
Imputation of missing data
Network analysis
Inference of company structures
Anomaly detection
Shipment trend prediction and modeling
Optimization of search weightings
Predictive modeling of customer acquisition and retention
Requirements
B.S, M.S, or Ph.D. in a quantitative field, or equivalent experience
Deep statistical knowledge and a broad understanding of analytical and machine-learning techniques
Track record of providing valuable insights into large, highly multidimensional datasets
Experience with a scripting language, such as Python with NumPy / SciPy or R, and the ability to use it to perform complex analyses of large data sets
Basic understanding of relational databases
Strong ability to communicate and visualize findings
Nice-to-Haves
Solid understanding of relational databases, including advanced query techniques
Background in text analysis / information retrieval algorithms
Experience building production software
Familiarity with Ruby, Postgres
Familiarity with libsvm
Experience with C++ or a similar highly performant language
Familiarity with large-scale, distributed data processing techniques (Hadoop, Pig, Hive, etc.)
Startup experience
Perks and Benefits
Competitive salary
Build or buy your dream computer
Harvard Square office 1 minute walk from the Red Line T stop
15 days vacation (rising to 25 days with longer tenure), 3 floating holidays / personal days, and 10-12 paid holidays annually, with unlimited sick leave
Weekly tech talks
Health, dental, and vision insurance as well as many other benefits
401(k) plan, with company matching
Hacker Continuing Education Wednesdays i.e., craft beer tasting, ping pong lessons
Work with a talented, focused, driven team in a growing company with opportunity for advancement and career development
How to apply


To apply, email jobs+datascience at panjiva.com with:
Your resume (and, if you have it, your blog, GitHub, etc. handles)
A description of an exciting project you've tackled in the past, with, if possible, an example of code from that project
A paper you think is exciting, with an explanation of what makes you excited about it
About Panjiva


Panjiva's technology creates insight from messy global trade data to provide powerful search, analysis, and visualizations of more than a billion shipping records from nearly every country in the world. More than 3,000 customers in over 100 countries, ranging from Fortune 500 companies and startups to government agencies and hedge funds, rely on our platform for supply chain intelligence. In global trade, better insight means better decision making and stronger connections between companies and governments across the globe.

Recognizing Panjiva's cutting-edge technology, S&P Global's Market Intelligence division acquired Panjiva in 2018. This acquisition has grown our resources, dramatically expanded our access to data, and accelerated our growth plans. Join our team as we revolutionize a key and fascinating part of the world economy!

NOTE: Panjiva is an EOAA. Panjiva takes affirmative action to employ and advance in employment qualified individuals with disabilities. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or physical or mental disabilities.",4.2,Panjiva,"Cambridge, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,14,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,MA,4334,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
782,782,Data Scientist,$81k-$129k,"Data Scientist

02-Sep-2020

Department/Practice Group
Innovation

Location
Indianapolis Downtown (LF)

Job Description
Faegre Drinker has an opportunity for a Data Scientist to work with our Innovation team in our Indianapolis office. You will be responsible for using advanced statistical, algorithmic, machine learning, data mining and visualization techniques to help advance and complete high level firm projects and assist with making informed business decisions. This position will work with other talented individuals who share a passion for doing great work in the best interest of our clients.

What you would do in this job:
• Work with firm stakeholders to identify opportunities for leveraging company data to drive business solutions
• Locate and define new process improvement opportunities
• Create operational predictive models using current and emerging methodologies in data science
• Use machine learning and data mining techniques to understand the patterns in large volumes of data, identify relationships, detect data anomalies and classify data sets
• Assess data quality and define data processing business rules for cleansing, aggregation, enhancement, supporting analysis and predictive modelling activities
• Design and build algorithms and predictive models using a variety of techniques
• Deploy predictive models and integrate findings into business processes
• Present complex analysis results tailored to different audiences in a highly consumable and actionable form, including by using data storytelling techniques
• Special projects and duties, as assigned

Exempt / Non-Exempt
Exempt

Requisition ID
1307BR

Number of Openings
1

Job Title
Data Scientist

Company Description
Faegre Drinker is a top 50 firm designed for clients. With more than 1,300 experienced attorneys, consultants and professionals in 22 locations across the United States, United Kingdom and China, we partner with clients ranging from emerging startups to multinational corporations, delivering comprehensive and customized advice to advance their most ambitious business objectives. Our culture is firmly rooted in relentless client focus and mutual trust that empowers collaboration. We are committed to our communities and to building a diverse and inclusive firm that reflects those communities and our clients. Bolstered by our collective history, Faegre Drinker moves boldly into the future, investing in the talent, technology and innovation to continually provide clients with exceptional service, collaborative experiences, innovative approaches and value.

Requirements
• Bachelor’s Degree in a quantitative discipline
• 5+ years of direct analytics experience
• Proficient understanding and usage of relational SQL (e.g. Oracle, SQL Server, PostgreSQL) databases and data structures
• Proficiency with programming languages such as Python
• Experience using visualization tools
• Ability to interact directly with non-technical client stakeholders and act in a business-to-technical translation role

Full-Time / Part-Time
Full-Time

Position Expectations
•Strong commitment to client service
•Excellent interpersonal, verbal, and written communication skills, including the ability to communicate effectively in a virtual environment
•Cooperation and the ability to collaborate in a team, including across offices, while also being able to work independently
•Ability to problem solve and use sound judgment and discretion in dealing with highly confidential information
•Ability to build and maintain positive relationships, both internally and externally
•Strong sense of urgency and professional dedication
•Ability to prioritize projects in a fast-paced, deadline-driven environment
•Positive and professional demeanor

Company Benefits
•Paid time for firm-sponsored volunteer events
•Wellness programming with personalized content and activities
•Business casual attire
•Professional environment and the opportunity to work with experts at the top of their fields
•Variety of health plan options, as well as dental and vision plans
•Generous paid time off
•Opportunity to work remotely
•A centralized “Town Hall” area with a wide selection of vending and seating for lunch breaks and casual group meetings",3.4,Faegre Baker Daniels,"Indianapolis, IN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Private Practice / Firm,other_industries,Accounting & Legal,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,IN,4233,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
783,783,Data Scientist,$81k-$129k,"Sony/ATV Music Publishing, established in 1995 as a joint venture between Sony and Michael Jackson, is the world’s leading music publisher. Together with EMI Music Publishing, Sony/ATV owns or administers more than 3 million copyrights, ranging from songs by iconic names including The Beatles, Bob Dylan, Michael Jackson, Carole King, Queen and The Rolling Stones to contemporary superstars such as Taylor Swift, Drake, Pharrell Williams, Lady Gaga, Kanye West, Pink, Sam Smith and Ed Sheeran. To learn more: https://www.sonyatv.com/en.

Job Purpose: The Data Scientist is responsible for leading efforts to leverage music business data and associated metadata maintained in internal and external databases to enhance performance and gain insights into results.

Responsibilities:
Designs, plans, advocates, and builds data-fueled analytics products that help different departments better understand past and improve future outcomes
Provides insight into leading analytic practices as well as produces new and creative analytic solutions utilizing advanced techniques and algorithms
Leads team of visualization/dashboard developers
Works closely with departments to understand data insight needs and translates them into appropriate analytics. Improves data access processes enabled through the implemented technologies
Develops processes and visualizations to monitor and analyze business performance
Architects, develops, and uses a variety of datasets to find opportunities for process optimization.
Architects and develops a variety of analytic visualization (models, simulations, etc.) to test and validate the effectiveness of different courses of action.
Works with stakeholders throughout the organization to identify opportunities for leveraging company data to drive business solutions
Acts as a key stakeholder in defining strategies for data capture, hygiene, and utilization
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree or advanced degree in Business, Statistics or a related field is required.
Five years of experience and 2 years’ experience with development teams
Expert level of competence in the development of Tableau Platform or other business intelligence product deliverables
Broad working knowledge of Windows operating systems and a wide variety of desktop applications (including spreadsheets, word processors, presentation graphics) in a network environment, and Internet browsers and related Internet tools
Working knowledge of relational database programs, demonstrated competence in writing SQL code
Required Skills/Competencies:
Must be aligned with Sony’s Purpose and Values
Ability to think strategically
Exceptional attention to detail
Exceptional organization skills
Excellent influencing skills; must have demonstrated experience in driving forward a cohesive program of work
Strong problem-solving capabilities and ability to resolve interdependencies across the company
Strong leaderships skills required in order to successfully lead and motivate a team, including high EQ, inspirational and servant leadership capabilities
Must possess meticulous and process-driven characteristics
Strong communication skills - ability to communicate complex processes into simplified form; effectively communicates in order to influence
Exceptional follow-through skills and ability to see a project from start to completion
Strives for efficiency – Actively seeks ways of improving current methods, systems, processes and structures
Multi-territory experience and propensity to think globally through both a macro and micro lens
Ability to work in a collaborative environment, while still managing to work independently
Flexibility - Ability to work in an ambiguous, fast-paced environment
Special Position Requirements:
Domestic and international travel may be required
Work Requirements:
Must be authorized to work in the United States
E-verify:
English/Spanish
Right to Work:


English

Spanish


Sony is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religious creed, sex (including pregnancy), gender, national origin, citizenship, ancestry, age, physical or mental disability, military status, status as a veteran or disabled veteran, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital or family status, genetic information, medical condition, or any other basis protected by applicable federal, state, or local law, ordinance, or regulation.",3.4,Sony/ATV Music Publishing,"Nashville, TN",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,other_industries,Media,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,TN,4462,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
785,785,Data Analyst/Data Scientist,$81k-$129k,"Cascade Data Labs is a boutique consulting agency with end-to-end experience helping Fortune 500 companies form and execute their analytics strategy and infrastructure. We believe strongly that the difference between analytics success and failure comes down to practitioner-level understanding of the “details” presented across a variety of disciplines; data collection, organization, and processing in a rapidly evolving technological landscape, analytical inference on multi-dimensional data sets, and the communication of findings to business stakeholders in visually compelling ways.

Ideal candidates will have strong quantitative backgrounds and analytical discipline. While they will have some demonstrated ability to write code, they will not have learned programming languages for the sake of building their resume, but rather as a means to express their intellectual curiosity and analytical voice. Cascade Data Labs will provide a platform and training to help them reach their full potential.

We are seeking candidates with all levels of experience; intern to senior-level
Responsibilities:
Analyze a collection of raw data sets to create meaningful impact to large enterprise clients while maintaining a high degree of scientific rigor and discipline
Build data pipelines to aid analysis and/or reporting
Communicate findings in an intuitive and visually compelling way
Qualifications:
Required:
Bachelors or Masters in Business Analytics (or related), Mathematics or Statistics - if you are currently enrolled in a degree program please include your GPA in your resume or cover letter)
Proficiency (can execute data ingestion to insight) in programmatic language such as SQL, R, Python (Pandas/Scipy/Numpy) OR at the very least, mastery level of Microsoft Excel
Preferred (candidates are not expected to possess all of the below skills but should possess a demonstrated aptitude and excitement to learn more of them):
Proficiency in visualization/reporting tool such as Tableau, Spotfire, Qlikview OR proficiency in programmatic visualization library such as R ggplot2, Python matplotlib/seaborn/bokeh, Javascript D3
Proficiency in Microsoft Powerpoint or Keynote
Proficiency scripting in UNIX environment
Exposure to big data environment and tools such as Hive, Impala, Pig, Spark, etc. Familiarity with AWS services a huge plus
Familiarity with machine learning techniques and libraries along with the ability to appropriately apply them to various business questions
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $65,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:

Bonus pay
COVID-19 considerations:
Employees are all working remotely at this time.

Experience:
Spark: 1 year (Preferred)
R: 1 year (Preferred)
SQL: 1 year (Preferred)
Python: 1 year (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.cascadedatalabs.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,Cascade Data Labs,"Portland, OR",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,OR,3076,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
787,787,Master Data Engineer Sr - P,$81k-$129k,"Master Data Engineer Sr, salary grade 9, reports to the Manager, Big Data & Analytics in Libertyville, IL.
Role Summary:

The Master Data Engineer Sr. will execute the full development life cycle for master and reference data in support of VCI core subject areas such as customer, vehicle and dealer. This will require data integration from multiple disparate sources and applying master update business rules as designed by the Decision Sciences and Analytics business unit.

The incumbent also designs and develops data pipelines, integrations and API’s to support the proper update, federation and consumption of master and certified data repositories.

This will be accomplished by collaborating directly with the Decision Sciences team, along with Data Governance, and other technical experts to devise a core master data repository that is foundational and supports multiple business needs – both operational and analytical.

We are looking for an experienced, energetic, and entrepreneurial engineer who has successfully imagined, built and launched master and certified data solutions.
Role Responsibilities:
Strategic Work – 25%
Educate and inform yourself and team members about master data integration technology solutions and emerging trends
Continually participate in visioning exercises and contribute to the data strategy for VCI
Operational Work – 75% of time
Design, develop, test and deploy master data integration solutions based on business requirements
Troubleshoot and resolve production issues
Implement data quality processes for the core master and reference data. Provide solutions where issues are identified
Participate in code reviews
Continually refine and document master data integration best practices
Identify, evaluate and refine leading-edge data integration tools and methods
Build prototypes and POCs
Bring a passion to stay on top of tech trends, experiment with and learn new technologies, participate in internal & external technology communities, and mentor other members of the engineering community
Collaborate with team members on master data integration designs and alternatives
Work within and across Agile teams, including Decision Sciences, in the support of master data federation and consumption needs.
Document and support deployment activities.
Report on status of master and reference data products and projects on a regular and timely basis.
Ensure the timely resolution of issues.
Follow VCI standards and guidelines.
Escalate anticipated risks to management promptly and properly.
Partner with Domain Architects regarding master data integration design options
Required –
10+ years’ experience with DBMS technologies (Oracle, MS SQL Server, MySQL, Postgres, etc...)
Ability to support both SQL and NoSQL data management systems.
Database management experience of SQL databases such as MySQL and PostgreSQL
Experience in database migrations to Cloud and
Migration to Opensource databases a Plus
Expertise data warehousing, performance tuning, data security, auditing and encryption.
Working level proficiency with both Linux and Windows Operating Systems
Data warehouse concepts and data modeling
Proficiency with Automation and scripting (Shell scripting, PowerShell etc.)
Continuous Identification and evaluation of evolving technology solutions
Experience in onboarding new users and mentor new Database Engineers within the team
Expert in maintaining high collaboration with cross functional skills
Experience with Agile Scrum delivery methodologies
Demonstrated experience with presentation skills
Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written and perform well with customers of varying levels of technical expertise in high-pressure situations and complex environments.
Technically enthusiastic and willing to learn and accept challenges attitude is required.
Ability to work independently with minimal supervision in a multi-task and fast paced environment.
Desired –
Experience with Cloud (AWS). Route 53, AMIs, Auto Scaling, EBS, S3, CloudFormation, CloudWatch, CloudTrail, Lambda and AWS Managed Services
Experience with automation using configuration management tool Ansible
Leveraging Microsoft Office SharePoint Server (WSS)
Knowledge in Open SSO, oAuth, SAML, SFTP, PGP
Work Flexibility:
Strategic Work – 25%
Educate and inform yourself and team members about master data integration technology solutions and emerging trends
Continually participate in visioning exercises and contribute to the data strategy for VCI
Operational Work – 75% of time
Design, develop, test and deploy master data integration solutions based on business requirements
#LI-TG1
Troubleshoot and resolve production issues",3.5,Volkswagen Group of America,"Libertyville, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,65,Subsidiary or Business Segment,manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,IL,4675,1,data engineer,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
789,789,Sr. Lead Data Engineer,$81k-$129k,"Overview


As a Sr. Lead Data Management Platforms Engineer, you will be responsible for leading significant enterprise wide work as a part of a larger cross-functional team in support of multiple major analytics technology tools. The role will leverage and implement both pre-defined analytics infrastructure as well as create and deploy new patterns on projects of significant technical complexity, focusing on developing solutions to data modeling and/or analytics technology needs. They must be able to quickly develop mastery of the needed subject across a specific line of business for which they are responsible. Our Sr. Lead Data Engineers typically work with wide latitude for action or decisions on specific projects, solutions, or technical issues. They will represent EA in internal conversations and may assist with the selection or oversight of outside vendor partners. Successful candidates for this role must have strong technology and data analysis skills, a solid understanding of database technology and data use within analytic platforms, and they must have strong programming skills with SQL and/or Python. We expect Sr. Lead Data Engineers to have the capacity for fluency and competency in both the technology language of IT and the analyst language of departmental analysts. They will need to be fast learners with a keen eye for detail, systems thinking, and process design. They must be team players who work steadfastly to create impactful change. This is a professional track role.

Responsibilities


The person who fills this role will be expected to do the following as a part of their regular work responsibilities:
Works with business stakeholders and IT to translate business logic into scalable data and analytic solutions.
Develops ETL pipelines within Tableau/ThoughtSpot/Alteryx for general business consumption, typically leveraging existing patterns as available for specific project execution and building pipelines with scalability in mind.
Implements tool, data, and analytics best practices for specific project execution and advises COPA on such best practices.
Leverages tools efficiently, understanding both Tableau and Alteryx performance (including server) and cloud compute performance requirements and expectations.
Leverages cloud compute resources efficiently.
Owns and is accountable for data model and code quality and any relevant documentation.
Implements data governance and master data management principles across specific project execution.
Performs ad-hoc analysis as necessary to support specific project work.
Drives projects to success and enables others to own the impact.
Minimum Qualifications
Has strong analytical and data management skills
Strong process management and process creation skills
Has a solid understanding of database technology
Has a solid understanding of reporting and analytic platform data use
Has developed programming skills in SQL and Python or R
Has the skill to partner with cross-functional teams using strong written and verbal communication
Fast learner and proven problem solver
Keen eye for system thinking and process design, especially with respect to scalability and automation
Keen eye for detail and thoughtful investigation of data
Has a steadfast focus on creating impactful change
Preferred Qualifications
Has some experience using the AWS big data technology stack
Has moderate experience with Alteryx or similar ETL platforms
Has moderate experience with Tableau or similar data visualization tools
Has some experience implementing data governance principles
Minimum Years of Experience
5
Travel Requirements
10%
Required Level of Education
Bachelor's Degree
Preferred Level of Education
Masters Degree",3.9,Chick-fil-A,"Atlanta, GA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,74,Company - Private,other_industries,"Restaurants, Bars & Food Services",$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,GA,3712,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
790,790,Data Scientist,$81k-$129k,"Hinge is seeking a versatile data scientist to work on product development initiatives. From assessing opportunities and results through analytical techniques to curating personalized experiences with machine learning, you will take on a central and multi-faceted role in the product development process. In turn, your work will deeply influence how millions of Hinge members connect with each other.
Responsibilities
Collaborate with a cross-functional team of product managers, researchers, and engineers to develop and iterate on product features
Translate product objectives to data science problems and vice versa
Apply statistical inference to draw rigorous conclusions from data
Identify and execute on opportunities to apply machine learning to improve user experience
Perform ad hoc exploratory analysis as needed

Requirements:

2+ years of experience as data scientist
Strong knowledge of statistics and machine learning
Experience with A/B testing
Proficiency in SQL and Python
Exposure to engineering best practices
Superb communication skills
Deep sense of intellectual curiosity
Comfort with ambiguity
Our Company:
Hinge is the dating app for people who want to get off dating apps. In today’s digital world, singles are so busy matching that they’re not actually connecting, in person, where it counts. Hinge is on a mission to change that. So we built an app that’s designed to be deleted. On Hinge, there are no rules, timers, or games. Instead, you’ll meet your most compatible matches and you’ll have unique conversations over what you’ve shared on your detailed profile. It’s a natural way to find a great first date. Currently, 3 out of 4 first dates lead to second dates, we’re the #1 mobile-first dating app mentioned in the New York Times wedding section, and we’re the fastest growing dating app in the US, UK, Canada, and Australia.

Our Culture:

Authenticity: Share your genuine thoughts and opinions directly.
Courage: Invite and deeply consider challenges and criticism.
Empathy: Be empathetic, communitarian and trustworthy.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",3.8,Hinge,"New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,9,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,NY,2296,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
792,792,Senior Data Engineer,$81k-$129k,"We are looking for a Data Engineer who will be responsible for enhancing our measurement tool. You are passionate about all things data and tech, and have extensive knowledge of the digital space. You are accomplished in the areas of data modeling and measurement and you are ready to support the strategic objectives of a highly cross-functional organization.

Technology:
Spark, Hive
Scala, Python, SQL
HDFS, S3
PostGres, Redis, Kafka
Kubernetes, Docker
Airflow
RESPONSIBILITIES:
Build and enhance current measurement architecture
Provide insight and guidance on new projects
Collaborate with other engineering and data science teams to build data models
Develop and release using agile methodologies
QUALIFICATIONS:
5+ years - Modeling, measuring, and analyzing data
5+ years - Working with Python or Scala
5+ years - Building and optimizing workflows on Spark, Hadoop, or other big data platforms
Understanding of ad-tech terms and methodologies preferred
PERKS:
Unlimited paid time off each year
Annual vacation stipend
Onsite gym, fitness classes and personal trainer
Casual dress code
Kitchen stocked with healthy snacks
Health, dental and vision benefits
Parental leave
ABOUT

At VideoAmp, we believe in challenging advertising paradigms to maximize value for clients. We do this by enabling companies to execute on business outcomes across their media investment instead of more traditional media metrics. VideoAmp is the software and data solutions company powering the convergence of the linear TV and digital video advertising. Our solutions connect linear TV viewership with addressable data assets to benefit the marketing and media industries. This enable marketers and content owners to holistically plan, transact, and measure deduplicated audiences across digital video, OTT, connected and linear TV advertising.",3.5,VideoAmp,"Los Angeles, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,6,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,CA,1830,1,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
793,793,Data Scientist,$81k-$129k,"Quest Analytics is one of the fastest growing companies n the Healthcare software space in the US. Healthcare providers and insurance companies rely on our software. We do the important work of providing access to healthcare for all Americans!

We are growing and looking for a Data Scientist to join our team in either Overland Park, KS or on a remote basis. This Data Scientist will provide support to the team that is responsible for managing and mastering the healthcare provider data used to measure the accuracy, adequacy, and accessibility of health plan networks.  The right candidate will help Quest discover high value insights and information hidden in vast, complex data that can be applied to solving business problems and building better products. Your primary focus will be in applying data mining techniques, doing statistical analysis, and building high quality prediction systems integrated with our products.
In this role you will:
Selecting features, building and optimizing classifiers using machine learning techniques
Data mining using state-of-the-art methods
Extending company’s data with third party sources of information when needed
Enhancing data collection procedures to include information that is relevant for building analytic systems
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis
Doing ad-hoc analysis and presenting results in a clear manner
Creating automated anomaly detection systems and constant tracking of its performance
Evaluate existing algorithms using various technique such as intrusion detection
Develop metrics for evaluating internal and external data sources
What we are looking for:
Master’s degree in data science
A minimum of 2 years’ experience in a data science position required
Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Forests, regression, classification, natural language processing, association rule learning, intrusion detection models, etc.
Intermediate to advanced Python (knowledge of data frames)
Intermediate to advanced experience with Spark and Scala
Intermediate SQL
Great communication skills
Good applied statistics skills, such as statistical testing, distribution estimation, regression, etc.
Good scripting and programming skills
Data-oriented personality
Experience with healthcare data a plus
Excellent troubleshooting, listening and problem-solving skills
We are not currently engaging with outside agencies on this role.

Ready to Evolve?

We want smart, driven individuals to help us create Quest Analytics future. If you invest yourself in your work, live with enthusiasm, and thrive on results, we want to know you.

What's In It For You
Great benefit package with:

100% paid HDHP Health plan, Dental, Vision for Employee tier and cost sharing for all other tiers
Company matching on 401(k) and HSA contributions
Generous PTO and 9 Paid Holidays
Life, Short and Long Term Disability
Paid maternity / paternity and much more
Flexible work arrangements so you can balance work/life
Competitive salary and success sharing bonus
Opportunity to get in on ground floor and grow & learn as the company grows
Work in a fun, flexible, casual environment
Ability to telecommute when needed
Plus, the free gourmet coffee to fuel the brainpower necessary to conquer your goals
Free drinks & snacks
Apply TODAY!

Visa sponsorship is not available at this time.

Quest Analytics provides equal employment opportunities to all people without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, marital status, veteran status, age, disability, sexual orientation or gender identity or expression or any other legally protected category.

Applicants must be legally authorized to work in the United States. Verification of employment eligibility will be required at the time of hire.",3.9,Quest Analytics,"Overland Park, KS",-1,51 to 200 Employees,17,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,KS,3863,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,1
794,794,Data Scientist,$81k-$129k,"Data Scientist, Research and Development; Connor Group. Location - Salt Lake City.

Connor Group is a specialized professional services firm, made up of Big Four alumni and industry professionals, that partners with financial executives on their most critical accounting and financial operational issues. We work hard to be the best at what we do in the markets we serve and to build a great firm that attracts, develops, motivates and retains exceptional people. Our brand is built from our ability to execute on the most complex transactions and issues, including over 50% of Bay Area IPOs over the past several years. We currently have more than 350 clients on five continents covering North America, Europe, Asia, Australia and South America. Our core expertise is in the following areas: Technical Accounting, IPO Services, Merger & Acquisition Services, Financial Operations including Systems, and Managed Services.

Connor Group’s client portfolio contains a mix of multibillion-dollar public companies, mid-cap public companies and pre-IPO companies ranging from late stage to early stage. Our global clients represent the most exciting industries including Software/SaaS, Biotechnology, Medical Device, Clean Technology, Internet/e-commerce, Media / Ad Tech, Consumer Goods and Fin Tech.

Connor Group is building its Research and Development (R&D) Group. Our R&D Group’s mission is to accelerate innovation across the firm focusing on research of new products or services, and development of software-enabled tools leveraging Big Data, AI, ML, and RPA. These exciting innovations will result in SaaS offerings for existing and new customers across multiple markets.

We are looking for core team members that will help us build the foundation for the R&D group and many new innovations. This role will work with the Partner of the R&D group, engaging with Practice Leaders and Clients to develop new products and services.

Responsibilities
Provide data analysis to other core team members – Data Scientist, Senior Data and Software Engineer, and Product Manager
Analyze the client’s business, processes and data; proposing and defining business drivers to achieve a set of outcomes
Build customer facing data visualizations to monitor, report and alert customers and CG on the impact of drivers to desired outcomes
Analyze offered service offerings with client data and internal processes to propose new tools and services that could be built into SaaS products.
Helping to build production systems that take inputs from multiple models and make decisions in real time.
Deliver ML / DL projects from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models to deliver business impact to the organization.
Deploy machine learning models to production environment
Required skills/Experience
Master’s degree in computer science, Mathematics, or other Scientific field
5+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science and analysis
Previous experience in a ML or data scientist role and a track record of building ML or DL models
Experience using Python and/or R
Knowledge of Microsoft Azure, Azure Machine Learning, Azure Blobs
Able to write production level code, which is well-written and explainable
Ability to deploy and productionize machine learning models
Experience using ML libraries, such as scikit-learn, pandas, numpy
Experience working with data warehouse solutions like Snowflake, SQL server
Knowledge of model serialization techniques like Pickle, ONNX
Track record of diving into data to discover hidden patterns
Familiarity with using data visualization tools like Tableau/Looker/Power BI
Knowledge and experience of writing and tuning SQL
Past and current experience writing and speaking about complex technical concepts to broad audiences in a simplified format
Experience giving data presentations
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Preferred skills/Experience
PhD in Computer Science, Mathematics, Operational Research, or Statistics, or related field
Knowledge of deep learning frameworks like Tensorflow, Pytorch
Knowledge of any RPA tool
Knowledge of Constraint Optimization, Linear Programming and evolutionary algorithms
Knowledge of private equity space, private equity exits strategies, VC & seed funding
Ability to develop experimental and analytic plans for data modeling processes, use of strong baselines, ability to accurately determine cause and effect relations
Track record of helping customers with their AI needs
Publications or presentation in recognized Machine Learning, Deep Learning and Data Mining journals/conferences
Combination of deep technical skills and business savvy enough to interface with all levels and disciplines within our customer’s organization
Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
Travel
Ability to travel 25 to 30%, mostly domestic",4.0,Connor Group,"Salt Lake City, UT",-1,201 to 500 Employees,14,Company - Private,other_industries,Accounting & Legal,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,UT,5032,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,1
796,796,Data Scientist,$81k-$129k,"Job Title: Data Scientist / Chemometrician

Description:

Vaporsens, Inc., a spinoff company of the University of Utah, is developing detectors that help public safety officials “sniff” out explosives and narcotics. Our detectors are based on sensors that are developed from organic nanofibers. See our website www.vaporsens.com for more details.

We seek a Data Scientist / Chemometrician who is multifaceted, creative, diligent in their work, and able to adapt to our dynamic environment. As part of a small multidisciplinary team, you will wear many hats, but your primary role will be to develop algorithms to interpret the signals from our array of chemical sensors.

Qualifications and Responsibilities:
Develop algorithms to convert raw sensor signals into actionable data for our customers
Understand how basic principles of sensor operation and how signals are generated in response to chemicals; relating artifacts in the data to the physical world is critical
Excellent knowledge of multivariate regression and classification methods, including but not limited to Principal Component Analysis (PCA), Partial Least Squares (PLS), adaptive cosine estimation (ACE), etc.
Experience in signal processing and signal cleaning (e.g., software filters, data whitening, matched filters, z-transform, etc.)
General knowledge of machine learning and artificial intelligence, including data pipelines, cross-validation, and testing of models’ robustness; knowledge of methods including random forests, convolutional and recurrent neural networks, k-nearest neighbors, etc.
Ability to integrate algorithms with software, particularly on instruments with limited processing power
Experience in mixture analysis
Experience in multivariate calibration and calibration transfer
Experience in multidimensional data visualization
Proficiency in Python and related packages (scikit learn, scipy, numpy, pandas, matplotlib, etc.)
Experience with dynamic modeling is a plus; dynamic models involving physical chemistry are especially relevant
Ability to adapt data to compensate for non-idealities from instrumentation
Ability to generate operationally-relevant statistics for detection (e.g., probability of detecting a chemical at a given concentration and continuous false alarm rate, receiver operating characteristics, detection truth tables), identification (e.g., probability of a correct identification, identification truth tables), and quantification (e.g., root mean square error, linear dynamic range)
Ability to work on an interdisciplinary team
Excellent written and verbal communication and interpersonal skills, including data presentation
Eagerness to learn outside of your established field, i.e., learning chemistry, physics, etc.
Requirements:
B.S. degree or higher in Data Science, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Physics, Chemistry, Electrical Engineering or related field from an accredited college or university (M.S. or Ph. D preferred; B.S. acceptable with appropriate level of experience)
Must be able to receive data that is export controlled by the International Traffic in Arms Regulations (ITAR); this position is only open to U.S. Citizens or Permanent Residents
Experience in the scientific instrumentation industry, with preference given to small, portable devices
Strong problem solving skills
Experience working within a formal product development environment
Experience in chemometrics for chemical sensors or sensor arrays is preferred.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:

Bonus Pay
COVID-19 considerations:
All meetings moved online; staggered shifts; occupancy limits on all rooms; mandatory temperature checks when reporting to work; mandatory face masks when away from personal work space; company provides face masks, gloves, and sanitizing products

Education:
Master's (Preferred)
Location:
Salt Lake City, UT 84108 (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
http://www.vaporsens.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1.0,"Vaporsens, Inc.","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,UT,4359,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
797,797,Data Scientist,$81k-$129k,"Do you want to build your personal brand with an industry-leading innovator that is always thinking outside the box? Does the box bore you? Do you want to leverage your analytic skills to tackle and solve difficult, seemingly impossible problems in a dynamic and growing industry? FourthWall Media is seeking junior to mid-level data analysts to expand its data analytics products and services.

This vital role works closely with data scientists and developers to discover insights within massive demographic, TV viewing, and advertising datasets and translate those insights into analytics products and business intelligence for FourthWall’s clients.

This non-traditional data analyst role requires inquisitiveness bound by pragmatism and cross-disciplinary skills to translate mathematical and statistical exploration into hands-on interaction with existing data systems. Perfectionism and attention to detail are required. Communication with co-workers, both to understand and to explain, is paramount.

Primary Goals
Exploration, analysis, modeling, mining, profiling and cleansing of large and interesting datasets
Searching for key insights, trends, flaws, and value in the data
Working with the data flow team to enhance quality and coverage
Working with R&D to develop new analytics processes and prototypes
Education and Experience
Excellent written and verbal communication skills are required
Self-motivating inquisitiveness, the ability to focus on complexity, and the tenacity to tackle seemingly impossible problems are required
Bachelor’s degree (B.S.) from four-year college or university with a preference in computer science, mathematics or statistics
Experience with Python is required
Experience with Hadoop, Hive, SQL, Theano, Tensorflow, Keras, Pandas, Scikit-Learn, R and Mathematica are preferred
xperience with television and/or advertising data ecosystems (DMPs, DSPs, media buying platforms, analytics platforms) is a plus
A minimum of 1 years experience in a professional, technical workplace",4.0,FourthWall Media,"Dulles, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,VA,2022,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,1,1,0,0,0
798,798,Data Scientist 2 - Microsoft,$81k-$129k,"Microsoft 365 is a key part of the company’s cloud strategy and overall mission of empowering people and organizations to achieve more. As part of the customer journey to the cloud there are times when they need to reach out to seek help from Microsoft and that’s where our team steps in to make sure that the customer support experience is best in class. Our team is responsible for the entire admin and support ecosystem starting from the Microsoft admin portal (https://admin.microsoft.com), support entry point experience, Artificial Intelligence (AI) driven self-help, support agent tooling, diagnostics and making sure telemetry is readily available to all of engineering to continuously drive product improvements. Our team is full of people who have truly embraced a growth mindset, is not afraid to make mistakes, believes in doing and are obsessed about providing our customers the best support experience possible.
The data science team is engaged in building intelligent solutions using AI and Machine Learning (ML) that help in resolving customer issues. The team is looking for a talented Data Scientist who has a track record of delivering highly reliable and scalable cloud services while collaborating with other teams.
Responsibilities
Perform exploratory analysis to understand trends and patterns in data.
Build Machine Learning (ML) models to understand customer query intent.
Build Natural Language Processing (NLP) tools to process and analyze customer queries.
Collaborate with engineering teams to bring experimental ML models to production.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree (or higher) in Predictive Analytics, Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Operations Research, Computer Science or related technical discipline.
Minimum of 3 years of work experience in data modeling using R, Python or similar statistical package.
Minimum of 2 years of experience in one or more of the following: generalized linear models, regression models, ensemble models, resampling methods, model validation and testing, dimensionality reduction, and clustering.
Preferred Qualifications:
Masters degree is preferred.
Proficiency in using statistical computing languages for data analysis.
Expertise in predictive modeling using both supervised and unsupervised learning techniques.
Experience in data transformation with SQL, statistical programming languages.
Demonstrated Exploratory Analysis and Visualization abilities.
Experience in Natural Language Processing (NLP) and text processing methods/models.

Ability to meet Microsoft, customer and/or government security screening requirements are required for this role. These requirements include, but are not limited to the following specialized security screenings:

Microsoft Cloud Background Check: This position will be required to pass the Microsoft Cloud background check upon hire/transfer and every two years thereafter.

#MicrosoftATL

Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws, regulations and ordinances. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application or the recruiting process, please send a request via the Accommodation request form.

Benefits/perks listed below may vary depending on the nature of your employment with Microsoft and the country where you work.",4.3,Microsoft,"Atlanta, GA",-1,10000+ Employees,45,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,GA,3841,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
799,799,Data Engineer - Cloud Technology,$81k-$129k,"RESPONSIBILITIES:

Kforce has a client seeking a Data Engineer - Cloud Technology in Grand Rapids, MI.

Are you an experienced Data Engineer with an eclectic collection of database background like Oracle, SQL Server, PostgreSQL? Help this Kforce client move their critical business intelligence environment to the cloud and a whole lot more. The ideal candidate will develop and support data analysis and visualization projects that empower data-driven business strategies. They will collect, clean, transform, and serve data where and when it needs to be, and work closely with (near) real-time data feeds, tackle extremely challenging problems of integrating machine learning and AI solutions, and help work with data scientist on predictive analytics.

Responsibilities:
Collaborate with Business Intelligence data scientists and data analysts to clean, enrich, and serve data where and when it is needed
Plan, develop, execute, and maintain complex data pipelines from multiple obscure data sources, including APIs, unstructured text data, image/binary data, flat files, and SQL/NoSQL databases
Work closely on complex implementations of ML/AI models for two-sided market pricing/matching and other business-specific optimizations
Adapt quick to changing business environments and technology advances, try new approaches which have not been tried before, challenge accepted practices to find innovations
REQUIREMENTS:
Working knowledge of Big Data technologies such as Spark, Hadoop and Redshift
Knowledge of complex data pipelines with products like Airflow or Luigi
Familiar with Python
Solid understanding and experience with data modelling
Helpful to have IoT exposure and / or knowledge
Experience working with unstructured and dirty data; Not only collecting, cleaning, and serving it, but understanding the connection between data and business value
Fluent in relational databases like SQL Server, PostgreSQL, and MySQL
Familiarity with NoSQL databases or NoSQL style data storage in relational databases
Comfortable working with geo-spatial data
Experience developing optimized and scalable ETL processes
Kforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",4.1,Kforce,"Grand Rapids, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,54,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,MI,2407,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
801,801,Data Scientist,$81k-$129k,"The Chan Zuckerberg Biohub (""CZ Biohub”) is an independent nonprofit medical research organization based in the San Francisco Bay Area. The Chan Zuckerberg Biohub supports scientific research to cure, prevent or manage disease in our children’s lifetime. Our mission is to understand the fundamental mechanisms underlying disease and to develop new technologies which will lead to actionable diagnostics and effective therapies. We harness the power and possibility of collaboration to drive discovery and set the standard for open, impactful science. For more information, please visit czbiohub.org.

Opportunity

The Data Science and Infectious Disease teams at CZ Biohub work closely with local, national, and international organizations and departments of public health to enable informed decision making using next-generation sequencing data, advanced statistical analyses and mathematical modeling. During the coronavirus pandemic, CZ Biohub has been working with UCSF to provide COVID-19 testing, sequencing samples and providing actionable information to local health departments, and enabling genomics-based surveillance in California through phylogenetics and mathematical modeling.

We are looking for a data scientist with mathematical modeling experience to join our team for predictive and analytical projects related to the COVID-19 pandemic. The role will involve working directly with public health departments to understand their needs and to provide actionable information from modeling analyses to support public health decision and policy making. In addition to working on specific public health problems, the data scientist will contribute to open-source software and workflows, develop new methods as needed, and collaborate with academic researchers on scientific projects. Strong communication skills are essential for this position in addition to technical skills.

We are open to more junior candidates who have at least a Bachelor’s degree, and relevant coursework and internship experience.

Requirements
PhD in Epidemiology, Population Genetics, Ecology and Evolution, Systems Biology, Computational Biology, Machine Learning or related disciplines;
OR Bachelor’s/Master’s in the above disciplines with relevant experience;
Working knowledge of Bayesian statistics and inference;
Experience with or relevant coursework in mathematical models used to study infectious disease transmission, ecology, mobility, networks or related areas;
2+ years of experience with Python or R;
Experience with data visualization software or packages such as ggplot2, matplotlib, d3;
Strong communication skills with both technical and non-specialist audiences.
In the cover letter, candidates should address:
Why are you interested in working on infectious disease modeling projects?
Why are you interested in working for CZ Biohub?
How does this role fit into your longer-term goals?
Preferred/Desired Qualifications
Previous experience with whole genome sequencing, mobility, or geospatial data;
Experience working with decision-makers in government and healthcare institutions;
Understanding of infectious disease and epidemiologic processes;
Experience with cloud computing, Github, or machine learning.
What We Provide
Resources to disrupt and innovate at the frontiers of our knowledge of biology and disease.
A collegial and collaborative environment consisting of diverse expertise.
Existing collaborations within CZ Biohub: Advanced Optical Microscopy, Cell Atlas, Bioengineering, Data Science, Genome Editing, and Infectious Diseases.
Access to collaborators, resources and facilities at the three partner campuses (UCSF, Berkeley and Stanford) and at partner institutions in the Bay Area and beyond.
Competitive compensation and benefits commensurate with the experience.
Benefits

We offer a robust benefits program that enables the important work Biohubbers do everyday. Our benefits include healthcare coverage, life and disability insurance, commuter subsidies, family planning services with fertility care, childcare stipend, 401(k) match, flexible time off and a generous parental leave policy. In addition, we honor our commitment to career development and our value of scholarly excellence through regular onsite opportunities to learn from the world's leading scientists.

CZ Biohub is an equal opportunity employer committed to diversity of thought, ideas and perspectives. We are committed to cultivating an inclusive organization where all Biohubbers feel inspired and know their work makes an important contribution. Therefore, we provide employment opportunities without regard to age, race, color, ancestry, national origin, religion, disability, sex, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, or any other protected status in accordance with applicable law.

Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Headhunters and recruitment agencies may not submit resumes/CVs through this Web site or directly to managers. CZ Biohub does not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes. CZ Biohub will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with CZ Biohub.",3.8,Chan Zuckerberg Biohub,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,other_industries,Non-Profit,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.0,CA,5248,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,1,0,1
802,802,Data Scientist,$57k-$111k,"Job Summary:
The primary function of this position is to utilize data science skills in data wrangling/munging to extract and transform data to produce analyzable datasets for the purpose of reproducible access, display, and analysis in support of ongoing investigations in NASAs biomedical research laboratories.

As a member of this team, the incumbent must possess the ability to use programming and scripting to extract data from multiple file types and formats to generate useable data, create automated reports, and build interactive dashboard visualizations. Responsibilities include the development of scripts to automate data extraction and formatting, and the generation of reports and visualizations. Scripts may be coded using a variety of statistical software, such as R, Python, and MATLAB, depending on investigator needs.

Primary Duties:

Responsible for compliance with Safety, Health and Environmental plan; must be committed to a high standard of safety and be willing and able to comply with all safety laws and all of the Companys safety policies and rules and must be willing to report safety violations and potential safety violations to appropriate supervisory or management personnel
Responsible for compliance with the Quality Assurance Plan, policies and procedures
Must maintain regular and acceptable attendance level as determined by the Company
Responsible for completing all assigned training
Programming to perform data transformations, including merging, ordering, aggregation, etc., using vetted data science software (e.g. R, Python, or MATLAB) to develop automated computational pipelines for complex data
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis
Integrate information from multiple data sources, solving common transformation problems, and resolve data cleansing and quality issues
Develop automated reports and visualizations tools, such as interactive dashboards
Know the context for the data well enough to be able to accurately assemble, clean, and transform it into a meaningful form useful for subsequent analysis
Implement statistical or other mathematical methodologies as needed for specific models or analysis as directed
Effectively communicate with managers and researchers across different disciplines regarding data sets and reporting needs
Understand and collaborate with scientists and management to devise solutions to meet reporting requirements
Maintain current CITI Human Subjects Research - Biomedical Research certification.
Other tasks as directed.
Education/Experience
Required:

Bachelors degree or certification in Data Science, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or similar quantitative field or at least 4 years relevant experience working with data
Demonstrated experience in Data Science including extracting and transforming different types of data files (csv, xls, txt, pdf, doc) into useable data using reproducible coding and scripting techniques
Minimum 1-2 years of programming code in software packages such as R, Python, MATLAB, etc. to perform data manipulation
Desired:
Experience with data visualization tools, such as plot.
Experience developing data visualizations and interactive dashboards through coding.
Experience with data wrangling and harmonization across a variety of data file types and formats.
Experience working with and creating data architectures
Demonstrated experience with collaborations supporting multiple research disciplines/specialties
Ability to be creative in developing different methods for reporting and communicating data insights depending on the specific needs of a project",3.0,JES Tech,"Houston, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Contract,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,TX,3630,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
804,804,Data Scientist,$57k-$111k,"Data Scientist


Main Responsibilities:
Execute quantitative analyses that translate data into actionable insights. Provide analytical and data-driven decision-making support for critical projects.
Develop new insights and analyses that inform decisions and help us continue to improve our business processes.
Provide reporting and performance monitoring to different stakeholders using data drawn from diverse sources.
Use advanced statistical knowledge to inference causal relationships through multiple technics
Build machine learning models and AI product to empower the product team, marketing team and internal data science teams.
Tencent Games has multiple openings for full time Data Scientists of senior and above levels for following areas:
Experimentation (A/B testing)
Product Analytics
User Acquisition, Marketing
Algorithms
The position will have the opportunity to work on many popular mobile games on a wide array of topics:
Building advanced interactive dashboards to help product and marketing teams to generate insights and put them into an action plan.
Automatic data engineering workflows run on a big data platform from a massive amount of data generated by our players every second.
Innovate how data science and analytics help the team solve many critical business problems backup by advanced techniques. Such as machine learning, statistical modeling, time series analysis, anomaly detection, classification, clustering methods, and all cool stuff you like to get your hands dirty!
Analytics/Data Science workflow automation to 10X the impact!
Minimal Requirements:
S. or B.A. in Math, Statistics, Comp Sci, Engineering, or another quantitative field required
2+ years' experience as a Data Scientist in a Cross Functional Team
2+ Hands-on experience with SQL/Python/R
Desired Skills and Experience:
S. or B.A. in Math, Statistics, Comp Sci, Engineering, or other quantitative field required; advanced degrees preferred
4+ Hands-on experience with SQL
Python/R is your go-to language and tool when coming to data science-related works!
Proven big data and distributed programing experience preferred, such as Spark, Scala, Hive, Hadoop
You are detail-oriented and are a self-starter!
You like challenges and know how to get things done!
You are comfortable to work in a fast-paced environment and to meet changing deadlines and priorities on multiple simultaneous projects.",4.2,Tencent,"Los Angeles, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,22,Company - Public,other_industries,Media,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,CA,2398,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
805,805,Data Scientist,$57k-$111k,"About Alteryx
As a global leader in analytic process automation (APA), Alteryx unifies analytics, data science and business process automation in one, end-to-end platform to accelerate digital transformation. Organizations of all sizes, all over the world, rely on the Alteryx Analytic Process Automation Platform to deliver high-impact business outcomes and the rapid upskilling of their modern workforce.

Why work for just any analytics company? At Alteryx, we are explorers, dreamers, and innovators. We're on a journey to build the best analytics platform in the world, but we can't do it without people like you leading the way.

Overview


The Data Science Innovation team directly contributes new and exciting capabilities to the Alteryx Platform. From OCR to NLP, we create tools for our customers leveraging state-of-the art data science techniques! We are a dynamic, resourceful, and inventive team that works on every stage of development – from ideation and design to deployment. We combine creativity with technical expertise to identify opportunities and unlock the potential of the Alteryx platform in original and unexpected ways.

We are very excited to be expanding our team, and are looking for a self-starters, creative-thinkers, and people passionate about learning new things. If you fit one or more of these descriptions, we would love to interview you!


Responsibilities
Quickly code minimum viable products (MVPS) to prove out new concepts and allow for testing
Leverage cutting-edge data science techniques by staying up to date on current research and development
Design and develop high-quality software, including automated testing of the code
Ensure the Data Science Innovation team remains a supportive, collaborative, and fun place to work
Willingness to travel up to 25%
*** The company will not provide sponsorship for work visas or other employment authorization for this position. ***

Required Qualifications
1+ year(s) of experience developing code in Python
1+ year(s) working with statistical or machine learning models
Strong interpersonal skills, including excellent written and verbal communication skills with experience presenting technical concepts to all levels
Demonstrated ability to translate project requirements into technical solutions
Creative problem solving
Ability to work in a fast-paced environment under pressure and prioritize multiple tasks
Preferred Qualifications
Experience writing production-quality code in Python or JavaScript (leveraging React and/or Redux)
Experience developing beautiful and informative data visualizations
Experience solving real problems with data science.
CI/CD (Gitlab preferred)
Experience with the Alteryx Platform
Benefits & Perks
100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision for associates
Health plans that cover your family and pets
Company matched 401(k)
Associate stock purchase plan
Paid time off: 3 weeks’ vacation, 5 sick days, 9 holidays, 3 floating holidays, and 20 hours volunteer time
100% paid parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Wellness programs with up to $300 fitness reimbursement annually
Collaborative offices stocked with healthy snacks and drinks
Office events, catered lunches, and happy hours
#LI-JE1",5.0,ClearStory Data,"Broomfield, CO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,9,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,CO,3223,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
808,808,"Data Scientist, Analytics & Inference",$57k-$111k,"Hello, World! Codecademy has helped tens of millions of learners upgrade their careers, build meaningful projects and gain confidence in their skills with engaging, accessible, and flexible education on programming and data skills. We provide hands-on interactive lessons ranging from Python to R to Javascript and everything in between. Our learners have gone on to start companies, new jobs, and new lives thanks to what they've learned with Codecademy, and we're thrilled to be working to take that impact to the next level.

Codecademy was started in 2011 by two college students in a dorm room at Columbia that were frustrated by the huge gap between education and employment. Almost a decade later, we are a rapidly growing, diverse team of 100+ headquartered in SoHo, NYC. We've raised over $40m in venture capital funding from top investors including Union Square Ventures, Kleiner Perkins, Naspers, Y Combinator, and more.

If you want to help build a business that impacts tens of millions of people each year and helps them lead better lives, join us!

WHAT YOU'LL DO


As a Data Scientist focused on Analytics and Experimentation, you will work on an impactful team to analyze our millions of learners. We capture terabytes of data on how users engage with our platform. As Codecademy continues our rapid growth, we want to build a data-informed culture that uses hypothesis testing, experimentation, and exploratory analysis to guide our decision-making process.

You will join a small but growing team of Data Scientists. Our work is in high-demand from all corners of Codecademy. We work on a variety of problems and have a real impact on the business and product. If you have a proven background in data and you are excited about making code education accessible, we want to hear from you!
Apply exploratory data analysis and causal inference to answer complex questions about our users.
Collaborate across teams to help scope out analyses, through a combination of experimentation (A/B testing) and quantitative user research.
Design experiments and evaluate results to test and iterate on new product ideas.
Perform deep dives into our data to build understanding around our business.
Work with our data science and engineering teams to maintain data integrity.
Mentor and consult with a cross-functional team of data scientists, engineers, and product managers.
WHAT YOU'LL NEED
3+ years of industry experience in a data science, analytics, or research role. You have strong data intuition and knowledge of using data science best practices to drive impact.
Expert SQL - we use Redshift. Able to write clean and efficient queries on massive datasets.
Applied experience with statistical programming languages - R or Python preferred.
Understanding of statistical methods and when to use them (hypothesis testing, experiment design, sampling).
Strong written and verbal communicator. Comfortable working with loosely defined research problems.
WHAT WILL MAKE YOU STAND OUT
Background in experimentation and measurement. We're looking to streamline our experimentation reporting framework and would love your help.
A workflow involving reproducible methods and version control - Github, Docker.
Experience automating dashboards with business intelligence tools - Looker, Tableau.
Passionate about teaching the world to code. Empathy for our learners, such as a background in education or past experience using our site.
Interesting questions you might work on
What are some different types of patterns in user behavior?
What do we do when we are unable to conduct an experiment?
Can we predict whether a learner will renew their subscription?
How do we improve the relevance of our course recommendations?
How can we scale our existing processes? (experiment reporting framework, forecasting)
At Codecademy, we are committed to teaching people the skills they need to upgrade their careers. Codecademy aims to educate a richly diverse demographic of learners with our product and in order to accomplish this, we believe our team should reflect that rich diversity. Our company celebrates diversity in all of its forms-- race, gender, color, national origin, marital status, sexuality, religion, veteran status, age, ability, disability status-- and works to create an inclusive workplace where people of all backgrounds and beliefs are empowered to better their futures.",3.5,Codecademy,"New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,9,Company - Private,other_industries,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,NY,4387,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
809,809,Data Scientist,$57k-$111k,"W. R. Berkley Corporation, founded in 1967, is one of the nation’s premier commercial lines property casualty insurance providers. Founded in 2004, Berkley Environmental has underwriting and account executive units in seven regions. Berkley Environmental offers an array of coverages for virtually all classes traditionally known to have environmental liability exposures on both an admitted and non-admitted basis. We provide a comprehensive portfolio of commercial property casualty insurance, automobile liability and workers’ compensation, along with claim services, providing expertise to meet the unique business needs of our customers. W.R. Berkley Corporation has reached a milestone and is celebrating 50 years, click here to read more on the history of the company.

As a data scientist for Berkley Environmental, you will play an integral part in changing the way insurance is delivered. The role will allow you to apply cutting edge machine learning algorithms to a variety of business problems. You will be joining an organization committed to data driven decision making meaning your models will be quickly implemented and have a real impact on the business. The role will provide exposure to a wide range of commercial insurance lines.
Duties and Responsibilities:
Build statistical models to select and price insurance business
Evaluate and refine existing models to increase profitability
Help build internal platforms and infrastructure to speed up the data science lifecycle
Clearly communicate model results to senior leaders
Collaborate with business experts to improve existing processes through analytics
Keep up-to-date with latest technology
Analyze data and recommend ways to increase quality

2-5 years of experience in a data science or analytics role
Strong P&C Insurance industry experience is preferred
5+ years of experience in SQL and extracting and cleaning data for modeling purposes
Proficient in Python or R
Demonstrated knowledge of machine learning techniques and an understanding of traditional statistical methods such as GLMs
Excellent communication skills and the ability to communicate clearly to both technical and non-technical audiences
Publicly available code (e.g. GitHub, Bitbucket, Kaggle) is a plus
Skills and Competencies:
Ability to meet deadlines, determine priorities and adapt to changing priorities as needed
Strong logical, analytical and reasoning abilities and attention to detail
Demonstrate organizational skills while working on multiple project initiatives
Ability to work independently, takes ownership, determine the urgency of situations and respond accordingly
Berkley Core Competencies
Accountability
Communication
Customer Focus and Teamwork
Flexibility
Innovation and Initiative",3.3,Berkley,"Atlanta, GA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,53,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,GA,2750,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
811,811,Data Scientist,$57k-$111k,"Who we are?

PSC Biotech is a leading Biotech Consultancy firm founded in 1996, headquartered in Pomona, California, USA, with global operations in Ireland, India, Singapore, Australia, and the US, serving 350 clients in more than 23 countries worldwide. We provide cloud-based software solutions for Quality Management and Regulatory Inspections, pharmaceuticals contract manufacturing professionals, and metrology services to our clients.

Take your Career to a New Level

PSC Biotech disrupts the conventional consultancy model by aligning our EVP as one of the unique selling points which include the opportunity to work with the most talented cohort of like-minded professionals operating in the Pharma/Biotech Industry. We offer a permanent contract of employment giving exposure to working in Top Pharmaceutical client sites in a diverse-cultural work setting.

We are looking for an experienced Data Scientist for our PSC Software Entity, this would be remote position. Details are as follows:

Expertise/Requirements
Bachelors or higher Degree in Computer Sciences or Data Science with an emphasis on data analysis and structures for machine learning, and artificial intelligence.
Additional experience in statistical modeling, computational biology/chemistry/physics, or mathematic modeling or other relevant areas is desirable.
Passionate about creating replicable, scalable systems around data and analytics.
You think modularly and create robust, reusable patterns and components whenever possible
Expertise and experience in engineering data pipelines using big data technologies on large scale data sets.
Understand the Data Lifecycle and concepts such as lineage, governance and retention
Conceptually familiar with AWS cloud resources (S3, EC2, RDS, etc.)
Excels at taking vague requirements and crystallizing them into scalable data solutions.
Operates independently, demonstrates excellence, and self learns new technologies and frameworks.
Knowledge of United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA), European Medicines Agency (EMA) and other regulatory schema is a plus.
Ability to communicate and work effectively with non-computer science personnel is a plus.
Ability to work well under pressure to provide results in a short time-frame.
PSC is seeking a highly responsive, goal-oriented individual who will bring significant energy and drive to lay the foundation for and help drive delivery of our next generation applications.
This is a remote position.",4.2,PSC Biotech,"Pomona, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,24,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,CA,2481,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
812,812,Data Scientist,$57k-$111k,"Zoba is building the next generation of spatial analytics to improve the efficiency of cities and the lives of people that live in them. Currently, we’re focused on providing industry-leading demand estimation and optimization to shared mobility companies around the world. Zoba is backed by leading investors including CRV, Founder Collective, and Mark Cuban.

Zoba is a data science company, and as such the data science and engineering teams work closely to build Zoba’s core products. Zoba has one of the world’s largest micromobility datasets--tens of millions of ride events and growing exponentially. At Zoba, you would use this data to:

- Discover drivers of micromobility demand
- Disentangle the causal impacts of seasonality, weather, and operational decisions on mobility system performance
- Develop dynamic pricing models

We are currently looking for a data scientist to join our growing team. The anticipated start date for this position is September 1st, 2020.
The role entails
Interfacing with customers to understand their needs and how those needs can be addressed with mathematical tools
Estimating the effects of changes in mobility operations
Developing pricing models which build upon Zoba’s demand estimation and optimization pipelines
Collaborating with Zoba’s engineering and product teams to implement new models and refine existing pipelines
Working with detailed, granular mobility data
What we are looking for
Demonstrable expertise in data science applied to mobility or a related field, either through academic or industry experience
Technical creativity and clarity in technical communication
Strong coding and implementation skills
Strong math modeling skills
A bias towards action, team-first mindset and willingness to take on the challenges of an early stage startup
An interest in spatial data, mobility, and making an impact on cities
Nice to have
Experience with our current stack: Python, Django, AWS, PostGIS, Julia
Experience with spatial data or geostatistics
A year or more of industry data science experience
Proficiency with any of the following: deep learning, hierarchical Bayesian models, mixed integer optimization, causal inference
Experience with dynamic pricing
At Zoba, we view diversity as a strength and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for employees of all backgrounds.",-1.0,Zoba,"Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,MA,2347,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
813,813,Entry Level - Associate Data Scientist,$57k-$111k,"Introduction
As a Data Scientist at IBM, you will help transform our clients data into tangible business value by analyzing information, communicating outcomes and collaborating on product development. Work with Best in Class open source and visual tools, along with the most flexible and scalable deployment options. Whether its investigating patient trends or weather patterns, you will work to solve real world problems for the industries transforming how we live.

Your Role and Responsibilities
Implement and validate predictive and prescriptive models, create and maintain statistical models with a focus on big data.
Incorporate a variety of statistical and machine learning techniques in your projects.
Write programs to cleanse and integrate data in an efficient and reusable manner.
Use leading edge and open-source tools such as Python, R, and TensorFlow, combined with IBM tools and our AI application suites.
Work in an Agile, collaborative environment, partnering with other scientists, engineers, consultants and database administrators of all backgrounds and disciplines to bring analytical rigor and statistical methods to the challenges of predicting behaviors.
Communicate with internal and external clients to understand and define business needs and appropriate modelling techniques to provide analytical solutions.
Evaluate modelling results and communicate the results to technical and non-technical audiences.
Locations:
Atlanta, GA
Cambridge, MA
Chicago, IL
Dallas, TX
Houston, TX
New York, NY
San Francisco, CA
Washington DC

Required Technical and Professional Expertise
Ability to look at things differently, debug, troubleshoot, design and implement solutions to complex technical issues.
Strong technical and analytical abilities, a knack for driving impact and growth, and experience with a programming/scripting in a language such as Java or Python.
Basic understanding of statistical programming in a language such as R, Python, or SAS, SPSS, MATLAB.
Basic understanding of Cloud (AWS, Azure, etc.)
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Work or internship experience using data science tools in a corporate environment.
Interest in, understanding of, or experience with Design Thinking and Agile Development Methodologies
Willingness to travel up to 100% of the time.
Majors:
Computer Science, Data Science, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Cognitive Science, Artificial Intelligence, Business Intelligence, Operations Research, Engineering

Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
NA

About Business Unit
IBM Services is a team of business, strategy and technology consultants that design, build, and run foundational systems and services that is the backbone of the world's economy. IBM Services partners with the world's leading companies in over 170 countries to build smarter businesses by reimagining and reinventing through technology, with its outcome-focused methodologies, industry-leading portfolio and world class research and operations expertise leading to results-driven innovation and enduring excellence.

Your Life @ IBM
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?

Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world? What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion? Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice? What about all of these? If so, then IBM could be your next career challenge. Join us, not to do something better, but to attempt things you never thought possible.

Impact. Inclusion. Infinite Experiences. Do your best work ever.

About IBM
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer. We believe that progress is made through progressive thinking, progressive leadership, progressive policy and progressive action. IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition. Restlessly reinventing since 1911, we are the largest technology and consulting employer in the world, with more than 380,000 IBMers serving clients in 170 countries.

Location Statement
We consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable law.

Being You @ IBM
IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status.",3.8,IBM,"Lansing, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,109,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,MI,4736,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
815,815,Data Engineer,$57k-$111k,"Our client is a leading hedge fund looking to hire a Data Engineer for their Macro Strategies business unit.

Responsibilities:
Driving innovation through product and platform development
Helping to facilitate bespoke custom basket trades for clients in a scalable infrastructure
Developing infrastructure and tools to administer basket rebalances for external clients and internal trading teams
Automation of corporate action adjustments and improvement of work-flow
Providing metrics for basket trades, to drive sales and trading decisions and to grow the business
Both independent and collaborative work, involving several sales/strat/trading teams globally

Requirements:
Expertise in Python
Strong SQL skills
Web scraping experience
Experience with Linux and Windows platform
Strong communication skills, both written and verbal
Exposure to non-relational databases
Exposure to web UI technologies
Data Warehousing and Modeling expertise
Financial knowledge


If you would like to be considered for the position of Data Engineer or wish to discuss the role further then please leave your details below. Your resume will be held in confidence until you connect with a member of our team
Email: info@njfsearch.com or call London (0207 604 4444,) New York (212 400 4845) or Chicago (312 204 72176) to speak to a member of our team. Thank you",4.2,NJF Global Holdings,"New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,17,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,NY,1343,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
816,816,Data Scientist,$57k-$111k,"Ph.D. or Masters in Computer Science, Statistics, Operations Research or related field.
3+ years of Data or Machine learning Science experience working on highly complex problems in a dynamic setting
Strong programming skills, especially in Scala or Python with 3+ years of relevant experience in a programming intensive role.
Technical expertise in one or more of the following Data Science topics:
-- Statistics, time-series data analysis and modeling
-- Traditional Machine Learning methods
-- Deep learning and CNNs
-- Optimization and operations research
-- Natural Language Processing (NLP), text mining, sentiment analysis, information retrieval, etc.
Relevant work experience, including experience applying advanced analytics, and data mining techniques.
Experience with distributed computing platforms, particularly Kubernetes or the Hadoop/Spark ecosystem
Experience with rule engine applications using distributed computing MapReduce, Spark, etc.
Experience with data presentation and visualization with tools such as Tableau, Zeppelin and other similar tools.
Proven track record of developing and deploying algorithms for a production-ready recommendation, data mining or prediction systems using languages and big data platforms such as Scala, Python, Java, Spark, Presto, and Hive
Excellent communication and presentation skills.
Nice to Have
Proficiency with a deep learning framework such as TensorFlow, Keras, Pytorch, Caffe, MXNet, etc.
Experience with telematics data analytics and decision modeling is a plus
Relevant experience in Automotive, Transportation or Manufacturing is a plus
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $45.00 - $55.00 per hour
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Education:
Master's (Required)
Experience:
Data science: 3 years (Preferred)
Python: 3 years (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1.0,SNAPIDEA SYSTEMS,"Milpitas, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,CA,1827,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,1
817,817,Data Scientist-Journeyman,$57k-$111k,"Business Group Highlights

Defense

The Defense group supports the Department of Defense (DoD) mission to keep our homeland and its citizens safe. We provide solutions to improve the Nation's defense by providing software, systems engineering, IT, training and logistics and fleet management solutions.

Responsibilities

This position is for a large contract for the Army, providing leadership and support existing systems, processes, and policies as well as working to implement new technologies and processes in support of the client’s mission to provide Intelligence training and technologies to military personnel.

Provides data science and data engineering support to targeting activities that bring in large datasets. Data science and data engineering support is needed to help manage and execute the ingest (extract, transform and load (ETL) operations), parsing, data normalizations, database design, as well as performing data analysis at scale and implementing algorithms to find impactful operational and finished intelligence in large data streams. Involved in the analysis of unstructured and semi-structured data. Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases. Handles processing against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams. Has the ability to make discoveries in the world of big data. Requires strong technical and computational skills coupled with the ability to code, design, develop, and deploy sophisticated applications using advanced unstructured and semi-structured data analysis techniques. Has the ability to utilize advance tools and computational skills to interpret, connect, predict and make discoveries in complex data and deliver recommendations. Develops documentation to support objectives of operationally-focused team members.

Qualifications

3 to 10 years of experience and a BA/BS or MA/MS degree

Typically performs all functional duties independently.

Current TS/SCI clearance

Bachelor of Science Degree or higher computer science, statistics, or other related STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math)

Desired qualifications:

Strong understanding of data engineering, structure, formatting, conditioning and analysis.
Knowledge of database tools and current data science processes.
Full-stack development experience.

Desired Skills:

Thorough/Working knowledge of Python and some of the following software/tools: SQL, R, Hadoop, Spark, Java, C/C++, Git Bash, Tableau, ArcGIS, Unix commands.
Thorough/Working knowledge of research designs.
Thorough/Working knowledge of collection methods, capabilities and tasking process.
Familiarity with project management concepts and principles.
Intellectual curiosity; creativity and innovation to go beyond current tools to deliver the best solution to complex problems.
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.2,Perspecta,"Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,2,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,DC,4627,0,data scientist,1,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
818,818,Data Scientist,$57k-$111k,"About us, but we’ll be brief

We are thrilled to share that FORTUNE has named Experian one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For. In addition, for the last five years we’ve been name in the top 100 “World’s Most Innovative Companies” by Forbes Magazine.

Experian DataLabs is a R&D unit at Experian formed with the desire to work in collaboration with Experian’s business units to enhance relationships with clients and acquire strategic datasets. Experian® is a global leader in providing information, analytical tools and marketing services to organizations and consumers to help manage the risk and reward of commercial and financial decisions. Using our comprehensive understanding of individuals, markets and economies, we help organizations find, develop and manage customer relationships to make their businesses more profitable.

What you’ll be doing
Leading research and development projects on machine learning and data analytics.
Analyzing, processing, evaluating and documenting large data sets
Identify/develop appropriate machine learning/deep learning/natural language understanding/natural language processing techniques to uncover the value of the data
Designing data structure and data storage schemes for efficient data manipulation and information retrieval
Developing tools for data processing and information retrieval
Developing data driven models to quantify the value of a given data set
Applying, developing and inventing algorithms to solve challenging business problems
Validating score performance and conducting ROI and benefit analysis
Documenting and presenting model process and model performance
What your background looks like
Advanced degree in Machine Learning, Data Science, AI, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Physics, Statistics, Applied Math or other quantitative fields
2-5 years of working experience in data science, and/or predictive modeling
Demonstrated ability to lead and execute projects from start to finish
Ability to independently support existing products
Proven track record in modifying and applying advanced algorithms to address practical problems
Experience in deep learning (CNN, RNN, LSTM, attention models, etc.), machine learning (SVM, GLM, boosting, random forest, etc.), graph models, and/or, reinforcement learning.
Experience with open source tools for deep learning and machine learning technology such as Keras, tensorflow, pytorch, scikit-learn, pandas, etc.
Proven ability to work independently on development of complex models with extremely large and complex data structures
Proficient in more than one of Python, R, Java, C++, or C
Experience in large data analysis using Spark (pySpark preferred)
Robust knowledge and experience with statistical methods
Plusses:
Extensive knowledge of MATLAB and SQL
Experience with Hadoop and NoSQL related technologies such as Map Reduce, Spark, Hive, HBase, mongoDB, Cassandra, etc.
Experience with online, mobile marketing analytics
Experience with GPU programming
Experience with Natural Language Processing, Natural Language Understanding, and the relevant open-source tools
Solid knowledge of Bayesian statistical inference and related machine learning methods.
Experience with Agile methods for software development
Perks
Three weeks of vacation to start, five sick days and two volunteer days (plus eleven paid holidays)
Competitive pay and comprehensive benefits package, with a bonus target of 20%
Flexible work schedule and relaxed dress code
EOE including Disability/Veteran",4.1,Experian,"San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,40,Company - Public,financial_related,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,CA,3528,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,0
820,820,Data Engineer,$57k-$111k,"As a Senior Data science engineer, you will be part of a team of data science engineers who research and development design, test, and deployment of automated process, reports and data processing systems. Data science engineer team use their analytics skills to develop solutions for storing and retrieving information related to the processing, publication, and distribution of scientific data products You will help the team philosophy on software engineering and serves as a mentor for understanding the inner workings and the debugging of complex queries and workflows on parallel data processing systems.
The candidate will have a strong technical ability, excellent project management skills, great communication skills, and a motivation to achieve results in a fast-paced environment.

Responsibilities\*\*
Create and maintain the high-quality data set to serve as the source of truth for various fundamental data captured, and hence enabling data scientist to be more confident on their analysis, machine learning training and reporting.
Create and maintain blue print for data to integrate, centralize and maintain the data sources.
Implement data preparation solutions.
Implement, verify, design, and maintain software systems.
Ensure data integrity by leveraging proven methodologies, including data reconciliation, data integration and data audits.
Requirements*
MS in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, relevant certificates or work experience
6+ years of experience working with relational databases, data warehousing and advanced working SQL knowledge.
6+ years of successful history in manipulating, processing, and analysis of large datasets (million+ records) and comfortable analyzing datasets of 10+ million records
6+ years of experience with the following tools/concepts:
ETL process development tools, preferably SQL Server Integration Services (SSIS)
Object-oriented development
Software development lifecycle
4+ years of experience working with Data Visualization and Descriptive Statistics, preferably SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS) and/or Microsoft Power BI
4+ years of experience executing full software development life cycle.
Strong skills on identifying and resolving performance and data quality issues
Solid software engineering skills across multiple languages
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Passion for teaching and mentoring
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Desired Qualifications: *
Experience working with finance industry.
Experience with one or more of the following:
Python
Scala
Java
Informatica
Manipulating/handling data in JSON or XML formats
PL/SQL
Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Relational Databases: 6 years (Preferred)
Big Data Analytics: 6 years (Preferred)
Data Visualization: 6 years (Preferred)
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
Flexible schedule
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Other
Company's website:
https://www.pragroup.com/",2.8,"PRA Group, Inc.","Richmond, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,24,Company - Public,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,VA,2979,0,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
821,821,Data & Analytics- Data Engineer,$57k-$111k,"About Slalom

Slalom is a purpose-driven consulting firm that helps companies solve business problems and build for the future, with solutions spanning business advisory, customer experience, technology, and analytics. We partner with companies to push the boundaries of what’s possible—together.

Founded in 2001 and headquartered in Seattle, WA, Slalom has organically grown to over 8,000 employees. We were named one of Fortune’s 100 Best Companies to Work For five consecutive years from 2016 - 2020 and are regularly recognized by our employees as a best place to work. You can find us in 35 cities across the U.S., U.K., Australia, and Canada.

The Data & Analytics teams across Slalom Northern California are all hiring! Come make an impact with our East Bay, Sacramento, San Francisco, or Silicon Valley markets.

Data Engineer Consultant

As a Data Engineer for Slalom Consulting, you'll work in small teams to deliver data pipelines and data models for our clients. You will design and build highly scalable and reliable modern data platforms including data lakes and data warehouse using Amazon Web Services, Azure, Google Cloud. Your work will include a variety of core data warehousing tools, Hadoop, Spark, event stream platforms, and ETL tools such as Airflow. In addition to building the next generation of data platforms, you'll be working with some of the most forward-thinking organizations in data and analytics.

Who are you?
You have passion for data!
You’re a smart, collaborative person who is excited about technology and driven to get things done.
You’re not afraid to be bring your authentic self to work.
You embrace a continuous learner mentality.
Who are we?
We are engineers, makers, planners, architects, and designers.
We choose to imagine things made better, and then set out on a journey to realize what’s possible.
We’ll never trade the upside of wonder for the comfort of the familiar or the safety of convention.
What technologies will you be using?

Every element of a modern data & analytics stack. It’s about using the right technologies to solve problems and playing with new technologies to figure out how to apply them intelligently. We work with technologies across the board.

Why do we work here?

Each of us came to Slalom because we wanted something different. We wanted to make a difference, we wanted autonomy to own and drive our future while working with some of the best companies in San Francisco leveraging the coolest technologies. At Slalom, we found our people.

Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Engineering, Computer Science, Information Systems or related discipline
3+ years relevant experience
Experience in capturing end users requirements and align technical solutions to the business objectives
Understanding of different types of storage (filesystem, relation, MPP, NoSQL) and working with various kinds of data (structured, unstructured, metrics, logs, etc.)
Understanding of data architecture concepts such as data modeling, metadata, workflow management, ETL/ELT, real-time streaming), data quality
3+ years of experience working with SQL
Experience with setting up and operating data pipelines using Python or SQL
1+ years of experience working on AWS, GCP or Azure
Experience working with data warehouses such as Redshift, BigQuery and Snowflake
Exposure to open source and proprietary cloud data pipeline tools such as Airflow, Glue and Dataflow
Experience working with relational databases
Experience with data serialization languages such as JSON, XML, YAML
Experience with code management tools (e.g. Git, SVN) and DevOps tools (e.g. Docker, Bamboo, Jenkins)
Strong analytical problem-solving ability
Great presentation skills, written and verbal communication skills
Self-starter with the ability to work independently or as part of a project team
Capability to conduct performance analysis, troubleshooting and remediation",4.1,Slalom LLC.,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,19,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,CA,3913,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
822,822,Data Scientist,$57k-$111k,"Public Goods' mission is to make premium-quality, healthy and sustainable products more accessible. We value the environment, and we believe that together our small choices can make a big impact.

It is an exciting time to join Public Goods. We are a small team, so you will have opportunities to make an unprecedented impact on defining the future of the business. We value diversity and inclusion, and we welcome people from different backgrounds and perspectives.

What you will do:
Work with complex datasets from Shopify, Stripe, Google Analytics, and other sources to build Tableau dashboards, visualizing key metrics including sales growth, membership conversions, retention & LTV, churns, etc
Take initiatives to pinpoint opportunities for business improvement and leverage quantitative models or machine learning techniques to form actionable suggestions
Articulate data science and machine learning concepts to a variety of audiences (executives, marketing channel managers, product developers, sales partners)
Partner with engineers to design ETLs and make sure all data required are properly pulled from sources
Who you are:
3+ years experience as a data scientist or data analyst in which you extract meaningful insights from large data sets, e-commerce background is a big plus
Highly fluent with SQL, Python, and Tableau
Have experience with AWS (Redshift mostly, and understand basic functions and flows of EC2, Lambda, Data Pipeline, etc.)
Proven experience collaborating with business stakeholders to identify analytical needs and deliver actionable suggestions to drive business
Proven experience cooperating with data engineers to construct ETLs and database tables, integrating data from various sources for reporting
Act as a mentor, guiding junior analysts to enhance their skills and achieve better efficiency
What we offer:
Competitive compensation package salary + equity.
100% covered Medical/Dental/Vision/telemedicine services for employees
Public Goods lifetime membership and monthly credits to both Public Goods and a monthly stipend for books of your choice!",4.3,Public Goods,"New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,3,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,NY,2091,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
823,823,Data Scientist,$57k-$111k,"Security Clearance:
Top Secret/Special Compartmented Information with Polygraph (TS/SCI with Poly)

Regular/Temporary:
Regular

Position Description:
Description:
Valiant is seeking a Data Scientist. The position requires an active TS/SCI with Polygraph security clearance.

Responsibilities:
Expected to build statistical models, test hypotheses, interpret, summarize, visualize, and succinctly report on data findings.
Perform research on various data sources, to include unstructured data using quantitative and qualitative content analytics.
Construct and perform complex database search queries in multiple databases using SQL and API interfaces
Perform web scraping and apply various techniques for processing unstructured da
Leverage automation and machine learning to manage data, predict scenarios and make recommendations.
Contribute to building new analytical tools and packages across the enterprise and will be expected to collaborate with team members in a highly technical environment.
Expected to learn and leverage emerging technologies including AWS and Git.
CORE VALUES:

INTEGRITY - Honesty, Trust and Respect in every situation

EXCELLENCE - Performance, Effectiveness, Quality, and Safety in everything we do

INNOVATION - Embracing new ideas and best practice in every service that we provide

Valiant Integrated Services is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.

NOTICE: Valiant Integrated Services NEVER asks job applicants to issue any payment or service fees to Valiant or its recruiters as part of our application process. Before providing any personal information to outside parties, verify that the job you are applying for appears on our Careers site.

Position Requirements:
Strong experience working with Python or R programming languages
Experience working with data manipulation, analytic/business insight tools, and data visualization experience
Experience with SciPy stack or Tidyverse packages
Experience constructing and performing complex database search queries
Experience/ knowledge of computer science concepts, data architecture, and experience/knowledge of statistics
Experience /familiarity with statistics and probability including predicative modeling
Experience with visualizing data using popular packages including Tableau, ggplot or Matplotlib
Ability to communicate technical findings to non-technical audiences
Bachelor's degree in a highly quantitative subject or related field ( for example, statistics, mathematics, economics, or related field)
TS/SCI clearance with polygraph required
Desired:
Experience/knowledge of social network and link analysis tools is desired (e.g. Palantir, i2 Analyst's Notebook, or Proton)
Experience designing and implementing neural network architectures
QHSE REQUIREMENTS
Take reasonable care for the Health and Safety of yourself and other persons who may be affected by your actions or omissions.
Conform to all Safety Instructions given by those with a higher responsibility for Health and Safety.
Report all hazards, potential hazards or dangerous situations, including damaged or mislaid personal protective equipment to your Supervisor or Safety Representative.
Report Environmental impacts, anything that results in a change to the Environment as a result of Valiant's activities, products or services.
Participate in the achievement of Valiant's QHSE objectives and targets, both those at departmental and company level.",2.9,Valiant Integrated Services,"McLean, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,VA,3685,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
824,824,Data Scientist,$57k-$111k,"Join us and make YOUR mark on the World!

Come join Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory (LLNL) where we apply science and technology to make the world a safer place; now one of 2020 Best Places to Work by Glassdoor!
We have multiple openings for Data Scientists with expertise in computer science, machine learning, computer vision, computational statistics, uncertainty quantification, and/or high-dimensional data analysis. You will work independently as a technical expert developing new methods to meet data analysis challenges and to contribute to programmatic efforts in support of Laboratory mission objectives. These positions are in the Center for Applied Scientific Computing (CASC) Division within the Computation Directorate.

These positions will be filled at either the SES.3 or SES.4 level depending on the skills of the selected candidates. Additional job responsibilities will be assigned if the candidate is hired at the higher level.

Essential Duties
Identify and define complex problems stemming from national security applications; scope, plan, and propose advanced analysis methodologies; collect and analyze data; and document results in technical reports and peer-reviewed publications.
Research, design and implement a variety of advanced data science methods in multiple application areas in a collaborative scientific environment.
Consult with programmatic sponsors and funding agencies, and foster research collaborations with academia and industry.
Conduct independent research projects to establish future research directions.
Author grant proposals, including proposal presentations and preparation of proposals.
Perform other duties as assigned.
In Addition at the SES.4 Level
Develop new program growth opportunities through interaction with existing and potential sponsors and the development of research proposals.
Lead mid-sized projects in advanced data science methodologies and tools and their application to mission-related science, serving as a primary technical contact.

Qualifications
Ph.D. in Computer Science, Statistics, Machine Learning, Mathematics or related field or the equivalent combination of education and related experience.
Significant experience working in a collaborative, multidisciplinary, scientific environment and contributing to diverse application areas.
Significant experience developing, implementing, and applying advanced statistical and machine learning models and algorithms.
Advanced knowledge and research ability, as documented by publications, reports, and presentations.
Significant analytical and problem-solving skills necessary to craft creative solutions and solve complex problems with limited direction.
Advanced programming skills in at least one prototyping language Python/R/MATLAB, as well as one of C/C++/Fortran to enable high-dimensional data analysis on high performance computing (HPC) platforms.
Advanced verbal and written communication skills to effectively collaborate in a team environment, to present and explain technical information, document work, prepare and present proposals and research papers, and provide advice to management.
In Addition at the SES.4 Level
Substantial record of successful proposal writing and program development, and experience leading research and development in support of programs or R&D.
Substantial experience mentoring students and postdocs.
Highly advanced project leadership experience and demonstrated ability to effectively lead teams and create technical direction, work independently while effectively managing concurrent technical tasks with competing priorities.

Desired Qualifications
Domain knowledge in multiple application domains and ability to communicate effectively with subject matter experts.
Experience with GPU programming, parallel programming, cloud computing, high-performance computing, and/or related methods.
Demonstrated ability to secure sponsor funding through winning proposals and sponsor relationships. Previous experience working with Department of Energy, Department of Defense or Department of Homeland Security.

Pre-Employment Drug Test: External applicant(s) selected for this position will be required to pass a post-offer, pre-employment drug test. This includes testing for use of marijuana as Federal Law applies to us as a Federal Contractor.

Security Clearance: This position requires a Department of Energy (DOE) Q-level clearance.

If you are selected, we will initiate a Federal background investigation to determine if you meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or matter. In addition, all L or Q cleared employees are subject to random drug testing. Q-level clearance requires U.S. citizenship. If you hold multiple citizenships (U.S. and another country), you may be required to renounce your non-U.S. citizenship before a DOE L or Q clearance will be processed/granted.

Note: This listing has two openings; these are Career Indefinite positions. Lab employees and external candidates may be considered for these positions.

About Us

Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory (LLNL), located in the San Francisco Bay Area (East Bay), is a premier applied science laboratory that is part of the National Nuclear Security Administration (NNSA) within the Department of Energy (DOE). LLNL's mission is strengthening national security by developing and applying cutting-edge science, technology, and engineering that respond with vision, quality, integrity, and technical excellence to scientific issues of national importance. The Laboratory has a current annual budget of about $2.1 billion, employing approximately 6,800 employees.

LLNL is an affirmative action/ equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, marital status, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, medical condition, protected veteran status, age, citizenship, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.7,Lawrence Livermore National Lab,"Livermore, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,68,Government,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,CA,6021,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
825,825,Data Scientist,$57k-$111k,"Business Unit:
Cubic Transportation Systems
Company Details:
Cubic Interactive is Cubic Transportation Systems loyalty and advertising division. Our mission is to help bring transit riders back to public transportation and open up untapped revenue stream through digital advertising content. Our platform is unique and industry leading with unlimited potential to expand globally.

In this role you will help transit agencies run and operate their loyalty programs and provide incentives to modify transit rider behavior. You will analyze transit rider behaviors to refine incentive campaigns. For our advertising partners you will help maximize advertising engagement providing clear ROI on their investments with Cubic Interactive by targeting users based on their preferences and profiles with personalized advertising content.

Although Orlando is the preferred location for this hire, 100% remote so long as USA based will also be considered.
Job Details:
Preferred location for this role is Orlando, FL but remote work from the US will also be considered.


Job Summary: Works closely with the data science team to build information-rich data products using innovative techniques and technologies to solve transportation related challenges and problems. Understands and leverages data mining, machine learning, data modeling, and statistical modeling techniques. Applies strong problem solving and analytic skills to data integration projects and is able to isolate non-obvious relationships between disparate data sources. This position typically works under general supervision and direction. Incumbents of this position will regularly exercise discretionary and substantial decision-making authority.

Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities:
Works with and advises customers and stakeholders to address business challenges by harnessing structured, semi-structured, and unstructured data in a distributed processing environment.
Designs, develops and programs methods, processes, and systems to consolidate and analyze unstructured, diverse data sources to generate actionable insights and solutions for client services and product enhancement.
Designs, implements, and maintains statistical models representing transportation network behavior and other transportation related processes.
Develops and codes software programs, algorithms and automated processes to cleanse, integrate and evaluate large datasets from multiple disparate sources.
Researches, interprets, and identifies use cases for applying data science techniques against public transportation data.
Prepares and delivers presentations that effectively describe complex quantitative methods in clear and concise communications.
Keeps up to date with technical as well as industry developments, analytics software/tools, trends, and recognized best practices.
Contributes to projects under the direction of project and product owners to adhere to funding, resourcing, schedule, and other constraints.
Minimum Job Requirements:
Four-year college degree, in statistics, economics, physics, mathematics, operations research, computer science, data engineering, or related field; plus four years experience using data mining, data modeling, data integration, machine learning, statistical modeling, and other data science skills and techniques. Masters or Ph.D. preferred. Experience with Python or comparable scripting language. Experience working with Hadoop, Pig, Hive, and knowledge of SQL is essential. Experience with statistical and analytic programming design and technologies such as R and other simulation / data analysis tools. Knowledge of database management systems and other software tools used to manage an organization’s business activities. Requires fundamental knowledge and experience developing algorithms and analytics applications. Must have adtech, advertiser or loyalty program background and experience. Must have strong analytical and problem solving skills, attention to details, critical thinking ability, and creativity. Must be able to abstract from ambiguous and sometimes conflicting information to identify opportunities for improvement and the critical business drivers and factors that influence outcomes. Must have demonstrated ability to produce high quality analytics applications that can be deployed in a repeatable and scalable fashion. Requires strong knowledge of statistics, signal processing, machine learning, predictive analytics, and other related techniques. Must have excellent written and verbal communication skills used to effectively communicate and present complex information in terms appropriate to the audience. Incumbent will have well-developed research skills and knowledge of current data management principles, procedures, and other tools of the trade. Must be able to manage and prioritize multiple projects simultaneously while balancing according to scope, budget and schedule. Prior experience working in the transportation or logistics industries desired.

The description provided above is not intended to be an exhaustive list of all job duties, responsibilities and requirements. Duties, responsibilities and requirements may change over time and according to business need.

Worker Type:
Employee",3.4,Cubic,"Orlando, FL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,69,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,FL,5242,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
827,827,"Sr Principal Data Engineer - Secureworks - Austin, TX; Atlanta, GA; or US Remote",$57k-$111k,"About Secureworks

Secureworks® (NASDAQ: SCWX) a global cybersecurity leader, enables our customers and partners to outpace and outmaneuver adversaries with more precision, so they can rapidly adapt and respond to market forces to meet their business needs. With a unique combination of cloud-native, SaaS security platform and intelligence-driven security solutions, informed by 20+ years of threat intelligence and research, no other security platform is grounded and informed with this much real-world experience. www.secureworks.com

We enjoy competitive compensation and benefits packages, and reward and recognize our employees for exceptional results. A constant focus on continued learning and growth keeps our team members engaged and excited about “what’s next.” We offer flexible work options when available, and emphasize the importance of work-life balance. We know that when our people are rewarded, recognized, and rejuvenated, we win as a team.

Role Overview


We are looking for a detail-oriented, talented, and enthusiastic data engineer to work in a fast-paced, startup-like environment with a seasoned cross-functional team of Security Experts, Data Scientists, and Machine Learning Engineers to advance the state-of-the-art in network defense. If you love the challenges that come with big data then this role is for you. Duties include large-scale data routing, modeling, extraction, transformation, loading, warehousing, and composing such systems together with support for monitoring and mediation logic. You will use the latest big data platforms and technologies (e.g. NiFi, Spark, Kafka, NoSQL, Docker, Kubernetes, AWS/GCP) to help federate algorithms and applications across many clouds as part of the next generation Secureworks platform.

The ideal candidate will have a software development background with an emphasis on distributed systems and some familiarity with data science or machine learning, though personal expertise is not required. This role requires a data engineer that can take architectures from concept to reality and work well within a collaborative environment. If you’re an engineer with experience solving big data problems, you might have what it takes to become an elite member of our team and help us innovate faster than the bad guys.

Key Responsibilities
Design, build, launch, and maintain infrastructure to support large-scale data routing, streaming and historical processing, data warehousing, and container orchestration.
Employ a variety of languages and tools to marry big data systems together and hunt down opportunities to acquire new data from other systems.
Recommend and implement ways to improve data reliability, efficiency, and quality.
Collaborate with data scientists and security researchers to productize new methods of extracting information from structured and unstructured data.
Work effectively on a geographically distributed team to deliver high quality software against aggressive schedules.
Minimum Requirements
Minimum of 6 years of experience in data engineering, data modeling, ETL development, or data warehousing.
Minimum of 2 years of experience of software engineering in Scala.
Minimum of 2 years of experience with scripting languages like Python, Ruby, Perl, Bash, etc.
Minimum of 3 years of experience with big data platforms (e.g. Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, HBase, etc)
Preferred Experience
Experience with Amazon AWS, Google GCP, or similar cloud provider.
Experience working with containers and container orchestration solutions such as Docker, Kubernetes, Mesos, etc.
Experience with stream-processing systems, such as NiFi/StreamSets, Kafka, Storm/Heron, Spark, or Flink.
Experience with distributed NoSQL databases, such as HBase, Cassandra, or Accumulo.
Secureworks (A Dell Technologies Company) is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Secureworks are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, physical, mental or sensory disability, HIV status, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, family medical history or genetic information, family or parental status, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Secureworks will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. Learn more about Diversity and Inclusion at Secureworks here.",3.8,Secureworks,"Atlanta, GA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,21,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,GA,4721,1,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
830,830,Data Scientist,$57k-$111k,"Wonderlic is all about people, period. Were on the lookout constantly for the best and brightest minds in the biz- we rely on our teams to propel Wonderlic to new heights within the HR tech industry. Do you strive for excellence? Are you driven by the desire to make positive changes in the world you live in?

Join Wonderlic in shaping the future of our organization. Were happy to have you.

Job Title: Data Scientist

Location: Remote, with some travel to Vernon Hills, IL

Overview:

Wonderlic is looking for a brand new Data Scientist, and were pretty sure its gonna be you. Why? Because youre ready to expand Wonderlics competitive edge, delivering world class production-ready data products. Youre excited to be at the forefront of our emerging product strategy. Youve read up on trends in the HR tech space, and youre confident in your ability to identify relevant opportunities where data science can make a difference in the field.

As a Wonderlic Data Scientist, youll work closely with our team of Machine Learning Engineers to collect and explore data that will be used to drive growth for our stakeholders and power innovation in our products. Your passion for data will empower you to deliver these solutions quickly and efficiently, solving problems in elegant, scalable ways. Through technical excellence, you will play a key role in enhancing our processes and improving our data science toolkits.

Essential Functions & Competencies needed:
Presents complex concepts in a clear narrative
Validates hypotheses, reveals data inconsistencies, and uncovers hidden insights through exploratory data analysis
Devotes time to learning new and relevant tools, processes, and technologies
Demonstrates mastery of common performance analyses of statistical models
Demonstrates knowledge of core computer science concepts, including common algorithms and data structures
Consistently delivers well-labeled and well-organized data outputs
Comfortable using a variety of structured data formats, including CSV, JSON, and XML
Demonstrates proficiency in SQL and Python, including Pandas, NumPy, at least one data visualization library (e.g. Matplotlib, Seaborn); proficiency in NoSQL (e.g. MongoDB), R, VBA, and/or JavaScript is a bonus
Cultivates innovation by proactively proposing new ideas to solve projects more effectively
Partners with Machine Learning Engineers to discuss implementation and prioritization
Responds promptly to opportunities and challenges with a constructive/positive mindset and a sense of urgency
Supervisory Responsibilities: No direct reports.

Reports to: Manager of AI Innovation

Required Education and Experience:
BA/BS in Data Science, Computer Science, Math, Statistics, Economics, or equivalent related STEM field, or equivalent experience from a boot camp or on-the-job training
Experienced programmer, with proficiency in data processing
Hands-on experience with Python and several of its popular data science libraries (e.g. Pandas, NumPy, Matplotlib)
Hands-on experience querying tabular databases with SQL (nontabular a plus)
(Preferred) Understands core ML concepts and at least one ML framework in Python
(Preferred) Proficiency in Tableau or another comparable dashboarding tool
What we offer:
Competitive salary
Competitive Paid Time Off (PTO) - 21 days PTO to start accruing
8 paid holidays and 2 extra floating holidays
A paid, company shutdown week from December 26 to December 31
Medical, dental, and vision group insurance
Company paid life and long-term disability insurance
Paid Parental and Primary Caregiver Leave after 1 year of employment
401(k) with matching after 1 year of employment
Highly collaborative, innovative and fun work environment
A casual dress code
Affirmative Action Plan/Equal Employer Opportunity (AAP/EEO) Statement: Wonderlic is proud to be an equal employment opportunity/affirmative action employer. Here, diversity is valued and celebrated, and is what makes us such a successful team. Wonderlic does not discriminate in employment on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, pregnancy status, national origin, sexual orientation, marital status, disability, genetic information, age, parental status, military/veteran status, or any other factor protected by law.

Powered by JazzHR",3.7,Wonderlic,"Vernon Hills, IL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,83,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,IL,4289,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
831,831,Data Scientist,$57k-$111k,"Role: Data Scientist

Sandy Springs GA

Fulltime/Permanent

You will work autonomously to identify opportunities for accelerated revenue growth and to improve operational efficiencies through data science.

We are looking for creative thinkers with analytical horsepower coupled with intellectual curiosity.

Responsibilities

Design, maintain and interpret core KPIs to identify key trends and drive actionable insights Devise and execute on new strategies to drive top line revenue growth Devise and execute on new strategies to improve net retention and renewal rates

Qualifications & Skills

A Masters Degree in Data Science Proficiency in Excel. VBA experience is a plus but not prerequisite Proficiency in SQL.

Experience with R or Python. Extensive experience working for SaaS-based businesses and deep knowledge of key SaaS metrics (such as ARR, ACV, Churn, Net Retention, etc) Ability to define and execute complex models and analysis used for capacity/headcount planning, quota setting, and identifying business trends with minimal supervision Deep analytical skills, strong out-of-the-box thinking, curiosity, and strong business intuition; can connect the dots between disparate data sources to drive insight Strong presentation and meeting management skills.

Ability to create effective presentations (Google Slides and PowerPoint) with clear and concise explanations of business implications to executives.

Experience working within and structuring very large data warehouses (i.e., Big Data) Knowledge of statistical and predictive modeling techniques, specifically of time series forecasting Experience creating data visualizations in Tableau, Looker, or other modern visualization tools",-1.0,Data Bridge Consultants,Georgia,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,84.0,GA,1707,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
832,832,Data Scientist,$70k-$116k,"Role: Data Scientist

Sandy Springs GA

Fulltime/Permanent

You will work autonomously to identify opportunities for accelerated revenue growth and to improve operational efficiencies through data science.

We are looking for creative thinkers with analytical horsepower coupled with intellectual curiosity.

Responsibilities

Design, maintain and interpret core KPIs to identify key trends and drive actionable insights Devise and execute on new strategies to drive top line revenue growth Devise and execute on new strategies to improve net retention and renewal rates

Qualifications & Skills

A Masters Degree in Data Science Proficiency in Excel. VBA experience is a plus but not prerequisite Proficiency in SQL.

Experience with R or Python. Extensive experience working for SaaS-based businesses and deep knowledge of key SaaS metrics (such as ARR, ACV, Churn, Net Retention, etc) Ability to define and execute complex models and analysis used for capacity/headcount planning, quota setting, and identifying business trends with minimal supervision Deep analytical skills, strong out-of-the-box thinking, curiosity, and strong business intuition; can connect the dots between disparate data sources to drive insight Strong presentation and meeting management skills.

Ability to create effective presentations (Google Slides and PowerPoint) with clear and concise explanations of business implications to executives.

Experience working within and structuring very large data warehouses (i.e., Big Data) Knowledge of statistical and predictive modeling techniques, specifically of time series forecasting Experience creating data visualizations in Tableau, Looker, or other modern visualization tools",-1.0,Data Bridge Consultants,Georgia,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,GA,1707,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
833,833,Data Scientist,$70k-$116k,"ALQIMI is seeking a highly motivated Data Scientist to lead our efforts with a US Department of Defense engagement.

As a Data Scientist on our team, you’ll provide technical leadership in broad array of data sciences to build deployable systems within the ALQIMI RAAVN software platform.

AQLIMI’s RAAVN software platform is built for ingesting vast quantities of diverse unstructured and structured data, performing simple and complex analytics, ML, DL and NLP, and visualizing the results through a suite of dynamic visualizations and dashboards.

The team comprises of approximately 14 persons including a Project Manager, Data Science Team and a dedicated MULTI-INT Analyst team. The visualization programmers and data science staff will tailor the platform to the client’s use case.

The overall mission of this effort is to investigate, research and analyze information and connections surrounding various persons of interest in order to develop leads for further investigation which will result in the safety of the US and its allies.

The position is located in Rosslyn, VA and will require occasional travel OCONUS and CONUS.

Key Responsibilities and Duties:
Develop plan and procedures to support the achievement of the project objectives.
Lead discovery processes with project stakeholders to identify the business requirements and the expected outcome.
Be responsible for the design-related and algorithmic innovations and abstracts.
Build models for creating, maintaining and using knowledge base consisting of semantic relationships.
Be able to work on databases, scientific computing, predictive modeling, and data analysis for building machine learning components and implementing algorithms on the back end.
Focus on data analytics and machine learning techniques (CNN, RNN, LSTM) and classical machine learning tools (non-linear regression, support vector machines, random forests, and ARIMA).
Perform research in applying machine learning and deep learning techniques such as clustering and classification algorithms, especially neural networks.
Perform development in R, Python, ElasticSearch, Painless, Lucene, machine learning, predictive modeling, SQL, Tableau, SAS, SPSS, statistical tools (Cook’s outlier treatment, Euclidean distance, Naïve Baye’s), image analytics.
Establish scalable, efficient, automated processes for large scale data analyses, model development, model validation, and model implementation.
Identifies what data is available and relevant, including internal and external data sources, leveraging new and open source data collection such as geo-location, and other open source data including social and news media.
Required Qualifications and Skills:

· Ten years of experience in building and integrating Data Science projects

· Bachelor’s Degree in “STEM” field (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Mathematics)

· Minimum clearance level of TS with SCI eligibility.

· Basic understanding of integrating machine learning systems and/or models in end-to-end applications

· Proficiency with Unsupervised Machine Learning methods including Cluster Analysis (e.g., K-means, K-nearest Neighbor, Hierarchical, Deep Belief Networks, Principal Component Analysis), Segmentation, etc.

· Proficiency with Supervised Machine Learning methods including Decision Trees, Support Vector Machines, Logistic Regression, Random/Rotation Forests, Categorization/Classification, Neural Nets, Bayesian Networks, etc.

· Experience working in a team and deploying solutions in an iterative or agile/DevOps continuous integration and delivery environment using lifecycle management methods and tools.

· Excellent written and verbal communication skills

· Written and verbal communication skills that have led to the ability to write for a variety of audiences

· Candidates will have strong interpersonal skills to work effectively with government and industry personnel at all levels of seniority

Attributes for Success:

· Ability to thrive in a fast-paced environment

· Ability to work independently and as part of a dynamic team

· Excellent creative problem-solving skills

· Excellent verbal and written communication skills

· Excellent customer service skills",4.5,ALQIMI,"Rosslyn, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,VA,4203,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
834,834,"Data Scientist, Product Development",$70k-$116k,"Spokeo is a people search engine that both enlightens and empowers our customers. With over 12 billion records and 18 million visitors per month, we reconnect friends, reunite families, prevent fraud, and more.

We are looking for a Data Scientist, Product Development to join us in Pasadena, CA, and help us turn our vast repository of data into usable information leveraging solutions that include matching techniques, machine learning, and graph theory to resolve entities across disparate data sets. Ultimately, these entity relationships will be used to build models that will be incorporated into the Spokeo product suite. This is part of Spokeo's Data Operations Team and is not an analytics-based role.

Responsibilities:
Profiling, processing, and evaluating large structured and unstructured data sets.
Developing data-driven models.
Data mining using state-of-the-art methods.
Collaborating with product and engineering to understand the needs of the company and assisting with the development of innovative solutions to meet those needs.
Productionalizing and maintaining algorithms primarily focused on entity resolution, linking, and scoring.
Creating automated anomaly detection systems and quality assurance metrics to constantly track performance.
Keeping up to date with the latest technology trends.
Performing Ad-hoc analysis and presenting results.
Requirements:
Degree in Machine Learning, Computer Science, Engineering, Physics, Statistics, Applied Math, Operations Research, or other quantitative fields.
Minimum of 3 years of working experience in analytics, data mining, data visualization, and/or predictive modeling.
Proficiency in working with statistical tools (such as R, SAS), database query languages (SQL), and scripting languages (Python required).
Experience with Hadoop and NoSQL related technologies such as MapReduce, Spark, Hive, ElasticSearch, and DynamoDB.
Comfortable training and communicating complex ideas to non-technical audiences.
Demonstrated ability to lead and execute projects from start to finish.
Privacy Notice for Candidates: https://www.spokeo.com/recruiting-policy

Spokeo is an equal opportunity employer. Applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status. Spokeo fosters a business culture where ideas and decisions from all people help us grow, innovate, create the best products and be relevant in a rapidly changing world.

Recruiters or staffing agencies: Spokeo is not obligated to compensate any external recruiter or search firm who presents a candidate or their resume or profile to a Spokeo employee without 1) a current, fully-executed agreement on file and 2) being assigned to the open position (as a search) via our applicant tracking solution.

]]>",3.3,Spokeo,"Pasadena, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,14,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,CA,2865,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
835,835,Data Scientist,$70k-$116k,"As a Data Scientist, you will be expected to create innovative solutions to solve business problems by using advanced machine learning, statistical modeling and optimization techniques and turning them into real world solutions for decision making online or offline. You will solve business critical problems inside a company that has a strong culture of measurement, testing, and optimization across all facets of its marketing and customer acquisition activities. You will see your contributions make a material impact to a business's bottom line. If you want to use cutting-edge machine learning techniques with technology that drives millions of decisions a day, this role is for you.

What You'll Be Doing:
Solve business critical problems inside a dynamic and fun company that has a strong culture of measurement, testing, and optimization across all facets of marketing and customer acquisition activities.
Integrate cutting-edge machine learning techniques with technology that drives millions of decisions each day.
Translate your expertise into contributions that make a material impact on a business's bottom line.
What We're Looking For:
2+ year experience as a Data Scientist with specialization in machine learning, statistical modeling and optimization
Expert knowledge of machine learning, predictive modeling, statistics and data science in general. Knowledge and experience in marketing channel optimization, customer behavior/journey modeling and prediction, product recommendation systems, online testing and etc. is highly desired
Proficiency in one or multiple data science programming languages such as R, Python and Spark
Capability of communicating effectively with business and data science leaders on project status, timeline and technical results
Proficient at collecting and mining data from disparate data sources, and willing to dig deeper and understand the process that creates the data
Analytical and detail oriented with the ability to prioritize, execute and deliver projects on time
Capable of translating business opportunities into data science problems and defining the right project scope and performance metric to measure success
Must be comfortable with unstructured, fast moving and constantly evolving high growth environment
Committed team player who is proactive, takes ownership over the success of their projects, and works hard to support those around them
Applied experience with machine learning on large datasets
Who We Are:

Founded in 2000, Red Ventures is a portfolio of growing digital businesses that bring consumers and brands together through integrated e-commerce, strategic partnerships and many proprietary brands including Bankrate, AllConnect.com and Reviews.com. Headquartered south of Charlotte, NC, Red Ventures has over 3000 employees in offices across the US, as well as London and Sao Paulo. For more information, visit www.redventures.com.

We offer competitive salaries and a comprehensive benefits program for full-time employees, including medical, dental and vision coverage, paid time off, life insurance, disability coverage, employee assistance program, 401(k) plan and a paid parental leave program.

Red Ventures is an equal opportunity employer that does not discriminate against any employee or applicant because of race, creed, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, national origin, disability, age, genetic information, veteran status, marital status, pregnancy or any other basis protected by law. Employment at Red Ventures is based solely on a person's merit and qualifications.

We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to qualified individuals with disabilities. This includes providing reasonable accommodation where appropriate. Should you require a reasonable accommodation to apply or participate in the job application or interview process, please contact xgonzalez@redventures.com.",3.6,Red Ventures - Digital,"Charlotte, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,20,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,NC,3932,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
836,836,Data Scientist,$70k-$116k,"The Dealer Analytics team in Credit Analytics is looking for a hardworking and motivated Data Scientist to work on dealer risk and sales initiatives within Ford Motor Company's Global Data, Insight, and Analytics (GDI&A) organization. In this role, you will perform analytics, segmentation and modeling work; build advanced models to support Ford Motor Credit Company's risk and sales activities; and report results in appropriate forums.

Responsibilities:
Utilize statistical software (e.g., SAS, Matlab, R) to develop models, forecasts, and optimization algorithms
Learn new software tools (e.g., Alteryx, Qlikview, ArcGIS, AnyLogic) as necessary
Collaborate with subject matter specialists to understand their requirements and business needs
Ensure overall quality of the data and solutions throughout the analytical development process
Fully understand the complex dealer data structure
Work with various data sources and platforms (e.g., PC, Hadoop, Teradata) to compile data
Execute both descriptive and inferential ad hoc requests in a timely manner
Work closely with business customers, IT, and other analytical teams within the GDI&A organization
Investigate data issues
Communicate and present models to business customers
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in a quantitative field such as Statistics, Economics, Applied Mathematics, Operations Research, Physics or a related field
3+ years of experience in at least two of the following languages/tools: R, MATLAB, SQL, Python, and/or SAS
Preferred Qualifications:
Robust knowledge of statistical methods (i.e., logistic regression, time series, seasonal adjustments)
The ability to prioritize efforts, work independently, and progress multiple initiatives concurrently
Experience in and interest in learning new technologies
Experience in applications of operations research, mathematics, and/or statistics in an industrial/applied environment
Working experience, preferably in the automotive industry, with manipulating large scale data, performing analysis, and building statistical models
SAS proficiency or programming background
Linux and Windows experience
Strong oral and written communication skills
Ability to translate complex quantitative methods into business insights and present to a non-technical audience
Join our team as we create tomorrow! We believe in putting people first, working together, and facing challenges head-on, because we're Built Ford Tough. We're one team striving to make people's lives better while creating value, delivering excellence and ultimately going for thewin.

Candidates for positions with Ford Motor Company must be legally authorized to work in the United States on a permanent basis. Verification of employment eligibility will be required at the time of hire. Visa sponsorship is not available for this position, TN visa holders may be considered.

Ford Motor Company is an equal opportunity employer committed to a culturally diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, age, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability status or protected veteran status.",4.0,Ford Motor Company,"Dearborn, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,117,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,MI,3183,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
838,838,Data Scientist,$70k-$116k,"Job Title: Data Scientist
Location: San Diego, CA
FULLTIME ROLE
Overview:
We are looking for a hands-on research scientist with a good track record of experience in
applying machine learning methods towards solving real-world problems through
(Un)supervised Learning, Operations Research and Optimization Problems to name a few. You
will be joining an excellent, multidisciplinary team and will be participating in cutting-edge
work in data science. You will be providing quality answers to large-scale problems with broad
impact.
Responsibilities:
1. Conceptualize, design and develop prototypes which demonstrate the required
functionality rapidly
2. Understand the latest industrial and academic developments in AI/ML, and apply it to
create prototypes for demonstration.
3. Work with development teams to mature these algorithms into production quality
programs
4. Do applied research on a wide array of Operations research and machine learning
projects.
Desired candidate profile:
1. Degree in relevant field or considerable hands-on experience in data science algorithms
2. Basic understanding of Supervised learning, Unsupervised learning. Graph theory
knowledge is a plus
3. Basic knowledge in working with Deep Learning libraries such as Tensorflow or Pytorch
or Keras or Theano is a plus.
Basic Qualifications:
1. A good foundation in AI Methodologies like ML and Deep Learning. NLP, Computer
vision is a plus.
2. Very good python programming skills. Java programming skills a bonus
3. Detailed oriented and penchant for data quality control
4. Ability to Dig deeper into data, understand characteristics of data, evaluate alternate
models and validate hypothesis through theoretical and empirical approaches
5. Is a Self-Driven individual contributor who prefers working in an agile manner.
6. Ability to work independently and have ownership mentality
7. Innovation minded, highly capable to think systematically, capable of redefining the
solutions to overcome the competitors and solving problems.
8. Curious and willing to challenge existing solutions with innovative technology concepts.
Thanks,
Amit Sehdev
APN Software Services Inc.
Direct: 510-402-1061 | Fax: 510-623-5055 | Amit@apninc.com
“Ranked Top Work Places 2016”
“Certified Small and Minority Business”
“Ranked Top 50 Organizations for Diversity”
“Ranked Top Diversity Business”",4.1,APN Software Services Inc.,"San Diego, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,CA,2355,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
839,839,Data Scientist,$70k-$116k,"Data Scientist
Are you interested in joining the fastest growing company in the city? Our client is newly international, hiring career aggressive high achievers to be the next generation of leaders. They offer highly competitive comp packages and fantastic PTO!

Description
The Data Scientist designs and develops methods and systems that have the ability to consolidate and analyze ""big data"" that generate insights to untapped client solutions. He/she will develop and code software programs, algorithms and automated processes to cleanse large datasets into meaningful information for gathering insight. By being able to draw conclusions from large, disparate sources of data, we can identify and pursue new areas of growth, preempt trends and continue our exponential growth.
Making an impact isn't something reserved for people in corner offices. It comes from people in every corner of the office. People with ambition, optimism and courage. We provide growth and opportunity and give employees flexibility in how they get the job done. You might not expect that from a big company, but we're smart enough to know how to hire the best and when to step aside and let them lead. Our goal is that you never stop learning and you never cease to amaze--especially yourself. If this fits your career goal, we can't wait to welcome you on board.
Responsibilities
Designs, develops and programs methods, processes, and systems to consolidate and analyze unstructured, diverse ""big data"" sources to generate actionable insights and solutions for client services and product enhancement.
Interacts with product and service teams to identify questions and issues for data analysis and experiments.
Develops and codes software programs, algorithms and automated processes to cleanse, integrate and evaluate large datasets from multiple disparate sources.
Identifies meaningful insights from large data and metadata sources.
Interprets and communicates insights and findings from analysis and experiments to product, service and business managers.
As a seasoned, experienced professional with a full understanding of area of specialization, he/she resolves a wide range of issues in creative ways.
Ability to draw on past experience and current data to influence business partners and provide insightful analytics.
Works on problems of diverse scope where analysis of data requires evaluation of identifiable factors.
Demonstrates good judgment in selecting methods and techniques for obtaining solutions.
Networks with senior internal and external personnel in own area of expertise.
Higher level of data analysis skills and knowledge M&A.
Ability to leverage Excel and other systems to perform complex financial modeling.
Ability to work in cross-functional teams and work independently.
Ability to perform onsite due diligence of potential acquisition targets.
Qualifications
Typically requires a minimum of 5 years of related experience with a Bachelor's degree; or 3 years and a Master's degree; or a PhD without experience; or equivalent work experience.
All the above duties and responsibilities are essential job functions for which reasonable accommodation will be made. All job requirements listed indicate the minimum level of knowledge, skills and/or ability deemed necessary to perform the job proficiently. This position description is not to be construed as an exhaustive statement of duties, responsibilities or requirements. Employees may be required to perform any other job-related instructions as requested by their leader, subject to reasonable accommodation.

*Rainmaker is a search firm focused in Finance, Accounting, Tax, Audit, Risk & Compliance,Treasury, M&A, Investor Relations, Financial Data, Business Intelligence and Analytics recruiting.
Certified Woman Owned Business by WBENC
7 Consecutive Years named a Largest Executive Search Firm by Cincinnati Business Courier
Largest Women-Owned Business by Columbus Business First
To view more active searches visit our website:
www.RainmakerResourcesLLC.com",-1.0,"Rainmaker Resources, LLC","Cincinnati, OH",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,OH,4027,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
840,840,Senior Data Engineer,$70k-$116k,"Job Summary

Blackline’s new Cloud Engineering team is seeking an experienced Data Engineer with expertise in platforms with asynchronous, event driven architecture to help advance the platform to allow the organization to make data-driven decisions and also improve the product experience. In this role, you will lead architecture, design, build, and manage physical data structures designed for flexibility, scalability and resiliency to support current and future business needs of all the BlackLine products and initiatives in automated, repeatable way. You’ll design, build, and maintain processes and components of a data pipeline to support analytics, focusing on data quality and governance, pipeline performance, and best practices for democratized data access. You will also mentor and train new team members on design and development and make recommendations to improve our model.

The team is also responsible for building and operating tools and platform around data while also promoting best practices around it with a focus on user data privacy. If you’rean expertin automation and tools development, Containers, Event driven technology (Kafka), traditional data warehousing, ETL and/or big data pipeline and processing, you’reexactly who we’re seeking. Technical capabilities aside, if you’rea self-starter who’s comfortable with ambiguity, able to think bigwithout overlooking minute details,andwho thrives in a fast-paced environment, you’re perfect for our new Cloud Engineering team.

Roles and Responsibility (list in order of importance)
Ensure 99.99%+ availability of the services and infrastructure that spans across multiple global datacenters in private and public clouds.
Design, build and maintain production data-pipelines (both batch and streaming) that deliver over a billion events with measurable quality within bounds of defined SLA(s)
Work with product and engineering managers to build necessary tools to help with their data-related needs
Build tools and infrastructure that enables external teams (engineers and analysts) to effectively create efficient data-pipelines
Be a champion of the overall strategy for data governance, security, privacy, quality and retention that will satisfy business policies and requirements
Monitor and maintain health, performance, and security of all infrastructure components.
Desire to automate everything
Architect and create reference architecture for Kafka Implementation standards
Participate in the design and development of ETL and ELT processes for data integration using Google Cloud Platform applications (BigQuery)
Design, build, and maintain processes and components of a streaming data/ETL pipeline to support real-time analytics (from requirements to data transformation, data modeling, metric definition, reporting, etc.)
Design, create and manage physical data structures designed for flexibility, scalability and resiliency to support future business needs.
Build and maintain ETL jobs for centralizing data into our Google Cloud data lake
Build and maintain tools to automate data modeling and data quality checks
Put in place tooling and frameworks to facilitate data governance and shared analysis between internal organizations
Required Qualifications

Years of Experience in Related Field: Minimum 5 Years

Education: Masters Preferred

Technical/Specialized Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities:
We run in Google Cloud and rely heavily on BigQuery, Cloud Storage and our internal ETL frameworks to automate tasks
Great communication and interpersonal skills
Individuals who are motivated by enabling and helping others within the company be data driven
Experience with Windows, Linux system administration, and/or Enterprise applications
Experience with container orchestration technologies (kubernetes, mesos, swarm etc.) and deployment methodologies and technologies (CI/CD, Chef, Puppet, Ansible, etc.)
Create reference architecture for Kafka Implementation standards
Standing up and administer on Kafka cluster, provide expertise in Kafka brokers, zookeepers, Kafka connect, schema registry, KSQL, Rest proxy, Replicator, ADB, Operator and Kafka Control center.
Create topics, setup redundancy cluster, deploy monitoring tools, alerts and has good knowledge of best practices.
Provide administration and operations of the Kafka platform like provisioning, access lists Kerberos and SSL configurations.
Use automation tools like provisioning using Docker, Jenkins and GitLab.
Experience with Relational Databases, NoSQL Databases and/or Big Data technologies
Working knowledge in IP and storage networking including SDN, Linux, application networking, DNS, SAN and hybrid technologies
Proficient with Terraform
Proficient in a modern scripting language (preferably Python) for automation of build tasks.
Experience with Big Data on GCP - BigQuery, Pub/Sub, Dataproc, Dataflow. (Nice to have)
Networking principles and protocols such as IP subnetting, routing, firewall rules, Virtual Private Cloud, LoadBalancer, Cloud DNS, Cloud CDN, etc.
Prior experience working with: container technology such as Docker, version control systems (Github), build management and CI/CD tools (Concourse, Jenkins), and monitoring tools (App Dynamics, etc.)
Preferred Qualifications
Demonstrable Cloud service provider experience (ideally GCP) - infrastructure build and configurations of a variety of services including Compute, Storage, SDN (VPC and XPN)
Experience of working with Continuous Integration (CI), Continuous Delivery (CD) and continuous testing tools
Experience working within an Agile environment
Programming experience in one or more of the following languages: Python, Ruby, Java, JavaScript, Go
Automation scripting (using scripting languages such as Terraform, Ansible etc.)
Server administration (either Linux or Windows)
Ability to quickly acquire new skills and tools",4.0,BlackLine,"Pleasanton, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,19,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,CA,5866,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
842,842,"Data Scientist, Operations",$70k-$116k,"PicnicHealth is a San Francisco-based, venture-backed health tech startup with the mission of structuring the world's medical data to make it useful. Our business is two-sided: We give patients the first truly useful and complete personal health record by doing all the legwork to collect, digitize, and organize medical records from all of their providers. In addition, patients can support new medical breakthroughs if they choose to contribute their anonymized medical histories to studies PicnicHealth sponsors with leading researchers. Patients get the PicnicHealth service free of charge, life sciences researchers get critical data on how diseases look in the real world, and academic researchers get free access to data sets that drive cutting edge medical research.

The Opportunity

At PicnicHealth, data science is at the core of how we cost-effectively retrieve and transform medical records into structured shareable data. Our teams recruit patients to partner's research studies, manage a large workforce of professionals who lend their expertise to the process of extracting clinical information, and build software tools to make these processes efficient. We are looking for a talented data scientist to arm these teams with data-driven insights so they can make informed operational and strategic decisions. This role provides a unique opportunity to work with continuous real-world operations data, to be tightly coupled to the actions taken based on one's analyses, and to drive significant impact within PicnicHealth's core business.

Our ideal team member will have equal parts communication, analytical, and leadership skills. You possess a strong sense of curiosity and a desire to contribute to a business that impacts the daily lives of chronic disease patients, as well as the doctors and scientists helping them. You ask analytical questions and possess the technical know-how to translate models into code, code into numbers, and numbers into operations decisions. You have prior experience analyzing networks, distribution, routing, or other dynamical operations scenarios. You have a strong desire to lead a growing team of data scientists as PicnicHealth scales to meet customer demand. You are a kind, passionate, and collaborative problem-solver who seeks and gives candid feedback.

As a Senior Data Scientist at PicnicHealth you will:
Work with a cross-functional team to model continually-evolving operations scenarios, drive analytical decision, and communicate actionable insights
Become an expert in the data we collect, understanding how to extract timely insights via SQL, and helping evolve our instrumentation to boost insight into company operations
Use PicnicHealth's data to optimize and shape the workflow of professionals tackling a hard problem: collecting and structuring medical histories to empower patients
Take a technical leadership role among a diverse, growing team of data scientists, while helping level up the sophistication of our analyses and processes
Help continue to build a world-class Data Science team, by helping attract, interview, and onboard your future team members during this exciting time of growth
You're a strong candidate if:
You hold a Master's degree with 4 years of industry experience or PhD in a quantitative discipline, such as operations research, applied math, applied statistics, health economics, or a related discipline
You love working with data and have experience exploring it with a critical eye
You are proficient in Python/SQL (or another programming language and are committed to becoming an expert in Python and SQL)
You are an excellent communicator, both oral and written, and can effectively adapt your tone, content, and approach to diverse audiences
You are self-motivated, flexible, proactive, and enjoy coming up with elegant and innovative solutions to challenging problems
You know how to balance attention to detail with execution against tight timelines
You are passionate about our grassroots patient-centric mission to improve healthcare through technology
You are an ideal candidate if you also have experience:
Analyzing efficiency and bottlenecks within real world networks, such as distribution, communications, or transportation networks
Why join PicnicHealth?

At PicnicHealth you get to solve real problems with real solutions, great tech, and great people.

You also get:
Competitive salary
Comprehensive benefits including Health, Dental, Vision
Flexible time off
401k plan
Parental leave
Free PicnicHealth account
Equipment and internet funds while we're working remotely during COVID-19
Due to COVID-19, currently all roles are remote until at least until January 2021. Once in-person work is safe for all team members, this role would be based out of our beautiful office in the Mission District of San Francisco.

Equal Opportunity Statement

PicnicHealth is committed to promoting an inclusive work environment free of discrimination and harassment. We value a diverse and balanced team where everyone can belong.",4.8,PicnicHealth,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,6,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,CA,5038,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
843,843,Data Scientist,$70k-$116k,"Groupons mission is to become the daily habit in local commerce and fulfill our purpose of building strong communities through thriving small businesses by connecting people to a vibrant, global marketplace for local services, experiences and goods. In the process, were positively impacting the lives of millions of customers and merchants globally. Even with thousands of employees spread across multiple continents, we still maintain a culture that inspires innovation, rewards risk-taking and celebrates success. If you want to take more ownership of your career, then you're ready to be part of Groupon.

Are you a problem solver? A creative thinker who asks questions others dont think of? Are you interested in bringing together data and algorithms to grow Groupons business?

The Data Science team at Groupon owns the heart of our decision-making system that provides value to the millions of merchants and customers that use our platforms on a daily basis. We use industry standard data technologies, data science methods, and machine learning models to build real-time solutions that tune an inventory of merchants offering goods and services that our customers need. For each merchant we provide direction on how to compete successfully in their unique local marketplace. For each customer, Groupon leverages real-time matching algorithms to personalize deals for local businesses in their area. We use the tremendous level of daily traffic on our site and mobile apps to understand the evolving needs of our customers and merchants. Groupon constantly monitors the performance of our models and algorithms to improve the accuracy of our models while staying accountable to the fundamentals of our business.

Data science is a quickly evolving discipline and Groupon is committed to ensuring that our Data Scientists use modern, career building tools that keep pace with the rest of the industry. Your role as a Data Scientist will be to understand the behavior of our customers and merchants and translate that understanding into actionable insights that can impact our real-time revenue and user experience. Team members are highly collaborative, have an authentic passion for trying new algorithms, a willingness to experiment, and a drive to execute.

We're a ""best of both worlds"" kind of company. We're big enough to have resources and scale, but small enough that a single person has a surprising amount of autonomy and can make a meaningful impact. We're curious, fun, a little intense, and kind of obsessed with helping local businesses thrive. Does that sound like a compelling place to work?

Youll spend time on the following:
Develop algorithms, data pipelines, and automated processes to create a data science backed solution that meets a business need for improving our customer or merchant platforms
Build machine-learned models in areas such as user segmentation, traffic change detection, personalized recommendations, conversion rate prediction of visiting customers, or time-series demand forecasting
Work with product and business teams to identify questions and issues for data analysis and experimentation
Design and develop processes and systems which consolidate, analyze and generate actionable insights from diverse data sources
Interpret and communicate meaningful insights and findings from analysis and experiments to partners across the organization


Were excited about you if you have:
3-5 years work experience as a data scientist
BS or MS degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Economics or similar quantitative field, with an emphasis on predictive analytics, data mining, statistics, linear algebra, machine learning, and/or algorithms (comparable industry experience may be substituted for this requirement)
Understanding of applied math topics, such as probability and statistics, linear algebra, basic optimization techniques, etc.
Hands-on experience with predictive analytics tools and machine learning techniques/algorithms
Experience with Python
Experience with Neural Networks / Deep Learning a plus
Experience with AWS services and Sagemaker a plus
Experience with data management technologies like Hadoop, Hive, Snowflake, etc.
Experience with Spark a plus
Self-driven problem solving skills and can identify problems unilaterally, but still bring back to the team
Experience translating business objectives and problems into analytic problems, and analytic solutions into actionable business solutions
Experience defining and analyzing multivariate tests


We value people who are:
Customer-focused: We believe that doing whats right for the customer is ultimately what will drive our business forward.
Obsessed with quality: Your production code just works & scales linearly
Team players. You believe that more can be achieved together. You listen to feedback and also provide supportive feedback to help others grow/improve.
Fast learners: We are willing to disrupt our existing business to trial new products and solutions. You love learning how to use new technologies and then rapidly apply them to new problems.
Pragmatic: We do things quickly to learn what our customers desire. You know when its appropriate to take shortcuts that dont sacrifice quality or maintainability.
Owners: People at Groupon know how to positively impact the business.


Groupon's purpose is to build strong communities through thriving small businesses.

To learn more about the world's largest local ecommerce marketplace,
click here for the latest Groupon news.
Plus, be sure to

check out the values

that shape our culture, guide our strategy and make our company a great place to work. And just don't take our word for it.

Hear from real Groupon team members

and learn more about our inclusive employee groups. If all of this sounds like something that's a great fit for you, then click apply and let's see where this takes us.

Groupon is an Equal Opportunity Employer

Qualifications for employment, promotion, and other terms and
conditions of employment are based upon the ability to perform the job.
Equal-employment opportunities are provided to all applicants and
employees without regard to race, creed, religion, color, age, national
origin, sex, disability, medical condition, sexual orientation, gender
identity or expression, genetic information, ancestry, marital status,
military discharge status (excluding dishonorable discharge), veteran
status, citizenship status, or other legally protected status. We are
all responsible for maintaining this policy. Groupon is committed to
providing reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with
disabilities and disabled veterans in our job application procedures. If
you need assistance or an accommodation due to a disability, you may
email us at hraccommodations at groupon.com. If you have concerns
related to Groupon’s equal employment opportunities, you may contact
Groupon's Ethics Reporting Service Ethicspoint.",3.3,Groupon,"Chicago, IL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,12,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,IL,6937,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
844,844,Data Scientist,$70k-$116k,"Company: FedEx Services
Job Title: Data Scientist
Job Requisition Number: RC271790
Category: Decision Science & Analytics
Locations:
Brookfield, Wisconsin 53045
United States

Coraopolis, Pennsylvania 15108
United States

Your application to this posting may potentially be considered for Sr. Data Scientist or Data Scientist Advisor.

Position Summary and Essential Duties:
Provide expertise and leadership at the enterprise level related to vast quantities of data (including disparate data), enterprise analytics, statistical modeling, and initiatives. Leads staff in descriptive, predictive, prescriptive and ensemble modeling, advanced statistical techniques, use of database tools and/or other approaches in quantitative analysis of complex business situations. Creates and executes solutions from initial concept to fully tested production, and communicates results to a broad range of audiences. Advanced use of current and emerging technologies to evaluate trends and develop actionable insights and recommendations to management, via understanding of the business model and the information available for analysis. Uses data, statistical and quantitative analysis, explanatory and high complexity predictive modeling and fact based management to drive decision making. Mentors less senior staff. Leads cross functional teams. Routinely work on multiple highly complex assignments. Provides consultation to Sr. Leadership on a normal basis.

Duties for this role include but not limited to: provide enterprise level analytics related to vast quantities of data (including disparate data), enterprise analytics, statistical modeling, and initiatives. Responsible for descriptive, predictive, prescriptive and ensemble modeling, advanced statistical techniques, use of databases tools and/or other approaches in quantitative analysis of complex business situations. Creates and executes solutions from initial concept to fully tested production and communicates results to a board range of audiences. Uses data, statistical and quantitative analysis, explanatory and high complexity predictive modeling and fact based management to drive decision making. Leads cross functional teams. Routinely work on multiple highly complex assignments

Data Science/Engineering Experience:

Interest/experience in Machine Learning (ML) Models (Neural Network models, Tree models, Linear Models and any other Regression/Classification Models.)
Strong software development skills as demonstrated through machine learning projects.
Experience building CI/CD pipelines
Experience in ML/OPS
Experience working on data science projects
Collaborate with development teams to test and deploy machine learning models
Experience in productizing machine learning models that’s measurable, scalable and maintainable
Programming Language experience:

Python / R
Java Programmer
SQL/Data Manipulation
DS Packages/Applications:

Tensorflow
PyTorch
PySpark
SciKit
XGBoost
Gitlab
Swift Stack
Jenkins
CI/CD
Docker
Deployment Pipelines

Domicile Location:
Brookfield, WI (a suburb of Milwaukee, WI)
Coraopolis, PA (a suburb of Pittsburgh, PA)
The ability to work remotely within the United States may be available based on business need.
Relocation:
Relocation assistance may be available for this position, but is based on business decision.
Minimum Qualifications:
Sr. Data Scientist - Masters degree or equivalent in a quantitative discipline required. five (5) years work experience in measurement and analysis, quantitative business problem solving, operations analysis, marketing analysis, simulation and/or predictive analytics. superior analytical skills with diverse analytics and statistical software and applications. excellent interpersonal skills, written, and oral communication skills. Proven leadership skills.
Data Scientist Advisor - Master's degree or equivalent in a quantitative discipline required. seven (7) Year work experience in measurement and analysis, quantitative business problem solving, solutions implementation, operations analysis, marketing analysis, simulation development and/or predictive analytics. Demonstrated superior analytical skills with diverse analytics, data types and statistical software and applications. Outstanding interpersonal skills, written, and oral communication skill. Proven leadership skills.
Want a career where you are empowered to make a difference? Want to work for a company that is environmentally responsible? Want to grow and develop on the job? If so, FedEx is the place for you! Every day FedEx delivers for its customers with transportation and business solutions. FedEx serves more than 220 countries and territories around the globe. We can serve this global network due to our outstanding team of FedEx employees. FedEx has over 400,000 talented employees who are tasked with making every FedEx experience outstanding. FedEx has been recognized on many different lists both for business success and for being a great employer.

Here are some of the recognitions FedEx has received from the past couple of years:
Fortune ""World’s Most Admired Companies"" – 2019
Forbes ""Best Employers for Diversity"" - 2019
Reputation Institute ""World’s Most Reputable Companies"" – 2019
National Business Inclusion Consortium ""Best-of-the-Best Corporations for Inclusion"" - 2019
Women’s Business Enterprise National Council ""America’s Top Corporations for Women’s Business Enterprises"" - 2018
Corporate Responsibility Magazine ""100 Best Corporate Citizens"" – 2018
Black Enterprise ""50 Best Companies For Diversity"" – 2018
When 400,000 employees around the globe are all working together it is amazing what we can achieve! FedEx connects people and ideas. If you would like to make a difference on a global scale while receiving top notch benefits, competitive pay, and plenty of opportunities to develop, click ‘Apply’ and tell us more about yourself.

EEO Statement - FedEx is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer (minorities/females/disability/veterans) that is committed to diversifying its workforce.

, street_address=17950 W.Corporate Drive",3.8,FedEx,"Brookfield, WI",-1,10000+ Employees,47,Company - Public,other_industries,Transportation & Logistics,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,WI,6090,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,1
845,845,Data Scientist,$70k-$116k,"Job Description

The Data Scientist is responsible for leading the design, development, and implementation of advanced quantitative models to evaluate the ITSM environment and to inform a variety of strategic and tactical business decisions. The Data Scientist works collaboratively across the service delivery teams and MSI to build and drive recommendations that translate into practical, measurable actionable insight and process improvements.

What Youll Get to Do:
Builds queries to monitor the IT Service Delivery environment to analyze demand, usage, and performance
Uses data analytics to provide actionable, timely and accurate reporting to improve service delivery, infrastructure management and proactive problem and incident management.
Works with the Service Providers, retained IT, and management teams to identify and monitor process performance and service provider performance
Lead Technical Exchange Meeting related to data structure, quality assurance, and reporting
Apply the various reporting and presentation tools to provide analysis and recommendations
Evaluate, analysis and interpret data to develop recommendations for service and process improvement
Lead a team of data analysts to identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Define and deliver a solution to clean-up data and provide the appropriate level of data hygiene
Analyze complex data schema (tables, reference, relationships) from multiple data sources/platforms
Define new data collection and analysis processes
Design and develop approaches leading to data automation, integration processes, and improvements
Normalize and redesign existing data schema according to requirements, business direction, and commercial best practices
Youll Bring These Qualifications:
Minimum of 5 years experience in the designing data models and conducting statistical data analysis, data manipulation, data visualization, and value modeling and simulations
B.S. in Mathematics, Computer Science or Engineering
A strong understanding of IT Service Management delivery
Experience developing and implementing data dashboards, data automation, and reporting systems to convert data into actionable information
Strong problem solving, quantitative and analytical abilities
Significant experience with conceptual, logical and physical data modeling
ITIL Foundations certification
Excellent communication skills effectively translating data analysis concepts to a business audience
TS/SCI with Poly
These Qualifications Would be Nice to Have:
M.S. in Statistics, Data Analysis or Information Technology
Experience with the ServiceNow toolset
Hands-on knowledge working with modeling tools: Tableau, Lime Survey, Strata, VBA, and SPSS
ITIL Intermediate Certifications
BITS3

allspark

What We Can Offer You:
Weve been named a Best Place to Work by the Washington Post.
Our employees value the flexibility at CACI that allows them to balance quality work and their personal lives.
We offer competitive benefits and learning and development opportunities.
We are mission-oriented and ever vigilant in aligning our solutions with the nations highest priorities.
For over 55 years, the principles of CACIs unique, character-based culture have been the driving force behind our success.
Job Location

US-Chantilly-VA-VIRGINIA SUBURBAN

CACI employs a diverse range of talent to create an environment that fuels innovation and fosters continuous improvement and success. At CACI, you will have the opportunity to make an immediate impact by providing information solutions and services in support of national security missions and government transformation for Intelligence, Defense, and Federal Civilian customers. CACI is proud to provide dynamic careers for employees worldwide. CACI is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.",3.7,CACI International,"Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,58,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,VA,3877,0,data scientist,0,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
846,846,Lead Data Engineer,$70k-$116k,"Published Job Title:
Lead Data Engineer

Location:
BRKFD-Brookfield

Position:
MDE020-Lead Data Engineer

Job Summary::

Milwaukee Tool is looking for a Lead Data Engineer. We are looking for someone who has delivered complex, enterprise grade data solutions who is detail-oriented, passionate, and has a keen business sense coupled with an entrepreneurial attitude.

A successful candidate will combine strong technical abilities with leadership skills to deliver business value in a fast-paced, collaborative development environment. They will be self-driven, capable of effective collaboration with different technical and non-technical stakeholders, an experienced mentor, a steward of best practices, and seek to deliver successfully against high operational standards.

Responsibilities:
Create and build robust data structures to support end user's analysis and decision making across multiple business verticals. This includes both end-to-end architecting and business solutioning.
Collaborate with end users and peers to understand requirements, formulate use cases, and then translate into an effective technical solution.
Participate in brainstorming sessions and contribute ideas to our technology, algorithms and products.
Effectively communicate and interact with business and technical personnel in solving complex data related business and technical problems.
Monitor data warehouse eco-system and identify opportunities to make enhancements.
Ensure data processes run and complete on a timely basis to ensure business continuity.
Adhere to timelines and excel in a fast-paced, high-energy environment.
Coach and develop other data professionals.
Drive data best practices and contribute to development of overall data strategy and roadmap.
Requirements:
Strong understanding of relational and dimensional data modeling (Kimball Dimensional Modeling Methodology). Advanced experience working with data warehouses and ETL applications with expert-level knowledge of relational data.
Clear communication skills; the ability to explain complex technical concepts to non- technical internal clients.
Coding proficiency in one or more languages (e.g. Python, Scala, Ruby, Java), expertise in SQL (e.g. MS SQL, T-SQL, PostgreSQL, SPARQL), and familiarity with one or more schema definition languages (e.g. DDL, SDL, etc.).
Advanced experience leveraging various strategies for ingesting, modelling, processing, and persisting data as well as excellent analytical and problem-solving skills.
Familiarity with distributed systems (e.g. Elastic Map Reduce, MPP architectures, and NoSQL databases). Experience with cloud data warehousing and management solutions.
Familiarity with Power BI and other visualization solutions (e.g. Tableau, Looker, Qlik, etc.).
Be a self-starter, with the ability to learn new technologies and work independently -- an ideal candidate is curious and always willing to implement the latest and greatest technologies.
Business Acumen and understanding of basic data flow and processes in a manufacturing business.
Cloud Experience preferred (e.g. AWS, Azure, Google Cloud Platform, etc.). Demonstrated Azure experience with Data Factory, Analysis Services, SQL Managed Instance, Synapse, and DevOps.
Education & Business Experience:
Minimum 7 years of industry experience as a Data Engineer or related specialty with demonstrable track record in developing data solutions that are correct, stable, and high performing; provide business value; and use resources efficiently (e.g. system hardware, data storage, query optimization, cloud infrastructure, etc.).
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or equivalent work experience.
Minimum Requirements::

Shift::
1st Shift

Full/Part Time:
Full-time

Pay Range::",4.5,Milwaukee Tool,"Brookfield, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,96,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,WI,3745,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
848,848,Data Scientist,$70k-$116k,"Crowdskout is a platform for advocates to create, power, and cultivate communities at local and national levels. We provide mobilization and data tools to non-profits, issue advocacy groups, electoral groups, and corporate social impact teams. We are building capabilities that live beyond a 4-year election cycle, and outside of a traditional ""Red/Blue"" partisan paradigm.

Crowdskout seeks a Data Scientist to build models and derive insights to power the Crowdskout data platform. The Data Scientist will design and analyze experiments, build predictive models, assist with survey methodology, and perform general data analysis on a diverse array of datasets with hundreds of millions of records. They will collaborate closely with the Product and Engineering teams to advise product strategy and incorporate their insights and models into production.

If you are highly motivated, super passionate about democracy, and want to join a close-knit team that is looking to build great things for regular people, Crowdskout may be for you. This is a full-time position in Atlanta, GA; Durham, NC; Salt Lake City, UT; Austin TX; Washington, DC; New York City, NY, or fully remote.

Responsibilities
Build predictive models, tools, and data visualizations
Lead and execute data science research and development projects, including algorithm and experiment design
Independently (and often Collaboratively) explore data sets for insight and understanding that can help drive product changes and priority
Collaborate with the product and data engineering teams to bring models and insights into production
Desired Skills
At least 2 years of experience in a quantitative production environment or a postgraduate degree in a quantitative field
Experience in data mining and machine learning tools and languages including Jupyter notebooks, Python, R, etc.
Ability to work with git for collaboration and version control
Familiarity with machine learning pipeline workflows for modeling, tuning, logging and deployment to end users
Nice-to-haves
Knowledge of a general purpose programming language such as Python, Java, or C
Experience with geospatial modeling
Experience with graph database technologies and graph algorithms
Experience working with product and engineering teams
Experience with data in the political or advocacy spaces
Crowdskout is an equal opportunity employer that encourages diversity across all spectrums in its hiring, without regard to race, gender, age, color, religion, national origin, marital status, disability, sexual orientation, or any other protected factor. With that being said, we wouldn't be able to accommodate candidates in need of work sponsorship at this time since we are a small company. If you find this role interesting and you hit on the elements above, please apply!",4.5,Crowdskout,Remote,-1,1 to 50 Employees,6,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,Remote,2804,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
849,849,Data Scientist,$70k-$116k,"Please make sure to read the job posting in its entirety as it reflects both the University roles and responsibilities, followed by the specific description.
Department
2012223 Medicine-Genetic Medicine
About the Unit
Job Family
Research
Responsible for all aspects of research projects and research facilities. Plans and conducts clinical and non-clinical research; facilitates and monitors daily activities of clinical trials or research projects. Directs engineering and technical support activities to develop and maintain tools and computational methods needed to gather and analyze data.
Career Track and Job Level
Data Science
Conducts data investigation, including data wrangling, cleaning, sampling, management, exploratory analysis, regression and classification, prediction, and data communication. Implements foundational concepts of data computation, such as data structure, algorithms, parallel computing, simulation, and analysis. Utilizes knowledge in game theory, statistical quality control, exponential smoothing, seasonally adjusted trend analysis, or data visualization to gain insights, develop new strategies, and cultivate actionable business intelligence in diverse career tracks across the University.
P2: Requires knowledge and experience in own discipline; still acquiring higher-level knowledge and skills. Builds knowledge of the organization, processes and customers. Solves a range of straightforward problems. Analyzes possible solutions using standard procedures. Receives a moderate level of guidance and direction.
Role Impact
Individual Contributor
Responsibilities
The job provides professional support and solves problems in collecting, organizing, and analyzing information from the University's various internal data systems as well as from external sources The job performs data analysis assignments related to data manipulation, statistical applications, programming, analysis and modeling in order to support projects.
1) Analyzes moderately complex data sets for the purpose of extracting and purposefully using applicable information., 2) Provides professional support to staff or faculty members in defining the project and applying principals of data science in manipulation, statistical applications, programming, analysis and modeling., 3) Cleans, transforms, merges, and matches between large and complex research and administrative datasets. Plans own resources to collect, organize, and analyze information from the University's various internal data systems as well as from external sources., 4) Builds and analyzes statistical models and reproducible data processing pipelines using knowledge of best practices in machine learning and statistical inference. Serves as a single point of contact for all requests and engages other IT resources to assist as needed. May partner with other campus teams to assist faculty with data science related needs., 5) Performs other related work as needed.
Unit-specific Responsibilities
1) The Data Scientist will sift through large amounts of data with the ultimate goal of making discoveries that can make a difference in the health of people.
2) Maintain lab's computational software.
3) Provide technical support for lab's computational software
4) Perform reproducible genomic data analysis
5) Provide internal support for computational software and workflows
6) Design and implementing research that focuses on investigation of human genome function in healthy and disease cohorts.
7) Perform integrative statistical analysis of genome-wide genomic datasets.
8) Write and implement efficient and effective code and pipelines for data processing and analysis.
9) Coordinate work with other scientists in the laboratory and collaborating effectively on joint research projects.
10) Download and organize data repositories.
11) Recognize abnormal results and troubleshooting analytic pipelines to correct problems.
12) Adapt existing procedures to current work needs and making significant contributions to analysis methodology.
13) Summarize results and assist in interpreting findings.
14) Present findings at internal and external venues, and in written publications.
15) Assist in supervising laboratory trainees.
16) Assist in grant writing.
Unit-preferred Competencies
1) Knowledge of regulatory policies and procedures.
2) Analytical skills.
3) Problem-solving skills.
4) Attention to detail.
5) Organizational skills.
6) Verbal and written communication skills.
7) Ability to work independently and as part of a team.
8) Ability to train others.
9) Version control experience.
Education, Experience, and Certifications
Minimum requirements include a college or university degree in related field.
Minimum requirements include knowledge and skills developed through 2-5 years of work experience in a related job discipline.
Preferred Qualifications
Education
1) Bachelor degree in statistics, computer science, genetics, bioinformatics, computational biology, population genetics or a field of study relevant to the research being conducted

Experience
1) Experience using languages such as Java, Perl, Python, R or PHP
2) Experience with Linux and/or Unix
3) Experience with cloud computing
4) Experience in project management
Required Documents
1) Resume
2) Cover letter
NOTE: When applying, all required documents MUST be uploaded under the Resume/CV section of the application.
FLSA Status
Exempt
Pay Frequency
Monthly
Pay Grade
Depends on Qualifications
Scheduled Weekly Hours
40
Benefits Eligible
Yes
Drug Test Required
No
Health Screen Required
No
Motor Vehicle Record Inquiry Required
No
Posting Date
2020-08-07-07:00
Remove from Posting On or Before
2021-02-07-08:00
Posting Statement
The University of Chicago is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity/Disabled/Veterans Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national or ethnic origin, age, status as an individual with a disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, or other protected classes under the law. For additional information please see the University's Notice of Nondiscrimination.
Staff Job seekers in need of a reasonable accommodation to complete the application process should call 773-702-5800 or submit a request via Applicant Inquiry Form.
The University of Chicago's Annual Security & Fire Safety Report (Report) provides information about University offices and programs that provide safety support, crime and fire statistics, emergency response and communications plans, and other policies and information. The Report can be accessed online at: http://securityreport.uchicago.edu. Paper copies of the Report are available, upon request, from the University of Chicago Police Department, 850 E. 61st Street, Chicago, IL 60637.",4.0,University of Chicago,"Chicago, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,130,College / University,other_industries,Education,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,IL,6800,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
851,851,Data Scientist,$70k-$116k,"Progressive Leasing is seeking an experienced Data Scientist in our Draper, Utah office. As a Data Scientist, you will blend analytics, data mining, machine learning, and software engineering to build algorithms that will result in massive improvements to the way we do business. You will be responsible for developing and improving key decision systems and predictive models to drive maximum business impact. You will develop a profound understanding of our customers, business processes, products, and financials by studying the data that describe each of these elements of our business. You will be at the forefront of this rapidly evolving field and have the opportunity to develop your own tools and technologies as you do. Most importantly, youll be part of a team that forms the backbone of a fast-growing company at the forefront of an exciting, growing industry.
What You'll Do:
Build, maintain, and improve key decision systems and predictive models that are key to Progressive Leasings competitive advantage
Explore new data sources both internal and external to Progressive and use findings to further improve and optimize model performance
Design, implement, and read in-market experiments testing new algorithms, technologies, and processes to better serve our customer and stay ahead of the competition
Recommend and support strategic business changes through rigorous analytics, deep understanding of the business, and creative problem solving
Identify, evaluate, and help implement emerging advanced analytics technologies and methods
Be part of a fast-growing team of like-minded data scientists who work and play together, and who love what they do and where they do it!
Minimum Experience & Qualifications:
Masters degree in a quantitative or technical field (Math, Statistics, Engineering, Economics, Physics, Computer Science, etc.)
Experience with data exploration and machine learning tools such as those found in R or Python
Demonstrated ability applying advanced statistical modeling techniques to solve problems
Ability to craft rigorous research / evaluation design approaches, based upon understanding of clients' research needs
Advanced knowledge and experience with querying languages (SQL, etc.)
Understanding of modern software development and engineering practices including scrum/agile, Git, and DevOps
Track record of achieving business results through creative problem solving and careful implementation

Compensation, Perks & Benefits:
Competitive Compensation + Bonus Potential
Full Health Benefits; Medical/Dental/Vision/Life Insurance + Paid Parental Leave
Company Matched 401k
Paid Time Off + Paid Holidays + Paid Volunteer Time
Diversity Alliance Resource Groups
Employee Stock Purchase Program
Tuition Reimbursement
Charitable Gift Matching
Job Required Equipment & Services Will Be Provided
Prog Leasing, LLC, a wholly owned subsidiary of Aarons, Inc (NYSE: AAN), is the largest and longest-tenured virtual lease-to-own provider in the United States. The Companys mission is to provide simple and affordable purchase options for credit challenged consumers. Over the last 20 years, Progressive Leasings alternative lease-purchase options have helped millions of customers with less than perfect credit get the things they need with ease. Progressive also helps more than 30,000retail stores drive increased revenue and improve customer satisfaction. Learn more at http://www.progleasing.com.

Progressive Leasing welcomes and encourages diversity in the workplace. We do not discriminate in any aspect of employment on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, age, veteran status, disability, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local employment discrimination laws where Progressive Leasing does business.",4.5,Progressive Leasing,"Salt Lake City, UT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,21,Company - Public,financial_related,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,UT,3860,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
853,853,Data Scientist,$70k-$116k,"Position at codeSpark

About codeSpark
codeSpark is turning programming into play for kids everywhere. We’re building the largest community of young kid coders in the world. Our award-winning app, codeSpark Academy, has a unique word-free interface that allows kids as young as four to become makers. We have a strong focus on making codeSpark Academy exciting for both girls and boys.

We believe all kids should have the opportunity to master this new form of literacy and creative expression. Our self-directed subscription service thoughtfully combines structured challenges and open-ended creative play.

Our new Data Scientist will have the opportunity to explore all sorts of interesting data about kids’ learning through play. You’ll also help us improve our marketing efforts through development and reporting on success metrics. The right person joining us will be interested in our mission and motivated to find all sorts of other cool data to analyze to help us grow, too!

Data Scientist Job Overview
We are looking for a Data Scientist who will support our product, marketing, and leadership with insights gained from analyzing company data. The ideal candidate is self-sufficient and adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization, and in building and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. They are experienced in using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. They must demonstrate a proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights. Finally, they must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams. The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

Responsibilities:
● Mine and analyze data from company databases to drive optimization and improvement of product development, marketing techniques and business strategies.
● Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
● Develop custom data models and algorithms to apply to data sets.
● Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, onboarding, revenue generation, ad targeting and other business outcomes.
● Leverage A/B testing framework and test model quality.
● Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy.
● Maintain company KPI dashboard.
● Collaborate with stakeholders throughout the organization to identify opportunities to leverage company data in driving business solutions.

Essential Qualifications:
● 5-7 years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models.
● Bachelor’s or Master’s in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field.
● Coding knowledge of several languages: Python (PySpark, TensorFlow, SciKit experience preferred), C#, R (or R-Shiny), MySQL/NoSQL, or JavaScript (bonus).
● Querying databases using statistical computer languages: Mongo, JQL, etc.
● Setting up AWS Analytics services.
● Analyzing/querying data from 3rd party providers: Google Analytics, Mixpanel, Facebook, Appsflyer, Email service providers, etc.
● Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders.

Highly desired:
● Experience working with product development and marketing teams, especially subscription products and kids games or apps.
● Experience using statistical computer languages to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
● Experience working with and creating data architectures: develop ETL pipelines, manage data migration, etc.
● Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications.
● Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across teams.
● A proactive approach to learning and mastering new technologies and techniques.

Perks
● Opportunity to shape strategy for a company having a global impact on K-5 education.
● The rare opportunity to change the world by helping create the first generation in history that is truly connected and collaborative.
● The fun of working with an effective and multi-award winning product that is beloved by customers.
● Sharp, motivated co-workers in a creative and supportive office environment.

Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
codeSpark believes in diversity and inclusion of all people, of all genders, races, ethnicities, sexual orientations, educational backgrounds, religions, abilities, socioeconomic backgrounds, immigration statuses, and more. Just as we hope to close access gaps in computer science education, we aim to create a culture within codeSpark that is inclusive and accessible to all current and potential employees.

codeSpark is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",4.0,Idealab,"Pasadena, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,14,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,CA,5007,0,data scientist,1,0,0,1,1,1,0,0,1
855,855,Data Scientist,$70k-$116k,"EXCITED TO GROW YOUR CAREER? WE’RE GLAD YOU’RE HERE!
Within the scope of employee recognition, sales incentive, channel loyalty and/or consumer rewards programs, develops analysis of client program performance utilizing internal Maritz, client and third party data, deriving actionable insights and recommendations. Develops basic statistical models which may predict participant behavior and forecast engagement activity and program revenue. Assists in conducting business reviews, presenting findings, program enhancements, and marketing recommendations to the client(s).

Scope

Develops and often-time leads the design and performance-based analytics, in support of the Market Teams for multiple assigned Maritz Motivation Solutions clients in accordance with agreed upon business requirements of each client. In partnership with the account teams, determines the strategic direction for and focus of the analysis and reviews. Makes recommendations resulting in program enhancement and combined incremental revenues. Works with all clients, regardless of program size.

Reporting and Working Relationships

Reports to Manager, Decision Sciences. Collaborates with Senior Analysts and Associate Analysts to improve and enhance client deliverables. Interacts significantly with account teams on assigned accounts, including such business roles as Sales, Operations, Solution Design, Solution Strategists, Finance, Technology, Marketing, etc. Interacts significantly with Technology, Data Mining team and Client to extract appropriate data files for analysis. Interacts with existing or prospective client contacts in face to face meetings to establish a relationship and manage client expectations as appropriate. Works independently with some supervision. No direct reports.

Primary Responsibilities

50%

Program Performance Analysis: Conducts performance-based analytics on assigned clients. Deriving a clear vision of client and program objectives, client analysis needs, scope and timeframe based on collaboration with client and account team. Managing client deliverables workflow and related processes. Requesting and leading other analytical resources to complete assigned client deliverables as needed. Analyzing program data for strengths, weaknesses, and/or anomalies within the performing groups for the purposes of designing and optimizing program effectiveness and return on investment. Analyzing program performance in the context of client business objectives and program strategy, developing insights that inform and improve future program performance. Requesting account team conversations to collaboratively support crafting of strategic recommendations to client.

20%

Communication and Sales support: Incorporates client facing skills with strategic presentation skills to establish a credible relationship with clients and prospects. Presents findings and recommendations to clients in face-to-face meetings for Motivation Solutions' client programs, emphasizing data-driven strategic insights to drive business performance, while following quality control processes as established by the Insight Services Leadership. Acts in consultative role with clients and Motivation Solutions' Account Teams to identify client and program objectives, key metrics and data sources, as well as to provide insight and make program recommendations. Collaborates with account teams to determine what analyses to conduct, review analyses and make program recommendations.

30%

Ad Hoc Analysis: Conducts custom analysis based on client requests. Examples include, exploratory analysis, segmentation, competition analysis, “what if” modeling, return on investment analysis, and forecasting.

Qualifications

1. Bachelor's degree in Marketing, Statistics, Business, Economics, Engineering or other quantitative field.

2. Minimum of two+ years’ experience in serving clients in a business or marketing environment.

3. Must understand relational databases.

4. Excellent written and oral communication skills with proven ability to present strategic recommendations. 5. Excellent organizational and project management skills with the ability to handle multiple projects simultaneously.

6. Experience in forecasting, predictive modeling, marketing analysis, and qualitative methods of customer, product, and market analytics.

7. Strong Microsoft Excel, Access, and PowerPoint skills required.

8. SQL a strong plus. R, SAS, Python or other statistical coding a strong plus.

DISCLAIMER: This job description is designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by associates within this classification. It is not designed to confirm or be interpreted as a comprehensive summary of all duties, responsibilities and qualifications required of associates assigned to this job.

Maritz will only employ applicants who have authorization to work permanently in the U.S. This is not a position for which sponsorship will be provided. Those who need sponsorship for work authorization now or in the future are not eligible for hire. No calls or agencies please.

Maritz is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, color, religion, national origin, age, marital status, political affiliation, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, disability or protected veteran status. We are committed to providing a workplace free of any discrimination or harassment. If you have a disability and are having difficulty accessing or using this website to apply for a position, you can request help by calling 1-636-827-1650 or by sending an email to idisability.administrator@maritz.com.",3.4,Maritz,"Fenton, MO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,126,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,MO,5697,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
856,856,Sr Big Data Engineer / Spark Lead,$70k-$116k,"Sr Big Data Engineer / Spark Lead

Job Title

Sr Big Data Engineer / Spark Lead

Job
ID

27355759

Duration

Location

Columbia,

MD

Other Location

Description

Dynamic, Entrepreneurial Marketing Consulting Company is seeking an Apache Spark Developer Lead to contribute to BLEND360 next level of growth and expansion.

BLEND360 is a multi-award winning Data-Driven Marketing Company who is privileged to provide our services to some of the most respected and recognized brands in the world. We aspire to have the best people, period! We have created a special culture where the brightest people come to work with the best clients, hone their craft, learn new skills and methodologies, and also have the flexibility to live their best lives in every way possible... and most of all, be part of the ever-growing, diverse family that is BLEND360.

The Apache Spark Lead will be a self-starting, motivated individual with is a strong developer who knows how to fully exploit the potential of our client’s Spark cluster.

The Details:
Location: Columbia, MD preferred, but will consider East Coast with travel to clients
Duration: Full-time Position
Benefits: We offer: Health, Vision, Dental, 401K plan, Life Insurance, and an incredibly supportive team cheering you on!
What you’ll do:

In this role, you’ll partner with our Fortune 100 clients and work within our Data Science team as our Apache Spark SME . You will clean, transform, and analyze vast amounts of raw data from various systems using Spark to provide ready-to-use data to our Data Scientists.

This involves both ad-hoc requests as well as data pipelines that are embedded in our production environment..

Additionally, you’ll:
Bring a strong background in Spark, PySpark, and Hadoop to the job
Create Scala/Spark jobs for data transformation and aggregation
Produce unit tests for Spark transformations and helper methods
Write Scaladoc-style documentation with all code
Design data processing pipelines
What you’ll get:
A fast-paced environment with supportive cross-functional partners
A team dedicated to transparency and simplicity to its customers
To be part of product, acquisition and servicing teams
Valuable experience running data science technologies for a highly visible Fortune 100 company
Support and expertise from all levels of the BLEND360 team including the Client Engagement and Talent teams
Benefits including Health, Vision, Dental, 401K plan, Life Insurance, Pretax Commuter Benefits, and an incredibly supportive team cheering you on!
Who you are:

You are a highly skilled expert in the Apache Spark cluster .

What you have:
Expert in full Spark Cluster, PySpark and Hadoop
Experience with Scala, Scalatest, Junit, Mockito, Embedded Cassandra
Spark query tuning and performance optimization
Experience with SQL and relational databases
Deep understanding of distributed systems (e.g. CAP theorem, partitioning, replication, consistency, and consensus)
Proven ability to prioritize work and projects
Accustom to working on multiple projects simultaneously
Self-starter and strong interpersonal skills
Proficient with Microsoft office suite (Excel, Word, PowerPoint)
Other:
Desire to work for a consulting firm with ability to travel up to 25%
Ability to keep a sense of humor while working in a fast pace environment
Collaborate well cross functionally and are an enthusiastic team player",4.5,Blend360,"Columbia, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,18,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,MD,3379,1,data engineer,0,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
857,857,data scientist,$70k-$116k,"Description
Cognistx is looking to hire an experienced Data Scientist to help lead our Data Science team. The Data Scientist is responsible for designing, developing, implementing and testing statistical and machine learning models that are the core components and integrated modules of Cognistx’s products and services.
For a full job description read here.
Work Location: Pittsburgh PA

Please submit your resume to:
info@cognistx.com
Essential Functions and Skills
Client data science requirements gathering to define analytic/predictive objectives of Cognistx projects and/or products

Execution of data analysis projects by: a) documenting the client’s requirements (including statistical analysis & visualization of data, data sampling, cleaning, and preprocessing), b) design, creation and optimization of statistical machine learning models to provide desired analytic capability (clustering, classification, matching/retrieval, prediction, regression, anomaly detection, etc.) on large-scale, real-world datasets

Design and execute experimental data collection and present resulting analyses using appropriate data visualizations

Best-practices implementation, maintenance and continuous improvement of created platforms and/or models, along with formal documentation and design/documentation reviews

Collaborate with other staff members such as Software Engineers, Product Managers, Cloud Specialists.

Writing, communicating and presenting results and findings to clients, and contributing to new proposal development
Preferred Education & Experience
Experience with other programming languages such as Java, R, Matlab.
Academic or professional background in Natural Language Processing, Computer Vision or similar.
Experience in presenting and visualizing complex data analysis and results to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Required Education and Experience
Masters degree or higher in Computer Science or related (Computer Engineering, Software Engineering, Statistics, Mathematics, Information Systems Management, etc.).
2+ years of experience working with SQL, NoSQL, AWS and Python data analysis-related libraries such as Pandas, Numpy, Scikit-Learn, Keras, PyTorch, Tensorflow, Matplotlib, Seaborn.
Solid academic and professional training in probability, statistics and Machine Learning. Academic courses such as: Statistics, Machine Learning, Deep Learning, Data Science, Data Mining, Big Data, Business Intelligence, etc.
Proven exposure to projects that involve all the data analytics process: data cleaning, data manipulation, statistical modeling, and final presentation of results/recommendations.
Solid knowledge of Machine Learning (classification and regression) algorithms such as Decision Trees, Random Forest, Logistic Regression, AdaBoost, Neural Networks. Able to work with unbalanced data sets, with structured and unstructured data.
Experience and knowledge modeling time series in predictive analysis.
Experience and solid knowledge working with large datasets using cloud services (Amazon Web Services, Google Cloud or Azure).",4.9,Cognistx,"Pittsburgh, PA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,5,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,PA,3078,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,1
858,858,Distinguished Data Engineer - Machine Learning,$70k-$116k,"1750 Tysons (12023), United States of America, McLean, Virginia

At Capital One, were building a leading information-based technology company. Still founder-led by Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Richard Fairbank, Capital One is on a mission to help our customers succeed by bringing ingenuity, simplicity, and humanity to banking. We measure our efforts by the success our customers enjoy and the advocacy they exhibit. We are succeeding because they are succeeding.

Guided by our shared values, we thrive in an environment where collaboration and openness are valued. We believe that innovation is powered by perspective and that teamwork and respect for each other lead to superior results. We elevate each other and obsess about doing the right thing. Our associates serve with humility and a deep respect for their responsibility in helping our customers achieve their goals and realize their dreams. Together, we are on a quest to change banking for good.

Distinguished Data Engineer - Machine Learning

At Capital One, we believe in the values of excellence and doing the right thing. We are a technology-oriented company delivering financial products to market through modern technology and constant innovation at a massive scale.

Distinguished Engineers are...
Deep technical experts, senior-level individual contributors and thought leaders that help accelerate adoption of the very best engineering practices, while maintaining knowledge on industry innovations, trends and practices
Visionaries, helping solve Capital Ones toughest technology challenges, to deliver on business needs that directly impact the lives of millions of our customers and associates
Role models and mentors, helping to coach and strengthen the technical expertise and know-how of our engineering and product community
Supporters, both internally and externally, helping to elevate the Distinguished Engineering community and establish themselves as a go-to resource on given technologies and technology-enabled capabilities
Those who gain the trust and confidence of those around them, from hands on engineers to executives
Whether a member of our engineering or architecture teams, Distinguished Engineers are individual contributors expected to solve problems in a fast-paced, collaborative, and iterative delivery environment. In order to meet these demands, candidates should be influential engineering leaders with deep technology expertise, and a collaborative style that brings others into the decision-making process. They will significantly impact the Tech agenda within their organization and devise clear roadmaps to deliver next generation technology solutions across organizational boundaries.

The Distinguished Engineer will be a hands-on (see: codes) individual contributor that will be part of the leadership team supporting our Marketing, Decision and Enablement, and Decisioning/Machine Learning Platform team within the Retail and Direct Technology organization (supports Capital One Bank). They will be responsible for tackling our hardest problems, establishing patterns, collaborating across teams and lines of business, and bringing SME-level knowledge around Data Engineering and Machine Learning Engineering domains. It is critically important to be able to tackle problems specifically (hands to keyboard) and influence (through engineering engagement) to scale our practice.

Responsibilities:
Design and develop cutting-edge solutions, using existing and emerging technology platforms specific to Data Engineering and Machine Learning Engineering (feature calculation, streaming and batch, machine learning lifecycle and platforms)
Build real-time and batch machine learning solutions at scale
Partner closely with Data Scientist to operational, scale, and contribute to model development lifecycle
Leverage sound judgment and problem solving to tackle some of Capital Ones most critical problems and connect the dots to broader implications of the work (as both an individual contributor and influencer)
Build awareness, increase knowledge and drive adoption of modern technologies and architecture patterns, sharing customer and engineering benefits to gain buy-in (working closely with leaders, other SMEs, and engineers)
Strike the right balance between lending expertise and providing an inclusive environment where others ideas can be heard and championed; leverage expertise to grow skills in the broader Capital One team (balance being a great coach and listener)
Promote a culture of engineering excellence and being well-managed, using opportunities to reuse and innersource solutions where possible (always consider resiliency and impact; major focus on customer experience)
Effectively communicate with and influence key stakeholders across the enterprise, at all levels of the organization
Operate as a trusted advisor for a specific technology, platform or capability domain, helping to shape use cases and implementation in an integrated manner
Design, architect, and help implement a solution to meet our software version management challenges
Design, architect, and help implement a system of record to monitor our usage of open source software
Design, architect, and help implement a recommendation engine to help Capital One engineering teams comply with open source software version policies and procedures
Facilitate the integration of these solutions into the overall Capital One SDLC processes


Basic Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree
At least 8 years of data engineering experience
At least 5 years of experience coding in Java, Scala, or Python
At least 3 years of experience working with Machine Learning
At least 3 years of experience working with data streaming solutions
At least 3 years of experience working with Big Data
At least 3 years of experience in Spark, PySpark, or Flink


Preferred Qualifications:
Masters Degree
10+ years of data engineering experience
8+ years of experience coding in Java, Scala, or Python
5+ years of experience working with Machine Learning
4+ years of experience with AWS


Capital One will consider sponsoring a new qualified applicant for employment authorization for this position.",3.9,Capital One,"McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,26,Company - Public,financial_related,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,VA,6174,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
859,859,Data Scientist active TS/SCI,$70k-$116k,"We are currently seeking an innovative, experienced, and highly-skilled Data Scientist to join our growing Advanced Analytics team in Ft. Belvoir, VA. In this role, you will create and develop custom solutions for our users in a collaborative, fast-paced, state-of-the art environment. To be successful in this role, you will be thorough, creative, and exceptionally well-skilled in all phases of the development lifecycle, with a passion for continued learning and collaboration.
*This position is located in Ft. Belvoir, VA and requires an active TS/SCI clearance*

The Data Scientist will:
Demonstrate the ability to frame and scale data problems to analyze, visualize, and find data solutions.
Manipulate common data formats, including comma-delimited, text files, and JSON.
Transform data and analysis into informative visualizations and interactive dashboards using open-source and commercially available tools.
Derive insights and analytic narratives from data and visualizations for effective storytelling and clear communication in response to client research questions.
Establish data science pipelines.
Develop, train, test, deploy, and sustain AI and machine learning models.
Leverage data patterns and other development methods to optimize code and reduce computational cost.
Develop front-end interfaces to facilitate usage of developed AI/ML solutions
Work in a fast-paced, solutions-oriented environment focused on client deliverables, analysis, and reporting.

Active TS/SCI clearance
Bachelor’s degree in data science, mathematics, statistics, economics, computer science, engineering, or a related business or quantitative discipline strongly preferred. Master's degree in these disciplines preferred.
Experience working with Scala, Python, Java
5-10+ years of related experience required
Advanced data science experience required
Significant experience with databases
Experience and familiarity with Agile-Scrum software development
Experience gathering and decomposing requirements
Proven record of solution development and deployment
Familiarity with web based application development
Experience with testing, use case, and user stories
Outstanding communication skills, written and verbal
Highly-organized and able to manage multiple projects simultaneously
Team-player mentality with a positive attitude
Keen attention to detail and solid analytical skills
Able to articulate complex, abstract concepts concisely and effectively
#LI-SH1

LMI is an Equal Opportunity Employer-all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",4.1,LMI,"Fort Belvoir, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,59,Nonprofit Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,VA,2668,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
860,860,Associate Data Scientist - Supply Chain,$70k-$116k,"Position Description:
POSITION PURPOSE
The Associate Data Scientist will be generating ideas for exploratory analysis to shape future projects and provide recommendations for actions, leading the development of models and techniques to deliver personalized experiences for our customers, leveraging data to perform intensive analysis across all areas of our business to drive product development. This role will ensure that the analysis results drives next iteration of changes to product functionality on desktop, mobile web and mobile app platforms. He or she will be working with cross-functional teams and present findings to senior management to drive business decisions

MAJOR TASKS, RESPONSIBILITIES AND KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES
50% - Model Preparation:Establish scalable, efficient processes for large scale data analyses, model development and model implementation
30% - Model Development and Deployment: Design and develop algorithms and models to use against large datasets to create business insights
20% - Communication and Visualization: Present analysis and resulting recommendations to senior management; Leverage data to present a compelling business case to optimize investments and operations

NATURE AND SCOPE
This position reports to the Senior Manager Data Science. This position has 0 direct reports.

ENVIRONMENTAL JOB REQUIREMENTS
Environment:
Located in a comfortable indoor area. Any unpleasant conditions would be infrequent and not objectionable.

Travel:
Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time.

ESSENTIAL SKILLS:
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS
Must be eighteen years of age or older.
Must be legally permitted to work in the United States.

Education Required:
The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a bachelor's degree program or equivalent degree in a field of study related to the job

Years of Relevant Work Experience: 2 years

Physical Requirements:
Most of the time is spent sitting in a comfortable position and there is frequent opportunity to move about. On rare occasions there may be a need to move or lift light articles

Preferred Qualifications:
Master's degree preferred
Working knowledge of analytical/statistics software (e.g., SPSS, SAS, R, Stata)
Ability to develop and apply advanced mathematical/statistical techniques
Ability to convey complex or technical ideas and processes in easy-to-understand terms to diverse audiences
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to build scalable systems that analyze huge data sets and make actionable recommendations
Strong communication and data presentation skills Ability to quickly adapt to new technologies, tools and techniques
Flexible and responsive able to perform in a fast paced, dynamic work environment and meet aggressive deadlines
Ability to work with technical and non-technical team members
Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Competencies:
Action Oriented - Taking on new opportunities and tough challenges with a sense of urgency, high energy, and enthusiasm
Collaborates - Building partnerships and working collaboratively with others to meet shared objectives
Communicates Effectively - Developing and delivering multi-mode communications that convey a clear understanding of the unique needs of different audiences
Customer Focus - Building strong customer relationships and delivering customer-centric solutions
Drives Results - Consistently achieving results, even under tough circumstances
Manages Conflict - Handling conflict situations effectively with minimal noise
Nimble Learning - Actively learning through experimentation when tackling new problems, using both successes and failures as learning fodder
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",3.7,Home Depot,"Atlanta, GA",-1,10000+ Employees,26,Subsidiary or Business Segment,other_industries,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,GA,4002,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
861,861,Data Scientist,$70k-$116k,"Located in Northern California, the Joby Aviation team has been steadily working toward our goal of providing safe, affordable, fully electric air transportation that is accessible to everyone. Imagine an air taxi that takes off vertically, then quietly and quickly carries you over the congestion below, giving you back that time you’d otherwise spend sitting in traffic. Technology has advanced to the point where designing and operating an all-electric aircraft is completely viable. Our team has been discreetly designing and flight testing this vehicle and is looking for talented individuals to see it through certification and high rate production.
Working as a Data Scientist in the Data Analytics core team you will be responsible for developing analytical tools and reporting results from numerous tests and flight operations. You should be able to work cohesively with subject matter experts, understand both data systems and physical systems, and have an eye for anomalies in physical test data. A good dose of ingenuity is required when approaching a new dataset. You will also need to work closely with your colleagues across a broad set of highly technical disciplines who depend on data. The ideal candidate is energetic, has a positive attitude, is flexible and excited about learning and using new technologies.

Wrangle data from a multitude of formats and systems (TDMS, AVRO, PostgreSQL, AWS, etc.)
Make sense of and groom data from a number of physical tests (the aircraft, simulators, reliability test equipment, subsystem tests, etc.)
Work closely with engineers to understand the test and clearly present the results
Work with the data engineering team to develop and maintain efficient data pipelines
Develop tools to make processing and reporting on data as consistent and easy as possible
Leverage statistics, numerical fitting methods, and visualization tools to draw conclusions
Develop algorithms to predict failures or the occurrence of certain events from the data

University degree in computer science, engineering, math, physics, or similar field
Expert knowledge of Python, numerical and data libraries (pandas, scipy, numpy, etc.)
Experience with data system architectures in relation to how to store, fetch, and manipulate data (SQL, custom APIs, etc.)
Familiar with Git
Experience with data visualization tools (matplotlib, seaborn, bokeh, plotly, tableau, looker, etc.)
Understanding of physical systems and an intuition on how data relates to physical phenomena
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Ability to support and work closely with a myriad of colleagues who are experts in aircraft design, systems engineering, test engineering, flight test operations, and machine learning
Comfortable navigating a quickly changing environment and willing to learn on-the-fly to obtain and define requirements

3+ years of work experience in similar roles
Experience with Apache Spark or other big data tools
Proficiency in statistical methods, A/B testing, hypothesis testing, etc.
Experience with anomaly/outlier detection in time series data
Experience with streaming architectures (Kafka, Kinesis, etc.)
Experience with Machine Learning and Deep Learning techniques and associated libraries (TensorFlow, Keras, Sklearn, PyTorch, etc.)
Experience building Python-based web applications (dash, flask, etc.)
Proficiency in other programming languages (Scala, R, SQL, Java, C, C++, etc.)
Prior participation in data science competitions (Kaggle, etc.)",3.8,Joby Aviation,"Santa Cruz, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,93.0,CA,3497,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,0
862,862,Data Scientist,$90k-$162k,"Infinia ML is seeking a Data Scientist with a desire to join a new and growing company focused on cutting-edge machine learning and deep learning technology. We provide our customers with immediate business impact through technology solutions that are tailored to their data and business needs. You will work with a dynamic team of researchers and data scientists, collaborating on new machine learning algorithms and their application to multiple fields, including natural language processing, image recognition, and business intelligence. We are looking for individuals who are excited about being exposed to new problems and challenges while working in a flexible and versatile environment.

Typical activities will include:
Developing and evaluating statistical models, machine learning algorithms, and data processing techniques
Applying deep learning techniques to large datasets through GPU-accelerated processing
Processing, characterizing, and managing business-critical data
Developing tools and libraries that support processing and analysis of datasets
Candidates must have the following characteristics:
Ability to identify and design solutions to data-driven problems, evaluate and interpret results, and determine next steps
Ability to develop and prototype solutions efficiently and accurately
Self-motivated with a strong desire to learn new technologies in a fast-moving field
Ability to collaborate and communicate effectively with researchers, developers, and customers
Preferred candidates will meet many of the following qualifications:
Advanced degree in a relevant quantitative field (statistics, computer science, applied mathematics, etc.)
3+ years experience in machine learning, data science, data engineering, and/or computational software development
2+ years development in Python, including libraries such as NumPy, SciPy, pandas, scikit-learn, matplotlib, PyTorch, NLTK
Knowledge of machine learning theory, implementation, and application
Experience with deep learning models, including CNN and Transformer architectures
Experience working with large datasets, including NoSQL and relational databases
Experience with Linux
Experience with cloud computing and Amazon EC2",4.4,Infinia ML,"Durham, NC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,3,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,NC,2204,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
863,863,Data Engineer with Top Secret,$90k-$162k,"Job Opportunity: Our team is seeking a talented Top Secret cleared Data Engineer to work in our NW Washington DC location.

This role supports DHS’s Office of Intelligence and Analysis (I&A). I&A is responsible for developing DHS-wide intelligence through managing the collection, analysis and fusion of intelligence throughout the entire Department. I&A disseminates intelligence throughout DHS, to the other members of the United States Intelligence Community, and to first responders at the state, local, and tribal level.
What You'll Get To Do as a Data Engineer: *
Create and maintain data pipelines and transformation flows in a cloud environment
Data management/mapping among multiple distinct data sources
Cloud management and server administration of domain services
Big Data infrastructure services and cross domain data transfer
You’ll Bring These Qualifications: *
Active Top Secret clearance with SCI Eligibility
BS degree in a related scientific or engineering discipline from an accredited college or university and ten (10) to fourteen (14) years of progressive experience, or an MS degree in a related scientific or engineering discipline, and eight (8) to twelve (12) years of progressive experience, or a Ph.D. degree in a related scientific or engineering discipline and four (4) to seven (7) years of progressive experience.
Familiar with ETL technologies, MapReduce, JSON/XML transformations and schemas
Familiar with AngularJS
Familiar with Apache NiFi and Java (NAR) NiFi Archives
Knowledge of Amazon Web Services (AWS Cloud)
Programming languages – Java/JEE, Javascript, Python, Groovy, Shell Script
HTTP via REST and SOAP
Datastores – HDFS, MongoDB, S3, Elastic, NoSQL, RDBMS
Build and Configuration Management Tools – Maven, Ansible, Puppet
Working knowledge with public keys and digital certificates
Linux/Unix server environments
These Qualifications Would be Nice to Have: *
Master’s level education
Familiarity with: jQuery, XPath, XQuery, Spark, Impala, Sqoop, Hive/Pig, Python, Gradle, Maven, PL/SQL, Unix Shell, C++/C, AngularJS, Spring, JSON, XML/XSLT/HTML, JPA/Hibernate, Spark, Accumulo, MapReduce, Storm/Kafka, HSpace, Pig, Servlet/JSP, LDAP
About OneGlobe: *
OneGlobe LLC was founded in 2005 to provide quality Information Technology solutions that exceed expectations. We focus on IT System Modernization using agile software development practices and DevSecOps to deliver intuitive and maintainable systems that we help our customers improve their processes and capabilities.

We provide full service IT solutions and have the skill to identify, plan and perform cost-saving steps throughout the system lifecycle to enhance system efficiency, while optimizing the value that we deliver to our customers. Our team has the drive and right mindset to feel ownership on the projects they work. They partner with our customers to give the extra effort sometimes required to deliver success.

We provide highly competitive benefits package to include: extensive medical/dental/vision, 7% of your annual salary toward 401(k), Paid Time Off (PTO), $5K annually toward ongoing education and training, and more. We also have monthly social and tech events!

See additional positions at: http://www.oneglobeit.com/#careers

OneGlobe is a proud equal opportunity employer. We are a drug free, EEO employer committed to a diverse workforce. We will consider all qualified candidates regardless of race, color, national origin, sex, age, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, gender identity, family responsibilities, disability, political affiliation or veteran status.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Professional Development Assistance
Referral Program
Retirement Plan
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
NiFi: 5 years (Preferred)
Java: 5 years (Preferred)
Hadoop: 5 years (Preferred)
Python: 5 years (Preferred)
ETL: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.oneglobeit.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,OneGlobe LLC,"Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,15,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,DC,4272,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
865,865,Data Scientist,$90k-$162k,"Bioinformatics Programmer II

17-Aug-2020

Job Code and Payroll Title
9402 Bioinformatics Programmer II

Job Summary
JOB OVERVIEW
As clinical and medical data is increasingly digitized, there is increasing opportunity to analyze this data for research purposes in a variety of ways that leverage “big data” characteristics of digital medical data.

Our clinical research effort employs novel analytic techniques, which include machine learning techniques, to identify complex patterns medical data derived from various sources - both collected through routine clinical care and expressly collected for research purposes.

Related to this goal, the Bioinformatics Programmer/Data Scientist will assist in managing, cleaning and analyzing large scale medical data using a wide variety of analytic techniques. The Data Scientist will be involved in developing software pipelines, mostly using Python, for data extraction which will need to be developed de novo to obtain data from various clinical systems or sources. Once the data is obtained, pipelines will be created to clean the data and store the data in file-systems appropriate for the size of the data at hand.

Under the supervision of the Principal Investigator (PI), the Data Scientist will also be involved in data analysis, and will be fluent in comparing a variety of techniques, including machine learning and deep learning techniques, to be able to empirically determine which approach is most suitable for the given research hypothesis and data type. This position may also include some administrative duties and will have the opportunity to participate in and lead authorship teams.

CARDIOVASCULAR RESEARCH INSTITUTE / CARDIOLOGY
The primary mission of the Cardiovascular Research Institute (CVRI), the largest organized research unit on the San Francisco campus, is to promote fundamental and clinical research on the cardiovascular and pulmonary respiratory systems and to provide opportunities for postdoctoral training in these fields.

With over 200 faculty, staff, and postdoctoral fellows, the CVRI supports faculty from a variety of departments (Medicine, Biochemistry, Biophysics, Lab Medicine, Pediatrics, Anatomy, Anesthesia, Pharmaceutical Chemistry, Physiology, Cellular and Molecular Pharmacology). The total extramural funding is $29 million annually (direct and indirect costs), with $1M in indirect cost return, and $561K in State funds. Assets include $38 million in endowment income and gifts, $3M in clinical reserves, and $5.8M in opportunity funds.

The Tison lab is also part of the Bakar Computational Health Sciences Institute and the Data Scientist will be part of the larger computational community and infrastructure.

ABOUT UCSF
The University of California, San Francisco (UCSF) is a leading university dedicated to promoting health worldwide through advanced biomedical research, graduate-level education in the life sciences and health professions, and excellence in patient care. It is the only campus in the 10-campus UC system dedicated exclusively to the health sciences.

Organization
Campus

Req Number
55681BR

Location
Mission Bay

Job Title
Data Scientist

Appointment Type
Career

Percentage
100%

Shift Length
8 Hours

Shift
Days

Work Days
Monday- Friday, 8:00 am - 5:00 pm

Required Qualifications
• Bachelor's degree in biological science, computational/programming, or related area and/or equivalent experience/training
• At least 6 months of experience in direct data management and analysis using medical and/or health-related data
• Demonstrated fluency and competency with the Python programming language, including with relevant scientific computing packages including numpy, scipy, sci-kit learn
• Experience with, or a demonstrated ability to learn and implement novel data management and machine learning-based pipelines for management of large-scale data
• Experience with, or demonstrated ability to learn and implement relevant deep learning frameworks such as TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch etc.
• Working knowledge of bioinformatics methods, data structures, statistical analysis, systems programming, and database design
• Working knowledge of databases
• Working knowledge of application and data security concepts
• Ability to lead and maintain data pipelines for real-time data acquisition from clinical systems
• Working project management skills
• Interpersonal skills in order to work with both technical and non-technical personnel at various levels in the organization
• Ability to communicate technical information in a clear and concise manner
• Ability to effectively manage time and see assigned parts of projects through to completion on deadline
• Basic consultation and communication skills
• Ability to multi-task and work well with limited supervision
• Self motivated, able to learn quickly, meet deadlines and demonstrate problem solving skills

Preferred Qualifications
• MS or greater degree in a related science or an equivalent combination of education and experience
• PhD in a field relevant to biomedical research (general biology, molecular biology, cell biology, chemistry, biomedical engineering, biomedical informatics), or computer science (computer science, machine learning, artificial intelligence) or similar
• 12 months or more of demonstrated work experience using medical and/or health-related data, or similar, including developing pipelines for obtaining data, data management and cleaning and data analysis, preferably using Python

License/Certification
n/a

Position Type
Full Time

Department Name
Cardiovascular Research Institute

Equal Employment Opportunity
The University of California San Francisco is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran or disabled status, or genetic information.",4.1,UC San Francisco,"San Francisco, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,156,College / University,-1,-1,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,CA,5959,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,0
866,866,Data Scientist,$90k-$162k,Healthcare Risk Advisors has an exciting opportunity for a Lead Data Scientist in a newly formed Data Strategy Team creating novel analytics at the intersection of insurance and healthcare The Lead Data Scientist will work closely with the claims risk managementpatient safety and IT teams in developing analytics tools to support HRAs existing clients the sales effort and the development of new products The ideal candidate should have experience with using large and disparate data sets to uncover insights build machine learning algorithms and be familiar with natural language processing techniques They must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and operating in a small multi functional team ESSENTIAL RESPONSIBILITIES Work closely with the claims risk management patient safety and insurance teams in the design and creation of analytics tool to support the businessesParticipate in meetings with healthcare clients to understand design and deliver tools to better manage risks and reduce liability exposuresEvaluate aggregate and mine all internal data assets; research the best publicly available and third party datasets to perform analyticsPerform statistical analysis and build machine learning models for deployment in a cloud environmentDevelop algorithms to extract and classify unstructured data from claims files and medical filesCreate compelling visualization tools using human centered design principles to display; present data in a meaningful and easy to understand mannerBecome a champion of data science and innovation work with business units to implement models and perform regular training for the teams Attend and speak at webinars and conferences as neededAssist in writing abstract articles publications and reports of findings from analyses as well as study design and methodology and sections for publicationsPERFORMANCE METRICS Develop machine learning algorithms for interpretation of existing and new datasetsResearch data and literature to solve risk management and patient safety problems QUALIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS EducationCertification Masters or PhD in Statistics Mathematics Computer Science or another quantitative fieldExperience Required 5 to 7 years of experience as a data scientist prior experience in the healthcare field preferredProficiency in R Python Spark SQL etcExperience creating machine learning algorithms to solve problems of classification regression forecasting and deep learning Experience with natural language processing techniques including text and sentiment analysisExperience with acquiring and organizing data in cloudExperience working with and creating data architecturesExperience with deploying and managing predictive models in a cloud environmentExperience with data science and machine learning platforms preferred H2O Databricks Alteryx etc SkillsAbilities Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts regression properties of distributions statistical tests and proper usage etcCapacity to visualizepresent data to stakeholders using Tableau Thoughtspot etcKnowledge of insurance and actuarial science preferredExcellent verbal and written communication skills; ability to speak clearly and concisely conveying complex or technical information in a manner that others can understandStrong analytical and problem solving skillsGood documentation skillsSelf starter; desire to take lead on projects and recognize when help is neededAbility to thrive in a multi functional teamHealthcare Risk Advisors Inc a subsidiary of the Doctors Company Group provides comprehensive insurance and risk management advisory services to leading academic hospitals long term care facilities and social services agencies in the metropolitan New York area,2.6,FOJP,"New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,43,Nonprofit Organization,financial_related,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,NY,3751,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,1,0,1
867,867,Data Scientist,$90k-$162k,"1. NO OPT CPT
2. Locals ONLY
3. Skill Matrix Mandatory
4. Rate Range.
5. Should have MUST HAVE SKILLS.
Â
Job Description for Data Scientist
Â
Â 8+ years of experience as a data scientist.
Â Strong skills for mining data, assessing the accuracy and insights from new data sources.
Â Work with stakeholders to understand data challenges and opportunities
Â Experience building Machine Learning models for predictive analytics, and NLP.
Â Understanding of Deep Learning models is a plus
Â Experience with SQL
Â Master in Statistics, Computer Science, or other STEM field. Ph.D. is a plus.
Â Knowledge of advanced statistics and hypothesis testing
Â Python, Pandas, Numpy, Scikit coding skills
Â Data visualization with Matplotlib, and Seaborn
Â Experience with at least one cloud data technology GCP, AWS, Azure
Â Experience with Spark, and Hadoop is a plus.
Â Effective at telling stories with data.
Â Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Â Creative drive to try data tools, and explore and discover insights from data
Â NLP experience is MUST
Â
Â
Sl.No
Skill
Years Of Experience
1
Â
Â
2
Â
Â
Â
Â
Â
Â
Â
Â
Â
Please send resumes to sgottumukkula@esharpedge.com
Â",4.7,Sharpedge Solutions Inc,"Seattle, WA",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,other_industries,Media,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,WA,1170,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
868,868,Data Scientist,$90k-$162k,"We believe a large part of building an effective insurance company can be solved with a principled quantitative framework. We are committed to the rigorous development and effective deployment of modern statistical machine learning methods to problems in the insurance industry.

One of our core data science challenges is understanding driving behavior from smartphone sensor data. Dealing with the flood of sensor data requires us to build large-scale systems that ride the big data wave rather than being submerged by it. There is no shortage of computational and statistical challenges to tackle. In addition to telematics risk-scoring, the Data Science team works on core problems in pricing model development, reserving methodology, marketing, and strategic business forecasts.

A Data Scientist at Root is responsible for the end-to-end development of statistical methods and algorithms. This includes taking high-level business challenges, translating them into a concrete, quantitative framework, and shepherding solutions from R&D into production. Data Scientists typically work on cross-functional teams, regularly engaging with the members of various departments including Product, Actuarial, Marketing, and Engineering.
Responsibilities:
Applying principled methods to quantitative insurance challenges in areas such as telematics risk scoring, pricing, reserving, and estimating customer lifetime value.
Learning the required tools to get the job done, e.g. Python, R, Spark, SQL, etc. Building data processing pipelines to quickly iterate on research ideas and put them into production.
Effectively communicating insights from complex analyses.
Taking end-to-end ownership of problem domains and continuously improving upon quantitative solutions.

Minimum Qualifications:

PhD in a quantitative discipline and/or 3+ years of applying advanced quantitative techniques to problems in industry.
Strong demonstrable knowledge of topics such as statistical inference, numerical linear algebra, machine learning, and numerical optimization.
Exceptional communicator and storyteller. Strong programming skills with experience using modern packages in R and Python.
Demonstrated experience building, validating, and applying statistical machine learning methods to real world problems.
Join us.
At Root, we judge people based on the merit of their work, not who they are. Very few (if any!) people will fit every description; so if you are passionate about what this role entails, and are excited by solving real problems, we encourage you to apply; we want to learn about you, and what you can add to our team!

Who we are.
Root Insurance is the nation’s first licensed insurance carrier powered entirely by mobile. We were founded on the belief that the services you need for everyday life should serve you better. That’s why we base insurance coverages on you, not your demographic. It’s the way insurance should be. And it’s all conveniently in an app.

What draws people to Root.

We’re a venture-backed technology company. Our early success is in large part due to our unwavering standards in hiring. We recognize that our product is only as good as the people building and promoting it. We look for individuals who find solutions by going through the cycle of ideation to implementation with curiosity, rigor, and a highly analytical lens. Ask anyone who works here and you’ll hear similar reasons for why they joined:
Autonomy. For assertive self-starters, the opportunities to contribute are limitless.
Impact. By challenging the way it’s always been done, we solve problems that have a big impact on our business.
Collaboration. We encourage rich discussion and civil debate at every turn.
People. We are inspired by the collection of crazy-smart people around us",3.9,Root Insurance,"Columbus, OH",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,5,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,OH,3781,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,1,0,0
869,869,Autonomous Driving Data Engineer,$90k-$162k,"Leading the future of luxury mobility

Lucid’s mission is to inspire the adoption of sustainable energy by creating the most captivating luxury electric vehicles, centered around the human experience. Working at Lucid Motors means having a shared vision to power the future in revolutionary ways. Be part of a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity to transform the automotive industry.

We are currently seeking an experienced Big Data Engineer to help building up our large-scale data management system for the ADAS / Autonomous Driving team. This field allows contributions on various levels around the data pipeline and data processing, data annotation, machine learning, data ingestion, data pre-processing, integration of Deep Neural Network frameworks, efficient data search and high performance data manipulation.
You Will:
Work with a state-of-the-art data pipeline on the development and test process of the ADAS/AD features
Enable efficient data (pre-)processing in our cloud infrastructure
Contribute to the architecture and implementation of an efficient data ingestion process to transfer and store large-scale vehicle sensor data from our Lucid Air test vehicles efficiently into our data storage
Help to optimize the data storage, search and data processing based on a diverse mix of storage solutions, caching techniques and big data frameworks.
Contribute to the implementation of a secure distributed data access solution for data on-premise and via cloud providers to connect Lucid data with service providers and partners
Work with machine learning experts, testing engineers and software developers to solve challenging development problems
You Bring:
Knowledge of database systems, big data concepts and cluster computing frameworks (e.g. Spark, Hadoop, or other tools)
Excellence in C++, Python, Java or other related programming languages
Previous experience with big data applications or back-end software development
Experience with machine learning, data engineering, deep learning frameworks and related open-loop testing techniques
Strong communication skills
Great to Have:
Previous experience building efficient large-scale data collection, storage and processing pipelines
Understanding of cyber-security issues and best practices
Advanced degrees preferred
Education:
BS minimum in the areas of Computer Science/Engineering, Data Engineering or other related fields
4+ years of work experience or a PhD in a related field
LMHP

Be part of something amazing

Come work alongside some of the most accomplished minds in the industry. Beyond providing competitive salaries, we’re providing a community for innovators who want to make an immediate and significant impact. If you are driven to create a better, more sustainable future, then this is the right place for you.

At Lucid, we don’t just welcome diversity - we celebrate it! Lucid Motors is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, national or ethnic origin, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity and expression, marital status, and any other characteristic protected under applicable State or Federal laws and regulations.

To all recruitment agencies: Lucid Motors does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our careers alias or other Lucid Motors employees. Lucid Motors is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",3.8,Lucid Motors,"Newark, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,13,Company - Private,manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,CA,3490,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,1,0,0
870,870,Data Scientist,$90k-$162k,"Who we are

Drizly is the world’s largest alcohol marketplace and the best way to shop beer, wine and spirits. Our customers trust us to be part of their lives – their celebrations, parties, dinners and quiet nights at home. We are there when it matters - committed to life’s moments and the people who create them. We partner with the best retail stores in over 1200 cities across North America to serve up the best buying experience. Drizly offers a huge selection and competitive pricing with a side of personalized content. That is what we do. Who we are is a different story.

We are more than just another tech company. There is an intellectual curiosity that occurs at Drizly. We have a desire to question, to understand, to figure it out. Bottom line, we solve it. We value not just the truth but the process to get to the truth, to deliberate, decide and then act. Most importantly, we care. We care about our customer. We care about our company. We care about our team. There will be long days and incredible challenges.

We are blazing a trail in an industry that hasn’t changed in nearly a century, and that doesn’t scare us (well, not all the time) -and even when it does, it doesn’t stop us, it energizes us.

Do you see yourself here? Read on.

Who you are

You are currently at the intersection of data science and retention marketing analytics, and you want to dive even deeper into both worlds. You have the operational ability to improve Drizly’s current marketing automations, CRM workflow inefficiencies, consumer segmentation processes, and champion our product vision to build Drizly’s roadmap of personalization. You have the empathy to understand our business from the eyes of a consumer, and you have the results driven mindset to drive improvements to Drizly’s experience that move the bottom line. You have a technical toolset which includes complex SQL, Python, scikit, Git, visualization tools, etc).

You love working with teams including Data Engineering and Business Intelligence to transform raw data into highly actionable business insights through Looker, as well as partnering with retention marketing and product teams to turn those insights into action. You also know how to work the other direction - how to implement and manage retention initiatives to ensure that data collection is seamless and comprehensive. You have a proven track record designing, implementing, and measuring solutions in the analytics space.

If you're coming from a consumer-facing ecommerce marketplace, that’s great! We deal with massive amounts of messy and eventstream data from a variety of internal and external sources.

If you have also delivered event streaming solutions, even better! You will feel right at home if you have deployed and maintained production data science models, set up data pipelines with schema validation and testing, or worked on problems involving customer segmentation, uplift modeling, recommendations, and attribution.

What the role is

We are looking for someone to build the future of customer personalization at Drizly. This person will support and optimize existing marketing automations, and partner with product and marketing to drive meaningful personalization. They will create touchpoints that differentiate the Drizly shopping experience across web, mobile web + app, email, push, and more.

The Data Scientist is a critical member of the Analytics organization, and will work closely with Data Engineering and BI, as well as the cross-functional Retention Growth team. They will certainly be responsible for supporting individual campaigns and product solutions, but also for the larger vision of how a data architecture, codebase, and best practices for consumer retention should grow with Drizly over time. Ultimately, this person will determine the ground truth, roadmap, and reporting lens through which Drizly will be enabled to deliver memorable and relevant experiences for our customers.
In this role you will:
Partner with product and marketing to drive personalization at scale across the product and notification layer, across Drizly’s consumer apps, websites, email, push, and more
Develop and execute retention growth process improvements through a complete lifecycle of experimental design, testing, measurement, and implementation
Drive the analytics roadmap on activation, engagement, and churn; including survival analysis, consumer tiering, consumer pathing, rewards, and onboarding efficacy
Maintain and improve the data infrastructure, documentation, codebase, internal processes, and standards of the Analytics Team
Integrate consumer and operational data sets from multiple internal and external sources

The Other Stuff:

Competitive salary
One-on-one professional coaching with an external expert
Health, Dental and Vision Insurance
Flexible vacation policy
401(K) Plan
Added perks
You do you.

Drizly is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status

BEFORE YOU APPLY...

We ask that you please remove all identifying information from your resume before you upload it on the next page in an effort to help us remove unconscious bias from our resume review process. Drizly is committed to cultivating an inclusive environment where a diverse group of people can and want to do their best work, and that starts with our hiring practices.
Identifying information includes your name, photos, LinkedIn URL, email address and more.",4.8,Drizly,"Denver, CO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,8,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,CO,5628,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
871,871,Data Scientist,$90k-$162k,"Tracking Code

4540

Job Description

Latham & Watkins, a global law firm consistently ranked among the top firms in the world, is currently seeking a Data Scientist to join our winning team, located in our Global Services Office in downtown Los Angeles. The success of our firm is largely determined by our commitment to hire and develop the very best and brightest, creating a team that provides our clients with the highest quality of work and service. We are driven by our core values: respect, innovation and collaboration.

As the global outbreak of COVID-19 continues to unfold, Latham has taken precautions to help protect our people, clients, and the communities where we live and work. This includes a shift to remote working for the majority of our lawyers and staff. The Data Scientist will likely start remotely while the firm continues to evaluate the situation.

The Data Scientist will receive a generous total compensation package. Bonuses are awarded in recognition of individual and firm performance. Eligible employees can participate in Latham's comprehensive benefit program including healthcare, life and disability insurance, flexible spending accounts, a 401k plan, and more! In addition, employees receive 10 paid holidays per year, and a PTO program that accrues 23 days during the first year of employment and grows with tenure.

As a Data Scientist at Latham, you will support the development of data science capabilities from within the firm’s Advisory services function. You will be responsible for manipulating, cleaning and analyzing datasets over multiple domains as well as applying machine learning techniques to provide actionable insights. Prior business consulting experience and knowledge of one or more programming languages is a plus. You must be comfortable with ambiguity and must be able to converse with stakeholders to understand data and business problems while accomplishing these and other critical functions:

Working with stakeholders throughout the organization to understand their data and develop data science solutions to help turn data into information and ultimately drive actions.
Assessing the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
Providing leadership to the development of best practices for teams working on analytics and data science problems throughout the firm.
Consulting with customers on operational processes and business strategy to understand data nuances and applications.
Applying knowledge of statistics, machine learning, programming, data modeling, simulation, and advanced mathematics to recognize patterns, identify opportunities, pose business questions, and making valuable discoveries from given data sets.
As a Data Scientist, you will be expected to apply your organizational and communication skills while displaying a positive, high-energy attitude. The successful Data Scientist must have advanced data visualization skills using tools such as Tableau, must be strong in SQL, data mapping, and data profiling, and must have experience with statistical computer languages (R, Python, Matlab, etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets. The ideal candidate must have the ability to comprehend and accurately perform advanced data analysis and communicate data findings to senior management, and knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks. Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications, as well as experience with in-Memory DBMS is a plus. The candidate must have experience with NoSQL technologies such as Hadoop, Cassandra, Apache Storm, MongoDB and Basho.

A minimum of six (6) years of experience in a Data Analyst or Data Science role is required. A bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Math, Economics or a related field is preferred. A master’s degree in Data Science or related field is a plus.

Qualified candidates are encouraged to apply by clicking the ‘Apply Now’ link.

Latham & Watkins is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Our commitment to diversity, equal opportunity and sustainability enables Latham & Watkins to draw from a remarkable wealth of talent to create one of the world's leading law firms.

Latham & Watkins LLP will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the City of Los Angeles Fair Chance Ordinance.

For information regarding family care and medical leave (CFRA), click here.

Job Location

Los Angeles, California, United States

Department

Audit & Advisory

Position Type

Full-Time/Regular",3.9,Latham & Watkins,"Los Angeles, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,48,Company - Private,other_industries,Accounting & Legal,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,CA,4781,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
872,872,Data Scientist,$90k-$162k,"Data Scientist

Downtown Seattle

OUR COMPANY

red violet (NASDAQ: RDVT) is a software and services company specializing in big data analysis, providing cloud-based, mission critical analytics and information solutions to enterprises in a variety of industries. We believe that time is your most valuable asset. Through powerful analytics, we transform data into intelligence, in a fast and efficient manner, so that our clients can spend their time on what matters most running their organizations with confidence. Our corporate headquarters is located in Boca Raton, Florida and our brands include IDI and FOREWARN, www.redviolet.com.

JOB SUMMARY

Were looking for a Data Scientist to join our Seattle team. Youll use your programming, mathematics and analytics experience to write scalable, production facing code and develop creative solutions to challenging problems. Together well be working in highly distributed, Linux-based environments that leverage our proprietary search and computing platform.

red violet (NASDAQ: RDVT) is the team behind idiCORE, the next generation of highly-distributed data fusion and search technologies. Our proprietary technology uncovers the relevance of disparate data sets to bring out comprehensive insights into people, businesses, assets, and their interrelationships.

As a Data Scientist at red violet, youll:
Design, develop, and maintain complex data fusion and entity resolution algorithms sitting at the core of our risk management offerings.
Create novel search capabilities that leverage inverted indices, Bayesian inference and higher order clustering techniques.
Develop ETL systems and data pipelines to interface new data assets with our proprietary distributed data processing platform
Work closely with our engineers to integrate your innovations into our production systems.
Support business decisions with ad hoc analysis as needed.
Our ideal Data Scientist will have:
Degree in Computer Science, Machine Learning, Math, Statistics, Physics, or related field.
Strong background in C++ or another compiled, strongly typed, object oriented language.
Experience working with large data sets for data mining, analytics, modeling.
Experience with Bash scripting in a Linux environment.
BONUS POINTS: experience with geospatial analytics and the ability to beat us at table tennis or pool

red violets idiDATA (ididata.com) data fusion and search technology is being used by Financial Services, Big Corporate, Government, and Law Enforcement to solve complex, real-world problems. Our platform solves important problems like identity validation and fraud detection and prevention and is very likely under the hood of your favorite apps. Were a small but highly successful and publicly-traded company backed by an elite team, including the preeminent experts in data fusion. Red Violet has the flexibility of a small team with the opportunities offered by an established company.

At red violet, youll work with great people at a modern downtown Seattle location with stunning waterfront views. We offer highly competitive benefits include leading compensation with a generous RSU package, health, dental, vision, 401k match, onsite bike parking, lockers, and a fitness center. We strive to foster an innovative, creative, and challenging work environment that encourages employee growth and promotes from within.

red violet is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.",5.0,Red Violet Inc.,"Seattle, WA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,WA,3425,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
874,874,Data Scientist,$90k-$162k,"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started.In this role, your primary responsibility will be to partner with key stakeholders and lead the development of an analytics program to support and enable the continued growth critical to Facebook's Data Center organization. You will be responsible for creating end to end analytics programs, from data sourcing to surfacing insights and driving action, for various aspects of Facebook's global data center operations. You will also help translate data and identify efficiency opportunities. You will be expected to use data to provide meaningful recommendations and actionable strategies to key stakeholders, and develop best practices, including streamlining of data sources and related programmatic initiatives.
The ideal candidate will have a passion for working in white space and creating impact from the ground up in a fast-paced environment. Additionally, you will have a proven track record of thought leadership and impact in developing similar analytics and metrics-based programs. This position is part of the Infrastructure Data Center team and located in Menlo Park, CA.

Responsibilities:

Leverage data and business principles to create and drive large scale FB Data Center programs
Define and develop the program for metrics creation, data collection, modeling, and reporting the operational performance of Facebooks data centers
Work cross-functionally to define problem statements, collect data, build analytical models and make recommendations
Be a self-starter, motivated by a passion for developing the best possible solutions to problems
Identify and implement streamlined processes for data reporting and communication
Use analytical models to identify insights that are used to drive key decisions across the organization
Routinely communicate metrics, trends and other key indicators to leadership
Provide leadership and mentorship to other members of the team
Lead and support various ad hoc projects, as needed, in support of Facebooks Data Center strategy
Build and maintain data driven optimization models, experiments, forecasting algorithms and capacity constraint models
Leverage tools like R, Tableau, PHP, Python, Hadoop & SQL to drive efficient analytics
Mininum Qualifications:

Degree in an analytical field (e.g. Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Operations Research, Management Science)
3+ years of experience in a role with data analysis and metrics development
3+ years of hands-on experience analyzing and interpreting data, drawing conclusions, defining recommended actions, and reporting results across stakeholders
3+ years of SQL development experience writing queries
3+ years of hands-on project management experience
3+ years of experience with data visualization tools
3+ years of experience with packages such as R, Tableau, SPSS, SAS, STATA, etc.
2+ years of experience with scripting in Python or PHP
Experience leveraging data driven models to drive business decisions
Experience using data access tools and building visualizations using large datasets and multiple data sources
Experience thinking analytically
Experience communicating data to all organizational levels
Experienced with packages such as NumPy, SciPy, pandas, scikit-learn, dplyr, ggplot2
Knowledge of statistics and optimization techniques
Hands-on experience with medium to large datasets (i.e. data extraction, cleaning, analysis and presentation)
Preferred Qualifications:

Technical knowledge of data center operations
Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.

Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,Facebook,"Fremont, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,16,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,CA,4990,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
876,876,Data Scientist,$90k-$162k,"RAPP Dallas is looking for a Data Scientist

to join our award-winning Marketing Sciences team.


ABOUT RAPP

Our purpose

We are the agency absolutely, utterly, fiercely focused on the individual. We use our data, technology and creative smarts to make meaningful connections with every single person a brand knows.

Our family

We are part of the Omnicom Precision Marketing Group (OPMG), which is in turn a part of Omnicom. This group also includes Critical Mass, Targetbase, Proximity, Credera, and sparks & honey and other well-known agencies.

Our home

We are 5 minutes from DFW Airport and a quick Uber to one of the fastest growing metro areas in Texas. 7850 N Beltline Rd. Irving.

Our clients

Like a broad mix of resume-building categories to apply your talents to? Then, you'll like how we roll with great brands like Toyota, AAA, Xoom, University of Phoenix, and more.

ABOUT YOU

You have 1-3 years of experience in a data science, data engineering, software engineering and/or statistics, and a bachelor's degree is required. You should also have strong proficiency in Python, some SQL experience, and ideally familiarity with the AWS stack (Sagemaker, S3, EC2, Redshift, Glue, Athena).

You should have experience with unstructured data and APIs, expertise in machine language/machine learning, and experience analyzing large and small internal and external datasets to extract actionable insights and know how to develop statistical models to drive targeting, messaging and strategic decision-making.

Ideally, you have some experience with disparate data sets (customer database, marketing behavior, social data, qualitative research data, macro-economic data, etc.) to expose brand realities, market opportunities, and potential marketing strategies.

In your career, you have provided actionable insights, algorithms and computational solutions to real-world marketing challenges through the application of technology-based mathematical methods. Working with automotive & financial services clients is a plus.

What else? Maybe you're a movie aficionado. Or maybe you have an impressively large vinyl collection? We'd love to know what makes you, you.",3.1,RAPP,"Dallas, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,55,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,TX,2172,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
877,877,Data Scientist,$90k-$162k,"As a Data Scientist at PPG you have
the exciting opportunity to leverage scientific knowledge and translate it to
digital solutions in the areas of product development, service, and
manufacturing. We are implementing a digital infrastructure and expanding our
digital capabilities for the Science and Technology function to drive growth
and improve productivity for the company. We are seeking a creative and
self-driven Data Scientist to join our team!

Key
Responsibilities:

This individual will be a member of
our Digital Initiatives Platform contributing to specific business projects.
You will utilize machine learning, computer vision, sophisticated statistical
analysis, data mining, and data visualization methods to drive product and
service development. He/she will also have responsibilities to make
recommendations on the data and provide insights into seeking rapid solutions
through agile teams / sprints. This individual will have the unique opportunity
to create innovative product and service developments that lie at the intersection
of both digital and physical sciences.

Principle
Accountabilities:
Producing meaningful and actionable results quickly
with teams
Devising and applying models and algorithms to mine the
stores of data
Analyzing the data to discover solutions and opportunities
Data visualization and communication
Application of advanced statistics on scientific
problems
Machine learning and computer vision implementation
expertise
Participate in the development of intellectual property
in the areas of applied machine learning, computer vision and advanced
statistics
Collaborate closely with top-tier research universities
in the US to help bring cutting-edge results out of the lab and into the
market
Work with global software development teams in various
countries such as Poland, Mexico and Malaysia to help translate innovative
research ideas into products and services with business impact
Staying current in the field of machine learning,
computer vision and building an external network
Requirements:
MS in Data Science, Predictive Analytics, Machine Learning or applicable technical field of study. PhD preferred.
BS in chemistry, physics, computer science, engineering, or equivalent
Proficiency in machine learning, with experience in unstructured/cognitive learning algorithms such as:
Text mining / natural language processing
Multivariate data analysis and clustering based models
Use of Neural Networks in scientific fields including deep learning techniques
Image processing & analysis
Preferred Qualifications:
> 2 years’ experience with Python, Matlab, R and/or other statistical programming languages applying the appropriate statistical procedures to problems
> 2 years’ experience in with state-of-the-art deep learning frameworks such as TensorFlow, PyTorch, Keras or comparable technologies
Practical experience with unsupervised machine learning methods such as k-means or PCA. Experience with unsupervised deep learning methods including GANs is a strong plus.
Experience with data storytelling and visualization technologies
Experience building multiple regression models; for multiple responses
Experience working with both structured and distributed data technologies ranging from SQL to Hadoop, Hive and Spark.
Experience in delivering results at the intersection of machine learning computer vision, engineering and material sciences
Prime Success Factors:
Manage complexity, focus on results, promote teamwork, build trust and respect, understand market & customer perspective
Individual Success Factors:
Demonstrate openness and flexibility, plan and organize, and act with a long-term perspective
Ambitious, self-starting, persistent and focused on results
Personal commitment to quality and on-schedule delivery
Strong ability to influence and gain buy-in
Open minded, innovative and curious
Organized, process and detail-oriented
Able to communicate complex ideas and concepts to the necessary and appropriate varying levels of the organization, including directors or executives
PPG: WE PROTECT AND BEAUTIFY THE WORLD™

Through leadership in innovation, sustainability and color, PPG helps customers in industrial, transportation, consumer products, and construction markets and aftermarkets to enhance more surfaces in more ways than does any other company. To learn more, visit www.ppg.com and follow @ PPG on Twitter.

The PPG Way
Every single day at PPG:
We partner with customers to create mutual value.

We are insightful, dedicated and proactive. We have intimate knowledge of the market and our customers. We focus on practical solutions that make a difference.

We are “One PPG” to the world.

We are better and stronger together. We leverage our scale to reach new markets and introduce innovative technologies as we differentiate and disrupt our markets.

We trust our people every day, in every way.

We enable and empower our people to make the right decisions. We are inclusive, transparent and respectful. Our feedback is clear and actionable.
We make it happen.

We have a passion for winning. We achieve. We deliver with discipline and integrity. We bring our best energy to our work. We decide and act intelligently and quickly.
We run it like we own it.

We respect one another by being responsible and accountable. We always act in the best interest of our company, customers, shareholders and our communities.
We do better today than yesterday – everyday.

We continuously learn. We develop our people to grow our businesses.

PPG Way: (Click here to learn more about the PPG Way)
PPG vision: http://corporate.ppg.com/Our-Company/PPG-Vision.aspx

We are One PPG: http://one.ppg.com/

PPG provides equal opportunity to all candidates and employees. We offer an opportunity to grow and develop your career in an environment that provides a fulfilling workplace for employees, creates an environment for continuous learning, and embraces the ideas and diversity of others. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, pregnancy, race, color, creed, religion, national origin, age, disability status, marital status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression. If you need assistance to complete your application due to a disability, please email recruiting@ppg.com.

PPG values your feedback on our recruiting process. We encourage you to visit Glassdoor.com and provide feedback on the process, so that we can do better today than yesterday.

Benefits will be discussed with you by your recruiter during the hiring process.
To read more about Equal Employment Opportunity please see attached links:

Pay Transparency poster: https://www.dol.gov/sites/dolgov/files/ofccp/pdf/pay-transp_ English_formattedESQA508c.pdf

EEO is the Law: https://www.eeoc.gov/sites/default/files/migrated_files/employers/eeoc_self_print_poster.pdf

EEO is the Law Supplement: http://www.eeoc.gov/sites/default/files/migrated_files/employers/eeoc_gina_supplement.pdf",3.1,PPG,"Allegheny, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,137,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,PA,7008,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,1,0,0
879,879,Data Scientist,$90k-$162k,"Develops, analyzes and models operational, economic, management, accounting and other organizational data to quantify the competitive performance of business segments, evaluate potential operational changes, and design new approaches and methodologies
Analyzes organizational data to recommend solutions to new and complex problems, develops innovative strategies, quantifies the competitive performance of the organization's operations and/or markets; models and evaluates the potential impact of changes
Applies and integrates statistical, mathematical, predictive modeling and business analysis skills to manage and manipulate complex high volume data from a variety of sources
General Profile:
Works independently Requires in-depth knowledge and experience
Solves complex problems
Contributes to process improvements
Uses best practices and knowledge of internal or external business issues to improve products or services
Acts as a resource for colleagues with less experience
We are an equal opportunity employer: qualified applicants are considered for and treated during employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, sex, national origin, citizenship status, disability status, protected veteran status, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law. If a qualified individual with a disability or disabled veteran needs a reasonable accommodation to use or access our online system, that individual should please contact 1.877.734.1938 or accommodations@relx.com.

Please read our Candidate Privacy Policy",3.6,LexisNexis Risk Solutions,"Alpharetta, GA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,20,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,GA,1605,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
880,880,Data Scientist,$90k-$162k,"ConsumerTrack™ is unique in the digital marketing and media industry - we combine marketing, digital, content and fintech. Our performance based approach increases brand awareness and generates targeted audience engagement on our internal web properties and partner sites.

Learn More About What We

We are looking for a candidate to help vastly expand the Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning capabilities of our platforms. In this role, you should be highly analytical with a knack for analysis, math and statistics. Critical thinking and problem-solving skills are essential for interpreting data. We also want to see a passion for machine-learning and research. Your goal will be to help our company analyze trends to make better decisions.

Responsibilities:
Analyze large amounts of data and information with statistical rigor to discover optimization opportunities.
Ensure accurate interpretation by combining business acumen with detailed data knowledge and statistical expertise.
Develop causal inference methodology to analyze behavior in cases where A/B testing may not be possible.
Build statistical models that better leverage test results to uncover insights or effect changes in the product.
Translate analytical insights into concrete, actionable recommendations for business or product improvement, and communicate your research and insights to all levels of the company, clearly and concisely.
Work closely with data engineers to identify data sources preprocess both structured and unstructured data
Build predictive models and machine-learning algorithms for digital ad conversion, pacing, and yield
Work with Software and Data engineers to layout a plan for incorporating ML Models recommendations at realtime
Propose solutions and strategies to business challenges
Requirements
Hands-on experience of statistical modeling from conceptualization, methodology creation, deployment and validation and ultimately delivering final insightful recommendations.
Robust mathematical skill, with strong working knowledge in some and the ability quickly to be competent in the rest of the gamut of modeling techniques and associated tooling, for examples:
Established statistical methods for data reduction (e.g., factor analysis, PCA) and for predictions (e.g., regression, classification);
Established machine learning methods for feature extraction (e.g., neural nets), for data reduction (e.g., clustering) and for prediction (e.g., decision trees, graph/network analysis);
Excellent understanding of machine learning algorithms, such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Random Forests, ensembles, etc.
Experience with common data science toolkits, such as sklearn, tensor-flow, keras, gensim, etc and NLP toolkits such as nltk, spacy, etc
Experience with data visualisation tools such as D3.js, plotly / seaborn / matplotlib / tensor-board, Tableau, etc
Proficiency in working with both NoSQL and relational databases such as DynamoDB, Elasticsearch, etc
Expert proficiency with statistical modeling tools like SAS, R, Python, etc.
Good scripting and programming skills using Python, bash, etc
Strong communication and interpersonal skills (both written and verbal)
Master’s or advanced degree with 3+ years experience in CS, Statistics, Machine Learning, Applied Mathematics or a related field, PhD a plus.
Benefits
Competitive salary with excellent growth opportunity; we pride ourselves in having a team that exudes leadership, high initiative, creativity, and passion.
Awesome medical, dental and vision plans with heavy employer contribution.
Paid vacation, holidays, and sick days
Flexible time/work from home (for eligible employees)
Company funding for outside classes and conferences to help you improve your skills.
Contribution to Student Loan Debt after the first year of employment.
401(k) -- employees can start contributing immediately. After the first year, CTI contributes 100% of the first 4% contributed of salary deferrals
We are an equal-opportunity employer, and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for
employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",3.3,ConsumerTrack,Colorado,-1,51 to 200 Employees,16,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,CO,4220,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
883,883,Data Scientist - DAB,$90k-$162k,"By clicking the Apply button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takedas Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description


Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

For the Takeda global scientific community who aspire to deliver transformative medicines to patients Scientific Informatics is the technology leader, with domain specific expertise, that provides innovative platforms and technologies to improve both operational efficiency and data-driven decision making. As an embedded partner Scientific Informatics is at the leading edge of both science and technology and proactively reacts to the changing scientific environment and needs of researchers in an agile fashion to deliver timely, value-adding solutions.

The Digital Advisory Board programs aim to ensure our growing data is easily accessible to everyone so we can help our patients and HCPs faster and more effectively.

Real World Evidence

Real World Evidence - Increase the use of real-world data across the Takeda value chain to accelerate our clinical trials and demonstrate patient outcomes.

We believe patients should receive the best support, anywhere, anytime, as they need it. We will do this by providing digital solutions that put patients at the heart of their care by integrating and personalizing the support they receive.

We will explore partnering externally and internally to provide fit-for-purpose solutions that help patients and care teams from diagnosis through treatment and beyond. We will leverage the power of data and technology to gain insights into diseases, treatments or lifestyle to improve the quality of care and make it as unique to each patient as possible.

OBJECTIVES/PURPOSE
Independently perform complex analysis using modern Data Science techniques against structured or unstructured data and report results back to generate insights to Takeda.
Apply machine learning, deep learning and other advanced techniques while performing Data Analysis engagements. This is against structured and un-structured data sets, at small and large scale.
Provide mentorship to other Data Engineers, Data Scientists and Data Specialists across R&D and Vaccine at Takeda as we elevate our data IQ across the organization. This will include coordination of Internal and External collaborations.
Deliver critical analysis against Takedas toughest data problems to give us critical insight to the organizations largest questions.
ACCOUNTABILITIES
Perform machine learning, deep learning and other advanced data techniques at a level of quality that can be defended by peers at a PHD level across the organizations.
Introduce novel and state-of-the-art computational techniques to other teams and scientists to improve capabilities for data analysis with the purpose of deriving high accuracy insight from available datasets more efficiently.
Understanding and usage of different Supervised and Unsupervised learning techniques, their biases, how and when to apply them and which methods are the best for a particular analysis.
Ability to wrangle raw data sets into a format that can have advanced methods applied against the resulting data.
Work independently on tough problems with other team members and independently solve, with some guidance, very difficult technology and data problems.
Demonstrates advanced tooling and techniques to other technical organizations throughout the company
CORE ELEMENTS RELATED TO THIS ROLE
Provide leadership and expertise to best construct data and execute analysis for feature detection, retrospective and predictive modelling, within a complex R&D and Vaccines environment.
Understanding of Machine Learning, Deep Learning, Re-enforcement learning and other techniques to be able to use and teach these methods inside the organization.
Ability to stay up to speed on modern data techniques, understand how to apply them and constantly demonstrated how and where to apply these new methods.
Ability to produce analysis for and defend results to PhD and executive level audience across the organizations
Design, Execute, QC and Deliver Data Science Analysis independently and effectively across the organization
EDUCATION, BEHAVIOURAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS
Masters Degree or PhD in Computer Science, Data Science or equivalent
3+ years experience or a PhD and relevant project / coursework
Expertise with the Application of Machine Learning and / or Deep Learning
Up-to-date specialized knowledge of data wrangling, manipulation and management of technologies
Experience with Spark
Ability to manipulate voluminous data with different degree of structuring across disparate sources to build and communicate actionable insights for internal or external parties
Possesses strong personal skills to portray information
Ability to work in an agile and rapid changing environment with high quality deliverables
Experience with two of the following languages: Python, R, Java or Scala
Experience with deep learning frameworks: TensorFlow, MX Net
Working knowledge of SQL and NoSQL datastores
Experience in a scientific environment
Locations


Cambridge, MA

Worker Type


Employee

Worker Sub-Type


Regular

Time Type


Full time",3.7,Takeda,"Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,239,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,MA,5966,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,1,0,1
884,884,Data Scientist,$90k-$162k,"Company Description

null
Job Description

Job description:

We are looking for a highly motivated Data Scientist to join our team. Our team leverages statistical, machine learning and deep learning models to analyze complex agronomic, genetic, environmental, and facility data to provide data and analytics driven solutions to various decisions for seed production and facility process/operation optimization. The successful candidate will use advanced knowledge and skills in statistics and machine learning to build predictive models, build data pipelines, and automate analytics workflows.

Required Skills:
Ph.D. (or MS with 4+ years of post MS experience) in Statistics, Mathematics, or closely related field
2 years of experience in using statistical or machine learning methodologies to solve research problems
Proficiency in R and/or Python or in another high-level programming language
Experience in developing statistical, and machine learning models
Experience analyzing and presenting complex data and proven problem-solving abilities
Strong publication record in leading scientific journals
Strong organizational, interpersonal, and written communication skills
Desired Skills:
Experience working with time-series data and forecasting is highly desired
Experience with building data and analytics pipeline and automation is highly desired
Drive for translating business problems into research initiatives that deliver business value
Creativity in defining challenging exploratory projects
Notes:
This position is on W2, not on C2C.
So if you are not comfortable to work on W2, then do not apply for this position.
Thanks and regards.

Qualifications

Required Skills:
Ph.D. (or MS with 4+ years of post MS experience) in Statistics, Mathematics, or closely related field.
2 years of experience in using statistical or machine learning methodologies to solve research problems.
This position is on W2, not on C2C.

Additional Information

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.",3.7,Infotree Service Inc,"Saint Louis, MO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,16,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,MO,2027,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
885,885,Data Scientist,$90k-$162k,"To continue our solid growth, we are seeking a talented and highly motivated Data Scientist to join our growing organization. The role will provide data curation and analysis support for novel biomarker immunoassay development programs, diagnostic test development and validation, and will be responsible for developing and/or maintaining analysis tools and databases. The successful candidate will possess proficient analytical capability, solid scientific background in mathematics/statistics, and strong communication skills. We are looking for team oriented, hands on experts with a passion for personalized medicine and precision health.

Key Responsibilities:
Perform statistical analysis and develop analytical tools for clinical and laboratory research data.
Statistical consulting in experiment design and data interpretation in technology development and biomarker discovery.
Statistical support for design and development of quality control process for immunoassay
Manipulate and process large multisource and/or multovariate data sets.
Respond to and manage requests to ensure accurate, in-depth results/data are delivered in a timely manner.
Author statistical analysis plans, protocols and reports for clinical and non-clinical evaluations.
Review study reports for statistical content.
Provide general informatics support for laboratory research, technology development and clinical studies.
Adhere to data and documentation standards and manage deliverables for area of responsibility.
Requirements:
D. in Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering or a related field, or Masters degree with extensive directly applicable job experience.
Ability to understand scientific questions and formulate statistical and data analysis methods.
Ability to effectively visualize complex datasets.
Familiar with statistical techniques for biomarker / diagnostic assay data
Experience in developing databases and data-driven applications.
Familiarity with validation of immunoassays / ligand-binding assays and FDA data reporting requirements.
Proficient verbal and written communication skills to clearly explain complex technical details.
Strong proficiency with statistical and data visualization tools e.g. Prism, JMP, Minitab, Excel, SPSS
Proficiency with R, MATLAB, Python, SQL, and/or Linux beneficial.
Commitment to the successful achievement of team and organizational goals.
Quanterix is a company that's digitizing biomarker analysis with the goal of advancing the science of precision health. The company's digital health solution, Simoa, has the potential to change the way in which healthcare is provided today by giving researchers the ability to closely examine the continuum from health to disease. Quanterix' technology is designed to enable much earlier disease detection, better prognoses and enhanced treatment methods to improve the quality of life and longevity of the population for generations to come. The technology is currently being used for research applications in several therapeutic areas, including oncology, neurology, cardiology, inflammation and infectious disease. The company was established in 2007 and is located in Billerica, Massachusetts. For additional Information, please visit https://www.quanterix.com.

Quanterix is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Quanterix is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. Quanterix will make reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with known disabilities, in accordance with applicable law.",3.2,Quanterix,"Billerica, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,13,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,MA,3677,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
889,889,Data Scientist,$90k-$162k,"Position Description

Sprezzatura seeks a Data Scientist to join our expanding team. The incumbent will broaden the base of knowledge through discovery, analyze data, and visualize and communicate information derived from data to a broad range of stakeholders. It is preferred that the Data Scientist should have a focus in the area of Educational Institutional Research.

Roles/Responsibilities:
Uses database query tools, statistical and analytical software, and data discovery tools to extract, manipulate, and analyze data for trends
Collaborates with various internal stakeholders (e.g., directors, faculty, and administrators) to understand their information needs
Develops dashboards and other visualizations to illustrate measures and associations
Reviews gaps in data; researches and recommends the adaptation of relevant datasets, research methods, and/or software tools to better perform data analytics and deliver results
Maintains proficiency and continuously develops expertise in new developments in the data mining domain including methods, tools, and software
Identifies and integrates external data sets with internal data elements for analysis to understand underlying patterns and trends
Utilizes text mining algorithms to analyze qualitative data and find patterns in textual datasets
Skills & Qualifications:
Should have specialized experience in collecting, analyzing, reporting, and warehousing quantitative data for colleges and universities in one, or more, areas including: admissions, financial aid, curriculum assessment, enrollment management, student life, course offerings, and learning outcomes. Experience in admissions is preferred.
Should have experience in collecting and reporting information to government bodies (such as the United States Department of Education's Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System) to the public (e.g., Common Data Set, the National Association of Independent Colleges and Universities), and various college guide publishers (such as the U.S. News & World Report and College Board)
Must have experience sharing data outside their institution to compare their practices and outcomes against those of similar institutions
Must be able to use data visualization and reporting tools to display and summarize data, trends, and patterns
Must be able to clearly communicate and accurately present the methodology and results of analyses to various internal audiences using a variety of visual, written, and oral formats
Must be able to research and implement new visualization tools and methods to uncover insights in data and present them in great detail
Other Requirements:
A bachelor's degree is required. Would prefer to have the degree in Data Analytics, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Informatics, or Information Technology
1-3 years of experience is required.
Exceptional organizational skills, attention to detail, and ability to work under tight deadlines
Experience with Microsoft Office programs (Word, Excel, Access, PowerPoint, and Outlook), with an emphasis on MS Word and Excel
Location: Remote
Veteran Preference: Yes.
Citizenship/Security: Citizen/Green Card. Must be able to hold a federal security clearance.
Transitioning military and/or Veterans are invited to apply. Sprezzatura is an equal opportunity employer.

Sprezzatura offers benefits including healthcare, vacation, and paid sick leave.

Company Description

Sprezzatura Management Consulting, LLC (www.sprezzmc.com) is a Washington, DC-area Service-Disabled Veteran-Owned Small Business (SDVOSB) that enables transformation by supplying insight and leadership at the intersection of people, processes, and technology. We apply knowledge, project, and life cycle management best practices to catalyze change.",5.0,Sprezzatura Management Consulting,"Washington, DC",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,DC,3764,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
890,890,Data Scientist,$90k-$162k,"MUST BE AU.S. CITIZEN WITH ATOP SECRET SSBI SECURITY CLEARANCE

Ability to develop analytics for multiple cyber weapon systems with many different infrastructure and end-point devices. Ability to incorporate predictive, descriptive, and presumptive modeling; machine learning; artificial intelligence into analytics. Must be able to code proficiently in one or more of the following languages: Python, R, Scala, Spark, and Maven. Develop algorithms in one or more of the following Machine Learning areas: anomaly detection, one/few-shot learning, deep learning, unsupervised feature learning, ensemble methods, probabilistic graphical models, reinforcement learning. Ability to develop analytics based upon the Mitre ATT&CK Matrix or other applicable CS&D framework to discover, identify, characterize, and/or create signatures for cyberspace threat activity. Ability to assist in the development and implementation of a data analytics program. Develop robust documentation and comprehensive user manuals for all developed projects

Original Hire Document for data scientist below:

Job Responsibilities:

· Perform big data analysis on information technology infrastructure and end-point devices

· Customer outreach and engagement

· Problem solving

· Time management

· Collaborate with others

· Mission focused

· Deliver findings

· Accept and assess customer data, dashboard, requirements

· Identify new ways to visualize and analyze data

· Develop analytics to identify anomalous activity based on customer requirements

· Perform hunt operations identifying anomalous activity

· Produce reports based on misconfigurations and/or anomalous activity discovered through analysis

Knowledge/Skills Ability:

Required:

· Ability to analyze and assess software development or data acquisition requirements and determine optimum, cost-effective solutions.

· Proficiency in one or more big data programming languages, such as R, Python, Scala, or Spark and Maven.

· Experience working with a hybrid team of analysts, visualization experts, engineers, and developers to conduct research, and build and deploy complex, but easy-to-use analytical platforms.

· Previous experience performing research in Data Analytics or big data.

· Be Director of Central Intelligence Directives 6/4 eligible (Top Secret) with a current Single Scope Background Investigation (SSBI)

Minimum Experience/Education:

· At least one (1) of the following:

· One (1) year experience in cyberspace operations

· IAT Level 1 per DoD 8140 (Net+, Sec+, etc.)

· Experience on National/Service cyber weapon system/platform within last five years

Highly Desired:

· Education/ Certifications:

· 4+ years of experience in data analytics or quantitative intelligence analysis

· Four (4) years of experience in an intelligence field at a tactical or operational level

· DoD 8570 IAT related BA/BS degree

*BEAT LLC IS AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER - DISABILITY AND VETERANS*",4.4,B.E.A.T.,"San Antonio, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,12,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,TX,2955,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
891,891,Data Scientist,$90k-$162k,"Greetings from Trovetechs!!!

Â

We have an immediate need for Data Scientist Role @ San Francisco, CA. Please find the below Job Description for your kind reference.

Â

Duration: Long term Contract

Experience: 8+ Years

Rate: DOE$/hr.

Â

Job Description:

1. Apply a deep understanding of technology innovation to solve complex. ambiguous, and novel problems.

2. Contribute to evolving multiple research pipelines

3. Implement new algorithms to enhance simulations and inference pipelines.

4. Enhance code efficiency through design, testing, and documentation,

5. Collaborate with other data science teams: Signal processing, deep learning and bioinformatics

6. Support the Statistical Modeling team discussions by demonstrating technology with compelling and clear communications
Experience with TensorFlow-Probability, or another probabilistic framework is a big plus.

8. Experience in genomics

9. Experience with cloud computing

10. Experience building robust, scalable software products.

11. Fluency with modern software engineering practices: version control, code reviews, automated testing, etc.

Â

If you are interested, please send us your updated resume along with best Time & Number to reach you ASAP.

Â

Thanks and look forward to working with you,",-1.0,Trovetechs Inc,"San Francisco, CA",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,126.0,CA,1275,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,1,1,0,0,0
892,892,Senior Data Engineer,$89k-$111k,"As a Senior Data Engineer at Guild, you'll work across teams to help us build the next generation of data products. You'll work with world class data engineers to design and build the scalable, robust, and high-quality data infrastructure and data pipelines needed to support growth of our education network and SaaS platform. Ultimately, you'll help change the landscape for how we think about delivering education products to learners across the country by building a digital solution that connects students, employers, and universities to deliver education at an affordable price to students.

A day in our open, collaborative workspace might look like:
Designing, building, and expanding Guild's backend data infrastructure, including data pipelines, ETL, data ingestion, data APIs, and data warehouses
Building APIs that can be used internally or externally to serve crucial information across systems, partners, and teams
Translating complex business requirements into usable, scalable data models and systems
Mentoring other engineers and analysts on the team and sharing technical knowledge to enable others to be more effective at their jobs
In this role, you'll expand your expertise by:
Evolving our data products now and in the future by contributing to our backend data architecture
Working in an agile team environment with a high performing engineering team
Taking on a cross-functional role that will expose you to the ins and outs of Guild (working with our Product, Design, Client Success, and Student Services teams)
Receiving feedback through our learning-focused, twice annual Structured Growth Conversations
You'll know if you're successful by:
Choosing and leveraging the latest technologies in data engineering to automate data integration and loading, such as, Amazon Redshift, Redis, Java, Scala, Spark, Kafka, Python, S3 and PostgreSQL
Leveraging your experience to design solutions that will be the backbone of a highly scalable, reusable, backend data infrastructure
Ensuring our data is clean, accurate, and secure
Thriving in fast-paced and scaling environment
You'll join a team:
From diverse backgrounds – from traditional higher education, to athletic coaches, to politicians, to mental health professionals (and more!)
Of learners & problem-solvers dedicated to our dual mission of changing education in America while building a successful, high-growth company
Committed to building a diverse, equitable, and inclusive environment that you'd support every day
What you'll add to Guild – as an individual and part of the broader team:
Experience building data pipelines, custom ETL processes and data warehouses
Experience with one or more programming languages such as Java, Python, or Scala
Expertise in database technologies such as Redshift, PostgreSQL, Redis, and working with large sets of data
Experience deploying solutions to cloud technology services such as Amazon Web Services
Experience improving software products through engineering best practices such as refactoring, reusability, TDD and continuous integration
A proven ability to thrive in changing environments by having a fast, flexible, cooperative work style
Strong communication skills and the ability to effectively explain technical concepts to other engineers, analysts, product managers, and stakeholders.
Experience with BI tools such as Looker, Tableau, Kibana, Chart.io, etc.
Basic experience in statistical analysis, text processing, and machine learning
Passion for higher education and our mission – Guild is pioneering a new path for education as a benefit in a complicated and regulated space – success means quickly and effectively adapting your expertise
A drive to work hard and plan for how you can refresh/recharge while working in a startup
Something else? Wonderful, we're curious to learn more about you!
About Guild:

Guild is increasing economic mobility for working adults by partnering with the largest employers in the country to offer education as a benefit to their employees via our marketplace of nonprofit universities and education institutions. Guild's proprietary technology platform facilitates the administration of this innovative benefit and our team of coaches helps each employee navigate the path back to school, providing individualized support from day one through program completion.

We also just became the latest female-led company to hit a $1billion valuation and the only B-corp with those qualifications. Our Series D round was led by Ken Chenault, General Catalyst Partners chairman and former CEO of AMEX, and joined by Emerson Collective, LeadEdge Capital, and Iconiq.

Guild Education is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.",3.5,Guild Education,"Denver, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,5,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CO,4775,1,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
893,893,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Pocket Outdoor Media is looking for a full time Data Scientist eager to put their data science and problem solving skills towards building the personalized fitness platform of the future. You'll join the energetic team in our Boulder office and develop machine learning-based algorithms and models powering our cutting-edge platform utilizing large, diverse fitness datasets. You'll receive competitive pay, benefits package (including medical, dental, vision), 401k, commuter benefits, and equity.

What you'll do
Lead development of custom predictive and prescriptive algorithms interfacing with large data sets, based on principles from statistics, machine learning, and operations research
Create integrated solutions using Python modules (including Pandas, Numpy, Scipy, SQLAlchemy, and Tensorflow), PostgreSQL, and other tools as needed
Work closely with engineers to help evolve proof of concept systems into production at scale
Work the product development team to define desired requirements and capabilities
Perform research as needed to identify the latest techniques from technical literature and apply them to relevant product features
Identify and promote the use of new technologies, toolkits, and frameworks, areas of inquiry, ways of working, methods and approaches in Computer Science, Artificial Intelligence, Software and Research Engineering
What you'll bring
A degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Applied Statistics, Operations Research, Computational Biology, or a related analytical field
3+ years experience of statistical programming experience, including development of applied algorithms in production
Demonstrated ability to develop algorithms in Python 3.x using Python libraries like Tensorflow, Keras, pandas, and numpy
Detailed knowledge of computer science including data structures, data modeling, distributed systems, and software design methods
Strong understanding of statistical inference, regression and classification, and the ability to explain rationale underlying data science-related decisions to a broader audience
Knowledge of current best-practices, tools, and technologies for implementing machine learning pipelines
When applying

If possible, include references algorithms you've developed and/or research that you have published demonstrating your Data Scientist prowess. Be prepared to describe at least one data science project (thought process, planning, technical implementation) during your interview.",-1.0,Pocket Outdoor Media,"Boulder, CO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,other_industries,Media,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CO,2463,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
894,894,Senior Data Scientist - Telecommute,$89k-$111k,"Optum Payment Integrity Analytics is looking to expand and is seeking a Senior Data Scientist to join our team and help us reach our goals of accurate and effortless payments of claims through advanced analytics and machine learning. You should be an exceptional disciplined and self-motivated Data Scientist with predictive modeling and advanced analytics experience and a passion for working with healthcare data, experience using various computational approaches, and a portfolio of projects you can show and talk about.

Youll enjoy the flexibility to telecommute* from anywhere within the U.S. as you take on some tough challenges.

Primary Responsibilities:
Improve and extend the analytic methods in our products
Work alongside other data scientists, engineers, and project managers to design and implement models and experiments from end to end, including data ingestion and preparation, feature engineering, analysis and modeling, model deployment, performance tracking and documentation
Conduct hands-on data analysis and predictive analytics on large datasets
Effectively communicate complex technical results to business partners
Support and drive analytic efforts around machine learning and innovation
Work with a great deal of autonomy to find solutions to complex problems
Youll be rewarded and recognized for your performance in an environment that will challenge you and give you clear direction on what it takes to succeed in your role as well as provide development for other roles you may be interested in.

Required Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree or higher in Applied Mathematics, Physics, Computer Science, Statistics or related technical field
3+ years of hands-on experience in in developing analytics with machine learning, deep learning, NLP, and/or other related modeling techniques
Strong proficiency in advanced data science tools such as R, Python, SQL, Spark and H2O
Familiarity with wrangling large datasets with big data tools such as Hadoop, Hive and Spark
Experience applying computational algorithms and statistical methods to structured and unstructured data
Experience combining analytic methods with advanced data visualizations using, for example, Tableau, Shiny or D3
Expert ability to breakdown and clearly define problems
Strong ability to communicate highly technical results to a diverse audience
Careers with Optum. Here's the idea. We built an entire organization around one giant objective; make the health system work better for everyone. So when it comes to how we use the world's large accumulation of health-related information, or guide health and lifestyle choices or manage pharmacy benefits for millions, our first goal is to leap beyond the status quo and uncover new ways to serve. Optum, part of the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, brings together some of the greatest minds and most advanced ideas on where health care has to go in order to reach its fullest potential. For you, that means working on high performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter. Optum, incredible ideas in one incredible company and a singular opportunity to do your life's best work.SM

*All Telecommuters will be required to adhere to UnitedHealth Groups Telecommuter Policy.

Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: UnitedHealth Group is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.

UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.

Job Keywords: Senior Data Scientist, Telecommute, Telecommuter",3.4,Unitedhealth Group,"Eden Prairie, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,43,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,MN,3866,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
895,895,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Job Description


Job #: 1088245

Please send resume to Kevin Reed at kreed@apexsystems.com

Data Scientist (Big Data)

San Antonio, TX (No remote work)

Must Have Top Secret Clearance w/ SCI Eligibility

Direct Hire to Client

Ability to develop analytics for multiple cyber weapon systems with many different infrastructure and end-point devices. Ability to incorporate predictive, descriptive, and presumptive modeling; machine learning; artificial intelligence into analytics. Must be able to code proficiently in one or more of the following languages: Python, R, Scala, Spark, and Maven. Develop algorithms in one or more of the following Machine Learning areas: anomaly detection, one/few-shot learning, deep learning, unsupervised feature learning, ensemble methods, probabilistic graphical models, reinforcement learning. Ability to develop analytics based upon the Mitre ATT&CK Matrix or other applicable CS&D framework to discover, identify, characterize, and/or create signatures for cyberspace threat activity. Ability to assist in the development and implementation of a data analytics program. Develop robust documentation and comprehensive user manuals for all developed projects

Original Hire Document for data scientist below:

Job Responsibilities:

· Perform big data analysis on information technology infrastructure and end-point devices

· Customer outreach and engagement

· Problem solving

· Time management

· Collaborate with others

· Mission focused

· Deliver findings

· Accept and assess customer data, dashboard, requirements

· Identify new ways to visualize and analyze data

· Develop analytics to identify anomalous activity based on customer requirements

· Perform hunt operations identifying anomalous activity

· Produce reports based on misconfigurations and/or anomalous activity discovered through analysis

Knowledge/Skills Ability:

Required:

· Ability to analyze and assess software development or data acquisition requirements and determine optimum, cost-effective solutions.

· Proficiency in one or more big data programming languages, such as R, Python, Scala, or Spark and Maven.

· Experience working with a hybrid team of analysts, visualization experts, engineers, and developers to conduct research, and build and deploy complex, but easy-to-use analytical platforms.

· Previous experience performing research in Data Analytics or big data.

· Be Director of Central Intelligence Directives 6/4 eligible (Top Secret) with a current Single Scope Background Investigation (SSBI)

Minimum Experience/Education:

· At least one (1) of the following:

· One (1) year experience in cyberspace operations

· IAT Level 1 per DoD 8140 (Net+, Sec+, etc.)

· Experience on National/Service cyber weapon system/platform within last five years

Highly Desired:

· Education/ Certifications:

· 4+ years of experience in data analytics or quantitative intelligence analysis

· Four (4) years of experience in an intelligence field at a tactical or operational level

· DoD 8570 IAT related BA/BS degree

EEO Employer

Apex Systems is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate or allow discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, creed, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding, or related medical conditions), age, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, genetic information, registered domestic partner status, marital status, disability, status as a crime victim, protected veteran status, political affiliation, union membership, or any other characteristic protected by law. Apex will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 844-463-6178.",3.8,Apex Systems,"San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,25,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,TX,4022,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
896,896,Data Engineer II,$89k-$111k,"Job Description


Here at Discount Tire, we celebrate the spirit of our people with extraordinary pride and enthusiasm. As America’s largest independent tire retailer, specializing in tires & wheels, we have over 1,000 store locations and continue to grow every year. Our consistent growth over the last 60 years, the loyalty of our customers and passion of our people makes Discount Tire a great place to work.

Under general supervision, Data Engineer II supports Discount Tire’s Data Science and Business Intelligence teams in developing advanced analytic solutions that support the enterprise’s key strategic initiatives. This role is responsible for developing, testing and maintaining our cloud-based analytics platform, including data pipelines, Enterprise Data Warehouse and other Big Data technologies. Embodies IOOGA (Integrity, Our People, Our Customers, Growth and Attitude)

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Develops high performance distributed data warehouse, distributed analytic systems and cloud architectures.
Participates in the development of relational and non-relational data models focusing on design for optimal storage and retrieval
Develops, tests and debugs batch and streaming, data pipelines (ETL/ELT) to populate databases and object stores from multiple disparate data sources; provides recommendations to improve data reliability, efficiency and quality.
Design and develop scalable solutions leveraging using technologies including Docker and Kubernetes
Working along side data scientists, supports the development and promotion of high-performance algorithms, models and prototypes.
Implements data quality metrics, standards, guidelines; automates data quality checks / routines as part of data processing frameworks; validates flow of information.
Ensures that Data Warehousing and Big Data systems meet business requirements and industry practices; including but not limited to, automation of system builds, security requirements, performance requirements and logging/monitoring requirements.
Troubleshoots data and performance related issues; implements adjustments, documents root cause and corrective measure; provides recommendations to stakeholders.
Documents technical specifications and participates with peers in design and code review sessions.
Employ a variety of scripting languages and tools to integrate data from multiple disparate data sources.
Use basic statistical and visualization techniques to analyze the resulting data sets of your processes
Learn and stay abreast of new technologies that can improve the efficacy of the analytics and data science teams
Stays current on the latest industry technologies, trends and strategies.
Other duties as assigned.

Job Requirements


Qualifications:
This position requires a minimum of five years of progressive database development and integration experience.
Strong knowledge of logical and physical data modeling is necessary, including but not limited to entity design, relationships, indexing and star schemas.
Ability to translate a logical data model into a relational or non-relational solution is necessary.
Understanding of multiple relational (RDMS) and non-relational (NoSQL) data platforms is needed.
SQL experience is required.
Scripting knowledge with SQL and Python.
Experience in SQL tuning, indexing, partitioning, data access patterns and scaling strategies is needed.
Experience with data integrations and data processing for business intelligence and analytics workloads is required.
Experience with AWS S3 or other distributed object stores, AWS Redshift, Elastic MapReduce a plus.
Hands-on experience in database development using views, SQL scripts and transformations is needed.
Proficient with Microsoft office, including skills with Word and Excel, is necessary.
Experience working with large complex data sets.
Understanding of Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) methodologies such as Agile and Waterfall is needed.
Proven analytical problem solving and decision making skills is critical.
Ability to communicate across all levels of the organization is necessary; must be able to clearly articulate technical ideas to a non-technical audience both verbally and in writing.
Ability to work independently and in a team is vital.
Customer service skills including the ability to manage and respond to different customer situations while maintaining a positive and friendly attitude is essential.
The ability to multi-task, and manage multiple projects to meet various deadlines simultaneously is required.
The ability to work efficiently and accurately under pressure, meet deadlines and present a professional demeanor is essential.
In addition, troubleshooting and organizational skills with a can-do attitude and the ability to adjust to changing requirements are essential.
Educational Requirements:

This position requires a Bachelors Degree in Computer Science, Computer Information Systems or related or equivalent experience.

Data or cloud related certifications are a plus.

Work Days:

Normal work days are Monday through Friday. Occasional Saturdays and Sundays may be necessary.

Work Hours:

Normal work hours are 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. Additional hours may be necessary.

Apply
Not ready to",4.0,Discount Tire,"Scottsdale, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,60,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,AZ,5242,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
897,897,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Job Purpose:

The Data Scientist reporting to the Chief Information Officer will be responsible for driving the scientific use of Global Supply Chain Data to accelerate speed to market as well as provide dashboards and predictive analytics to clients. Additionally, this role will assist in advancing and shaping Ancillare’s supply chain data strategy through the due diligence on new data providers/vendors and informational support for data surrounding a range of Therapeutic Areas.

Duties and Responsibilities:
Work as the lead data strategist, identifying and integrating new datasets that can be leveraged through our product capabilities.
Work collaboratively with the engineering team to strategize and execute the development of data products.
Execute analytical experiments methodically to help solve various problems and make a true impact across various domains.
Identify relevant data sources and sets to mine for client business needs and collect large structured and unstructured datasets and variables.
Devise and utilize algorithms and models to mine big data stores, perform data and error analysis to improve models, and clean and validate data for uniformity and accuracy.
Analyze data for trends and patterns and interpret data with a clear objective in mind.
Implement analytical models into production by collaborating with software developers and machine learning engineers.
Create expert data visualization applications.
Communicate analytic solutions to stakeholders and implement improvements as needed to operational systems
Ability and desire to work a project to completion meeting and or exceeding timeline deliverables.
Demonstrate and drive the Ancillare mission, values, and strategy.
Participate and contribute positively to process improvement initiatives.
Travel as may be required.
Perform other duties as assigned.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, applied mathematics, or related discipline required. Advanced degree preferred.
7+ years’ experience in data science required.
2+ years of project management experience and/or professional certifications preferred.
Experience working with pharmaceutical and supply chain data
Minimum Requirements:
Ability to effectively communicate in English both written and verbal.
Ability to partner and successfully gain collaboration across all levels of the organization.
Demonstrated proficiency with data mining, mathematics, and statistical analysis.
Advanced pattern recognition and predictive modeling experience required.
Working experience with Excel, PowerPoint, PowerBI, SQL, and programming languages (i.e., Java/Python, SAS).
Knowledge of Hadoop and or Big Data environments a plus.
Working knowledge and experience with building and maintaining Data Warehousing, Datalakes etc.
Comfort working in a dynamic, research-oriented group with several ongoing concurrent projects.
Knowledge in the use of AI a plus.
Knowledge of BlockChain processes and implementations a big plus.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Employee Discount
Flexible Schedule
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Professional Development Assistance
Referral Program
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
8 Hour Shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Data Science: 5 years (Required)
Project Management: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Doctorate (Preferred)
Location:
Horsham, PA 19044 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.ancillare.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.1,Ancillare,"Horsham, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,14,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,PA,3711,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
898,898,Principal Data Scientist I,$89k-$111k,"JOB SUMMARY
The Principal Data Scientist I will serve as a technical lead for the experimentation data science team. This role will support experiment planning and set-up across Charter product teams including video, buyflow, and support portals and own experimentation strategy including validation development of experimentation plans, frameworks, and experimentation metrics. The individual will additionally be responsible for executing advanced analytic projects with the objectives of creating causal inferences, correlations, predictions, and recommendations for improvements to business processes, and the metrics to monitor those improvements. Requires a strong command of statistical and data science oriented techniques and algorithms as well as a demonstrated practical ability to determine where to invest time, synthesize actionable findings across diverse assignments, and present these findings to an audience with varying levels of background in analytics.

MAJOR DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Actively and consistently support all efforts to simplify and enhance the customer experience
Collaborate with stakeholders to understand product / feature plans for development and translate those plans into experimentation objectives and testable hypotheses
Assist product teams with experimental design and analyses, including development of analysis plans and ad hoc reports
Develop experimentation strategy and project plans for stakeholders and lead execution of plans involving members across multiple teams
Synthesize data from experimentation and other data sources to provide stakeholders with answers to research questions and help determine next steps for a product / feature using a data driven approach
Create and present materials communicating quantitative findings and relevant business impacts to internal and external teams as well as an executive audience
Supervise and integrate the work of junior data scientists on experimentation and data science team to produce high quality work products
Refine experimentation processes including leverage of existing data science tools and development of new tools where applicable
Identify new methodologies for advancing experimentation program, develop plans to evaluate these methodologies through simulation studies, and work with software and data engineering teams on implementation strategies
Leverage multiple data sources to produce intelligent data products that solve the needs of business and engineering for business intelligence, operational analytics, descriptive models, predictive models, diagnostic models, and prescriptive models.
Make technical decisions for the organization
Coordinate technical activities across projects and the organization
Interact with various stakeholders to understand their business needs, communicate project status and develop relationships to ensure satisfaction
Develop and deliver materials on experimentation techniques and tools to a broad set of business-intelligence, data, and analytics professionals with varied backgrounds
Exercise thought leadership and discretion in tailoring the tools, approaches, and data used to meet the needs of the particular problem
Deliver results using metrics-driven analysis, and communicating the costs and tradeoffs of ideas to stakeholders and top management
REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS
Skills/Abilities and Knowledge
Ability to read, write, speak and understand English
Able to communicate complex technical, statistical and quantitative concepts to individuals with a variety of backgrounds, explain the importance and relevance of data, and suggest solutions
Works with minimal guidance to set project plans and timelines and prioritize among multiple competing interests
Working knowledge of current industry best practices for online experimentation
Command of advanced statistical concepts including experimental design, hypothesis testing, common and more advance analytic methods
Fluency with regression modeling and the ability to develop and evaluate a model using simple and complex regression, working knowledge of correlated data analysis and ability to identify when more sophisticated ML modeling may be warranted over common approaches
Knowledge of tools to obtain, transform, and store data on Big Data and Streaming systems
Ability to design and implement ETL projects from scratch
Knowledge of tools to develop, test, and deploy production code, modify CICD pipelines and deployment scripts
Background with Cable systems and operations
Experience with Hadoop, HIVE, SPARK, and/or Snowflake
Knowledge of other relevant tools such as SAS, SPSS, Alteryx, Linux
Knowledge of other relevant techniques such as text analysis and text mining
Familiarity with the open-source ecosystems surrounding R (CRAN), Python (PyPi), and/or Hadoop
Broad experience and solid theoretical foundation on the modeling process using a variety of algorithms
Data profiling, distributions, confidence intervals, hypothesis testing
Data pre-processing, exploratory data analysis using a variety of techniques
Knowledge of classification using techniques such as linear models, GLMs, and tree-based methods
Interpretation of model results, consideration of causality, treatment of multicollinearity
Strong synthesis and presentation skills
Ability to communicate results and recommendations to a wide variety of audiences including executive leadership
Understanding of data architecture, data warehouse and data marts
Demonstrated ability and desire to continually expand skill set, and learn from and teach others
Experience with other database and data store technologies, such as NoSQL, key-value, columnar, graph, and document.
Experience in receiving, converting, and cleansing big data
Program, product, or project management experience delivering analytics results
Strong background in Linux/Unix/CentOS and Windows installation and administration
Ability to identify and resolve end-to-end performance, network, server, cloud, and platform issues
Pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Keen attention to detail with the ability to effectively prioritize and execute multiple tasks
Education
Bachelors Degree in a statistics, data science, applied math or related field.

Related Work Experience
3 plus years user and system admin ownership with Linux/Unix/CentOS and Windows
10 plus years Statistical Analysis
8 plus years Business Analysis
8 plus years SQL/R/SAS Programming
2 plus years Database Design or Database Modeling

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Skills/Abilities and Knowledge
Operations-research background, in particular focused on large labor operations such as field ops, technical support, and sales
Background with cable and/ or telecommunications

Education
Masters degree in a statistics, data science, applied math or related field.

WORKING CONDITIONS
Office environment
Charter Technical Engineering Center
Highly collaborative and innovative work space
Occasional Travel",3.0,Spectrum,"Greenwood Village, Arapahoe, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,4,Subsidiary or Business Segment,other_industries,Telecommunications,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,Arapahoe,6960,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
899,899,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Bioinformatics Programmer II

17-Aug-2020

Job Code and Payroll Title
9402 Bioinformatics Programmer II

Job Summary
JOB OVERVIEW
As clinical and medical data is increasingly digitized, there is increasing opportunity to analyze this data for research purposes in a variety of ways that leverage “big data” characteristics of digital medical data.

Our clinical research effort employs novel analytic techniques, which include machine learning techniques, to identify complex patterns medical data derived from various sources - both collected through routine clinical care and expressly collected for research purposes.

Related to this goal, the Bioinformatics Programmer/Data Scientist will assist in managing, cleaning and analyzing large scale medical data using a wide variety of analytic techniques. The Data Scientist will be involved in developing software pipelines, mostly using Python, for data extraction which will need to be developed de novo to obtain data from various clinical systems or sources. Once the data is obtained, pipelines will be created to clean the data and store the data in file-systems appropriate for the size of the data at hand.

Under the supervision of the Principal Investigator (PI), the Data Scientist will also be involved in data analysis, and will be fluent in comparing a variety of techniques, including machine learning and deep learning techniques, to be able to empirically determine which approach is most suitable for the given research hypothesis and data type. This position may also include some administrative duties and will have the opportunity to participate in and lead authorship teams.

CARDIOVASCULAR RESEARCH INSTITUTE / CARDIOLOGY
The primary mission of the Cardiovascular Research Institute (CVRI), the largest organized research unit on the San Francisco campus, is to promote fundamental and clinical research on the cardiovascular and pulmonary respiratory systems and to provide opportunities for postdoctoral training in these fields.

With over 200 faculty, staff, and postdoctoral fellows, the CVRI supports faculty from a variety of departments (Medicine, Biochemistry, Biophysics, Lab Medicine, Pediatrics, Anatomy, Anesthesia, Pharmaceutical Chemistry, Physiology, Cellular and Molecular Pharmacology). The total extramural funding is $29 million annually (direct and indirect costs), with $1M in indirect cost return, and $561K in State funds. Assets include $38 million in endowment income and gifts, $3M in clinical reserves, and $5.8M in opportunity funds.

The Tison lab is also part of the Bakar Computational Health Sciences Institute and the Data Scientist will be part of the larger computational community and infrastructure.

ABOUT UCSF
The University of California, San Francisco (UCSF) is a leading university dedicated to promoting health worldwide through advanced biomedical research, graduate-level education in the life sciences and health professions, and excellence in patient care. It is the only campus in the 10-campus UC system dedicated exclusively to the health sciences.

Organization
Campus

Req Number
55681BR

Location
Mission Bay

Job Title
Data Scientist

Appointment Type
Career

Percentage
100%

Shift Length
8 Hours

Shift
Days

Work Days
Monday- Friday, 8:00 am - 5:00 pm

Required Qualifications
• Bachelor's degree in biological science, computational/programming, or related area and/or equivalent experience/training
• At least 6 months of experience in direct data management and analysis using medical and/or health-related data
• Demonstrated fluency and competency with the Python programming language, including with relevant scientific computing packages including numpy, scipy, sci-kit learn
• Experience with, or a demonstrated ability to learn and implement novel data management and machine learning-based pipelines for management of large-scale data
• Experience with, or demonstrated ability to learn and implement relevant deep learning frameworks such as TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch etc.
• Working knowledge of bioinformatics methods, data structures, statistical analysis, systems programming, and database design
• Working knowledge of databases
• Working knowledge of application and data security concepts
• Ability to lead and maintain data pipelines for real-time data acquisition from clinical systems
• Working project management skills
• Interpersonal skills in order to work with both technical and non-technical personnel at various levels in the organization
• Ability to communicate technical information in a clear and concise manner
• Ability to effectively manage time and see assigned parts of projects through to completion on deadline
• Basic consultation and communication skills
• Ability to multi-task and work well with limited supervision
• Self motivated, able to learn quickly, meet deadlines and demonstrate problem solving skills

Preferred Qualifications
• MS or greater degree in a related science or an equivalent combination of education and experience
• PhD in a field relevant to biomedical research (general biology, molecular biology, cell biology, chemistry, biomedical engineering, biomedical informatics), or computer science (computer science, machine learning, artificial intelligence) or similar
• 12 months or more of demonstrated work experience using medical and/or health-related data, or similar, including developing pipelines for obtaining data, data management and cleaning and data analysis, preferably using Python

License/Certification
n/a

Position Type
Full Time

Department Name
Cardiovascular Research Institute

Equal Employment Opportunity
The University of California San Francisco is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran or disabled status, or genetic information.",4.1,UCSF Medical Center,"San Francisco, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,113,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CA,5959,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,0
900,900,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Exciting opportunityin a thriving company that values and appreciates their employees while acknowledging their contributions!

Company Information
Serving their industry for over 45 years, this company is a leader in global life reinsurance.They deliver expert solutions in individual life reinsurance, individual living benefits reinsurance, group reinsurance, financial solutions and product development.
The firm was recognized by the Asia Insurance Review as ""Life Reinsurer of the Year"" at the 2018 Asia Insurance Industry Awards for the second consecutive year. The honor recognizes innovation, thought leadership, and actions to enhance the stability, security, and image of the Forbes Global 2000: World's Best Employers.
The firm was also ranked #97 among 500 companies in the Forbes 2018 Global 2000: World's Best Employers listing.
Benefits and Features
Skill building: this firm encourages personal & professional growth through ongoing training & skills development
Work/life balance: family friendly culture and flexible work arrangements
Career growth: Performance based compensation & competitive benefits package
Strong retirement benefits
The Role they will Play
Develop and enhance statistical models for the applications in insurance industry, including mortality, morbidity, etc.
Need to be very hands-on, needs to know how the models are built and how they work.
Serve as a client contact/consultant either internally or externally, serving as a subject matter expert.
Actively participate in other research-related initiatives.


Community Information
This opportunity is based at the corporate office in Saint Louis, Missouri.
Saint Louis offers a culture of innovation and excellence paired with historic and iconic city/sites.
With an affordable cost of living, Saint Louis is a great place to live.
Desired Background Profile:
1+ years of experience doing statistical modeling in insurance
Strong experience in R, familiar with other packages including SAS, MATLAB, Python, SQL, etc.
Master’s Degree or PHD in Statistics, Actuarial Science, Business, Finance, Economics or related field",5.0,"Kalos Consulting, Inc.","Saint Louis, MO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,MO,2114,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
903,903,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Apply

Description

Title: Data Scientist

Location: Washington, DC

Terms: Full Time

Duration: 5 years

Clearance: Currently possess or be able to favorably pass a full five (5) year Background Investigation (BI) required by CBP (e.g. Secret, Top Secret, etc.)

Travel: Occasional travel may be required.

Position Overview:

The Data Scientist will build and maintain models to support business use cases. They will work as part of the data science services team. The function of this team is to provide analytical support to address complex business questions. More specifically, the team will work with stakeholders to clearly articulate mission gap problems and process inefficiencies. The team will then suggest and implement appropriate solutions, such as data science reports or machine learning models, for the stakeholders.

Responsibilities:

• Under little or no supervision, applies expert knowledge in statistical analysis, complex data mining, and artificial intelligence to make value out of data.

• Provides consulting relating to the data mining and analysis of data from a range of sources to transform raw data into concise and actionable insights.

• Designs and implements data-driven solutions, with specific focus on advanced analytical methods, data models, and visualizations.

• Develop quantitative simulations and models to provide descriptive and predictive analytics solution recommendations.

• Identifies trends and problems through complex big data analysis.

• Maintains current in emerging tools and techniques in machine learning, statistical modeling, and analytics.

Requirements

Basic Qualifications:

• Eight (8) years relevant experience in applied data science research or big data analytics.

• Advanced Degree (Masters or PhD) in Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Data Science, Computer Science, Operations Research or other closely related other quantitative or mathematical discipline. A PhD degree may be substituted for up to three (3) years of experience.

• Demonstrates knowledge of data mining methods, databases, data visualization and machine learning.

• Ability to communicate analysis techniques, concepts and products

• Ability to develop data-driven solutions, data models, and visualizations

About RIVA:

RIVA Solutions, Inc. is a rapidly growing provider of information Technology and Program Support Services to the United States Federal Government. Headquartered in McLean VA, RIVA has over 400 employees in 20+ states across the US. As we continue to expand our services within Management Consulting, STEM, Cyber AI and Robotic Process Automation, we are looking for highly qualified people to join and thrive with us. VivaLaRIVA!

RIVA is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy, gender identity, and sexual orientation), parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service, or other non-merit based factors.",3.7,RIVA Solutions,"Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,11,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,DC,3088,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
904,904,Data Scientist - Nationwide Opportunities,$89k-$111k,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)? Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models? Eager to learn to apply ML to a diverse array of enterprise use cases? Thrilled to be a part of Amazon who has been pioneering and shaping the worlds AI/ML technology for decades?

At Amazon Web Services (AWS), we are helping large enterprises build ML models on the AWS Cloud. We are applying predictive technology to large volumes of data and against a wide spectrum of problems. AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.

AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team. We pride ourselves on being customer obsessed and highly focused on the AI enablement of our customers. If you have experience with AI, including building ML models, wed like to have you join our team. You will get to work with an innovative company, with great teammates, and have a lot of fun helping our customers. A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.

This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.

Major responsibilities include:
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
· Use AWS AI services (e.g., Personalize), ML platforms (SageMaker), and frameworks (e.g., MXNet, TensorFlow, PyTorch, SparkML, scikit-learn) to help our customers build ML models
· Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
· Work with our other Professional Services consultants (Big Data, IoT, HPC) to analyze, extract, normalize, and label relevant data, and with our Professional Services engineers to operationalize customers models after they are prototyped

Basic Qualifications

· Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.) or equivalent professional or military experience
· Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
· 4+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
· Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
· Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
· Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations

Preferred Qualifications

· Maters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
· Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
· Deep technical skills, consulting experience, and business savvy to interface with all levels and disciplines within our customers organization
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",3.9,Amazon,"New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,26,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,NY,4217,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,1,0,0
905,905,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Join the INTERACTIVE BROKERS Team!

Interactive Brokers has been at the forefront of the Fintech space for over 42 years and we pride ourselves on being primarily a technology company. We continue to challenge the status quo and push boundaries to offer the best trading platform with the most sophisticated features all for the lowest cost to our customers.

We are looking for a Data Scientist with good knowledge and ability to communicate effectively understanding complex problems and explain their solution. The position is well-suited for an organized individual who can meet deadlines, follow written procedures, and collaborate for improvements

You will be part of:

The data science team, you will work on developing mathematical models in areas such as detecting fraud and suspicious transactions, security lending pricing models and analysis. You will Build supporting architecture for systems to utilize the models and ensure they are working as expected. You will have close interaction with the software and business departments. The best results come when all members of our team understand the business problems we are working to solve.

You will be responsible to:
Work with various internal stakeholders to address their data analysis/modeling needs.
Understand software skills such as business analysis in an analytical framework, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Apply statistical / machine learning methods to solve broad range of business problems including pricing, forecasting, anomaly detection, process performance, inventory optimization, customer acquisition/retention/attrition, etc.
Demonstrates ability to extract meaning from and interpret data using a variety of tools and methods from statistics and machine learning.
Work with developers on implementing the solutions in a production environment
Document steps taken and methods utilized in any project
Generate executive summary of the analysis for stakeholders
eager to learn new tools and business concepts and quickly adapt to changing business requirements
You are someone who will have:
BS in Computer Science or Mathematics or in any related quantitative field.
Adept at exploratory data analysis, data normalization and data visualization methods
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and programming.
Experience using statistical computer languages R (ML), Python (scikit-learn), SQL etc. to manipulate, extract and aggregate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Analytical mind and business acumen
Strong math skills (e.g. statistics, algebra)
Good to haves:
MS or PhD in Mathematics or another quantitative field
Prior experience with financial instruments in trading and brokerage
Experience programming in Java and Oracle
Experience with machine learning tools and methods such as Deep Learning, Convoluted/Adversarial NN, Tensor Flow, H2O
Experience with distributed tools such as Hadoop and Spark
Benefits to work with us:
Competitive salary, annual performance-based bonus, and stock grant
Retirement plan (401K) with company match
Excellent health and welfare benefits including medical, dental, and vision benefits
Wellness screenings and assessments, health coaches and counseling services through Employee Assistance Program (EAP)
Paid time off along and generous parental leave policy
Daily company paid lunch and a fully stocked kitchen with healthy options for breakfast and snack
Corporate events including team outings, dinners, volunteer activities and company sports teams
Education reimbursement and learning opportunities with Udemy
Modern offices with sit/stand desks and multi-monitor setups


Company Overview

Interactive Brokers a subsidiary of publicly-traded Interactive Brokers Group, Inc., based in Greenwich, Connecticut (NASDAQ: IBKR) is a low-cost provider of trade execution and clearing services for active traders, institutional investors, financial advisors and introducing brokers. IBKR's premier technology provides electronic access to stocks, options, futures, forex, bonds, and funds worldwide from a single IBKR Integrated Investment account. IBKR is one of the largest online brokers by trade volume and is consistently ranked at the top of its field.

Our employees are part of a dynamic, multinational, fast-paced, results-oriented team working to provide our customers with state-of-the-art trading technology, superior execution capabilities, worldwide electronic access, and sophisticated risk management tools.

Our headquarters are in Greenwich, CT, USA. IBKR has offices in the United States, Canada, the United Kingdom, Switzerland, Hungary, Estonia, Russia, India, Hong Kong, China, Japan and Australia.

IBKR is a member of NYSE, FINRA, and SIPC. Interactive Brokers Group brokerage affiliates are regulated by securities and commodities agencies around the world.

Click HERE to view a short video with a few words from current Interactive Brokers employees. (if hyperlink is deactivated please copy https://www.interactivebrokers.com/en/index.php?f=31899 to your browser)

For more information, please visit www.ibkr.com/info",3.1,IBKR,"Greenwich, CT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,financial_related,Finance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CT,5190,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,1,0,0
906,906,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"About Lokavant

Lokavant is a technology companywhose mission is to ensure that no clinical trial fails due to operationalerror. By integrating and analyzing the disparate data sources within clinicaltrials, Lokavant provides real-time visualizations and risk alerts to studysponsors and contract research organizations (CROs) to enable data-drivendecisions. These insights expedite trial timelines and reduce the costs ofdevelopment, allowing safe and efficacious treatments to get to patients.

Lokavant centralizes trial data topower a machine learning model that anticipates trial risk, providesdata-driven risk mitigation strategies, and predicts the impact of mitigationstrategy implementation. Lokavant's anticipatory monitoring capability isgrounded in a compendium of data from over 1,000 clinical trials and willimprove with each deployment.

About the Opportunity

How often are you given theopportunity to build something from the ground up, with an abundance ofresources at your disposal; to be part of a team of people accomplished indiverse scientific and engineering disciplines, focused on using the best ofwhat lies at the forefront of technology to address complex, real-worldproblems that have a positive impact on potentially millions of peoples' lives?This is that kind of opportunity.

We are seeking a thoughtful, hands-ondata scientist with an aptitude for or strong interest in clinical trial data tojoin the rapidly growing Lokavant Data Science team in our New York Cityheadquarters. As a part of the data science team, you will work very closelywith Lokavants engineering and product teams. Our platform is fullycloud-based and is being built around modern tools and frameworks in anincredibly fast-moving agile environment. As a Data Scientist at Lokavant, youwill be instrumental in setting and executing upon the vision for Lokavantsdifferentiation in the clinical research technology industry.

Key Responsibilities
Take an active role in defining the developmentroadmap and deliverables for the data science team in an integrated agileproduct development process
Drive development and productizationof end-to-end machine learning models
Work in a small team settingpartnering with engineers and scientists to derive the insights needed tosupport our products and product features
Follow industry standard practices toimplement, optimize, maintain, troubleshoot, and continuously improve the practicesof the data science team
Enable effective workingrelationships across Product Management, Front-End Development, DevelopmentOperations, Commercial and Data Engineering
Mentor and be mentored by datascientists of varied experience levels and subject matter areas
Minimum Requirements
2+ years of relevant experience in ananalytical role involving data science and statistical modeling
Fluency in Python and SQL
Strong understanding of advancedstatistical models and Machine Learning techniques
Experienceworking in an Agile software development environment
Exceptional written and verbal communicationskills
Strong attention to detail and highlyorganized, with effective multi-tasking and prioritization skills
Proactive, self-motivated andself-directed, with the ability to learn quickly and autonomously
Comfortable with ambiguity
Superior problem-solving andtroubleshooting skills
Ability to work as part of acollaborative cross-functional team in a fast-paced environment
Sincere interest in working at arapidly changing start-up and scaling with the company as we grow
Bachelors or masters degree withstrong academic performance in Statistics, Mathematics, Data Science, orequivalent field


Preferred (Nice-to-have) Qualifications
Experience in the life sciences industry
Experience with healthcare data, ideally clinical/operational clinicaltrial data
Knowledge of clinical data standards (e.g. CDISC, FHIR, HL7, etc.)
Knowledge of e-clinical systems and technologies (e.g. EDC, CTMS, IRT,etc.)


Employee Benefits
Competitive salary and equitycompensation
Full medical, dental, and visionbenefits
One Medical membership
401(k) plan
Flexible PTO policy
Flexible remote work policy
Great NYC office located in the heartof Times Square
Team events and outings
Lokavant is an equal opportunityemployer, indiscriminate of race, color, religion, ethnicity, ancestry,national origin, sex, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, maritalstatus, veteran status, disability, medical condition, or any other protectedcharacteristic. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating aninclusive environment for all employees.",-1.0,"Lokavant, Inc.","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,NY,4568,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
907,907,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"About the Role

We are looking for a data scientist who is innovative, highly-motivated, and proactive.

For this role, you will be part of a team that builds cutting-edge trading products in the cryptocurrency industry. You will be responsible for transforming data and generating actionable insights into our customer behavior and measuring the performance of our trading engine. You will collaborate and lead projects with product management, engineering, marketing, and growth teams. You will transform data from complex systems, generate performance metrics, and share the results with stakeholders at all levels of the company.

Great benefits, amazing perks, remote work and travel opportunities, stock incentives, beautiful HQ office, and a flexible PTO policy make Kraken a great place to work. If you value having a seat at the table and want to make a big impact on guiding the direction of marketing and growth at one of the top crypto exchanges in the world, this role is for you.

Responsibilities
Partner with Kraken’s engineering, marketing, product, and finance teams to identify, prioritize, and answer the most important questions where analytics and modeling will have a material impact.
Drive cross functional analytic projects from beginning to end: build relationships with partner teams, frame and structure questions, collect and analyze data, summarize and present key insights in support of decision making.
Work with engineers to evangelize data best practices and implement analytics solutions.
Collaborate with business leaders, subject matter experts, and decision makers to develop success criteria and optimize new products, features, policies, and models.
Communicate key results with self-serve tools (dashboards, analytics tools) for leadership and product management.
Develop anomaly detection, and data modelling tools to monitor key performance indicators to improve the efficiency of the products.
Design experiments for product teams to test hypothesis and help with idea generation and refinement.
Build key datasets and data pipelines using Python/ETL frameworks.
Requirements
A degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Physical Sciences, Economics, Math or a related technical field.
5+ years industry experience in data science or analytics
A consistent track record of performing data analysis using Python, R, and/or SQL
Experience using statistics and predictive analytics to solve complex business problems.
The versatility and willingness to learn new technologies on the job.
The ability to clearly communicate complex results to technical and non-technical audiences.
Familiarity with other data tools such as Hive, Vertica, Tableau & Ruby is a plus
We’re powered by people from around the world with their own unique backgrounds and experiences. We value all Krakenites and their talents, contributions, and perspectives.
Check out all our open roles at our Careers Page. We’re excited to see what you’re made of.
Learn more about us
Watch ""Working at Kraken""
Follow us on Twitter
Catch up on our blog
Follow us on LinkedIn",4.5,Kraken Digital Asset Exchange,Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,9,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,Remote,3075,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
908,908,Data Engineer,$89k-$111k,"About MasterControl:

MasterControl Inc. is a leading provider of cloud-based quality and compliance software for life sciences and other regulated industries. Our mission is the same as that of our customers to bring life-changing products to more people sooner. The MasterControl Platform helps organizations digitize, automate and connect quality and compliance processes across the regulated product development life cycle. Over 1,000 companies worldwide rely on MasterControl solutions to achieve new levels of operational excellence across product development, clinical trials, regulatory affairs, quality management, supply chain, manufacturing and postmarket surveillance. For more information, visitwww.mastercontrol.com.

Summary

At MasterControl we are building our next generation data platform that will leverage AI/ML techniques to help redefine how our customers bring lifesaving and lifechanging products to market. To enable this, we need your help building our data pipeline, DataMart and data lake.

You will be responsible for implementing the data life cycle consumption from the data source to the end model. By gathering requirements from Product, you will transform data in near real-time which will be consumable by AI model training, business intelligence analytic tools, and self-service platforms. You will need a strong emphasis on data modeling, as well as proficiency in data transformation. You will be responsible for integration into the CI/CD pipeline as well as unit and integration testing of all processes. You will need experience with structured, semi-structured, and unstructured data sources. You will need a bachelor's degree in a STEM related field, or equivalent experience. You will have some work experience with and a passion for Big Data.

Responsibilities
Pull data from all customer databases into S3 and put into a queryable format
Model the data for optimal performance (ETL, star-schema like, ORC, partitioning, etc ...)
Pull data from a real-time streaming architecture (Kafka) and do near-real-time aggregations andprojections of the data, storing the results in S3
Help automate the provisioning of AWS Lake Formations, EMR/Spark/S3 and other services in AWS
Analyze data to find patterns worthy to expose to the end-user
Help tie corporate data to customer data from an OLTP store
Help us discover ways to use Big Data technologies in a Machine Learning pipeline (discover, clean, label, train, test)
Other assigned duties
Preferred Skills
Scala/Python/SQL/Java
Apache Spark with EMR and/or other Big Data tools
Kafka Streams experience is big plus
Airflow experience is a plus
Big Data Mindset (Spark/Hive/Hadoop/HCatalog/Hudi). Understanding of the Big Data landscape.
Warehouse Architectures (Star Schema/Snowflake/Vaults/Lakes)
Familiarity with AWS and Cloud Formation or Terraform
Data Modelling
ETL Best Practices
Passionate about creatively solving business problems.
Effectively prioritize and execute tasks in a high-pressure environment.
The ability to non-emotionally coach and mentor others.
The ability to not participate in 'techno-arrogant' conversation.
Meet multiple, challenging deadlines while communicating expectations clearly.
Physical Demands and Working Conditions
Must be able to work well with people.
Ability to operate a computer and work at a desk for extended periods of time.
Ability to communicate effectively in writing, in person, over the telephone and in e-mail.
Why Work Here?

#WhyWorkAnywhereElse

#ExceptionalTeamCulture

MasterControl is a place where Exceptional Teams come together to do their best work. Hiring Exceptional Teams, including the best talent in our industry, is a core value of ours. MasterControl employees are surrounded by intelligent, motivated individuals every day. We like to call it #TheBestTeamOnThePlanet.

We value every employee and their contribution to what makes MasterControl successful. We give right back to the employee through a generous benefits package, great flexibility, and continuous opportunities for advancement.

Not only do we hire Exceptional Teams, but we work hard to keep them here by developing and challenging their skillsets, encouraging professional development and growth, and offering a culture that can't be found elsewhere. Which is why we say - #WhyWorkAnywhereElse?

To put it simply, working at MasterControl is fun, challenging, and rewarding. From our Fitness Clubs to our awards programs, from our company parties to our competitive benefits, you can't really go wrong. MasterControl could be your next (and last) career move!

We are growing quickly and always looking for talented individuals to add to #TheBestTeamOnThePlanet!

Here are some of the benefits MasterControl employees enjoy:
Generous PTO package of three weeks, increasing after just three years of employment
Competitive compensation with annual merit increase reviews
100% medical premium coverage (yes, you read that right!)
Dental/Vision Plans
401k Plan
Employer Paid Life Insurance Policy ($50K)
Great Flexibility
Wellness Programs (every employee gets a Fitbit!)
Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis.

Job Posted by ApplicantPro",4.0,MasterControl,"Salt Lake City, UT",-1,201 to 500 Employees,27,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,UT,5219,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
909,909,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Job Title

Data Scientist
Summary
As a key member of our team at RiverStone, you will be collaborating with different engineering and operations teams and leading development machine learning solutions for a variety of tasks and projects. You will be responsible for delivering projects from end-to-end: problem statement and conceptualization, proof-of-concept, and participation in final deployment. You will also perform ad-hoc statistical and data science analyses. Our ideal candidates are smart, creative, analytical thinkers with attention to detail. You will also work closely with data engineers, developers and modeling analysts to generate seamless business solutions. You will be expected to present results of analyses to a wide range of audiences including executives.
Essential Functions
Collaborate with multiple business and information technology units to understand company needs and propose solutions
Implement new statistical or other mathematical methodologies as needed for specific models or analysis.
Organize and synthesize data into actionable business decisions, focused on insights.
Related Functions:
Establishes and maintains effective working relationships, both internally and externally
Maintains and communicates on a regular basis the progress against department goals/objectives and priorities to Director of Data Science and Innovation
Compile, review, verify and analyze related external and internal insurance data including completed models for benchmarking of results
Organizational
Develops creative ideas and solutions to real time business problems and/or business opportunities; takes reasonable, calculated risks even if failure is possible.
Empowers self and teammates to continuously improve RiverStones business processes/ systems and develops and escalates ideas and solutions.
Consistently delivers superior customer service to both internal and external business partners.
Demonstrates alignment with RiverStones Commitments.
Prioritizes and organizes work in self-directed manner.
Attains and maintains knowledge of assigned department.
Performs other duties as required, including supporting and coordinating with other department colleagues.
Required Skills
Ability to tell meaningful stories with data.
Minimum four years of proven hands-on experience applying machine learning techniques to build models integrated into applications.
Strong working knowledge of machine learning/data mining algorithms (deep learning, classification, clustering, etc), experience with Image Analysis/Computer Vision is a plus.
Understand algorithms (be able to tweak them when needed) as well as infrastructure that enables fast iterations
Strong software development skills with proficiency in Python and R. Experienced user of libraries such as scikit-learn, scipy, R, NetworkX, Spacy, and NLTK.
Good understanding of deep learning algorithms and workflows, and experience with CNTK, Caffe, MXNet or TensorFlow is a plus.
Experience in Hadoop, Spark, Hive, Cassandra, Kafka and NoSQL databases is a plus
Familiarity with SQL programing
Experience
3+ years experience applying machine learning techniques to real business problems.
Property & Casualty Insurance experience encouraged, but not required

Required Education

Master of Applied Math, Machine Learning, Data Science, Statistics, Operations Research or related fields
Preferred Education or Certification

PhD of Applied Math, Machine Learning, Data Science, Statistics, Operations Research or related fields
Supervisory Role

None
Travel

Minimal, less than 10%
Work Environment / Physical Demands

This position operates in a professional cubicle based collaborative environment and must have the ability to timely produce thorough, accurate work with many competing demands, deadlines, and distractions. The position uses standard equipment such as phones, computers, copiers/printers and filing cabinets. Noise level is moderate. While this is a largely sedentary role, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear; stand; walk; bend; use hands to handle or feel; and reach with hands and arms. On occasion the individual must be able to lift and transport boxes weighing up to 30 pounds.

Other Duties (Disclaimer Statement)

RiverStone retains the right to change or assign other duties to this position as needed, OR

Other duties or responsibilities may change or be assigned as needed.
Core Competencies

32.) Learning on the Fly: Learns quickly when facing new problems; a relentless and versatile learner; open to change; analyzes both successes and failures for clues to improvement; experiments and will try anything to find solutions; enjoys the challenge of unfamiliar tasks; quickly grasps the essence and the underlying structure of anything.

51.) Problem Solving: Uses rigorous logic and methods to solve difficult problems with effective solutions; probes all fruitful sources for answers; can see hidden problems; is excellent at honest analysis; looks beyond the obvious and doesnt stop at the first answers.

52.) Process Management: Good at figuring out the processes necessary to get things done; knows how to organize people and activities; understands how to separate and combine tasks into efficient flow; knows what to measure and how to measure it; can see opportunities for synergy and integration where others cant; can simplify complex processes; gets more out of fewer resources.

56.) Sizing Up People: Is a good judge of talent; after reasonable exposure, can articulate the strengths and limitations of people inside or outside the organization; can accurately project what people are likely to do across a variety of situations.

22.) Ethics and Values: Adheres to an appropriate (for the setting) and effective set of core values and beliefs during both good and bad times; acts in line with those values; rewards the right values and disapproves of others; practices what he/she preaches.

61.) Technical Learning: Picks up on technical things quickly; can learn new skills and knowledge; is good at learning new industry, company, product, or technical knowledge like internet technology; does well in technical courses and seminars.

65.) Managing Vision and Purpose: Communicates a compelling and inspired vision or sense of core purpose; talks beyond today; talks about possibilities; is optimistic; creates mileposts and symbols to rally support behind the vision; makes the vision sharable by everyone; can inspire and motivate entire units or organizations.

14.) Creativity: Comes up with a lot of new and unique ideas; easily makes connections among previously unrelated notions; tends to be seen as original and value-added in brainstorming settings.

35.) Managing and Measuring Work: Clearly assigns responsibility for tasks and decisions; sets clear objectives and measures; monitors process, progress, and results; designs feedback loops into work.",3.0,The RiverStone Group,"San Diego, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CA,6911,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,1,0,1
910,910,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Trace Data is developing a ground breaking product to help companies monitor and secure their data. We're integrating the world of security, observability and connectivity. We're looking for people with a strong background or interest in building successful products and systems; you're comfortable in dealing with lots of moving pieces; you have exquisite attention to detail; and love learning new technologies and systems.

As our Data Scientist, you will:
Develop large scale machine learning algorithms that support monitoring, privacy and security capabilities.
Own the machine learning algorithms that power core features in the product such as the identification of sensitive data, automated data classification and anomaly detection using unsupervised and deep learning techniques ranging from computer vision algorithms for pattern recognition to variational auto-encoders to NLP.
Design, build, and launch efficient & reliable new data models, schemas and pipelines to enable analysis, modeling and machine learning.
Partner with product managers, designers, and engineers to prototype and productize data mining features.
Advise on best practices and statistical methods for measuring and evaluating experiments.
You may be fit for this role if you:
Have experience of building products from the ground up.
Have a Bachelor's/Master's degree or higher in a technical field such as Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Operations Research, Math, Physics or Engineering.
Have a deep theoretical understanding of modern machine learning algorithms, statistical models or optimization.
Have experience with data tools such as Python, R, SAS, SQL, etc and strong skills in data analysis, data visualization and engineering.
Have the ability to own your modeling work from model development all the way to launching into production with minimal help from engineers.
Have experience with MapReduce, Spark, Hive, HBase, Google BigQuery, BigTable is a plus. Experience ML frameworks like Tensorflow, PyTorch, Spark MLlib, XGBoost, and Scikit-Learn is a plus.
You're a strong communicators; explaining complex technical concepts to product managers, data analysts, and other engineers shouldn't be a problem for you.
About Trace Data

Trace Data is an early stage startup founded in 2019 and headquartered in Oakland, California. We're backed by top tier investors including Accel and Kleiner Perkins.

We're a highly cross-functional organization and encourage as much collaboration as possible. We have a culture of transparency that we carry through to internal communication, ensuring everyone has the information they need to make great decisions. We value humility, respect and diversity. We look for people who are curious, want to grow and have impact every day.

Trace Data provides equal employment opportunities (EEO). All applicants are considered without regards to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, or sexual orientation.",3.9,Trace Data,"Oakland, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,20,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CA,3029,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,1
913,913,Data Scientist I,$89k-$111k,"Cars.com is one of Chicago's original tech companies. Our online platform makes it easier for consumers to shop for, sell and service their cars. With our expert content, mobile app features, millions of new and used vehicle listings, a comprehensive set of research tools and the largest database of consumer reviews in the industry, Cars.com offers innovative products to connect consumers with dealers across the country.

Data is the driver for our future at Cars. We are looking for Data Scientists (at various levels) to join our core Machine Learning group. This team is responsible to improve shopping experience, optimize sales and marketing pipelines and build measurement strategies. You'll work with various teams like Analytics, Engineering, Product, Marketing and Sales to drive business value.

on a typical day you will:
Work with senior members to build and deploy machine learning models
Support full iteration of data driven product feature development from requirement gathering, algorithm design, production implementation to experimentation and measurement
Pivot between analysis, model building and programing tasks to identify opportunities for model performance and code execution improvements
Communicate modeling methodologies and analytical findings to business stakeholders
Stay up-to-date with latest technology trends and publish research articles on science and innovations
requirements:
BS in statistics, econometrics, machine-learning, applied mathematics or related quantitative field
Knowledge of common machine learning algorithms, and ability to identify the right algorithms to experiment with for different problems
Familiarity with python/R/scala/julia
Experience with relational databases / SQL
Ability to communicate technical findings to non technical audience
preferred:
Eager to learn: blogging, portfolio of passion projects or involvement in Kaggle, open source and any other data science/engineering community
Knowledge of how to work with different types of data such as text, image, audio etc.
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

#LI-LB",3.2,Cars.com,Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,22,Company - Public,other_industries,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,Remote,2291,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
914,914,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Chicago, IL
Posted 4 weeks ago

The Process Monitoring, Automation and Control (PMAC) team is responsible for driving the development and implementation of advanced analytics and control solutions that deliver value for today and build capability for tomorrow.
As a member of PMAC, this role will have the opportunity to work closely with the IT organization to
develop and implement Advanced Analytics, AI, APC and IIoT solutions/capabilities in manufacturing
settings to achieve actionable insights and enable continued improvement for pharmaceutical
manufacturing and quality operations.
Responsibilities
• You will contribute to the development of the multiple use cases across manufacturing operations,
leveraging IIOT and analytics, in areas such as energy management, predictive maintenance, production
scheduling and process optimization.
• Development and implementation of analytic models and tools using advanced analytics, machine
learning and artificial intelligence;
• Work with the IIoT developers to integrate predictive/prescriptive analytics with the IIoT platform to
achieve visibility, predictability and learning across multiple automation layers from process to plant and
to enterprise
• Understand Advanced Analytics approaches in other businesses;
Qualifications
• Bachelor’s Degree or higher in Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Engineering and/or Computer Science
• Hands-on experience in data science, advanced analytics, multivariate data analysis, machine learning,
artificial intelligence, and familiarity with related open source libraries (e.g. Tensor Flow, AWS ML)
• Proficient in one or more of the following programming environments: Python (preferred), R, Matlab,
PMML, JAVA, Spark
• Familiarity with deep Learning, Neural Networks, Natural Language Processing or related fields
• Experience with cloud-based analytics platforms
• Experience with ThingWorx IIoT platform preferred
• Familiarity with industrial process control system, operations management system and/or SAP is a plus
• Pharmaceutical experience preferred but not necessary
• Independent, self-motivated personality with excellent oral and written communication skills
• Ability to work collaboratively in diverse cross-functional teams on innovative solutions and tools with
an open attitude towards fast learning

To apply for this job email your details to suda@sutoer.com",4.7,Sutoer,"Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,IL,2378,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
915,915,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Data Scientist (Mid)

Education Required:

Bachelors with 8 years of experience.

Required Experience:
Provide onsite data science support to advance Latin America and Global drug trend analysesin support ofthe Consolidated Counterdrug Database (CCDB)
Conduct data entry into the digital foundation in counternarcotics data Artificial Intelligence ( AI), Machine Learning (ML), data mining algorithms, probability modeling, and other scientific techniques to correlate complex, technical findings into graphical, written, visual and verbal narrative products on trends of intelligence information
Apply technical expertise to leverage inhouse tools such as Rand Python scripts to generate insights into existing data stores, to include CCDB
Employ knowledge of existing and emerging "" big data"" processing tools and techniques useful in delivering strategic insights to policy makers in the counterdrug mission
Contribute to identifying new classified and unclassified data stores of massive size and relevance to the counternarcotics mission to enhance CCDB data enrichment efforts or provide unique analytic insights into counterdrug issues
Engage in exploratory analysis and rapid iteration techniques of large volumes of data to quickly derive intelligence
Prepare products to describe and document findings and activities
Identify and evaluate a wide range of existing methods, models, and algorithms to develop more accurate and/or objective quantitative analysis approaches for CCDB data completeness, accuracy and consistency
Clearly articulate opportunities, risks and assumptions with applied methodologies. Communicate findings to a wide variety of customers, in both written and verbal formats; with the ability to communicate complex information in laymen's terms
Participate in special projects / surge support as required
** Please note this position is contingent upon award **

Company Overview:

BTS Software Solutions is a Service Disabled Veteran Owned Small Business who are community-focused innovators who transform ideas into technology to serve people. We recognize that innovation is only valuable when applied towards a needed solution. Technology has no value without the hard work to turn ideas into reality. Our roots are in helping save Soldiers lives through technology. We bring that ethos to serving our community. We create solutions that touch people's lives - products to communicate, to connect companies with customers, to stay informed, to save lives, and to enhance lives.

We have a small company persona with a large company ethos and capabilities; we create elegant solutions for complex problems that will enrich peoples lives. We offer one of the best benefits packages in the industry: Competitive health benefits package, PTO, 401K matching and vested from day one to name just a few of our benefits and perks.

BTS Software Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE). All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.",4.9,BTS Software Solutions,"Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,9,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,DC,3253,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
918,918,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Overview


This data scientist position will utilize analytical, statistical, and programming skills to collect, analyze, and interpret large datasets. The role requires the ability to work with a variety of stakeholders and functional teams to uncover data-based insights to deliver improved business outcomes.

Responsibilities
Research, design and prototype robust and scalable models based on machine learning, data mining, and statistical modeling to answer key business problems
Build tools and support structures needed to analyze data, perform elements of data cleaning, feature selection and feature engineering and organize experiments in conjunction with best practices
Work with the data science team and business groups to ensure models can be implemented as part of a web application framework (R/Shiny)
Keep current with the latest developments in the field by continuous learning and adapting new methods relevant to the problems at hand
Qualifications


EDUCATION & EXPERIENCE MINIMUMS:
BS in Statistics, Computer Science or other related field
5+ years of experience building and deploying machine learning models
Strong skills in statistical application prototyping and engineering with expert knowledge in R development
Deep knowledge of fundamentals of machine learning, data mining and statistical predictive modeling, and extensive experience applying these methods to real world problems
Ability and inclination to work in multi-disciplinary environments, and desire to see ideas realized in practice
2+ years of experience using SQL
EDUCATION & EXPERIENCE PREFERRED:
Desired interdisciplinary skills include big data technologies, ETL, statistics and causal inference, Deep Learning, modeling and simulation
Experience with business intelligence tools such as Tableau/Shiny
Automotive, chemistry/chemical, or petroleum additive related academic background or work experience
For NewMarket or Afton employees, an appropriate combination of experiences that will support the required skill base may replace one or more of the specific experience requirements above.

SKILLS/ABILITIES:

· Decision Making - Decision making in a timely manner based upon a mixture of analysis, wisdom, experience, and judgment; sometimes with incomplete information, under tight deadlines and pressure; while based upon appropriate risk and authority

· Business Insight - The understanding of the basis for our business model and how that is realized in the market. The understanding of how business and operations are intimately linked. The ability to utilize information, practices & trends, affecting the business to engage and drive new strategies and tactics work in the marketplace.

· Analysis and Problem Solving - Solves difficult problems with effective solutions; asks good questions and questions all likely sources for answers; can solve complex problems and recognize complex patterns; utilizing all appropriate tools to reach a robust answer.

· Communication - The ability to communicate information clearly and effectively in an engaging and convincing manner.

· Managing Performance - Possessing the drive and focus to achieve challenging goals.

· Collaboration and Networking - The ability to work in and across Afton's organizational matrix to achieve business objectives, via engaging and rewarding interactions. Through this network provide support, exert influence. Influencing without authority.

· Project Management - The ability to manage tasks and activities and achieve their completion within the agreed framework, across regional and organizational boundaries

· Innovation - The openness to new ideas and the ability to generate breakthrough solutions. Can develop, seek out, critically assess and implement new and value adding concepts.

· Dealing with Uncertainty - Can effectively cope with change; can shift gears comfortably; can decide and act without having the total picture; isn’t upset when things are up in the air; doesn’t have to finish things before moving on; can comfortably handle risk and uncertainty.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to the individual’s race, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, religion, age, disability, genetic information, status as a military veteran or any other characteristic protected by applicable law.",4.2,NewMarket Corporation,"Richmond, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,133,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,VA,4429,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
920,920,"Data Scientist, Analytics",$89k-$111k,"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started.Were looking for Data Scientists to work on our core and business products (ex. Instagram, Messaging, Growth, Engagement, Ads) to help shape the future of what we build at Facebook. You will enjoy working with one of the richest data sets in the world, cutting edge technology, and the ability to see your insights turned into real products on a regular basis. The perfect candidate will have a background in a quantitative or technical field, will have experience working with large data sets, and will have some experience in data-driven decision making. You are focused on results, a self-starter, and have demonstrated success in using analytics to drive the understanding, growth, and success of a product. This position is based full time in our Menlo Park, CA office.

Responsibilities:

Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, data mining, and the presentation of data to see beyond the numbers and understand how our users interact with both our consumer and business products
Partner with Product and Engineering teams to solve problems and identify trends and opportunities
Inform, influence, support, and execute our product decisions and product launches
The Data Scientist Analytics role has work across the following four areas:
Product Operations
Forecasting and setting product team goals
Designing and evaluating experiments
Monitoring key product metrics, understanding root causes of changes in metrics
Building and analyzing dashboards and reports
Building key data sets to empower operational and exploratory analysis
Evaluating and defining metrics
Exploratory Analysis
Proposing what to build in the next roadmap
Understanding ecosystems, user behaviors, and long-term trends
Identifying new levers to help move key metrics
Building models of user behaviors for analysis or to power production systems
Product Leadership
Influencing product teams through presentation of data-based recommendations
Communicating state of business, experiment results, etc. to product teams
Spreading best practices to analytics and product teams
Data Infrastructure
Working in Hadoop and Hive primarily, sometimes MySQL, Oracle, and Vertica
Automating analyses and authoring pipelines via SQL and python based ETL framework
Mininum Qualifications:

2+ years experience doing quantitative analysis
BA/BS in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics or other technical field
Experience in SQL or other programming languages
Development experience in any scripting language (PHP, Python, Perl, etc.)
Ability to communicate the results of analyses with product and leadership teams to influence the strategy of the product
Understanding of statistics (e.g., hypothesis testing, regressions)
Experience manipulating data sets through statistical software (ex. R, SAS) or other methods
Preferred Qualifications:

Advanced degrees
Experience with distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop)
Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.

Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,Facebook,"Menlo Park, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,16,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CA,4428,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
921,921,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Data Scientist
Location


Tysons Corner, VA

Job Code

229

# of Openings

1

Apply Now

Ridgeline International is looking for a Data Scientist to help us boldly innovate through data.

This is a strategic hire. You should be curious by design, think of yourself as a data artist and storyteller, have an ownership, solution and action mindset, can impact the cross functional team that moves fast with intent and purpose. We are particularly interested in your portfolio of data innovation in the geo-political, national issue or brand campaigns.

If this is you then then we should talk.

What you’ll do:
Build data products that solve hard problems and reveal opportunity through creative sourcing, model development and visualization.
What you’ll need:
Four or more years of experience in a data science role, with a concentration on social sciences, demographic analysis and anthropology.
Experience with creation of visual data displays.
Expert in Python; R; Scala
Nice to Haves:
MA in Applied Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, or related field; or experience. Self-taught coders are welcome. Bring your portfolio and impress us.
Credentials in machine learning, AI, probabilities, statistical inference and linear models
Familiarity with Unix shell scripting
Visualization to tell a story and explain a point
Here are some Perks of being a Ridgeliner!
20% 401K contribution regardless of employee match
Flexible PTO + Holidays
Opportunities for professional development to attend conferences, classes, and workshops.
$1,000 every month for discretionary team building stipend.
$2,500 Annual Clothing Allowance
$2,000 Hobby Allowance
Medical, dental, vision, disability, life insurance
Free daily snacks & fancy sparkling water and nitro cold brew on tap
Company-wide events, including team building, holiday party, and off-sites.
Free gym membership
Get the technology you want to do your job
Flexible work schedules",4.7,Ridgeline International,"Tysons Corner, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,5,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,VA,1934,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
922,922,Senior Data Engineer,$89k-$111k,"As a Senior Data Engineer at Guild, you'll work across teams to help us build the next generation of data products. You'll work with world class data engineers to design and build the scalable, robust, and high-quality data infrastructure and data pipelines needed to support growth of our education network and SaaS platform. Ultimately, you'll help change the landscape for how we think about delivering education products to learners across the country by building a digital solution that connects students, employers, and universities to deliver education at an affordable price to students.

A day in our open, collaborative workspace might look like:
Designing, building, and expanding Guild's backend data infrastructure, including data pipelines, ETL, data ingestion, data APIs, and data warehouses
Building APIs that can be used internally or externally to serve crucial information across systems, partners, and teams
Translating complex business requirements into usable, scalable data models and systems
Mentoring other engineers and analysts on the team and sharing technical knowledge to enable others to be more effective at their jobs
In this role, you'll expand your expertise by:
Evolving our data products now and in the future by contributing to our backend data architecture
Working in an agile team environment with a high performing engineering team
Taking on a cross-functional role that will expose you to the ins and outs of Guild (working with our Product, Design, Client Success, and Student Services teams)
Receiving feedback through our learning-focused, twice annual Structured Growth Conversations
You'll know if you're successful by:
Choosing and leveraging the latest technologies in data engineering to automate data integration and loading, such as, Amazon Redshift, Redis, Java, Scala, Spark, Kafka, Python, S3 and PostgreSQL
Leveraging your experience to design solutions that will be the backbone of a highly scalable, reusable, backend data infrastructure
Ensuring our data is clean, accurate, and secure
Thriving in fast-paced and scaling environment
You'll join a team:
From diverse backgrounds – from traditional higher education, to athletic coaches, to politicians, to mental health professionals (and more!)
Of learners & problem-solvers dedicated to our dual mission of changing education in America while building a successful, high-growth company
Committed to building a diverse, equitable, and inclusive environment that you'd support every day
What you'll add to Guild – as an individual and part of the broader team:
Experience building data pipelines, custom ETL processes and data warehouses
Experience with one or more programming languages such as Java, Python, or Scala
Expertise in database technologies such as Redshift, PostgreSQL, Redis, and working with large sets of data
Experience deploying solutions to cloud technology services such as Amazon Web Services
Experience improving software products through engineering best practices such as refactoring, reusability, TDD and continuous integration
A proven ability to thrive in changing environments by having a fast, flexible, cooperative work style
Strong communication skills and the ability to effectively explain technical concepts to other engineers, analysts, product managers, and stakeholders.
Experience with BI tools such as Looker, Tableau, Kibana, Chart.io, etc.
Basic experience in statistical analysis, text processing, and machine learning
Passion for higher education and our mission – Guild is pioneering a new path for education as a benefit in a complicated and regulated space – success means quickly and effectively adapting your expertise
A drive to work hard and plan for how you can refresh/recharge while working in a startup
Something else? Wonderful, we're curious to learn more about you!
About Guild:

Guild is increasing economic mobility for working adults by partnering with the largest employers in the country to offer education as a benefit to their employees via our marketplace of nonprofit universities and education institutions. Guild's proprietary technology platform facilitates the administration of this innovative benefit and our team of coaches helps each employee navigate the path back to school, providing individualized support from day one through program completion.

We also just became the latest female-led company to hit a $1billion valuation and the only B-corp with those qualifications. Our Series D round was led by Ken Chenault, General Catalyst Partners chairman and former CEO of AMEX, and joined by Emerson Collective, LeadEdge Capital, and Iconiq.

Guild Education is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.",3.5,Guild Education,"Denver, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,5,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CO,4775,1,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
923,923,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Pocket Outdoor Media is looking for a full time Data Scientist eager to put their data science and problem solving skills towards building the personalized fitness platform of the future. You'll join the energetic team in our Boulder office and develop machine learning-based algorithms and models powering our cutting-edge platform utilizing large, diverse fitness datasets. You'll receive competitive pay, benefits package (including medical, dental, vision), 401k, commuter benefits, and equity.

What you'll do
Lead development of custom predictive and prescriptive algorithms interfacing with large data sets, based on principles from statistics, machine learning, and operations research
Create integrated solutions using Python modules (including Pandas, Numpy, Scipy, SQLAlchemy, and Tensorflow), PostgreSQL, and other tools as needed
Work closely with engineers to help evolve proof of concept systems into production at scale
Work the product development team to define desired requirements and capabilities
Perform research as needed to identify the latest techniques from technical literature and apply them to relevant product features
Identify and promote the use of new technologies, toolkits, and frameworks, areas of inquiry, ways of working, methods and approaches in Computer Science, Artificial Intelligence, Software and Research Engineering
What you'll bring
A degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Applied Statistics, Operations Research, Computational Biology, or a related analytical field
3+ years experience of statistical programming experience, including development of applied algorithms in production
Demonstrated ability to develop algorithms in Python 3.x using Python libraries like Tensorflow, Keras, pandas, and numpy
Detailed knowledge of computer science including data structures, data modeling, distributed systems, and software design methods
Strong understanding of statistical inference, regression and classification, and the ability to explain rationale underlying data science-related decisions to a broader audience
Knowledge of current best-practices, tools, and technologies for implementing machine learning pipelines
When applying

If possible, include references algorithms you've developed and/or research that you have published demonstrating your Data Scientist prowess. Be prepared to describe at least one data science project (thought process, planning, technical implementation) during your interview.",-1.0,Pocket Outdoor Media,"Boulder, CO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,other_industries,Media,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CO,2463,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
924,924,Senior Data Scientist - Telecommute,$89k-$111k,"Optum Payment Integrity Analytics is looking to expand and is seeking a Senior Data Scientist to join our team and help us reach our goals of accurate and effortless payments of claims through advanced analytics and machine learning. You should be an exceptional disciplined and self-motivated Data Scientist with predictive modeling and advanced analytics experience and a passion for working with healthcare data, experience using various computational approaches, and a portfolio of projects you can show and talk about.

Youll enjoy the flexibility to telecommute* from anywhere within the U.S. as you take on some tough challenges.

Primary Responsibilities:
Improve and extend the analytic methods in our products
Work alongside other data scientists, engineers, and project managers to design and implement models and experiments from end to end, including data ingestion and preparation, feature engineering, analysis and modeling, model deployment, performance tracking and documentation
Conduct hands-on data analysis and predictive analytics on large datasets
Effectively communicate complex technical results to business partners
Support and drive analytic efforts around machine learning and innovation
Work with a great deal of autonomy to find solutions to complex problems
Youll be rewarded and recognized for your performance in an environment that will challenge you and give you clear direction on what it takes to succeed in your role as well as provide development for other roles you may be interested in.

Required Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree or higher in Applied Mathematics, Physics, Computer Science, Statistics or related technical field
3+ years of hands-on experience in in developing analytics with machine learning, deep learning, NLP, and/or other related modeling techniques
Strong proficiency in advanced data science tools such as R, Python, SQL, Spark and H2O
Familiarity with wrangling large datasets with big data tools such as Hadoop, Hive and Spark
Experience applying computational algorithms and statistical methods to structured and unstructured data
Experience combining analytic methods with advanced data visualizations using, for example, Tableau, Shiny or D3
Expert ability to breakdown and clearly define problems
Strong ability to communicate highly technical results to a diverse audience
Careers with Optum. Here's the idea. We built an entire organization around one giant objective; make the health system work better for everyone. So when it comes to how we use the world's large accumulation of health-related information, or guide health and lifestyle choices or manage pharmacy benefits for millions, our first goal is to leap beyond the status quo and uncover new ways to serve. Optum, part of the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, brings together some of the greatest minds and most advanced ideas on where health care has to go in order to reach its fullest potential. For you, that means working on high performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter. Optum, incredible ideas in one incredible company and a singular opportunity to do your life's best work.SM

*All Telecommuters will be required to adhere to UnitedHealth Groups Telecommuter Policy.

Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: UnitedHealth Group is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.

UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.

Job Keywords: Senior Data Scientist, Telecommute, Telecommuter",3.4,Unitedhealth Group,"Eden Prairie, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,43,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,MN,3866,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
925,925,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Job Description


Job #: 1088245

Please send resume to Kevin Reed at kreed@apexsystems.com

Data Scientist (Big Data)

San Antonio, TX (No remote work)

Must Have Top Secret Clearance w/ SCI Eligibility

Direct Hire to Client

Ability to develop analytics for multiple cyber weapon systems with many different infrastructure and end-point devices. Ability to incorporate predictive, descriptive, and presumptive modeling; machine learning; artificial intelligence into analytics. Must be able to code proficiently in one or more of the following languages: Python, R, Scala, Spark, and Maven. Develop algorithms in one or more of the following Machine Learning areas: anomaly detection, one/few-shot learning, deep learning, unsupervised feature learning, ensemble methods, probabilistic graphical models, reinforcement learning. Ability to develop analytics based upon the Mitre ATT&CK Matrix or other applicable CS&D framework to discover, identify, characterize, and/or create signatures for cyberspace threat activity. Ability to assist in the development and implementation of a data analytics program. Develop robust documentation and comprehensive user manuals for all developed projects

Original Hire Document for data scientist below:

Job Responsibilities:

· Perform big data analysis on information technology infrastructure and end-point devices

· Customer outreach and engagement

· Problem solving

· Time management

· Collaborate with others

· Mission focused

· Deliver findings

· Accept and assess customer data, dashboard, requirements

· Identify new ways to visualize and analyze data

· Develop analytics to identify anomalous activity based on customer requirements

· Perform hunt operations identifying anomalous activity

· Produce reports based on misconfigurations and/or anomalous activity discovered through analysis

Knowledge/Skills Ability:

Required:

· Ability to analyze and assess software development or data acquisition requirements and determine optimum, cost-effective solutions.

· Proficiency in one or more big data programming languages, such as R, Python, Scala, or Spark and Maven.

· Experience working with a hybrid team of analysts, visualization experts, engineers, and developers to conduct research, and build and deploy complex, but easy-to-use analytical platforms.

· Previous experience performing research in Data Analytics or big data.

· Be Director of Central Intelligence Directives 6/4 eligible (Top Secret) with a current Single Scope Background Investigation (SSBI)

Minimum Experience/Education:

· At least one (1) of the following:

· One (1) year experience in cyberspace operations

· IAT Level 1 per DoD 8140 (Net+, Sec+, etc.)

· Experience on National/Service cyber weapon system/platform within last five years

Highly Desired:

· Education/ Certifications:

· 4+ years of experience in data analytics or quantitative intelligence analysis

· Four (4) years of experience in an intelligence field at a tactical or operational level

· DoD 8570 IAT related BA/BS degree

EEO Employer

Apex Systems is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate or allow discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, creed, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding, or related medical conditions), age, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, genetic information, registered domestic partner status, marital status, disability, status as a crime victim, protected veteran status, political affiliation, union membership, or any other characteristic protected by law. Apex will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 844-463-6178.",3.8,Apex Systems,"San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,25,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,TX,4022,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
926,926,Data Engineer II,$89k-$111k,"Job Description


Here at Discount Tire, we celebrate the spirit of our people with extraordinary pride and enthusiasm. As America’s largest independent tire retailer, specializing in tires & wheels, we have over 1,000 store locations and continue to grow every year. Our consistent growth over the last 60 years, the loyalty of our customers and passion of our people makes Discount Tire a great place to work.

Under general supervision, Data Engineer II supports Discount Tire’s Data Science and Business Intelligence teams in developing advanced analytic solutions that support the enterprise’s key strategic initiatives. This role is responsible for developing, testing and maintaining our cloud-based analytics platform, including data pipelines, Enterprise Data Warehouse and other Big Data technologies. Embodies IOOGA (Integrity, Our People, Our Customers, Growth and Attitude)

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Develops high performance distributed data warehouse, distributed analytic systems and cloud architectures.
Participates in the development of relational and non-relational data models focusing on design for optimal storage and retrieval
Develops, tests and debugs batch and streaming, data pipelines (ETL/ELT) to populate databases and object stores from multiple disparate data sources; provides recommendations to improve data reliability, efficiency and quality.
Design and develop scalable solutions leveraging using technologies including Docker and Kubernetes
Working along side data scientists, supports the development and promotion of high-performance algorithms, models and prototypes.
Implements data quality metrics, standards, guidelines; automates data quality checks / routines as part of data processing frameworks; validates flow of information.
Ensures that Data Warehousing and Big Data systems meet business requirements and industry practices; including but not limited to, automation of system builds, security requirements, performance requirements and logging/monitoring requirements.
Troubleshoots data and performance related issues; implements adjustments, documents root cause and corrective measure; provides recommendations to stakeholders.
Documents technical specifications and participates with peers in design and code review sessions.
Employ a variety of scripting languages and tools to integrate data from multiple disparate data sources.
Use basic statistical and visualization techniques to analyze the resulting data sets of your processes
Learn and stay abreast of new technologies that can improve the efficacy of the analytics and data science teams
Stays current on the latest industry technologies, trends and strategies.
Other duties as assigned.

Job Requirements


Qualifications:
This position requires a minimum of five years of progressive database development and integration experience.
Strong knowledge of logical and physical data modeling is necessary, including but not limited to entity design, relationships, indexing and star schemas.
Ability to translate a logical data model into a relational or non-relational solution is necessary.
Understanding of multiple relational (RDMS) and non-relational (NoSQL) data platforms is needed.
SQL experience is required.
Scripting knowledge with SQL and Python.
Experience in SQL tuning, indexing, partitioning, data access patterns and scaling strategies is needed.
Experience with data integrations and data processing for business intelligence and analytics workloads is required.
Experience with AWS S3 or other distributed object stores, AWS Redshift, Elastic MapReduce a plus.
Hands-on experience in database development using views, SQL scripts and transformations is needed.
Proficient with Microsoft office, including skills with Word and Excel, is necessary.
Experience working with large complex data sets.
Understanding of Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) methodologies such as Agile and Waterfall is needed.
Proven analytical problem solving and decision making skills is critical.
Ability to communicate across all levels of the organization is necessary; must be able to clearly articulate technical ideas to a non-technical audience both verbally and in writing.
Ability to work independently and in a team is vital.
Customer service skills including the ability to manage and respond to different customer situations while maintaining a positive and friendly attitude is essential.
The ability to multi-task, and manage multiple projects to meet various deadlines simultaneously is required.
The ability to work efficiently and accurately under pressure, meet deadlines and present a professional demeanor is essential.
In addition, troubleshooting and organizational skills with a can-do attitude and the ability to adjust to changing requirements are essential.
Educational Requirements:

This position requires a Bachelors Degree in Computer Science, Computer Information Systems or related or equivalent experience.

Data or cloud related certifications are a plus.

Work Days:

Normal work days are Monday through Friday. Occasional Saturdays and Sundays may be necessary.

Work Hours:

Normal work hours are 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. Additional hours may be necessary.

Apply
Not ready to",4.0,Discount Tire,"Scottsdale, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,60,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,AZ,5242,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
927,927,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Job Purpose:

The Data Scientist reporting to the Chief Information Officer will be responsible for driving the scientific use of Global Supply Chain Data to accelerate speed to market as well as provide dashboards and predictive analytics to clients. Additionally, this role will assist in advancing and shaping Ancillare’s supply chain data strategy through the due diligence on new data providers/vendors and informational support for data surrounding a range of Therapeutic Areas.

Duties and Responsibilities:
Work as the lead data strategist, identifying and integrating new datasets that can be leveraged through our product capabilities.
Work collaboratively with the engineering team to strategize and execute the development of data products.
Execute analytical experiments methodically to help solve various problems and make a true impact across various domains.
Identify relevant data sources and sets to mine for client business needs and collect large structured and unstructured datasets and variables.
Devise and utilize algorithms and models to mine big data stores, perform data and error analysis to improve models, and clean and validate data for uniformity and accuracy.
Analyze data for trends and patterns and interpret data with a clear objective in mind.
Implement analytical models into production by collaborating with software developers and machine learning engineers.
Create expert data visualization applications.
Communicate analytic solutions to stakeholders and implement improvements as needed to operational systems
Ability and desire to work a project to completion meeting and or exceeding timeline deliverables.
Demonstrate and drive the Ancillare mission, values, and strategy.
Participate and contribute positively to process improvement initiatives.
Travel as may be required.
Perform other duties as assigned.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, applied mathematics, or related discipline required. Advanced degree preferred.
7+ years’ experience in data science required.
2+ years of project management experience and/or professional certifications preferred.
Experience working with pharmaceutical and supply chain data
Minimum Requirements:
Ability to effectively communicate in English both written and verbal.
Ability to partner and successfully gain collaboration across all levels of the organization.
Demonstrated proficiency with data mining, mathematics, and statistical analysis.
Advanced pattern recognition and predictive modeling experience required.
Working experience with Excel, PowerPoint, PowerBI, SQL, and programming languages (i.e., Java/Python, SAS).
Knowledge of Hadoop and or Big Data environments a plus.
Working knowledge and experience with building and maintaining Data Warehousing, Datalakes etc.
Comfort working in a dynamic, research-oriented group with several ongoing concurrent projects.
Knowledge in the use of AI a plus.
Knowledge of BlockChain processes and implementations a big plus.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Employee Discount
Flexible Schedule
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Professional Development Assistance
Referral Program
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
8 Hour Shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Data Science: 5 years (Required)
Project Management: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Doctorate (Preferred)
Location:
Horsham, PA 19044 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.ancillare.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.1,Ancillare,"Horsham, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,14,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,PA,3711,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
928,928,Principal Data Scientist I,$89k-$111k,"JOB SUMMARY
The Principal Data Scientist I will serve as a technical lead for the experimentation data science team. This role will support experiment planning and set-up across Charter product teams including video, buyflow, and support portals and own experimentation strategy including validation development of experimentation plans, frameworks, and experimentation metrics. The individual will additionally be responsible for executing advanced analytic projects with the objectives of creating causal inferences, correlations, predictions, and recommendations for improvements to business processes, and the metrics to monitor those improvements. Requires a strong command of statistical and data science oriented techniques and algorithms as well as a demonstrated practical ability to determine where to invest time, synthesize actionable findings across diverse assignments, and present these findings to an audience with varying levels of background in analytics.

MAJOR DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Actively and consistently support all efforts to simplify and enhance the customer experience
Collaborate with stakeholders to understand product / feature plans for development and translate those plans into experimentation objectives and testable hypotheses
Assist product teams with experimental design and analyses, including development of analysis plans and ad hoc reports
Develop experimentation strategy and project plans for stakeholders and lead execution of plans involving members across multiple teams
Synthesize data from experimentation and other data sources to provide stakeholders with answers to research questions and help determine next steps for a product / feature using a data driven approach
Create and present materials communicating quantitative findings and relevant business impacts to internal and external teams as well as an executive audience
Supervise and integrate the work of junior data scientists on experimentation and data science team to produce high quality work products
Refine experimentation processes including leverage of existing data science tools and development of new tools where applicable
Identify new methodologies for advancing experimentation program, develop plans to evaluate these methodologies through simulation studies, and work with software and data engineering teams on implementation strategies
Leverage multiple data sources to produce intelligent data products that solve the needs of business and engineering for business intelligence, operational analytics, descriptive models, predictive models, diagnostic models, and prescriptive models.
Make technical decisions for the organization
Coordinate technical activities across projects and the organization
Interact with various stakeholders to understand their business needs, communicate project status and develop relationships to ensure satisfaction
Develop and deliver materials on experimentation techniques and tools to a broad set of business-intelligence, data, and analytics professionals with varied backgrounds
Exercise thought leadership and discretion in tailoring the tools, approaches, and data used to meet the needs of the particular problem
Deliver results using metrics-driven analysis, and communicating the costs and tradeoffs of ideas to stakeholders and top management
REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS
Skills/Abilities and Knowledge
Ability to read, write, speak and understand English
Able to communicate complex technical, statistical and quantitative concepts to individuals with a variety of backgrounds, explain the importance and relevance of data, and suggest solutions
Works with minimal guidance to set project plans and timelines and prioritize among multiple competing interests
Working knowledge of current industry best practices for online experimentation
Command of advanced statistical concepts including experimental design, hypothesis testing, common and more advance analytic methods
Fluency with regression modeling and the ability to develop and evaluate a model using simple and complex regression, working knowledge of correlated data analysis and ability to identify when more sophisticated ML modeling may be warranted over common approaches
Knowledge of tools to obtain, transform, and store data on Big Data and Streaming systems
Ability to design and implement ETL projects from scratch
Knowledge of tools to develop, test, and deploy production code, modify CICD pipelines and deployment scripts
Background with Cable systems and operations
Experience with Hadoop, HIVE, SPARK, and/or Snowflake
Knowledge of other relevant tools such as SAS, SPSS, Alteryx, Linux
Knowledge of other relevant techniques such as text analysis and text mining
Familiarity with the open-source ecosystems surrounding R (CRAN), Python (PyPi), and/or Hadoop
Broad experience and solid theoretical foundation on the modeling process using a variety of algorithms
Data profiling, distributions, confidence intervals, hypothesis testing
Data pre-processing, exploratory data analysis using a variety of techniques
Knowledge of classification using techniques such as linear models, GLMs, and tree-based methods
Interpretation of model results, consideration of causality, treatment of multicollinearity
Strong synthesis and presentation skills
Ability to communicate results and recommendations to a wide variety of audiences including executive leadership
Understanding of data architecture, data warehouse and data marts
Demonstrated ability and desire to continually expand skill set, and learn from and teach others
Experience with other database and data store technologies, such as NoSQL, key-value, columnar, graph, and document.
Experience in receiving, converting, and cleansing big data
Program, product, or project management experience delivering analytics results
Strong background in Linux/Unix/CentOS and Windows installation and administration
Ability to identify and resolve end-to-end performance, network, server, cloud, and platform issues
Pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Keen attention to detail with the ability to effectively prioritize and execute multiple tasks
Education
Bachelors Degree in a statistics, data science, applied math or related field.

Related Work Experience
3 plus years user and system admin ownership with Linux/Unix/CentOS and Windows
10 plus years Statistical Analysis
8 plus years Business Analysis
8 plus years SQL/R/SAS Programming
2 plus years Database Design or Database Modeling

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Skills/Abilities and Knowledge
Operations-research background, in particular focused on large labor operations such as field ops, technical support, and sales
Background with cable and/ or telecommunications

Education
Masters degree in a statistics, data science, applied math or related field.

WORKING CONDITIONS
Office environment
Charter Technical Engineering Center
Highly collaborative and innovative work space
Occasional Travel",3.0,Spectrum,"Greenwood Village, Arapahoe, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,4,Subsidiary or Business Segment,other_industries,Telecommunications,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,Arapahoe,6960,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
929,929,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Bioinformatics Programmer II

17-Aug-2020

Job Code and Payroll Title
9402 Bioinformatics Programmer II

Job Summary
JOB OVERVIEW
As clinical and medical data is increasingly digitized, there is increasing opportunity to analyze this data for research purposes in a variety of ways that leverage “big data” characteristics of digital medical data.

Our clinical research effort employs novel analytic techniques, which include machine learning techniques, to identify complex patterns medical data derived from various sources - both collected through routine clinical care and expressly collected for research purposes.

Related to this goal, the Bioinformatics Programmer/Data Scientist will assist in managing, cleaning and analyzing large scale medical data using a wide variety of analytic techniques. The Data Scientist will be involved in developing software pipelines, mostly using Python, for data extraction which will need to be developed de novo to obtain data from various clinical systems or sources. Once the data is obtained, pipelines will be created to clean the data and store the data in file-systems appropriate for the size of the data at hand.

Under the supervision of the Principal Investigator (PI), the Data Scientist will also be involved in data analysis, and will be fluent in comparing a variety of techniques, including machine learning and deep learning techniques, to be able to empirically determine which approach is most suitable for the given research hypothesis and data type. This position may also include some administrative duties and will have the opportunity to participate in and lead authorship teams.

CARDIOVASCULAR RESEARCH INSTITUTE / CARDIOLOGY
The primary mission of the Cardiovascular Research Institute (CVRI), the largest organized research unit on the San Francisco campus, is to promote fundamental and clinical research on the cardiovascular and pulmonary respiratory systems and to provide opportunities for postdoctoral training in these fields.

With over 200 faculty, staff, and postdoctoral fellows, the CVRI supports faculty from a variety of departments (Medicine, Biochemistry, Biophysics, Lab Medicine, Pediatrics, Anatomy, Anesthesia, Pharmaceutical Chemistry, Physiology, Cellular and Molecular Pharmacology). The total extramural funding is $29 million annually (direct and indirect costs), with $1M in indirect cost return, and $561K in State funds. Assets include $38 million in endowment income and gifts, $3M in clinical reserves, and $5.8M in opportunity funds.

The Tison lab is also part of the Bakar Computational Health Sciences Institute and the Data Scientist will be part of the larger computational community and infrastructure.

ABOUT UCSF
The University of California, San Francisco (UCSF) is a leading university dedicated to promoting health worldwide through advanced biomedical research, graduate-level education in the life sciences and health professions, and excellence in patient care. It is the only campus in the 10-campus UC system dedicated exclusively to the health sciences.

Organization
Campus

Req Number
55681BR

Location
Mission Bay

Job Title
Data Scientist

Appointment Type
Career

Percentage
100%

Shift Length
8 Hours

Shift
Days

Work Days
Monday- Friday, 8:00 am - 5:00 pm

Required Qualifications
• Bachelor's degree in biological science, computational/programming, or related area and/or equivalent experience/training
• At least 6 months of experience in direct data management and analysis using medical and/or health-related data
• Demonstrated fluency and competency with the Python programming language, including with relevant scientific computing packages including numpy, scipy, sci-kit learn
• Experience with, or a demonstrated ability to learn and implement novel data management and machine learning-based pipelines for management of large-scale data
• Experience with, or demonstrated ability to learn and implement relevant deep learning frameworks such as TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch etc.
• Working knowledge of bioinformatics methods, data structures, statistical analysis, systems programming, and database design
• Working knowledge of databases
• Working knowledge of application and data security concepts
• Ability to lead and maintain data pipelines for real-time data acquisition from clinical systems
• Working project management skills
• Interpersonal skills in order to work with both technical and non-technical personnel at various levels in the organization
• Ability to communicate technical information in a clear and concise manner
• Ability to effectively manage time and see assigned parts of projects through to completion on deadline
• Basic consultation and communication skills
• Ability to multi-task and work well with limited supervision
• Self motivated, able to learn quickly, meet deadlines and demonstrate problem solving skills

Preferred Qualifications
• MS or greater degree in a related science or an equivalent combination of education and experience
• PhD in a field relevant to biomedical research (general biology, molecular biology, cell biology, chemistry, biomedical engineering, biomedical informatics), or computer science (computer science, machine learning, artificial intelligence) or similar
• 12 months or more of demonstrated work experience using medical and/or health-related data, or similar, including developing pipelines for obtaining data, data management and cleaning and data analysis, preferably using Python

License/Certification
n/a

Position Type
Full Time

Department Name
Cardiovascular Research Institute

Equal Employment Opportunity
The University of California San Francisco is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran or disabled status, or genetic information.",4.1,UCSF Medical Center,"San Francisco, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,113,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CA,5959,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,0
930,930,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Exciting opportunityin a thriving company that values and appreciates their employees while acknowledging their contributions!

Company Information
Serving their industry for over 45 years, this company is a leader in global life reinsurance.They deliver expert solutions in individual life reinsurance, individual living benefits reinsurance, group reinsurance, financial solutions and product development.
The firm was recognized by the Asia Insurance Review as ""Life Reinsurer of the Year"" at the 2018 Asia Insurance Industry Awards for the second consecutive year. The honor recognizes innovation, thought leadership, and actions to enhance the stability, security, and image of the Forbes Global 2000: World's Best Employers.
The firm was also ranked #97 among 500 companies in the Forbes 2018 Global 2000: World's Best Employers listing.
Benefits and Features
Skill building: this firm encourages personal & professional growth through ongoing training & skills development
Work/life balance: family friendly culture and flexible work arrangements
Career growth: Performance based compensation & competitive benefits package
Strong retirement benefits
The Role they will Play
Develop and enhance statistical models for the applications in insurance industry, including mortality, morbidity, etc.
Need to be very hands-on, needs to know how the models are built and how they work.
Serve as a client contact/consultant either internally or externally, serving as a subject matter expert.
Actively participate in other research-related initiatives.


Community Information
This opportunity is based at the corporate office in Saint Louis, Missouri.
Saint Louis offers a culture of innovation and excellence paired with historic and iconic city/sites.
With an affordable cost of living, Saint Louis is a great place to live.
Desired Background Profile:
1+ years of experience doing statistical modeling in insurance
Strong experience in R, familiar with other packages including SAS, MATLAB, Python, SQL, etc.
Master’s Degree or PHD in Statistics, Actuarial Science, Business, Finance, Economics or related field",5.0,"Kalos Consulting, Inc.","Saint Louis, MO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,MO,2114,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
933,933,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Apply

Description

Title: Data Scientist

Location: Washington, DC

Terms: Full Time

Duration: 5 years

Clearance: Currently possess or be able to favorably pass a full five (5) year Background Investigation (BI) required by CBP (e.g. Secret, Top Secret, etc.)

Travel: Occasional travel may be required.

Position Overview:

The Data Scientist will build and maintain models to support business use cases. They will work as part of the data science services team. The function of this team is to provide analytical support to address complex business questions. More specifically, the team will work with stakeholders to clearly articulate mission gap problems and process inefficiencies. The team will then suggest and implement appropriate solutions, such as data science reports or machine learning models, for the stakeholders.

Responsibilities:

• Under little or no supervision, applies expert knowledge in statistical analysis, complex data mining, and artificial intelligence to make value out of data.

• Provides consulting relating to the data mining and analysis of data from a range of sources to transform raw data into concise and actionable insights.

• Designs and implements data-driven solutions, with specific focus on advanced analytical methods, data models, and visualizations.

• Develop quantitative simulations and models to provide descriptive and predictive analytics solution recommendations.

• Identifies trends and problems through complex big data analysis.

• Maintains current in emerging tools and techniques in machine learning, statistical modeling, and analytics.

Requirements

Basic Qualifications:

• Eight (8) years relevant experience in applied data science research or big data analytics.

• Advanced Degree (Masters or PhD) in Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Data Science, Computer Science, Operations Research or other closely related other quantitative or mathematical discipline. A PhD degree may be substituted for up to three (3) years of experience.

• Demonstrates knowledge of data mining methods, databases, data visualization and machine learning.

• Ability to communicate analysis techniques, concepts and products

• Ability to develop data-driven solutions, data models, and visualizations

About RIVA:

RIVA Solutions, Inc. is a rapidly growing provider of information Technology and Program Support Services to the United States Federal Government. Headquartered in McLean VA, RIVA has over 400 employees in 20+ states across the US. As we continue to expand our services within Management Consulting, STEM, Cyber AI and Robotic Process Automation, we are looking for highly qualified people to join and thrive with us. VivaLaRIVA!

RIVA is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy, gender identity, and sexual orientation), parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service, or other non-merit based factors.",3.7,RIVA Solutions,"Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,11,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,DC,3088,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
934,934,Data Scientist - Nationwide Opportunities,$89k-$111k,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)? Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models? Eager to learn to apply ML to a diverse array of enterprise use cases? Thrilled to be a part of Amazon who has been pioneering and shaping the worlds AI/ML technology for decades?

At Amazon Web Services (AWS), we are helping large enterprises build ML models on the AWS Cloud. We are applying predictive technology to large volumes of data and against a wide spectrum of problems. AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.

AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team. We pride ourselves on being customer obsessed and highly focused on the AI enablement of our customers. If you have experience with AI, including building ML models, wed like to have you join our team. You will get to work with an innovative company, with great teammates, and have a lot of fun helping our customers. A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.

This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.

Major responsibilities include:
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
· Use AWS AI services (e.g., Personalize), ML platforms (SageMaker), and frameworks (e.g., MXNet, TensorFlow, PyTorch, SparkML, scikit-learn) to help our customers build ML models
· Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
· Work with our other Professional Services consultants (Big Data, IoT, HPC) to analyze, extract, normalize, and label relevant data, and with our Professional Services engineers to operationalize customers models after they are prototyped

Basic Qualifications

· Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.) or equivalent professional or military experience
· Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
· 4+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
· Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
· Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
· Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations

Preferred Qualifications

· Maters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
· Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
· Deep technical skills, consulting experience, and business savvy to interface with all levels and disciplines within our customers organization
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",3.9,Amazon,"New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,26,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,NY,4217,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,1,0,0
935,935,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Join the INTERACTIVE BROKERS Team!

Interactive Brokers has been at the forefront of the Fintech space for over 42 years and we pride ourselves on being primarily a technology company. We continue to challenge the status quo and push boundaries to offer the best trading platform with the most sophisticated features all for the lowest cost to our customers.

We are looking for a Data Scientist with good knowledge and ability to communicate effectively understanding complex problems and explain their solution. The position is well-suited for an organized individual who can meet deadlines, follow written procedures, and collaborate for improvements

You will be part of:

The data science team, you will work on developing mathematical models in areas such as detecting fraud and suspicious transactions, security lending pricing models and analysis. You will Build supporting architecture for systems to utilize the models and ensure they are working as expected. You will have close interaction with the software and business departments. The best results come when all members of our team understand the business problems we are working to solve.

You will be responsible to:
Work with various internal stakeholders to address their data analysis/modeling needs.
Understand software skills such as business analysis in an analytical framework, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Apply statistical / machine learning methods to solve broad range of business problems including pricing, forecasting, anomaly detection, process performance, inventory optimization, customer acquisition/retention/attrition, etc.
Demonstrates ability to extract meaning from and interpret data using a variety of tools and methods from statistics and machine learning.
Work with developers on implementing the solutions in a production environment
Document steps taken and methods utilized in any project
Generate executive summary of the analysis for stakeholders
eager to learn new tools and business concepts and quickly adapt to changing business requirements
You are someone who will have:
BS in Computer Science or Mathematics or in any related quantitative field.
Adept at exploratory data analysis, data normalization and data visualization methods
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and programming.
Experience using statistical computer languages R (ML), Python (scikit-learn), SQL etc. to manipulate, extract and aggregate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Analytical mind and business acumen
Strong math skills (e.g. statistics, algebra)
Good to haves:
MS or PhD in Mathematics or another quantitative field
Prior experience with financial instruments in trading and brokerage
Experience programming in Java and Oracle
Experience with machine learning tools and methods such as Deep Learning, Convoluted/Adversarial NN, Tensor Flow, H2O
Experience with distributed tools such as Hadoop and Spark
Benefits to work with us:
Competitive salary, annual performance-based bonus, and stock grant
Retirement plan (401K) with company match
Excellent health and welfare benefits including medical, dental, and vision benefits
Wellness screenings and assessments, health coaches and counseling services through Employee Assistance Program (EAP)
Paid time off along and generous parental leave policy
Daily company paid lunch and a fully stocked kitchen with healthy options for breakfast and snack
Corporate events including team outings, dinners, volunteer activities and company sports teams
Education reimbursement and learning opportunities with Udemy
Modern offices with sit/stand desks and multi-monitor setups


Company Overview

Interactive Brokers a subsidiary of publicly-traded Interactive Brokers Group, Inc., based in Greenwich, Connecticut (NASDAQ: IBKR) is a low-cost provider of trade execution and clearing services for active traders, institutional investors, financial advisors and introducing brokers. IBKR's premier technology provides electronic access to stocks, options, futures, forex, bonds, and funds worldwide from a single IBKR Integrated Investment account. IBKR is one of the largest online brokers by trade volume and is consistently ranked at the top of its field.

Our employees are part of a dynamic, multinational, fast-paced, results-oriented team working to provide our customers with state-of-the-art trading technology, superior execution capabilities, worldwide electronic access, and sophisticated risk management tools.

Our headquarters are in Greenwich, CT, USA. IBKR has offices in the United States, Canada, the United Kingdom, Switzerland, Hungary, Estonia, Russia, India, Hong Kong, China, Japan and Australia.

IBKR is a member of NYSE, FINRA, and SIPC. Interactive Brokers Group brokerage affiliates are regulated by securities and commodities agencies around the world.

Click HERE to view a short video with a few words from current Interactive Brokers employees. (if hyperlink is deactivated please copy https://www.interactivebrokers.com/en/index.php?f=31899 to your browser)

For more information, please visit www.ibkr.com/info",3.1,IBKR,"Greenwich, CT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,financial_related,Finance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CT,5190,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,1,0,0
936,936,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"About Lokavant

Lokavant is a technology companywhose mission is to ensure that no clinical trial fails due to operationalerror. By integrating and analyzing the disparate data sources within clinicaltrials, Lokavant provides real-time visualizations and risk alerts to studysponsors and contract research organizations (CROs) to enable data-drivendecisions. These insights expedite trial timelines and reduce the costs ofdevelopment, allowing safe and efficacious treatments to get to patients.

Lokavant centralizes trial data topower a machine learning model that anticipates trial risk, providesdata-driven risk mitigation strategies, and predicts the impact of mitigationstrategy implementation. Lokavant's anticipatory monitoring capability isgrounded in a compendium of data from over 1,000 clinical trials and willimprove with each deployment.

About the Opportunity

How often are you given theopportunity to build something from the ground up, with an abundance ofresources at your disposal; to be part of a team of people accomplished indiverse scientific and engineering disciplines, focused on using the best ofwhat lies at the forefront of technology to address complex, real-worldproblems that have a positive impact on potentially millions of peoples' lives?This is that kind of opportunity.

We are seeking a thoughtful, hands-ondata scientist with an aptitude for or strong interest in clinical trial data tojoin the rapidly growing Lokavant Data Science team in our New York Cityheadquarters. As a part of the data science team, you will work very closelywith Lokavants engineering and product teams. Our platform is fullycloud-based and is being built around modern tools and frameworks in anincredibly fast-moving agile environment. As a Data Scientist at Lokavant, youwill be instrumental in setting and executing upon the vision for Lokavantsdifferentiation in the clinical research technology industry.

Key Responsibilities
Take an active role in defining the developmentroadmap and deliverables for the data science team in an integrated agileproduct development process
Drive development and productizationof end-to-end machine learning models
Work in a small team settingpartnering with engineers and scientists to derive the insights needed tosupport our products and product features
Follow industry standard practices toimplement, optimize, maintain, troubleshoot, and continuously improve the practicesof the data science team
Enable effective workingrelationships across Product Management, Front-End Development, DevelopmentOperations, Commercial and Data Engineering
Mentor and be mentored by datascientists of varied experience levels and subject matter areas
Minimum Requirements
2+ years of relevant experience in ananalytical role involving data science and statistical modeling
Fluency in Python and SQL
Strong understanding of advancedstatistical models and Machine Learning techniques
Experienceworking in an Agile software development environment
Exceptional written and verbal communicationskills
Strong attention to detail and highlyorganized, with effective multi-tasking and prioritization skills
Proactive, self-motivated andself-directed, with the ability to learn quickly and autonomously
Comfortable with ambiguity
Superior problem-solving andtroubleshooting skills
Ability to work as part of acollaborative cross-functional team in a fast-paced environment
Sincere interest in working at arapidly changing start-up and scaling with the company as we grow
Bachelors or masters degree withstrong academic performance in Statistics, Mathematics, Data Science, orequivalent field


Preferred (Nice-to-have) Qualifications
Experience in the life sciences industry
Experience with healthcare data, ideally clinical/operational clinicaltrial data
Knowledge of clinical data standards (e.g. CDISC, FHIR, HL7, etc.)
Knowledge of e-clinical systems and technologies (e.g. EDC, CTMS, IRT,etc.)


Employee Benefits
Competitive salary and equitycompensation
Full medical, dental, and visionbenefits
One Medical membership
401(k) plan
Flexible PTO policy
Flexible remote work policy
Great NYC office located in the heartof Times Square
Team events and outings
Lokavant is an equal opportunityemployer, indiscriminate of race, color, religion, ethnicity, ancestry,national origin, sex, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, maritalstatus, veteran status, disability, medical condition, or any other protectedcharacteristic. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating aninclusive environment for all employees.",-1.0,"Lokavant, Inc.","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,NY,4568,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
937,937,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"About the Role

We are looking for a data scientist who is innovative, highly-motivated, and proactive.

For this role, you will be part of a team that builds cutting-edge trading products in the cryptocurrency industry. You will be responsible for transforming data and generating actionable insights into our customer behavior and measuring the performance of our trading engine. You will collaborate and lead projects with product management, engineering, marketing, and growth teams. You will transform data from complex systems, generate performance metrics, and share the results with stakeholders at all levels of the company.

Great benefits, amazing perks, remote work and travel opportunities, stock incentives, beautiful HQ office, and a flexible PTO policy make Kraken a great place to work. If you value having a seat at the table and want to make a big impact on guiding the direction of marketing and growth at one of the top crypto exchanges in the world, this role is for you.

Responsibilities
Partner with Kraken’s engineering, marketing, product, and finance teams to identify, prioritize, and answer the most important questions where analytics and modeling will have a material impact.
Drive cross functional analytic projects from beginning to end: build relationships with partner teams, frame and structure questions, collect and analyze data, summarize and present key insights in support of decision making.
Work with engineers to evangelize data best practices and implement analytics solutions.
Collaborate with business leaders, subject matter experts, and decision makers to develop success criteria and optimize new products, features, policies, and models.
Communicate key results with self-serve tools (dashboards, analytics tools) for leadership and product management.
Develop anomaly detection, and data modelling tools to monitor key performance indicators to improve the efficiency of the products.
Design experiments for product teams to test hypothesis and help with idea generation and refinement.
Build key datasets and data pipelines using Python/ETL frameworks.
Requirements
A degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Physical Sciences, Economics, Math or a related technical field.
5+ years industry experience in data science or analytics
A consistent track record of performing data analysis using Python, R, and/or SQL
Experience using statistics and predictive analytics to solve complex business problems.
The versatility and willingness to learn new technologies on the job.
The ability to clearly communicate complex results to technical and non-technical audiences.
Familiarity with other data tools such as Hive, Vertica, Tableau & Ruby is a plus
We’re powered by people from around the world with their own unique backgrounds and experiences. We value all Krakenites and their talents, contributions, and perspectives.
Check out all our open roles at our Careers Page. We’re excited to see what you’re made of.
Learn more about us
Watch ""Working at Kraken""
Follow us on Twitter
Catch up on our blog
Follow us on LinkedIn",4.5,Kraken Digital Asset Exchange,Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,9,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,Remote,3075,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
938,938,Data Engineer,$89k-$111k,"About MasterControl:

MasterControl Inc. is a leading provider of cloud-based quality and compliance software for life sciences and other regulated industries. Our mission is the same as that of our customers to bring life-changing products to more people sooner. The MasterControl Platform helps organizations digitize, automate and connect quality and compliance processes across the regulated product development life cycle. Over 1,000 companies worldwide rely on MasterControl solutions to achieve new levels of operational excellence across product development, clinical trials, regulatory affairs, quality management, supply chain, manufacturing and postmarket surveillance. For more information, visitwww.mastercontrol.com.

Summary

At MasterControl we are building our next generation data platform that will leverage AI/ML techniques to help redefine how our customers bring lifesaving and lifechanging products to market. To enable this, we need your help building our data pipeline, DataMart and data lake.

You will be responsible for implementing the data life cycle consumption from the data source to the end model. By gathering requirements from Product, you will transform data in near real-time which will be consumable by AI model training, business intelligence analytic tools, and self-service platforms. You will need a strong emphasis on data modeling, as well as proficiency in data transformation. You will be responsible for integration into the CI/CD pipeline as well as unit and integration testing of all processes. You will need experience with structured, semi-structured, and unstructured data sources. You will need a bachelor's degree in a STEM related field, or equivalent experience. You will have some work experience with and a passion for Big Data.

Responsibilities
Pull data from all customer databases into S3 and put into a queryable format
Model the data for optimal performance (ETL, star-schema like, ORC, partitioning, etc ...)
Pull data from a real-time streaming architecture (Kafka) and do near-real-time aggregations andprojections of the data, storing the results in S3
Help automate the provisioning of AWS Lake Formations, EMR/Spark/S3 and other services in AWS
Analyze data to find patterns worthy to expose to the end-user
Help tie corporate data to customer data from an OLTP store
Help us discover ways to use Big Data technologies in a Machine Learning pipeline (discover, clean, label, train, test)
Other assigned duties
Preferred Skills
Scala/Python/SQL/Java
Apache Spark with EMR and/or other Big Data tools
Kafka Streams experience is big plus
Airflow experience is a plus
Big Data Mindset (Spark/Hive/Hadoop/HCatalog/Hudi). Understanding of the Big Data landscape.
Warehouse Architectures (Star Schema/Snowflake/Vaults/Lakes)
Familiarity with AWS and Cloud Formation or Terraform
Data Modelling
ETL Best Practices
Passionate about creatively solving business problems.
Effectively prioritize and execute tasks in a high-pressure environment.
The ability to non-emotionally coach and mentor others.
The ability to not participate in 'techno-arrogant' conversation.
Meet multiple, challenging deadlines while communicating expectations clearly.
Physical Demands and Working Conditions
Must be able to work well with people.
Ability to operate a computer and work at a desk for extended periods of time.
Ability to communicate effectively in writing, in person, over the telephone and in e-mail.
Why Work Here?

#WhyWorkAnywhereElse

#ExceptionalTeamCulture

MasterControl is a place where Exceptional Teams come together to do their best work. Hiring Exceptional Teams, including the best talent in our industry, is a core value of ours. MasterControl employees are surrounded by intelligent, motivated individuals every day. We like to call it #TheBestTeamOnThePlanet.

We value every employee and their contribution to what makes MasterControl successful. We give right back to the employee through a generous benefits package, great flexibility, and continuous opportunities for advancement.

Not only do we hire Exceptional Teams, but we work hard to keep them here by developing and challenging their skillsets, encouraging professional development and growth, and offering a culture that can't be found elsewhere. Which is why we say - #WhyWorkAnywhereElse?

To put it simply, working at MasterControl is fun, challenging, and rewarding. From our Fitness Clubs to our awards programs, from our company parties to our competitive benefits, you can't really go wrong. MasterControl could be your next (and last) career move!

We are growing quickly and always looking for talented individuals to add to #TheBestTeamOnThePlanet!

Here are some of the benefits MasterControl employees enjoy:
Generous PTO package of three weeks, increasing after just three years of employment
Competitive compensation with annual merit increase reviews
100% medical premium coverage (yes, you read that right!)
Dental/Vision Plans
401k Plan
Employer Paid Life Insurance Policy ($50K)
Great Flexibility
Wellness Programs (every employee gets a Fitbit!)
Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis.

Job Posted by ApplicantPro",4.0,MasterControl,"Salt Lake City, UT",-1,201 to 500 Employees,27,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,UT,5219,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
939,939,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Job Title

Data Scientist
Summary
As a key member of our team at RiverStone, you will be collaborating with different engineering and operations teams and leading development machine learning solutions for a variety of tasks and projects. You will be responsible for delivering projects from end-to-end: problem statement and conceptualization, proof-of-concept, and participation in final deployment. You will also perform ad-hoc statistical and data science analyses. Our ideal candidates are smart, creative, analytical thinkers with attention to detail. You will also work closely with data engineers, developers and modeling analysts to generate seamless business solutions. You will be expected to present results of analyses to a wide range of audiences including executives.
Essential Functions
Collaborate with multiple business and information technology units to understand company needs and propose solutions
Implement new statistical or other mathematical methodologies as needed for specific models or analysis.
Organize and synthesize data into actionable business decisions, focused on insights.
Related Functions:
Establishes and maintains effective working relationships, both internally and externally
Maintains and communicates on a regular basis the progress against department goals/objectives and priorities to Director of Data Science and Innovation
Compile, review, verify and analyze related external and internal insurance data including completed models for benchmarking of results
Organizational
Develops creative ideas and solutions to real time business problems and/or business opportunities; takes reasonable, calculated risks even if failure is possible.
Empowers self and teammates to continuously improve RiverStones business processes/ systems and develops and escalates ideas and solutions.
Consistently delivers superior customer service to both internal and external business partners.
Demonstrates alignment with RiverStones Commitments.
Prioritizes and organizes work in self-directed manner.
Attains and maintains knowledge of assigned department.
Performs other duties as required, including supporting and coordinating with other department colleagues.
Required Skills
Ability to tell meaningful stories with data.
Minimum four years of proven hands-on experience applying machine learning techniques to build models integrated into applications.
Strong working knowledge of machine learning/data mining algorithms (deep learning, classification, clustering, etc), experience with Image Analysis/Computer Vision is a plus.
Understand algorithms (be able to tweak them when needed) as well as infrastructure that enables fast iterations
Strong software development skills with proficiency in Python and R. Experienced user of libraries such as scikit-learn, scipy, R, NetworkX, Spacy, and NLTK.
Good understanding of deep learning algorithms and workflows, and experience with CNTK, Caffe, MXNet or TensorFlow is a plus.
Experience in Hadoop, Spark, Hive, Cassandra, Kafka and NoSQL databases is a plus
Familiarity with SQL programing
Experience
3+ years experience applying machine learning techniques to real business problems.
Property & Casualty Insurance experience encouraged, but not required

Required Education

Master of Applied Math, Machine Learning, Data Science, Statistics, Operations Research or related fields
Preferred Education or Certification

PhD of Applied Math, Machine Learning, Data Science, Statistics, Operations Research or related fields
Supervisory Role

None
Travel

Minimal, less than 10%
Work Environment / Physical Demands

This position operates in a professional cubicle based collaborative environment and must have the ability to timely produce thorough, accurate work with many competing demands, deadlines, and distractions. The position uses standard equipment such as phones, computers, copiers/printers and filing cabinets. Noise level is moderate. While this is a largely sedentary role, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear; stand; walk; bend; use hands to handle or feel; and reach with hands and arms. On occasion the individual must be able to lift and transport boxes weighing up to 30 pounds.

Other Duties (Disclaimer Statement)

RiverStone retains the right to change or assign other duties to this position as needed, OR

Other duties or responsibilities may change or be assigned as needed.
Core Competencies

32.) Learning on the Fly: Learns quickly when facing new problems; a relentless and versatile learner; open to change; analyzes both successes and failures for clues to improvement; experiments and will try anything to find solutions; enjoys the challenge of unfamiliar tasks; quickly grasps the essence and the underlying structure of anything.

51.) Problem Solving: Uses rigorous logic and methods to solve difficult problems with effective solutions; probes all fruitful sources for answers; can see hidden problems; is excellent at honest analysis; looks beyond the obvious and doesnt stop at the first answers.

52.) Process Management: Good at figuring out the processes necessary to get things done; knows how to organize people and activities; understands how to separate and combine tasks into efficient flow; knows what to measure and how to measure it; can see opportunities for synergy and integration where others cant; can simplify complex processes; gets more out of fewer resources.

56.) Sizing Up People: Is a good judge of talent; after reasonable exposure, can articulate the strengths and limitations of people inside or outside the organization; can accurately project what people are likely to do across a variety of situations.

22.) Ethics and Values: Adheres to an appropriate (for the setting) and effective set of core values and beliefs during both good and bad times; acts in line with those values; rewards the right values and disapproves of others; practices what he/she preaches.

61.) Technical Learning: Picks up on technical things quickly; can learn new skills and knowledge; is good at learning new industry, company, product, or technical knowledge like internet technology; does well in technical courses and seminars.

65.) Managing Vision and Purpose: Communicates a compelling and inspired vision or sense of core purpose; talks beyond today; talks about possibilities; is optimistic; creates mileposts and symbols to rally support behind the vision; makes the vision sharable by everyone; can inspire and motivate entire units or organizations.

14.) Creativity: Comes up with a lot of new and unique ideas; easily makes connections among previously unrelated notions; tends to be seen as original and value-added in brainstorming settings.

35.) Managing and Measuring Work: Clearly assigns responsibility for tasks and decisions; sets clear objectives and measures; monitors process, progress, and results; designs feedback loops into work.",3.0,The RiverStone Group,"San Diego, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CA,6911,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,1,0,1
940,940,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Trace Data is developing a ground breaking product to help companies monitor and secure their data. We're integrating the world of security, observability and connectivity. We're looking for people with a strong background or interest in building successful products and systems; you're comfortable in dealing with lots of moving pieces; you have exquisite attention to detail; and love learning new technologies and systems.

As our Data Scientist, you will:
Develop large scale machine learning algorithms that support monitoring, privacy and security capabilities.
Own the machine learning algorithms that power core features in the product such as the identification of sensitive data, automated data classification and anomaly detection using unsupervised and deep learning techniques ranging from computer vision algorithms for pattern recognition to variational auto-encoders to NLP.
Design, build, and launch efficient & reliable new data models, schemas and pipelines to enable analysis, modeling and machine learning.
Partner with product managers, designers, and engineers to prototype and productize data mining features.
Advise on best practices and statistical methods for measuring and evaluating experiments.
You may be fit for this role if you:
Have experience of building products from the ground up.
Have a Bachelor's/Master's degree or higher in a technical field such as Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Operations Research, Math, Physics or Engineering.
Have a deep theoretical understanding of modern machine learning algorithms, statistical models or optimization.
Have experience with data tools such as Python, R, SAS, SQL, etc and strong skills in data analysis, data visualization and engineering.
Have the ability to own your modeling work from model development all the way to launching into production with minimal help from engineers.
Have experience with MapReduce, Spark, Hive, HBase, Google BigQuery, BigTable is a plus. Experience ML frameworks like Tensorflow, PyTorch, Spark MLlib, XGBoost, and Scikit-Learn is a plus.
You're a strong communicators; explaining complex technical concepts to product managers, data analysts, and other engineers shouldn't be a problem for you.
About Trace Data

Trace Data is an early stage startup founded in 2019 and headquartered in Oakland, California. We're backed by top tier investors including Accel and Kleiner Perkins.

We're a highly cross-functional organization and encourage as much collaboration as possible. We have a culture of transparency that we carry through to internal communication, ensuring everyone has the information they need to make great decisions. We value humility, respect and diversity. We look for people who are curious, want to grow and have impact every day.

Trace Data provides equal employment opportunities (EEO). All applicants are considered without regards to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, or sexual orientation.",3.9,Trace Data,"Oakland, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,20,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CA,3029,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,1
943,943,Data Scientist I,$89k-$111k,"Cars.com is one of Chicago's original tech companies. Our online platform makes it easier for consumers to shop for, sell and service their cars. With our expert content, mobile app features, millions of new and used vehicle listings, a comprehensive set of research tools and the largest database of consumer reviews in the industry, Cars.com offers innovative products to connect consumers with dealers across the country.

Data is the driver for our future at Cars. We are looking for Data Scientists (at various levels) to join our core Machine Learning group. This team is responsible to improve shopping experience, optimize sales and marketing pipelines and build measurement strategies. You'll work with various teams like Analytics, Engineering, Product, Marketing and Sales to drive business value.

on a typical day you will:
Work with senior members to build and deploy machine learning models
Support full iteration of data driven product feature development from requirement gathering, algorithm design, production implementation to experimentation and measurement
Pivot between analysis, model building and programing tasks to identify opportunities for model performance and code execution improvements
Communicate modeling methodologies and analytical findings to business stakeholders
Stay up-to-date with latest technology trends and publish research articles on science and innovations
requirements:
BS in statistics, econometrics, machine-learning, applied mathematics or related quantitative field
Knowledge of common machine learning algorithms, and ability to identify the right algorithms to experiment with for different problems
Familiarity with python/R/scala/julia
Experience with relational databases / SQL
Ability to communicate technical findings to non technical audience
preferred:
Eager to learn: blogging, portfolio of passion projects or involvement in Kaggle, open source and any other data science/engineering community
Knowledge of how to work with different types of data such as text, image, audio etc.
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

#LI-LB",3.2,Cars.com,Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,22,Company - Public,other_industries,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,Remote,2291,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
944,944,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Chicago, IL
Posted 4 weeks ago

The Process Monitoring, Automation and Control (PMAC) team is responsible for driving the development and implementation of advanced analytics and control solutions that deliver value for today and build capability for tomorrow.
As a member of PMAC, this role will have the opportunity to work closely with the IT organization to
develop and implement Advanced Analytics, AI, APC and IIoT solutions/capabilities in manufacturing
settings to achieve actionable insights and enable continued improvement for pharmaceutical
manufacturing and quality operations.
Responsibilities
• You will contribute to the development of the multiple use cases across manufacturing operations,
leveraging IIOT and analytics, in areas such as energy management, predictive maintenance, production
scheduling and process optimization.
• Development and implementation of analytic models and tools using advanced analytics, machine
learning and artificial intelligence;
• Work with the IIoT developers to integrate predictive/prescriptive analytics with the IIoT platform to
achieve visibility, predictability and learning across multiple automation layers from process to plant and
to enterprise
• Understand Advanced Analytics approaches in other businesses;
Qualifications
• Bachelor’s Degree or higher in Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Engineering and/or Computer Science
• Hands-on experience in data science, advanced analytics, multivariate data analysis, machine learning,
artificial intelligence, and familiarity with related open source libraries (e.g. Tensor Flow, AWS ML)
• Proficient in one or more of the following programming environments: Python (preferred), R, Matlab,
PMML, JAVA, Spark
• Familiarity with deep Learning, Neural Networks, Natural Language Processing or related fields
• Experience with cloud-based analytics platforms
• Experience with ThingWorx IIoT platform preferred
• Familiarity with industrial process control system, operations management system and/or SAP is a plus
• Pharmaceutical experience preferred but not necessary
• Independent, self-motivated personality with excellent oral and written communication skills
• Ability to work collaboratively in diverse cross-functional teams on innovative solutions and tools with
an open attitude towards fast learning

To apply for this job email your details to suda@sutoer.com",4.7,Sutoer,"Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,IL,2378,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
945,945,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Data Scientist (Mid)

Education Required:

Bachelors with 8 years of experience.

Required Experience:
Provide onsite data science support to advance Latin America and Global drug trend analysesin support ofthe Consolidated Counterdrug Database (CCDB)
Conduct data entry into the digital foundation in counternarcotics data Artificial Intelligence ( AI), Machine Learning (ML), data mining algorithms, probability modeling, and other scientific techniques to correlate complex, technical findings into graphical, written, visual and verbal narrative products on trends of intelligence information
Apply technical expertise to leverage inhouse tools such as Rand Python scripts to generate insights into existing data stores, to include CCDB
Employ knowledge of existing and emerging "" big data"" processing tools and techniques useful in delivering strategic insights to policy makers in the counterdrug mission
Contribute to identifying new classified and unclassified data stores of massive size and relevance to the counternarcotics mission to enhance CCDB data enrichment efforts or provide unique analytic insights into counterdrug issues
Engage in exploratory analysis and rapid iteration techniques of large volumes of data to quickly derive intelligence
Prepare products to describe and document findings and activities
Identify and evaluate a wide range of existing methods, models, and algorithms to develop more accurate and/or objective quantitative analysis approaches for CCDB data completeness, accuracy and consistency
Clearly articulate opportunities, risks and assumptions with applied methodologies. Communicate findings to a wide variety of customers, in both written and verbal formats; with the ability to communicate complex information in laymen's terms
Participate in special projects / surge support as required
** Please note this position is contingent upon award **

Company Overview:

BTS Software Solutions is a Service Disabled Veteran Owned Small Business who are community-focused innovators who transform ideas into technology to serve people. We recognize that innovation is only valuable when applied towards a needed solution. Technology has no value without the hard work to turn ideas into reality. Our roots are in helping save Soldiers lives through technology. We bring that ethos to serving our community. We create solutions that touch people's lives - products to communicate, to connect companies with customers, to stay informed, to save lives, and to enhance lives.

We have a small company persona with a large company ethos and capabilities; we create elegant solutions for complex problems that will enrich peoples lives. We offer one of the best benefits packages in the industry: Competitive health benefits package, PTO, 401K matching and vested from day one to name just a few of our benefits and perks.

BTS Software Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE). All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.",4.9,BTS Software Solutions,"Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,9,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,DC,3253,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
948,948,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Overview


This data scientist position will utilize analytical, statistical, and programming skills to collect, analyze, and interpret large datasets. The role requires the ability to work with a variety of stakeholders and functional teams to uncover data-based insights to deliver improved business outcomes.

Responsibilities
Research, design and prototype robust and scalable models based on machine learning, data mining, and statistical modeling to answer key business problems
Build tools and support structures needed to analyze data, perform elements of data cleaning, feature selection and feature engineering and organize experiments in conjunction with best practices
Work with the data science team and business groups to ensure models can be implemented as part of a web application framework (R/Shiny)
Keep current with the latest developments in the field by continuous learning and adapting new methods relevant to the problems at hand
Qualifications


EDUCATION & EXPERIENCE MINIMUMS:
BS in Statistics, Computer Science or other related field
5+ years of experience building and deploying machine learning models
Strong skills in statistical application prototyping and engineering with expert knowledge in R development
Deep knowledge of fundamentals of machine learning, data mining and statistical predictive modeling, and extensive experience applying these methods to real world problems
Ability and inclination to work in multi-disciplinary environments, and desire to see ideas realized in practice
2+ years of experience using SQL
EDUCATION & EXPERIENCE PREFERRED:
Desired interdisciplinary skills include big data technologies, ETL, statistics and causal inference, Deep Learning, modeling and simulation
Experience with business intelligence tools such as Tableau/Shiny
Automotive, chemistry/chemical, or petroleum additive related academic background or work experience
For NewMarket or Afton employees, an appropriate combination of experiences that will support the required skill base may replace one or more of the specific experience requirements above.

SKILLS/ABILITIES:

· Decision Making - Decision making in a timely manner based upon a mixture of analysis, wisdom, experience, and judgment; sometimes with incomplete information, under tight deadlines and pressure; while based upon appropriate risk and authority

· Business Insight - The understanding of the basis for our business model and how that is realized in the market. The understanding of how business and operations are intimately linked. The ability to utilize information, practices & trends, affecting the business to engage and drive new strategies and tactics work in the marketplace.

· Analysis and Problem Solving - Solves difficult problems with effective solutions; asks good questions and questions all likely sources for answers; can solve complex problems and recognize complex patterns; utilizing all appropriate tools to reach a robust answer.

· Communication - The ability to communicate information clearly and effectively in an engaging and convincing manner.

· Managing Performance - Possessing the drive and focus to achieve challenging goals.

· Collaboration and Networking - The ability to work in and across Afton's organizational matrix to achieve business objectives, via engaging and rewarding interactions. Through this network provide support, exert influence. Influencing without authority.

· Project Management - The ability to manage tasks and activities and achieve their completion within the agreed framework, across regional and organizational boundaries

· Innovation - The openness to new ideas and the ability to generate breakthrough solutions. Can develop, seek out, critically assess and implement new and value adding concepts.

· Dealing with Uncertainty - Can effectively cope with change; can shift gears comfortably; can decide and act without having the total picture; isn’t upset when things are up in the air; doesn’t have to finish things before moving on; can comfortably handle risk and uncertainty.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to the individual’s race, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, religion, age, disability, genetic information, status as a military veteran or any other characteristic protected by applicable law.",4.2,NewMarket Corporation,"Richmond, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,133,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,VA,4429,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
950,950,"Data Scientist, Analytics",$89k-$111k,"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started.Were looking for Data Scientists to work on our core and business products (ex. Instagram, Messaging, Growth, Engagement, Ads) to help shape the future of what we build at Facebook. You will enjoy working with one of the richest data sets in the world, cutting edge technology, and the ability to see your insights turned into real products on a regular basis. The perfect candidate will have a background in a quantitative or technical field, will have experience working with large data sets, and will have some experience in data-driven decision making. You are focused on results, a self-starter, and have demonstrated success in using analytics to drive the understanding, growth, and success of a product. This position is based full time in our Menlo Park, CA office.

Responsibilities:

Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, data mining, and the presentation of data to see beyond the numbers and understand how our users interact with both our consumer and business products
Partner with Product and Engineering teams to solve problems and identify trends and opportunities
Inform, influence, support, and execute our product decisions and product launches
The Data Scientist Analytics role has work across the following four areas:
Product Operations
Forecasting and setting product team goals
Designing and evaluating experiments
Monitoring key product metrics, understanding root causes of changes in metrics
Building and analyzing dashboards and reports
Building key data sets to empower operational and exploratory analysis
Evaluating and defining metrics
Exploratory Analysis
Proposing what to build in the next roadmap
Understanding ecosystems, user behaviors, and long-term trends
Identifying new levers to help move key metrics
Building models of user behaviors for analysis or to power production systems
Product Leadership
Influencing product teams through presentation of data-based recommendations
Communicating state of business, experiment results, etc. to product teams
Spreading best practices to analytics and product teams
Data Infrastructure
Working in Hadoop and Hive primarily, sometimes MySQL, Oracle, and Vertica
Automating analyses and authoring pipelines via SQL and python based ETL framework
Mininum Qualifications:

2+ years experience doing quantitative analysis
BA/BS in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics or other technical field
Experience in SQL or other programming languages
Development experience in any scripting language (PHP, Python, Perl, etc.)
Ability to communicate the results of analyses with product and leadership teams to influence the strategy of the product
Understanding of statistics (e.g., hypothesis testing, regressions)
Experience manipulating data sets through statistical software (ex. R, SAS) or other methods
Preferred Qualifications:

Advanced degrees
Experience with distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop)
Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.

Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,Facebook,"Menlo Park, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,16,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CA,4428,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
951,951,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Data Scientist
Location


Tysons Corner, VA

Job Code

229

# of Openings

1

Apply Now

Ridgeline International is looking for a Data Scientist to help us boldly innovate through data.

This is a strategic hire. You should be curious by design, think of yourself as a data artist and storyteller, have an ownership, solution and action mindset, can impact the cross functional team that moves fast with intent and purpose. We are particularly interested in your portfolio of data innovation in the geo-political, national issue or brand campaigns.

If this is you then then we should talk.

What you’ll do:
Build data products that solve hard problems and reveal opportunity through creative sourcing, model development and visualization.
What you’ll need:
Four or more years of experience in a data science role, with a concentration on social sciences, demographic analysis and anthropology.
Experience with creation of visual data displays.
Expert in Python; R; Scala
Nice to Haves:
MA in Applied Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, or related field; or experience. Self-taught coders are welcome. Bring your portfolio and impress us.
Credentials in machine learning, AI, probabilities, statistical inference and linear models
Familiarity with Unix shell scripting
Visualization to tell a story and explain a point
Here are some Perks of being a Ridgeliner!
20% 401K contribution regardless of employee match
Flexible PTO + Holidays
Opportunities for professional development to attend conferences, classes, and workshops.
$1,000 every month for discretionary team building stipend.
$2,500 Annual Clothing Allowance
$2,000 Hobby Allowance
Medical, dental, vision, disability, life insurance
Free daily snacks & fancy sparkling water and nitro cold brew on tap
Company-wide events, including team building, holiday party, and off-sites.
Free gym membership
Get the technology you want to do your job
Flexible work schedules",4.7,Ridgeline International,"Tysons Corner, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,5,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,VA,1934,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
952,952,Senior Data Engineer,$89k-$111k,"As a Senior Data Engineer at Guild, you'll work across teams to help us build the next generation of data products. You'll work with world class data engineers to design and build the scalable, robust, and high-quality data infrastructure and data pipelines needed to support growth of our education network and SaaS platform. Ultimately, you'll help change the landscape for how we think about delivering education products to learners across the country by building a digital solution that connects students, employers, and universities to deliver education at an affordable price to students.

A day in our open, collaborative workspace might look like:
Designing, building, and expanding Guild's backend data infrastructure, including data pipelines, ETL, data ingestion, data APIs, and data warehouses
Building APIs that can be used internally or externally to serve crucial information across systems, partners, and teams
Translating complex business requirements into usable, scalable data models and systems
Mentoring other engineers and analysts on the team and sharing technical knowledge to enable others to be more effective at their jobs
In this role, you'll expand your expertise by:
Evolving our data products now and in the future by contributing to our backend data architecture
Working in an agile team environment with a high performing engineering team
Taking on a cross-functional role that will expose you to the ins and outs of Guild (working with our Product, Design, Client Success, and Student Services teams)
Receiving feedback through our learning-focused, twice annual Structured Growth Conversations
You'll know if you're successful by:
Choosing and leveraging the latest technologies in data engineering to automate data integration and loading, such as, Amazon Redshift, Redis, Java, Scala, Spark, Kafka, Python, S3 and PostgreSQL
Leveraging your experience to design solutions that will be the backbone of a highly scalable, reusable, backend data infrastructure
Ensuring our data is clean, accurate, and secure
Thriving in fast-paced and scaling environment
You'll join a team:
From diverse backgrounds – from traditional higher education, to athletic coaches, to politicians, to mental health professionals (and more!)
Of learners & problem-solvers dedicated to our dual mission of changing education in America while building a successful, high-growth company
Committed to building a diverse, equitable, and inclusive environment that you'd support every day
What you'll add to Guild – as an individual and part of the broader team:
Experience building data pipelines, custom ETL processes and data warehouses
Experience with one or more programming languages such as Java, Python, or Scala
Expertise in database technologies such as Redshift, PostgreSQL, Redis, and working with large sets of data
Experience deploying solutions to cloud technology services such as Amazon Web Services
Experience improving software products through engineering best practices such as refactoring, reusability, TDD and continuous integration
A proven ability to thrive in changing environments by having a fast, flexible, cooperative work style
Strong communication skills and the ability to effectively explain technical concepts to other engineers, analysts, product managers, and stakeholders.
Experience with BI tools such as Looker, Tableau, Kibana, Chart.io, etc.
Basic experience in statistical analysis, text processing, and machine learning
Passion for higher education and our mission – Guild is pioneering a new path for education as a benefit in a complicated and regulated space – success means quickly and effectively adapting your expertise
A drive to work hard and plan for how you can refresh/recharge while working in a startup
Something else? Wonderful, we're curious to learn more about you!
About Guild:

Guild is increasing economic mobility for working adults by partnering with the largest employers in the country to offer education as a benefit to their employees via our marketplace of nonprofit universities and education institutions. Guild's proprietary technology platform facilitates the administration of this innovative benefit and our team of coaches helps each employee navigate the path back to school, providing individualized support from day one through program completion.

We also just became the latest female-led company to hit a $1billion valuation and the only B-corp with those qualifications. Our Series D round was led by Ken Chenault, General Catalyst Partners chairman and former CEO of AMEX, and joined by Emerson Collective, LeadEdge Capital, and Iconiq.

Guild Education is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.",3.5,Guild Education,"Denver, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,5,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CO,4775,1,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
953,953,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Pocket Outdoor Media is looking for a full time Data Scientist eager to put their data science and problem solving skills towards building the personalized fitness platform of the future. You'll join the energetic team in our Boulder office and develop machine learning-based algorithms and models powering our cutting-edge platform utilizing large, diverse fitness datasets. You'll receive competitive pay, benefits package (including medical, dental, vision), 401k, commuter benefits, and equity.

What you'll do
Lead development of custom predictive and prescriptive algorithms interfacing with large data sets, based on principles from statistics, machine learning, and operations research
Create integrated solutions using Python modules (including Pandas, Numpy, Scipy, SQLAlchemy, and Tensorflow), PostgreSQL, and other tools as needed
Work closely with engineers to help evolve proof of concept systems into production at scale
Work the product development team to define desired requirements and capabilities
Perform research as needed to identify the latest techniques from technical literature and apply them to relevant product features
Identify and promote the use of new technologies, toolkits, and frameworks, areas of inquiry, ways of working, methods and approaches in Computer Science, Artificial Intelligence, Software and Research Engineering
What you'll bring
A degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Applied Statistics, Operations Research, Computational Biology, or a related analytical field
3+ years experience of statistical programming experience, including development of applied algorithms in production
Demonstrated ability to develop algorithms in Python 3.x using Python libraries like Tensorflow, Keras, pandas, and numpy
Detailed knowledge of computer science including data structures, data modeling, distributed systems, and software design methods
Strong understanding of statistical inference, regression and classification, and the ability to explain rationale underlying data science-related decisions to a broader audience
Knowledge of current best-practices, tools, and technologies for implementing machine learning pipelines
When applying

If possible, include references algorithms you've developed and/or research that you have published demonstrating your Data Scientist prowess. Be prepared to describe at least one data science project (thought process, planning, technical implementation) during your interview.",-1.0,Pocket Outdoor Media,"Boulder, CO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,other_industries,Media,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CO,2463,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
954,954,Senior Data Scientist - Telecommute,$89k-$111k,"Optum Payment Integrity Analytics is looking to expand and is seeking a Senior Data Scientist to join our team and help us reach our goals of accurate and effortless payments of claims through advanced analytics and machine learning. You should be an exceptional disciplined and self-motivated Data Scientist with predictive modeling and advanced analytics experience and a passion for working with healthcare data, experience using various computational approaches, and a portfolio of projects you can show and talk about.

Youll enjoy the flexibility to telecommute* from anywhere within the U.S. as you take on some tough challenges.

Primary Responsibilities:
Improve and extend the analytic methods in our products
Work alongside other data scientists, engineers, and project managers to design and implement models and experiments from end to end, including data ingestion and preparation, feature engineering, analysis and modeling, model deployment, performance tracking and documentation
Conduct hands-on data analysis and predictive analytics on large datasets
Effectively communicate complex technical results to business partners
Support and drive analytic efforts around machine learning and innovation
Work with a great deal of autonomy to find solutions to complex problems
Youll be rewarded and recognized for your performance in an environment that will challenge you and give you clear direction on what it takes to succeed in your role as well as provide development for other roles you may be interested in.

Required Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree or higher in Applied Mathematics, Physics, Computer Science, Statistics or related technical field
3+ years of hands-on experience in in developing analytics with machine learning, deep learning, NLP, and/or other related modeling techniques
Strong proficiency in advanced data science tools such as R, Python, SQL, Spark and H2O
Familiarity with wrangling large datasets with big data tools such as Hadoop, Hive and Spark
Experience applying computational algorithms and statistical methods to structured and unstructured data
Experience combining analytic methods with advanced data visualizations using, for example, Tableau, Shiny or D3
Expert ability to breakdown and clearly define problems
Strong ability to communicate highly technical results to a diverse audience
Careers with Optum. Here's the idea. We built an entire organization around one giant objective; make the health system work better for everyone. So when it comes to how we use the world's large accumulation of health-related information, or guide health and lifestyle choices or manage pharmacy benefits for millions, our first goal is to leap beyond the status quo and uncover new ways to serve. Optum, part of the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, brings together some of the greatest minds and most advanced ideas on where health care has to go in order to reach its fullest potential. For you, that means working on high performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter. Optum, incredible ideas in one incredible company and a singular opportunity to do your life's best work.SM

*All Telecommuters will be required to adhere to UnitedHealth Groups Telecommuter Policy.

Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: UnitedHealth Group is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.

UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.

Job Keywords: Senior Data Scientist, Telecommute, Telecommuter",3.4,Unitedhealth Group,"Eden Prairie, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,43,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,MN,3866,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
955,955,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Job Description


Job #: 1088245

Please send resume to Kevin Reed at kreed@apexsystems.com

Data Scientist (Big Data)

San Antonio, TX (No remote work)

Must Have Top Secret Clearance w/ SCI Eligibility

Direct Hire to Client

Ability to develop analytics for multiple cyber weapon systems with many different infrastructure and end-point devices. Ability to incorporate predictive, descriptive, and presumptive modeling; machine learning; artificial intelligence into analytics. Must be able to code proficiently in one or more of the following languages: Python, R, Scala, Spark, and Maven. Develop algorithms in one or more of the following Machine Learning areas: anomaly detection, one/few-shot learning, deep learning, unsupervised feature learning, ensemble methods, probabilistic graphical models, reinforcement learning. Ability to develop analytics based upon the Mitre ATT&CK Matrix or other applicable CS&D framework to discover, identify, characterize, and/or create signatures for cyberspace threat activity. Ability to assist in the development and implementation of a data analytics program. Develop robust documentation and comprehensive user manuals for all developed projects

Original Hire Document for data scientist below:

Job Responsibilities:

· Perform big data analysis on information technology infrastructure and end-point devices

· Customer outreach and engagement

· Problem solving

· Time management

· Collaborate with others

· Mission focused

· Deliver findings

· Accept and assess customer data, dashboard, requirements

· Identify new ways to visualize and analyze data

· Develop analytics to identify anomalous activity based on customer requirements

· Perform hunt operations identifying anomalous activity

· Produce reports based on misconfigurations and/or anomalous activity discovered through analysis

Knowledge/Skills Ability:

Required:

· Ability to analyze and assess software development or data acquisition requirements and determine optimum, cost-effective solutions.

· Proficiency in one or more big data programming languages, such as R, Python, Scala, or Spark and Maven.

· Experience working with a hybrid team of analysts, visualization experts, engineers, and developers to conduct research, and build and deploy complex, but easy-to-use analytical platforms.

· Previous experience performing research in Data Analytics or big data.

· Be Director of Central Intelligence Directives 6/4 eligible (Top Secret) with a current Single Scope Background Investigation (SSBI)

Minimum Experience/Education:

· At least one (1) of the following:

· One (1) year experience in cyberspace operations

· IAT Level 1 per DoD 8140 (Net+, Sec+, etc.)

· Experience on National/Service cyber weapon system/platform within last five years

Highly Desired:

· Education/ Certifications:

· 4+ years of experience in data analytics or quantitative intelligence analysis

· Four (4) years of experience in an intelligence field at a tactical or operational level

· DoD 8570 IAT related BA/BS degree

EEO Employer

Apex Systems is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate or allow discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, creed, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding, or related medical conditions), age, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, genetic information, registered domestic partner status, marital status, disability, status as a crime victim, protected veteran status, political affiliation, union membership, or any other characteristic protected by law. Apex will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 844-463-6178.",3.8,Apex Systems,"San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,25,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,TX,4022,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
956,956,Data Engineer II,$89k-$111k,"Job Description


Here at Discount Tire, we celebrate the spirit of our people with extraordinary pride and enthusiasm. As America’s largest independent tire retailer, specializing in tires & wheels, we have over 1,000 store locations and continue to grow every year. Our consistent growth over the last 60 years, the loyalty of our customers and passion of our people makes Discount Tire a great place to work.

Under general supervision, Data Engineer II supports Discount Tire’s Data Science and Business Intelligence teams in developing advanced analytic solutions that support the enterprise’s key strategic initiatives. This role is responsible for developing, testing and maintaining our cloud-based analytics platform, including data pipelines, Enterprise Data Warehouse and other Big Data technologies. Embodies IOOGA (Integrity, Our People, Our Customers, Growth and Attitude)

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Develops high performance distributed data warehouse, distributed analytic systems and cloud architectures.
Participates in the development of relational and non-relational data models focusing on design for optimal storage and retrieval
Develops, tests and debugs batch and streaming, data pipelines (ETL/ELT) to populate databases and object stores from multiple disparate data sources; provides recommendations to improve data reliability, efficiency and quality.
Design and develop scalable solutions leveraging using technologies including Docker and Kubernetes
Working along side data scientists, supports the development and promotion of high-performance algorithms, models and prototypes.
Implements data quality metrics, standards, guidelines; automates data quality checks / routines as part of data processing frameworks; validates flow of information.
Ensures that Data Warehousing and Big Data systems meet business requirements and industry practices; including but not limited to, automation of system builds, security requirements, performance requirements and logging/monitoring requirements.
Troubleshoots data and performance related issues; implements adjustments, documents root cause and corrective measure; provides recommendations to stakeholders.
Documents technical specifications and participates with peers in design and code review sessions.
Employ a variety of scripting languages and tools to integrate data from multiple disparate data sources.
Use basic statistical and visualization techniques to analyze the resulting data sets of your processes
Learn and stay abreast of new technologies that can improve the efficacy of the analytics and data science teams
Stays current on the latest industry technologies, trends and strategies.
Other duties as assigned.

Job Requirements


Qualifications:
This position requires a minimum of five years of progressive database development and integration experience.
Strong knowledge of logical and physical data modeling is necessary, including but not limited to entity design, relationships, indexing and star schemas.
Ability to translate a logical data model into a relational or non-relational solution is necessary.
Understanding of multiple relational (RDMS) and non-relational (NoSQL) data platforms is needed.
SQL experience is required.
Scripting knowledge with SQL and Python.
Experience in SQL tuning, indexing, partitioning, data access patterns and scaling strategies is needed.
Experience with data integrations and data processing for business intelligence and analytics workloads is required.
Experience with AWS S3 or other distributed object stores, AWS Redshift, Elastic MapReduce a plus.
Hands-on experience in database development using views, SQL scripts and transformations is needed.
Proficient with Microsoft office, including skills with Word and Excel, is necessary.
Experience working with large complex data sets.
Understanding of Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) methodologies such as Agile and Waterfall is needed.
Proven analytical problem solving and decision making skills is critical.
Ability to communicate across all levels of the organization is necessary; must be able to clearly articulate technical ideas to a non-technical audience both verbally and in writing.
Ability to work independently and in a team is vital.
Customer service skills including the ability to manage and respond to different customer situations while maintaining a positive and friendly attitude is essential.
The ability to multi-task, and manage multiple projects to meet various deadlines simultaneously is required.
The ability to work efficiently and accurately under pressure, meet deadlines and present a professional demeanor is essential.
In addition, troubleshooting and organizational skills with a can-do attitude and the ability to adjust to changing requirements are essential.
Educational Requirements:

This position requires a Bachelors Degree in Computer Science, Computer Information Systems or related or equivalent experience.

Data or cloud related certifications are a plus.

Work Days:

Normal work days are Monday through Friday. Occasional Saturdays and Sundays may be necessary.

Work Hours:

Normal work hours are 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. Additional hours may be necessary.

Apply
Not ready to",4.0,Discount Tire,"Scottsdale, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,60,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,AZ,5242,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
957,957,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Job Purpose:

The Data Scientist reporting to the Chief Information Officer will be responsible for driving the scientific use of Global Supply Chain Data to accelerate speed to market as well as provide dashboards and predictive analytics to clients. Additionally, this role will assist in advancing and shaping Ancillare’s supply chain data strategy through the due diligence on new data providers/vendors and informational support for data surrounding a range of Therapeutic Areas.

Duties and Responsibilities:
Work as the lead data strategist, identifying and integrating new datasets that can be leveraged through our product capabilities.
Work collaboratively with the engineering team to strategize and execute the development of data products.
Execute analytical experiments methodically to help solve various problems and make a true impact across various domains.
Identify relevant data sources and sets to mine for client business needs and collect large structured and unstructured datasets and variables.
Devise and utilize algorithms and models to mine big data stores, perform data and error analysis to improve models, and clean and validate data for uniformity and accuracy.
Analyze data for trends and patterns and interpret data with a clear objective in mind.
Implement analytical models into production by collaborating with software developers and machine learning engineers.
Create expert data visualization applications.
Communicate analytic solutions to stakeholders and implement improvements as needed to operational systems
Ability and desire to work a project to completion meeting and or exceeding timeline deliverables.
Demonstrate and drive the Ancillare mission, values, and strategy.
Participate and contribute positively to process improvement initiatives.
Travel as may be required.
Perform other duties as assigned.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, applied mathematics, or related discipline required. Advanced degree preferred.
7+ years’ experience in data science required.
2+ years of project management experience and/or professional certifications preferred.
Experience working with pharmaceutical and supply chain data
Minimum Requirements:
Ability to effectively communicate in English both written and verbal.
Ability to partner and successfully gain collaboration across all levels of the organization.
Demonstrated proficiency with data mining, mathematics, and statistical analysis.
Advanced pattern recognition and predictive modeling experience required.
Working experience with Excel, PowerPoint, PowerBI, SQL, and programming languages (i.e., Java/Python, SAS).
Knowledge of Hadoop and or Big Data environments a plus.
Working knowledge and experience with building and maintaining Data Warehousing, Datalakes etc.
Comfort working in a dynamic, research-oriented group with several ongoing concurrent projects.
Knowledge in the use of AI a plus.
Knowledge of BlockChain processes and implementations a big plus.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Employee Discount
Flexible Schedule
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Professional Development Assistance
Referral Program
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
8 Hour Shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Data Science: 5 years (Required)
Project Management: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Doctorate (Preferred)
Location:
Horsham, PA 19044 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.ancillare.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.1,Ancillare,"Horsham, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,14,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,PA,3711,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
958,958,Principal Data Scientist I,$89k-$111k,"JOB SUMMARY
The Principal Data Scientist I will serve as a technical lead for the experimentation data science team. This role will support experiment planning and set-up across Charter product teams including video, buyflow, and support portals and own experimentation strategy including validation development of experimentation plans, frameworks, and experimentation metrics. The individual will additionally be responsible for executing advanced analytic projects with the objectives of creating causal inferences, correlations, predictions, and recommendations for improvements to business processes, and the metrics to monitor those improvements. Requires a strong command of statistical and data science oriented techniques and algorithms as well as a demonstrated practical ability to determine where to invest time, synthesize actionable findings across diverse assignments, and present these findings to an audience with varying levels of background in analytics.

MAJOR DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Actively and consistently support all efforts to simplify and enhance the customer experience
Collaborate with stakeholders to understand product / feature plans for development and translate those plans into experimentation objectives and testable hypotheses
Assist product teams with experimental design and analyses, including development of analysis plans and ad hoc reports
Develop experimentation strategy and project plans for stakeholders and lead execution of plans involving members across multiple teams
Synthesize data from experimentation and other data sources to provide stakeholders with answers to research questions and help determine next steps for a product / feature using a data driven approach
Create and present materials communicating quantitative findings and relevant business impacts to internal and external teams as well as an executive audience
Supervise and integrate the work of junior data scientists on experimentation and data science team to produce high quality work products
Refine experimentation processes including leverage of existing data science tools and development of new tools where applicable
Identify new methodologies for advancing experimentation program, develop plans to evaluate these methodologies through simulation studies, and work with software and data engineering teams on implementation strategies
Leverage multiple data sources to produce intelligent data products that solve the needs of business and engineering for business intelligence, operational analytics, descriptive models, predictive models, diagnostic models, and prescriptive models.
Make technical decisions for the organization
Coordinate technical activities across projects and the organization
Interact with various stakeholders to understand their business needs, communicate project status and develop relationships to ensure satisfaction
Develop and deliver materials on experimentation techniques and tools to a broad set of business-intelligence, data, and analytics professionals with varied backgrounds
Exercise thought leadership and discretion in tailoring the tools, approaches, and data used to meet the needs of the particular problem
Deliver results using metrics-driven analysis, and communicating the costs and tradeoffs of ideas to stakeholders and top management
REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS
Skills/Abilities and Knowledge
Ability to read, write, speak and understand English
Able to communicate complex technical, statistical and quantitative concepts to individuals with a variety of backgrounds, explain the importance and relevance of data, and suggest solutions
Works with minimal guidance to set project plans and timelines and prioritize among multiple competing interests
Working knowledge of current industry best practices for online experimentation
Command of advanced statistical concepts including experimental design, hypothesis testing, common and more advance analytic methods
Fluency with regression modeling and the ability to develop and evaluate a model using simple and complex regression, working knowledge of correlated data analysis and ability to identify when more sophisticated ML modeling may be warranted over common approaches
Knowledge of tools to obtain, transform, and store data on Big Data and Streaming systems
Ability to design and implement ETL projects from scratch
Knowledge of tools to develop, test, and deploy production code, modify CICD pipelines and deployment scripts
Background with Cable systems and operations
Experience with Hadoop, HIVE, SPARK, and/or Snowflake
Knowledge of other relevant tools such as SAS, SPSS, Alteryx, Linux
Knowledge of other relevant techniques such as text analysis and text mining
Familiarity with the open-source ecosystems surrounding R (CRAN), Python (PyPi), and/or Hadoop
Broad experience and solid theoretical foundation on the modeling process using a variety of algorithms
Data profiling, distributions, confidence intervals, hypothesis testing
Data pre-processing, exploratory data analysis using a variety of techniques
Knowledge of classification using techniques such as linear models, GLMs, and tree-based methods
Interpretation of model results, consideration of causality, treatment of multicollinearity
Strong synthesis and presentation skills
Ability to communicate results and recommendations to a wide variety of audiences including executive leadership
Understanding of data architecture, data warehouse and data marts
Demonstrated ability and desire to continually expand skill set, and learn from and teach others
Experience with other database and data store technologies, such as NoSQL, key-value, columnar, graph, and document.
Experience in receiving, converting, and cleansing big data
Program, product, or project management experience delivering analytics results
Strong background in Linux/Unix/CentOS and Windows installation and administration
Ability to identify and resolve end-to-end performance, network, server, cloud, and platform issues
Pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Keen attention to detail with the ability to effectively prioritize and execute multiple tasks
Education
Bachelors Degree in a statistics, data science, applied math or related field.

Related Work Experience
3 plus years user and system admin ownership with Linux/Unix/CentOS and Windows
10 plus years Statistical Analysis
8 plus years Business Analysis
8 plus years SQL/R/SAS Programming
2 plus years Database Design or Database Modeling

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Skills/Abilities and Knowledge
Operations-research background, in particular focused on large labor operations such as field ops, technical support, and sales
Background with cable and/ or telecommunications

Education
Masters degree in a statistics, data science, applied math or related field.

WORKING CONDITIONS
Office environment
Charter Technical Engineering Center
Highly collaborative and innovative work space
Occasional Travel",3.0,Spectrum,"Greenwood Village, Arapahoe, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,4,Subsidiary or Business Segment,other_industries,Telecommunications,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,Arapahoe,6960,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
959,959,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Bioinformatics Programmer II

17-Aug-2020

Job Code and Payroll Title
9402 Bioinformatics Programmer II

Job Summary
JOB OVERVIEW
As clinical and medical data is increasingly digitized, there is increasing opportunity to analyze this data for research purposes in a variety of ways that leverage “big data” characteristics of digital medical data.

Our clinical research effort employs novel analytic techniques, which include machine learning techniques, to identify complex patterns medical data derived from various sources - both collected through routine clinical care and expressly collected for research purposes.

Related to this goal, the Bioinformatics Programmer/Data Scientist will assist in managing, cleaning and analyzing large scale medical data using a wide variety of analytic techniques. The Data Scientist will be involved in developing software pipelines, mostly using Python, for data extraction which will need to be developed de novo to obtain data from various clinical systems or sources. Once the data is obtained, pipelines will be created to clean the data and store the data in file-systems appropriate for the size of the data at hand.

Under the supervision of the Principal Investigator (PI), the Data Scientist will also be involved in data analysis, and will be fluent in comparing a variety of techniques, including machine learning and deep learning techniques, to be able to empirically determine which approach is most suitable for the given research hypothesis and data type. This position may also include some administrative duties and will have the opportunity to participate in and lead authorship teams.

CARDIOVASCULAR RESEARCH INSTITUTE / CARDIOLOGY
The primary mission of the Cardiovascular Research Institute (CVRI), the largest organized research unit on the San Francisco campus, is to promote fundamental and clinical research on the cardiovascular and pulmonary respiratory systems and to provide opportunities for postdoctoral training in these fields.

With over 200 faculty, staff, and postdoctoral fellows, the CVRI supports faculty from a variety of departments (Medicine, Biochemistry, Biophysics, Lab Medicine, Pediatrics, Anatomy, Anesthesia, Pharmaceutical Chemistry, Physiology, Cellular and Molecular Pharmacology). The total extramural funding is $29 million annually (direct and indirect costs), with $1M in indirect cost return, and $561K in State funds. Assets include $38 million in endowment income and gifts, $3M in clinical reserves, and $5.8M in opportunity funds.

The Tison lab is also part of the Bakar Computational Health Sciences Institute and the Data Scientist will be part of the larger computational community and infrastructure.

ABOUT UCSF
The University of California, San Francisco (UCSF) is a leading university dedicated to promoting health worldwide through advanced biomedical research, graduate-level education in the life sciences and health professions, and excellence in patient care. It is the only campus in the 10-campus UC system dedicated exclusively to the health sciences.

Organization
Campus

Req Number
55681BR

Location
Mission Bay

Job Title
Data Scientist

Appointment Type
Career

Percentage
100%

Shift Length
8 Hours

Shift
Days

Work Days
Monday- Friday, 8:00 am - 5:00 pm

Required Qualifications
• Bachelor's degree in biological science, computational/programming, or related area and/or equivalent experience/training
• At least 6 months of experience in direct data management and analysis using medical and/or health-related data
• Demonstrated fluency and competency with the Python programming language, including with relevant scientific computing packages including numpy, scipy, sci-kit learn
• Experience with, or a demonstrated ability to learn and implement novel data management and machine learning-based pipelines for management of large-scale data
• Experience with, or demonstrated ability to learn and implement relevant deep learning frameworks such as TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch etc.
• Working knowledge of bioinformatics methods, data structures, statistical analysis, systems programming, and database design
• Working knowledge of databases
• Working knowledge of application and data security concepts
• Ability to lead and maintain data pipelines for real-time data acquisition from clinical systems
• Working project management skills
• Interpersonal skills in order to work with both technical and non-technical personnel at various levels in the organization
• Ability to communicate technical information in a clear and concise manner
• Ability to effectively manage time and see assigned parts of projects through to completion on deadline
• Basic consultation and communication skills
• Ability to multi-task and work well with limited supervision
• Self motivated, able to learn quickly, meet deadlines and demonstrate problem solving skills

Preferred Qualifications
• MS or greater degree in a related science or an equivalent combination of education and experience
• PhD in a field relevant to biomedical research (general biology, molecular biology, cell biology, chemistry, biomedical engineering, biomedical informatics), or computer science (computer science, machine learning, artificial intelligence) or similar
• 12 months or more of demonstrated work experience using medical and/or health-related data, or similar, including developing pipelines for obtaining data, data management and cleaning and data analysis, preferably using Python

License/Certification
n/a

Position Type
Full Time

Department Name
Cardiovascular Research Institute

Equal Employment Opportunity
The University of California San Francisco is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran or disabled status, or genetic information.",4.1,UCSF Medical Center,"San Francisco, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,113,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CA,5959,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,0
960,960,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Exciting opportunityin a thriving company that values and appreciates their employees while acknowledging their contributions!

Company Information
Serving their industry for over 45 years, this company is a leader in global life reinsurance.They deliver expert solutions in individual life reinsurance, individual living benefits reinsurance, group reinsurance, financial solutions and product development.
The firm was recognized by the Asia Insurance Review as ""Life Reinsurer of the Year"" at the 2018 Asia Insurance Industry Awards for the second consecutive year. The honor recognizes innovation, thought leadership, and actions to enhance the stability, security, and image of the Forbes Global 2000: World's Best Employers.
The firm was also ranked #97 among 500 companies in the Forbes 2018 Global 2000: World's Best Employers listing.
Benefits and Features
Skill building: this firm encourages personal & professional growth through ongoing training & skills development
Work/life balance: family friendly culture and flexible work arrangements
Career growth: Performance based compensation & competitive benefits package
Strong retirement benefits
The Role they will Play
Develop and enhance statistical models for the applications in insurance industry, including mortality, morbidity, etc.
Need to be very hands-on, needs to know how the models are built and how they work.
Serve as a client contact/consultant either internally or externally, serving as a subject matter expert.
Actively participate in other research-related initiatives.


Community Information
This opportunity is based at the corporate office in Saint Louis, Missouri.
Saint Louis offers a culture of innovation and excellence paired with historic and iconic city/sites.
With an affordable cost of living, Saint Louis is a great place to live.
Desired Background Profile:
1+ years of experience doing statistical modeling in insurance
Strong experience in R, familiar with other packages including SAS, MATLAB, Python, SQL, etc.
Master’s Degree or PHD in Statistics, Actuarial Science, Business, Finance, Economics or related field",5.0,"Kalos Consulting, Inc.","Saint Louis, MO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,MO,2114,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
963,963,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Apply

Description

Title: Data Scientist

Location: Washington, DC

Terms: Full Time

Duration: 5 years

Clearance: Currently possess or be able to favorably pass a full five (5) year Background Investigation (BI) required by CBP (e.g. Secret, Top Secret, etc.)

Travel: Occasional travel may be required.

Position Overview:

The Data Scientist will build and maintain models to support business use cases. They will work as part of the data science services team. The function of this team is to provide analytical support to address complex business questions. More specifically, the team will work with stakeholders to clearly articulate mission gap problems and process inefficiencies. The team will then suggest and implement appropriate solutions, such as data science reports or machine learning models, for the stakeholders.

Responsibilities:

• Under little or no supervision, applies expert knowledge in statistical analysis, complex data mining, and artificial intelligence to make value out of data.

• Provides consulting relating to the data mining and analysis of data from a range of sources to transform raw data into concise and actionable insights.

• Designs and implements data-driven solutions, with specific focus on advanced analytical methods, data models, and visualizations.

• Develop quantitative simulations and models to provide descriptive and predictive analytics solution recommendations.

• Identifies trends and problems through complex big data analysis.

• Maintains current in emerging tools and techniques in machine learning, statistical modeling, and analytics.

Requirements

Basic Qualifications:

• Eight (8) years relevant experience in applied data science research or big data analytics.

• Advanced Degree (Masters or PhD) in Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Data Science, Computer Science, Operations Research or other closely related other quantitative or mathematical discipline. A PhD degree may be substituted for up to three (3) years of experience.

• Demonstrates knowledge of data mining methods, databases, data visualization and machine learning.

• Ability to communicate analysis techniques, concepts and products

• Ability to develop data-driven solutions, data models, and visualizations

About RIVA:

RIVA Solutions, Inc. is a rapidly growing provider of information Technology and Program Support Services to the United States Federal Government. Headquartered in McLean VA, RIVA has over 400 employees in 20+ states across the US. As we continue to expand our services within Management Consulting, STEM, Cyber AI and Robotic Process Automation, we are looking for highly qualified people to join and thrive with us. VivaLaRIVA!

RIVA is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy, gender identity, and sexual orientation), parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service, or other non-merit based factors.",3.7,RIVA Solutions,"Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,11,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,DC,3088,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
964,964,Data Scientist - Nationwide Opportunities,$89k-$111k,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)? Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models? Eager to learn to apply ML to a diverse array of enterprise use cases? Thrilled to be a part of Amazon who has been pioneering and shaping the worlds AI/ML technology for decades?

At Amazon Web Services (AWS), we are helping large enterprises build ML models on the AWS Cloud. We are applying predictive technology to large volumes of data and against a wide spectrum of problems. AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.

AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team. We pride ourselves on being customer obsessed and highly focused on the AI enablement of our customers. If you have experience with AI, including building ML models, wed like to have you join our team. You will get to work with an innovative company, with great teammates, and have a lot of fun helping our customers. A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.

This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.

Major responsibilities include:
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
· Use AWS AI services (e.g., Personalize), ML platforms (SageMaker), and frameworks (e.g., MXNet, TensorFlow, PyTorch, SparkML, scikit-learn) to help our customers build ML models
· Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
· Work with our other Professional Services consultants (Big Data, IoT, HPC) to analyze, extract, normalize, and label relevant data, and with our Professional Services engineers to operationalize customers models after they are prototyped

Basic Qualifications

· Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.) or equivalent professional or military experience
· Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
· 4+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
· Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
· Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
· Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations

Preferred Qualifications

· Maters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
· Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
· Deep technical skills, consulting experience, and business savvy to interface with all levels and disciplines within our customers organization
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",3.9,Amazon,"New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,26,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,NY,4217,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,1,0,0
965,965,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Join the INTERACTIVE BROKERS Team!

Interactive Brokers has been at the forefront of the Fintech space for over 42 years and we pride ourselves on being primarily a technology company. We continue to challenge the status quo and push boundaries to offer the best trading platform with the most sophisticated features all for the lowest cost to our customers.

We are looking for a Data Scientist with good knowledge and ability to communicate effectively understanding complex problems and explain their solution. The position is well-suited for an organized individual who can meet deadlines, follow written procedures, and collaborate for improvements

You will be part of:

The data science team, you will work on developing mathematical models in areas such as detecting fraud and suspicious transactions, security lending pricing models and analysis. You will Build supporting architecture for systems to utilize the models and ensure they are working as expected. You will have close interaction with the software and business departments. The best results come when all members of our team understand the business problems we are working to solve.

You will be responsible to:
Work with various internal stakeholders to address their data analysis/modeling needs.
Understand software skills such as business analysis in an analytical framework, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Apply statistical / machine learning methods to solve broad range of business problems including pricing, forecasting, anomaly detection, process performance, inventory optimization, customer acquisition/retention/attrition, etc.
Demonstrates ability to extract meaning from and interpret data using a variety of tools and methods from statistics and machine learning.
Work with developers on implementing the solutions in a production environment
Document steps taken and methods utilized in any project
Generate executive summary of the analysis for stakeholders
eager to learn new tools and business concepts and quickly adapt to changing business requirements
You are someone who will have:
BS in Computer Science or Mathematics or in any related quantitative field.
Adept at exploratory data analysis, data normalization and data visualization methods
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and programming.
Experience using statistical computer languages R (ML), Python (scikit-learn), SQL etc. to manipulate, extract and aggregate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Analytical mind and business acumen
Strong math skills (e.g. statistics, algebra)
Good to haves:
MS or PhD in Mathematics or another quantitative field
Prior experience with financial instruments in trading and brokerage
Experience programming in Java and Oracle
Experience with machine learning tools and methods such as Deep Learning, Convoluted/Adversarial NN, Tensor Flow, H2O
Experience with distributed tools such as Hadoop and Spark
Benefits to work with us:
Competitive salary, annual performance-based bonus, and stock grant
Retirement plan (401K) with company match
Excellent health and welfare benefits including medical, dental, and vision benefits
Wellness screenings and assessments, health coaches and counseling services through Employee Assistance Program (EAP)
Paid time off along and generous parental leave policy
Daily company paid lunch and a fully stocked kitchen with healthy options for breakfast and snack
Corporate events including team outings, dinners, volunteer activities and company sports teams
Education reimbursement and learning opportunities with Udemy
Modern offices with sit/stand desks and multi-monitor setups


Company Overview

Interactive Brokers a subsidiary of publicly-traded Interactive Brokers Group, Inc., based in Greenwich, Connecticut (NASDAQ: IBKR) is a low-cost provider of trade execution and clearing services for active traders, institutional investors, financial advisors and introducing brokers. IBKR's premier technology provides electronic access to stocks, options, futures, forex, bonds, and funds worldwide from a single IBKR Integrated Investment account. IBKR is one of the largest online brokers by trade volume and is consistently ranked at the top of its field.

Our employees are part of a dynamic, multinational, fast-paced, results-oriented team working to provide our customers with state-of-the-art trading technology, superior execution capabilities, worldwide electronic access, and sophisticated risk management tools.

Our headquarters are in Greenwich, CT, USA. IBKR has offices in the United States, Canada, the United Kingdom, Switzerland, Hungary, Estonia, Russia, India, Hong Kong, China, Japan and Australia.

IBKR is a member of NYSE, FINRA, and SIPC. Interactive Brokers Group brokerage affiliates are regulated by securities and commodities agencies around the world.

Click HERE to view a short video with a few words from current Interactive Brokers employees. (if hyperlink is deactivated please copy https://www.interactivebrokers.com/en/index.php?f=31899 to your browser)

For more information, please visit www.ibkr.com/info",3.1,IBKR,"Greenwich, CT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,financial_related,Finance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CT,5190,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,1,0,0
966,966,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"About Lokavant

Lokavant is a technology companywhose mission is to ensure that no clinical trial fails due to operationalerror. By integrating and analyzing the disparate data sources within clinicaltrials, Lokavant provides real-time visualizations and risk alerts to studysponsors and contract research organizations (CROs) to enable data-drivendecisions. These insights expedite trial timelines and reduce the costs ofdevelopment, allowing safe and efficacious treatments to get to patients.

Lokavant centralizes trial data topower a machine learning model that anticipates trial risk, providesdata-driven risk mitigation strategies, and predicts the impact of mitigationstrategy implementation. Lokavant's anticipatory monitoring capability isgrounded in a compendium of data from over 1,000 clinical trials and willimprove with each deployment.

About the Opportunity

How often are you given theopportunity to build something from the ground up, with an abundance ofresources at your disposal; to be part of a team of people accomplished indiverse scientific and engineering disciplines, focused on using the best ofwhat lies at the forefront of technology to address complex, real-worldproblems that have a positive impact on potentially millions of peoples' lives?This is that kind of opportunity.

We are seeking a thoughtful, hands-ondata scientist with an aptitude for or strong interest in clinical trial data tojoin the rapidly growing Lokavant Data Science team in our New York Cityheadquarters. As a part of the data science team, you will work very closelywith Lokavants engineering and product teams. Our platform is fullycloud-based and is being built around modern tools and frameworks in anincredibly fast-moving agile environment. As a Data Scientist at Lokavant, youwill be instrumental in setting and executing upon the vision for Lokavantsdifferentiation in the clinical research technology industry.

Key Responsibilities
Take an active role in defining the developmentroadmap and deliverables for the data science team in an integrated agileproduct development process
Drive development and productizationof end-to-end machine learning models
Work in a small team settingpartnering with engineers and scientists to derive the insights needed tosupport our products and product features
Follow industry standard practices toimplement, optimize, maintain, troubleshoot, and continuously improve the practicesof the data science team
Enable effective workingrelationships across Product Management, Front-End Development, DevelopmentOperations, Commercial and Data Engineering
Mentor and be mentored by datascientists of varied experience levels and subject matter areas
Minimum Requirements
2+ years of relevant experience in ananalytical role involving data science and statistical modeling
Fluency in Python and SQL
Strong understanding of advancedstatistical models and Machine Learning techniques
Experienceworking in an Agile software development environment
Exceptional written and verbal communicationskills
Strong attention to detail and highlyorganized, with effective multi-tasking and prioritization skills
Proactive, self-motivated andself-directed, with the ability to learn quickly and autonomously
Comfortable with ambiguity
Superior problem-solving andtroubleshooting skills
Ability to work as part of acollaborative cross-functional team in a fast-paced environment
Sincere interest in working at arapidly changing start-up and scaling with the company as we grow
Bachelors or masters degree withstrong academic performance in Statistics, Mathematics, Data Science, orequivalent field


Preferred (Nice-to-have) Qualifications
Experience in the life sciences industry
Experience with healthcare data, ideally clinical/operational clinicaltrial data
Knowledge of clinical data standards (e.g. CDISC, FHIR, HL7, etc.)
Knowledge of e-clinical systems and technologies (e.g. EDC, CTMS, IRT,etc.)


Employee Benefits
Competitive salary and equitycompensation
Full medical, dental, and visionbenefits
One Medical membership
401(k) plan
Flexible PTO policy
Flexible remote work policy
Great NYC office located in the heartof Times Square
Team events and outings
Lokavant is an equal opportunityemployer, indiscriminate of race, color, religion, ethnicity, ancestry,national origin, sex, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, maritalstatus, veteran status, disability, medical condition, or any other protectedcharacteristic. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating aninclusive environment for all employees.",-1.0,"Lokavant, Inc.","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,NY,4568,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
967,967,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"About the Role

We are looking for a data scientist who is innovative, highly-motivated, and proactive.

For this role, you will be part of a team that builds cutting-edge trading products in the cryptocurrency industry. You will be responsible for transforming data and generating actionable insights into our customer behavior and measuring the performance of our trading engine. You will collaborate and lead projects with product management, engineering, marketing, and growth teams. You will transform data from complex systems, generate performance metrics, and share the results with stakeholders at all levels of the company.

Great benefits, amazing perks, remote work and travel opportunities, stock incentives, beautiful HQ office, and a flexible PTO policy make Kraken a great place to work. If you value having a seat at the table and want to make a big impact on guiding the direction of marketing and growth at one of the top crypto exchanges in the world, this role is for you.

Responsibilities
Partner with Kraken’s engineering, marketing, product, and finance teams to identify, prioritize, and answer the most important questions where analytics and modeling will have a material impact.
Drive cross functional analytic projects from beginning to end: build relationships with partner teams, frame and structure questions, collect and analyze data, summarize and present key insights in support of decision making.
Work with engineers to evangelize data best practices and implement analytics solutions.
Collaborate with business leaders, subject matter experts, and decision makers to develop success criteria and optimize new products, features, policies, and models.
Communicate key results with self-serve tools (dashboards, analytics tools) for leadership and product management.
Develop anomaly detection, and data modelling tools to monitor key performance indicators to improve the efficiency of the products.
Design experiments for product teams to test hypothesis and help with idea generation and refinement.
Build key datasets and data pipelines using Python/ETL frameworks.
Requirements
A degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Physical Sciences, Economics, Math or a related technical field.
5+ years industry experience in data science or analytics
A consistent track record of performing data analysis using Python, R, and/or SQL
Experience using statistics and predictive analytics to solve complex business problems.
The versatility and willingness to learn new technologies on the job.
The ability to clearly communicate complex results to technical and non-technical audiences.
Familiarity with other data tools such as Hive, Vertica, Tableau & Ruby is a plus
We’re powered by people from around the world with their own unique backgrounds and experiences. We value all Krakenites and their talents, contributions, and perspectives.
Check out all our open roles at our Careers Page. We’re excited to see what you’re made of.
Learn more about us
Watch ""Working at Kraken""
Follow us on Twitter
Catch up on our blog
Follow us on LinkedIn",4.5,Kraken Digital Asset Exchange,Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,9,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,Remote,3075,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
968,968,Data Engineer,$89k-$111k,"About MasterControl:

MasterControl Inc. is a leading provider of cloud-based quality and compliance software for life sciences and other regulated industries. Our mission is the same as that of our customers to bring life-changing products to more people sooner. The MasterControl Platform helps organizations digitize, automate and connect quality and compliance processes across the regulated product development life cycle. Over 1,000 companies worldwide rely on MasterControl solutions to achieve new levels of operational excellence across product development, clinical trials, regulatory affairs, quality management, supply chain, manufacturing and postmarket surveillance. For more information, visitwww.mastercontrol.com.

Summary

At MasterControl we are building our next generation data platform that will leverage AI/ML techniques to help redefine how our customers bring lifesaving and lifechanging products to market. To enable this, we need your help building our data pipeline, DataMart and data lake.

You will be responsible for implementing the data life cycle consumption from the data source to the end model. By gathering requirements from Product, you will transform data in near real-time which will be consumable by AI model training, business intelligence analytic tools, and self-service platforms. You will need a strong emphasis on data modeling, as well as proficiency in data transformation. You will be responsible for integration into the CI/CD pipeline as well as unit and integration testing of all processes. You will need experience with structured, semi-structured, and unstructured data sources. You will need a bachelor's degree in a STEM related field, or equivalent experience. You will have some work experience with and a passion for Big Data.

Responsibilities
Pull data from all customer databases into S3 and put into a queryable format
Model the data for optimal performance (ETL, star-schema like, ORC, partitioning, etc ...)
Pull data from a real-time streaming architecture (Kafka) and do near-real-time aggregations andprojections of the data, storing the results in S3
Help automate the provisioning of AWS Lake Formations, EMR/Spark/S3 and other services in AWS
Analyze data to find patterns worthy to expose to the end-user
Help tie corporate data to customer data from an OLTP store
Help us discover ways to use Big Data technologies in a Machine Learning pipeline (discover, clean, label, train, test)
Other assigned duties
Preferred Skills
Scala/Python/SQL/Java
Apache Spark with EMR and/or other Big Data tools
Kafka Streams experience is big plus
Airflow experience is a plus
Big Data Mindset (Spark/Hive/Hadoop/HCatalog/Hudi). Understanding of the Big Data landscape.
Warehouse Architectures (Star Schema/Snowflake/Vaults/Lakes)
Familiarity with AWS and Cloud Formation or Terraform
Data Modelling
ETL Best Practices
Passionate about creatively solving business problems.
Effectively prioritize and execute tasks in a high-pressure environment.
The ability to non-emotionally coach and mentor others.
The ability to not participate in 'techno-arrogant' conversation.
Meet multiple, challenging deadlines while communicating expectations clearly.
Physical Demands and Working Conditions
Must be able to work well with people.
Ability to operate a computer and work at a desk for extended periods of time.
Ability to communicate effectively in writing, in person, over the telephone and in e-mail.
Why Work Here?

#WhyWorkAnywhereElse

#ExceptionalTeamCulture

MasterControl is a place where Exceptional Teams come together to do their best work. Hiring Exceptional Teams, including the best talent in our industry, is a core value of ours. MasterControl employees are surrounded by intelligent, motivated individuals every day. We like to call it #TheBestTeamOnThePlanet.

We value every employee and their contribution to what makes MasterControl successful. We give right back to the employee through a generous benefits package, great flexibility, and continuous opportunities for advancement.

Not only do we hire Exceptional Teams, but we work hard to keep them here by developing and challenging their skillsets, encouraging professional development and growth, and offering a culture that can't be found elsewhere. Which is why we say - #WhyWorkAnywhereElse?

To put it simply, working at MasterControl is fun, challenging, and rewarding. From our Fitness Clubs to our awards programs, from our company parties to our competitive benefits, you can't really go wrong. MasterControl could be your next (and last) career move!

We are growing quickly and always looking for talented individuals to add to #TheBestTeamOnThePlanet!

Here are some of the benefits MasterControl employees enjoy:
Generous PTO package of three weeks, increasing after just three years of employment
Competitive compensation with annual merit increase reviews
100% medical premium coverage (yes, you read that right!)
Dental/Vision Plans
401k Plan
Employer Paid Life Insurance Policy ($50K)
Great Flexibility
Wellness Programs (every employee gets a Fitbit!)
Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis.

Job Posted by ApplicantPro",4.0,MasterControl,"Salt Lake City, UT",-1,201 to 500 Employees,27,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,UT,5219,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
969,969,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Job Title

Data Scientist
Summary
As a key member of our team at RiverStone, you will be collaborating with different engineering and operations teams and leading development machine learning solutions for a variety of tasks and projects. You will be responsible for delivering projects from end-to-end: problem statement and conceptualization, proof-of-concept, and participation in final deployment. You will also perform ad-hoc statistical and data science analyses. Our ideal candidates are smart, creative, analytical thinkers with attention to detail. You will also work closely with data engineers, developers and modeling analysts to generate seamless business solutions. You will be expected to present results of analyses to a wide range of audiences including executives.
Essential Functions
Collaborate with multiple business and information technology units to understand company needs and propose solutions
Implement new statistical or other mathematical methodologies as needed for specific models or analysis.
Organize and synthesize data into actionable business decisions, focused on insights.
Related Functions:
Establishes and maintains effective working relationships, both internally and externally
Maintains and communicates on a regular basis the progress against department goals/objectives and priorities to Director of Data Science and Innovation
Compile, review, verify and analyze related external and internal insurance data including completed models for benchmarking of results
Organizational
Develops creative ideas and solutions to real time business problems and/or business opportunities; takes reasonable, calculated risks even if failure is possible.
Empowers self and teammates to continuously improve RiverStones business processes/ systems and develops and escalates ideas and solutions.
Consistently delivers superior customer service to both internal and external business partners.
Demonstrates alignment with RiverStones Commitments.
Prioritizes and organizes work in self-directed manner.
Attains and maintains knowledge of assigned department.
Performs other duties as required, including supporting and coordinating with other department colleagues.
Required Skills
Ability to tell meaningful stories with data.
Minimum four years of proven hands-on experience applying machine learning techniques to build models integrated into applications.
Strong working knowledge of machine learning/data mining algorithms (deep learning, classification, clustering, etc), experience with Image Analysis/Computer Vision is a plus.
Understand algorithms (be able to tweak them when needed) as well as infrastructure that enables fast iterations
Strong software development skills with proficiency in Python and R. Experienced user of libraries such as scikit-learn, scipy, R, NetworkX, Spacy, and NLTK.
Good understanding of deep learning algorithms and workflows, and experience with CNTK, Caffe, MXNet or TensorFlow is a plus.
Experience in Hadoop, Spark, Hive, Cassandra, Kafka and NoSQL databases is a plus
Familiarity with SQL programing
Experience
3+ years experience applying machine learning techniques to real business problems.
Property & Casualty Insurance experience encouraged, but not required

Required Education

Master of Applied Math, Machine Learning, Data Science, Statistics, Operations Research or related fields
Preferred Education or Certification

PhD of Applied Math, Machine Learning, Data Science, Statistics, Operations Research or related fields
Supervisory Role

None
Travel

Minimal, less than 10%
Work Environment / Physical Demands

This position operates in a professional cubicle based collaborative environment and must have the ability to timely produce thorough, accurate work with many competing demands, deadlines, and distractions. The position uses standard equipment such as phones, computers, copiers/printers and filing cabinets. Noise level is moderate. While this is a largely sedentary role, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear; stand; walk; bend; use hands to handle or feel; and reach with hands and arms. On occasion the individual must be able to lift and transport boxes weighing up to 30 pounds.

Other Duties (Disclaimer Statement)

RiverStone retains the right to change or assign other duties to this position as needed, OR

Other duties or responsibilities may change or be assigned as needed.
Core Competencies

32.) Learning on the Fly: Learns quickly when facing new problems; a relentless and versatile learner; open to change; analyzes both successes and failures for clues to improvement; experiments and will try anything to find solutions; enjoys the challenge of unfamiliar tasks; quickly grasps the essence and the underlying structure of anything.

51.) Problem Solving: Uses rigorous logic and methods to solve difficult problems with effective solutions; probes all fruitful sources for answers; can see hidden problems; is excellent at honest analysis; looks beyond the obvious and doesnt stop at the first answers.

52.) Process Management: Good at figuring out the processes necessary to get things done; knows how to organize people and activities; understands how to separate and combine tasks into efficient flow; knows what to measure and how to measure it; can see opportunities for synergy and integration where others cant; can simplify complex processes; gets more out of fewer resources.

56.) Sizing Up People: Is a good judge of talent; after reasonable exposure, can articulate the strengths and limitations of people inside or outside the organization; can accurately project what people are likely to do across a variety of situations.

22.) Ethics and Values: Adheres to an appropriate (for the setting) and effective set of core values and beliefs during both good and bad times; acts in line with those values; rewards the right values and disapproves of others; practices what he/she preaches.

61.) Technical Learning: Picks up on technical things quickly; can learn new skills and knowledge; is good at learning new industry, company, product, or technical knowledge like internet technology; does well in technical courses and seminars.

65.) Managing Vision and Purpose: Communicates a compelling and inspired vision or sense of core purpose; talks beyond today; talks about possibilities; is optimistic; creates mileposts and symbols to rally support behind the vision; makes the vision sharable by everyone; can inspire and motivate entire units or organizations.

14.) Creativity: Comes up with a lot of new and unique ideas; easily makes connections among previously unrelated notions; tends to be seen as original and value-added in brainstorming settings.

35.) Managing and Measuring Work: Clearly assigns responsibility for tasks and decisions; sets clear objectives and measures; monitors process, progress, and results; designs feedback loops into work.",3.0,The RiverStone Group,"San Diego, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CA,6911,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,1,0,1
970,970,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Trace Data is developing a ground breaking product to help companies monitor and secure their data. We're integrating the world of security, observability and connectivity. We're looking for people with a strong background or interest in building successful products and systems; you're comfortable in dealing with lots of moving pieces; you have exquisite attention to detail; and love learning new technologies and systems.

As our Data Scientist, you will:
Develop large scale machine learning algorithms that support monitoring, privacy and security capabilities.
Own the machine learning algorithms that power core features in the product such as the identification of sensitive data, automated data classification and anomaly detection using unsupervised and deep learning techniques ranging from computer vision algorithms for pattern recognition to variational auto-encoders to NLP.
Design, build, and launch efficient & reliable new data models, schemas and pipelines to enable analysis, modeling and machine learning.
Partner with product managers, designers, and engineers to prototype and productize data mining features.
Advise on best practices and statistical methods for measuring and evaluating experiments.
You may be fit for this role if you:
Have experience of building products from the ground up.
Have a Bachelor's/Master's degree or higher in a technical field such as Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Operations Research, Math, Physics or Engineering.
Have a deep theoretical understanding of modern machine learning algorithms, statistical models or optimization.
Have experience with data tools such as Python, R, SAS, SQL, etc and strong skills in data analysis, data visualization and engineering.
Have the ability to own your modeling work from model development all the way to launching into production with minimal help from engineers.
Have experience with MapReduce, Spark, Hive, HBase, Google BigQuery, BigTable is a plus. Experience ML frameworks like Tensorflow, PyTorch, Spark MLlib, XGBoost, and Scikit-Learn is a plus.
You're a strong communicators; explaining complex technical concepts to product managers, data analysts, and other engineers shouldn't be a problem for you.
About Trace Data

Trace Data is an early stage startup founded in 2019 and headquartered in Oakland, California. We're backed by top tier investors including Accel and Kleiner Perkins.

We're a highly cross-functional organization and encourage as much collaboration as possible. We have a culture of transparency that we carry through to internal communication, ensuring everyone has the information they need to make great decisions. We value humility, respect and diversity. We look for people who are curious, want to grow and have impact every day.

Trace Data provides equal employment opportunities (EEO). All applicants are considered without regards to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, or sexual orientation.",3.9,Trace Data,"Oakland, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,20,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CA,3029,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,1
973,973,Data Scientist I,$89k-$111k,"Cars.com is one of Chicago's original tech companies. Our online platform makes it easier for consumers to shop for, sell and service their cars. With our expert content, mobile app features, millions of new and used vehicle listings, a comprehensive set of research tools and the largest database of consumer reviews in the industry, Cars.com offers innovative products to connect consumers with dealers across the country.

Data is the driver for our future at Cars. We are looking for Data Scientists (at various levels) to join our core Machine Learning group. This team is responsible to improve shopping experience, optimize sales and marketing pipelines and build measurement strategies. You'll work with various teams like Analytics, Engineering, Product, Marketing and Sales to drive business value.

on a typical day you will:
Work with senior members to build and deploy machine learning models
Support full iteration of data driven product feature development from requirement gathering, algorithm design, production implementation to experimentation and measurement
Pivot between analysis, model building and programing tasks to identify opportunities for model performance and code execution improvements
Communicate modeling methodologies and analytical findings to business stakeholders
Stay up-to-date with latest technology trends and publish research articles on science and innovations
requirements:
BS in statistics, econometrics, machine-learning, applied mathematics or related quantitative field
Knowledge of common machine learning algorithms, and ability to identify the right algorithms to experiment with for different problems
Familiarity with python/R/scala/julia
Experience with relational databases / SQL
Ability to communicate technical findings to non technical audience
preferred:
Eager to learn: blogging, portfolio of passion projects or involvement in Kaggle, open source and any other data science/engineering community
Knowledge of how to work with different types of data such as text, image, audio etc.
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

#LI-LB",3.2,Cars.com,Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,22,Company - Public,other_industries,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,Remote,2291,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
974,974,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Chicago, IL
Posted 4 weeks ago

The Process Monitoring, Automation and Control (PMAC) team is responsible for driving the development and implementation of advanced analytics and control solutions that deliver value for today and build capability for tomorrow.
As a member of PMAC, this role will have the opportunity to work closely with the IT organization to
develop and implement Advanced Analytics, AI, APC and IIoT solutions/capabilities in manufacturing
settings to achieve actionable insights and enable continued improvement for pharmaceutical
manufacturing and quality operations.
Responsibilities
• You will contribute to the development of the multiple use cases across manufacturing operations,
leveraging IIOT and analytics, in areas such as energy management, predictive maintenance, production
scheduling and process optimization.
• Development and implementation of analytic models and tools using advanced analytics, machine
learning and artificial intelligence;
• Work with the IIoT developers to integrate predictive/prescriptive analytics with the IIoT platform to
achieve visibility, predictability and learning across multiple automation layers from process to plant and
to enterprise
• Understand Advanced Analytics approaches in other businesses;
Qualifications
• Bachelor’s Degree or higher in Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Engineering and/or Computer Science
• Hands-on experience in data science, advanced analytics, multivariate data analysis, machine learning,
artificial intelligence, and familiarity with related open source libraries (e.g. Tensor Flow, AWS ML)
• Proficient in one or more of the following programming environments: Python (preferred), R, Matlab,
PMML, JAVA, Spark
• Familiarity with deep Learning, Neural Networks, Natural Language Processing or related fields
• Experience with cloud-based analytics platforms
• Experience with ThingWorx IIoT platform preferred
• Familiarity with industrial process control system, operations management system and/or SAP is a plus
• Pharmaceutical experience preferred but not necessary
• Independent, self-motivated personality with excellent oral and written communication skills
• Ability to work collaboratively in diverse cross-functional teams on innovative solutions and tools with
an open attitude towards fast learning

To apply for this job email your details to suda@sutoer.com",4.7,Sutoer,"Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,IL,2378,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
975,975,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Data Scientist (Mid)

Education Required:

Bachelors with 8 years of experience.

Required Experience:
Provide onsite data science support to advance Latin America and Global drug trend analysesin support ofthe Consolidated Counterdrug Database (CCDB)
Conduct data entry into the digital foundation in counternarcotics data Artificial Intelligence ( AI), Machine Learning (ML), data mining algorithms, probability modeling, and other scientific techniques to correlate complex, technical findings into graphical, written, visual and verbal narrative products on trends of intelligence information
Apply technical expertise to leverage inhouse tools such as Rand Python scripts to generate insights into existing data stores, to include CCDB
Employ knowledge of existing and emerging "" big data"" processing tools and techniques useful in delivering strategic insights to policy makers in the counterdrug mission
Contribute to identifying new classified and unclassified data stores of massive size and relevance to the counternarcotics mission to enhance CCDB data enrichment efforts or provide unique analytic insights into counterdrug issues
Engage in exploratory analysis and rapid iteration techniques of large volumes of data to quickly derive intelligence
Prepare products to describe and document findings and activities
Identify and evaluate a wide range of existing methods, models, and algorithms to develop more accurate and/or objective quantitative analysis approaches for CCDB data completeness, accuracy and consistency
Clearly articulate opportunities, risks and assumptions with applied methodologies. Communicate findings to a wide variety of customers, in both written and verbal formats; with the ability to communicate complex information in laymen's terms
Participate in special projects / surge support as required
** Please note this position is contingent upon award **

Company Overview:

BTS Software Solutions is a Service Disabled Veteran Owned Small Business who are community-focused innovators who transform ideas into technology to serve people. We recognize that innovation is only valuable when applied towards a needed solution. Technology has no value without the hard work to turn ideas into reality. Our roots are in helping save Soldiers lives through technology. We bring that ethos to serving our community. We create solutions that touch people's lives - products to communicate, to connect companies with customers, to stay informed, to save lives, and to enhance lives.

We have a small company persona with a large company ethos and capabilities; we create elegant solutions for complex problems that will enrich peoples lives. We offer one of the best benefits packages in the industry: Competitive health benefits package, PTO, 401K matching and vested from day one to name just a few of our benefits and perks.

BTS Software Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE). All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.",4.9,BTS Software Solutions,"Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,9,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,DC,3253,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
978,978,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Overview


This data scientist position will utilize analytical, statistical, and programming skills to collect, analyze, and interpret large datasets. The role requires the ability to work with a variety of stakeholders and functional teams to uncover data-based insights to deliver improved business outcomes.

Responsibilities
Research, design and prototype robust and scalable models based on machine learning, data mining, and statistical modeling to answer key business problems
Build tools and support structures needed to analyze data, perform elements of data cleaning, feature selection and feature engineering and organize experiments in conjunction with best practices
Work with the data science team and business groups to ensure models can be implemented as part of a web application framework (R/Shiny)
Keep current with the latest developments in the field by continuous learning and adapting new methods relevant to the problems at hand
Qualifications


EDUCATION & EXPERIENCE MINIMUMS:
BS in Statistics, Computer Science or other related field
5+ years of experience building and deploying machine learning models
Strong skills in statistical application prototyping and engineering with expert knowledge in R development
Deep knowledge of fundamentals of machine learning, data mining and statistical predictive modeling, and extensive experience applying these methods to real world problems
Ability and inclination to work in multi-disciplinary environments, and desire to see ideas realized in practice
2+ years of experience using SQL
EDUCATION & EXPERIENCE PREFERRED:
Desired interdisciplinary skills include big data technologies, ETL, statistics and causal inference, Deep Learning, modeling and simulation
Experience with business intelligence tools such as Tableau/Shiny
Automotive, chemistry/chemical, or petroleum additive related academic background or work experience
For NewMarket or Afton employees, an appropriate combination of experiences that will support the required skill base may replace one or more of the specific experience requirements above.

SKILLS/ABILITIES:

· Decision Making - Decision making in a timely manner based upon a mixture of analysis, wisdom, experience, and judgment; sometimes with incomplete information, under tight deadlines and pressure; while based upon appropriate risk and authority

· Business Insight - The understanding of the basis for our business model and how that is realized in the market. The understanding of how business and operations are intimately linked. The ability to utilize information, practices & trends, affecting the business to engage and drive new strategies and tactics work in the marketplace.

· Analysis and Problem Solving - Solves difficult problems with effective solutions; asks good questions and questions all likely sources for answers; can solve complex problems and recognize complex patterns; utilizing all appropriate tools to reach a robust answer.

· Communication - The ability to communicate information clearly and effectively in an engaging and convincing manner.

· Managing Performance - Possessing the drive and focus to achieve challenging goals.

· Collaboration and Networking - The ability to work in and across Afton's organizational matrix to achieve business objectives, via engaging and rewarding interactions. Through this network provide support, exert influence. Influencing without authority.

· Project Management - The ability to manage tasks and activities and achieve their completion within the agreed framework, across regional and organizational boundaries

· Innovation - The openness to new ideas and the ability to generate breakthrough solutions. Can develop, seek out, critically assess and implement new and value adding concepts.

· Dealing with Uncertainty - Can effectively cope with change; can shift gears comfortably; can decide and act without having the total picture; isn’t upset when things are up in the air; doesn’t have to finish things before moving on; can comfortably handle risk and uncertainty.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to the individual’s race, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, religion, age, disability, genetic information, status as a military veteran or any other characteristic protected by applicable law.",4.2,NewMarket Corporation,"Richmond, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,133,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,VA,4429,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
980,980,"Data Scientist, Analytics",$89k-$111k,"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started.Were looking for Data Scientists to work on our core and business products (ex. Instagram, Messaging, Growth, Engagement, Ads) to help shape the future of what we build at Facebook. You will enjoy working with one of the richest data sets in the world, cutting edge technology, and the ability to see your insights turned into real products on a regular basis. The perfect candidate will have a background in a quantitative or technical field, will have experience working with large data sets, and will have some experience in data-driven decision making. You are focused on results, a self-starter, and have demonstrated success in using analytics to drive the understanding, growth, and success of a product. This position is based full time in our Menlo Park, CA office.

Responsibilities:

Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, data mining, and the presentation of data to see beyond the numbers and understand how our users interact with both our consumer and business products
Partner with Product and Engineering teams to solve problems and identify trends and opportunities
Inform, influence, support, and execute our product decisions and product launches
The Data Scientist Analytics role has work across the following four areas:
Product Operations
Forecasting and setting product team goals
Designing and evaluating experiments
Monitoring key product metrics, understanding root causes of changes in metrics
Building and analyzing dashboards and reports
Building key data sets to empower operational and exploratory analysis
Evaluating and defining metrics
Exploratory Analysis
Proposing what to build in the next roadmap
Understanding ecosystems, user behaviors, and long-term trends
Identifying new levers to help move key metrics
Building models of user behaviors for analysis or to power production systems
Product Leadership
Influencing product teams through presentation of data-based recommendations
Communicating state of business, experiment results, etc. to product teams
Spreading best practices to analytics and product teams
Data Infrastructure
Working in Hadoop and Hive primarily, sometimes MySQL, Oracle, and Vertica
Automating analyses and authoring pipelines via SQL and python based ETL framework
Mininum Qualifications:

2+ years experience doing quantitative analysis
BA/BS in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics or other technical field
Experience in SQL or other programming languages
Development experience in any scripting language (PHP, Python, Perl, etc.)
Ability to communicate the results of analyses with product and leadership teams to influence the strategy of the product
Understanding of statistics (e.g., hypothesis testing, regressions)
Experience manipulating data sets through statistical software (ex. R, SAS) or other methods
Preferred Qualifications:

Advanced degrees
Experience with distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop)
Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.

Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,Facebook,"Menlo Park, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,16,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CA,4428,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
981,981,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Data Scientist
Location


Tysons Corner, VA

Job Code

229

# of Openings

1

Apply Now

Ridgeline International is looking for a Data Scientist to help us boldly innovate through data.

This is a strategic hire. You should be curious by design, think of yourself as a data artist and storyteller, have an ownership, solution and action mindset, can impact the cross functional team that moves fast with intent and purpose. We are particularly interested in your portfolio of data innovation in the geo-political, national issue or brand campaigns.

If this is you then then we should talk.

What you’ll do:
Build data products that solve hard problems and reveal opportunity through creative sourcing, model development and visualization.
What you’ll need:
Four or more years of experience in a data science role, with a concentration on social sciences, demographic analysis and anthropology.
Experience with creation of visual data displays.
Expert in Python; R; Scala
Nice to Haves:
MA in Applied Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, or related field; or experience. Self-taught coders are welcome. Bring your portfolio and impress us.
Credentials in machine learning, AI, probabilities, statistical inference and linear models
Familiarity with Unix shell scripting
Visualization to tell a story and explain a point
Here are some Perks of being a Ridgeliner!
20% 401K contribution regardless of employee match
Flexible PTO + Holidays
Opportunities for professional development to attend conferences, classes, and workshops.
$1,000 every month for discretionary team building stipend.
$2,500 Annual Clothing Allowance
$2,000 Hobby Allowance
Medical, dental, vision, disability, life insurance
Free daily snacks & fancy sparkling water and nitro cold brew on tap
Company-wide events, including team building, holiday party, and off-sites.
Free gym membership
Get the technology you want to do your job
Flexible work schedules",4.7,Ridgeline International,"Tysons Corner, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,5,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,VA,1934,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
982,982,Senior Data Engineer,$89k-$111k,"As a Senior Data Engineer at Guild, you'll work across teams to help us build the next generation of data products. You'll work with world class data engineers to design and build the scalable, robust, and high-quality data infrastructure and data pipelines needed to support growth of our education network and SaaS platform. Ultimately, you'll help change the landscape for how we think about delivering education products to learners across the country by building a digital solution that connects students, employers, and universities to deliver education at an affordable price to students.

A day in our open, collaborative workspace might look like:
Designing, building, and expanding Guild's backend data infrastructure, including data pipelines, ETL, data ingestion, data APIs, and data warehouses
Building APIs that can be used internally or externally to serve crucial information across systems, partners, and teams
Translating complex business requirements into usable, scalable data models and systems
Mentoring other engineers and analysts on the team and sharing technical knowledge to enable others to be more effective at their jobs
In this role, you'll expand your expertise by:
Evolving our data products now and in the future by contributing to our backend data architecture
Working in an agile team environment with a high performing engineering team
Taking on a cross-functional role that will expose you to the ins and outs of Guild (working with our Product, Design, Client Success, and Student Services teams)
Receiving feedback through our learning-focused, twice annual Structured Growth Conversations
You'll know if you're successful by:
Choosing and leveraging the latest technologies in data engineering to automate data integration and loading, such as, Amazon Redshift, Redis, Java, Scala, Spark, Kafka, Python, S3 and PostgreSQL
Leveraging your experience to design solutions that will be the backbone of a highly scalable, reusable, backend data infrastructure
Ensuring our data is clean, accurate, and secure
Thriving in fast-paced and scaling environment
You'll join a team:
From diverse backgrounds – from traditional higher education, to athletic coaches, to politicians, to mental health professionals (and more!)
Of learners & problem-solvers dedicated to our dual mission of changing education in America while building a successful, high-growth company
Committed to building a diverse, equitable, and inclusive environment that you'd support every day
What you'll add to Guild – as an individual and part of the broader team:
Experience building data pipelines, custom ETL processes and data warehouses
Experience with one or more programming languages such as Java, Python, or Scala
Expertise in database technologies such as Redshift, PostgreSQL, Redis, and working with large sets of data
Experience deploying solutions to cloud technology services such as Amazon Web Services
Experience improving software products through engineering best practices such as refactoring, reusability, TDD and continuous integration
A proven ability to thrive in changing environments by having a fast, flexible, cooperative work style
Strong communication skills and the ability to effectively explain technical concepts to other engineers, analysts, product managers, and stakeholders.
Experience with BI tools such as Looker, Tableau, Kibana, Chart.io, etc.
Basic experience in statistical analysis, text processing, and machine learning
Passion for higher education and our mission – Guild is pioneering a new path for education as a benefit in a complicated and regulated space – success means quickly and effectively adapting your expertise
A drive to work hard and plan for how you can refresh/recharge while working in a startup
Something else? Wonderful, we're curious to learn more about you!
About Guild:

Guild is increasing economic mobility for working adults by partnering with the largest employers in the country to offer education as a benefit to their employees via our marketplace of nonprofit universities and education institutions. Guild's proprietary technology platform facilitates the administration of this innovative benefit and our team of coaches helps each employee navigate the path back to school, providing individualized support from day one through program completion.

We also just became the latest female-led company to hit a $1billion valuation and the only B-corp with those qualifications. Our Series D round was led by Ken Chenault, General Catalyst Partners chairman and former CEO of AMEX, and joined by Emerson Collective, LeadEdge Capital, and Iconiq.

Guild Education is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.",3.5,Guild Education,"Denver, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,5,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CO,4775,1,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
983,983,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Pocket Outdoor Media is looking for a full time Data Scientist eager to put their data science and problem solving skills towards building the personalized fitness platform of the future. You'll join the energetic team in our Boulder office and develop machine learning-based algorithms and models powering our cutting-edge platform utilizing large, diverse fitness datasets. You'll receive competitive pay, benefits package (including medical, dental, vision), 401k, commuter benefits, and equity.

What you'll do
Lead development of custom predictive and prescriptive algorithms interfacing with large data sets, based on principles from statistics, machine learning, and operations research
Create integrated solutions using Python modules (including Pandas, Numpy, Scipy, SQLAlchemy, and Tensorflow), PostgreSQL, and other tools as needed
Work closely with engineers to help evolve proof of concept systems into production at scale
Work the product development team to define desired requirements and capabilities
Perform research as needed to identify the latest techniques from technical literature and apply them to relevant product features
Identify and promote the use of new technologies, toolkits, and frameworks, areas of inquiry, ways of working, methods and approaches in Computer Science, Artificial Intelligence, Software and Research Engineering
What you'll bring
A degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Applied Statistics, Operations Research, Computational Biology, or a related analytical field
3+ years experience of statistical programming experience, including development of applied algorithms in production
Demonstrated ability to develop algorithms in Python 3.x using Python libraries like Tensorflow, Keras, pandas, and numpy
Detailed knowledge of computer science including data structures, data modeling, distributed systems, and software design methods
Strong understanding of statistical inference, regression and classification, and the ability to explain rationale underlying data science-related decisions to a broader audience
Knowledge of current best-practices, tools, and technologies for implementing machine learning pipelines
When applying

If possible, include references algorithms you've developed and/or research that you have published demonstrating your Data Scientist prowess. Be prepared to describe at least one data science project (thought process, planning, technical implementation) during your interview.",-1.0,Pocket Outdoor Media,"Boulder, CO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,other_industries,Media,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CO,2463,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
984,984,Senior Data Scientist - Telecommute,$89k-$111k,"Optum Payment Integrity Analytics is looking to expand and is seeking a Senior Data Scientist to join our team and help us reach our goals of accurate and effortless payments of claims through advanced analytics and machine learning. You should be an exceptional disciplined and self-motivated Data Scientist with predictive modeling and advanced analytics experience and a passion for working with healthcare data, experience using various computational approaches, and a portfolio of projects you can show and talk about.

Youll enjoy the flexibility to telecommute* from anywhere within the U.S. as you take on some tough challenges.

Primary Responsibilities:
Improve and extend the analytic methods in our products
Work alongside other data scientists, engineers, and project managers to design and implement models and experiments from end to end, including data ingestion and preparation, feature engineering, analysis and modeling, model deployment, performance tracking and documentation
Conduct hands-on data analysis and predictive analytics on large datasets
Effectively communicate complex technical results to business partners
Support and drive analytic efforts around machine learning and innovation
Work with a great deal of autonomy to find solutions to complex problems
Youll be rewarded and recognized for your performance in an environment that will challenge you and give you clear direction on what it takes to succeed in your role as well as provide development for other roles you may be interested in.

Required Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree or higher in Applied Mathematics, Physics, Computer Science, Statistics or related technical field
3+ years of hands-on experience in in developing analytics with machine learning, deep learning, NLP, and/or other related modeling techniques
Strong proficiency in advanced data science tools such as R, Python, SQL, Spark and H2O
Familiarity with wrangling large datasets with big data tools such as Hadoop, Hive and Spark
Experience applying computational algorithms and statistical methods to structured and unstructured data
Experience combining analytic methods with advanced data visualizations using, for example, Tableau, Shiny or D3
Expert ability to breakdown and clearly define problems
Strong ability to communicate highly technical results to a diverse audience
Careers with Optum. Here's the idea. We built an entire organization around one giant objective; make the health system work better for everyone. So when it comes to how we use the world's large accumulation of health-related information, or guide health and lifestyle choices or manage pharmacy benefits for millions, our first goal is to leap beyond the status quo and uncover new ways to serve. Optum, part of the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, brings together some of the greatest minds and most advanced ideas on where health care has to go in order to reach its fullest potential. For you, that means working on high performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter. Optum, incredible ideas in one incredible company and a singular opportunity to do your life's best work.SM

*All Telecommuters will be required to adhere to UnitedHealth Groups Telecommuter Policy.

Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: UnitedHealth Group is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.

UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.

Job Keywords: Senior Data Scientist, Telecommute, Telecommuter",3.4,Unitedhealth Group,"Eden Prairie, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,43,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,MN,3866,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
985,985,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Job Description


Job #: 1088245

Please send resume to Kevin Reed at kreed@apexsystems.com

Data Scientist (Big Data)

San Antonio, TX (No remote work)

Must Have Top Secret Clearance w/ SCI Eligibility

Direct Hire to Client

Ability to develop analytics for multiple cyber weapon systems with many different infrastructure and end-point devices. Ability to incorporate predictive, descriptive, and presumptive modeling; machine learning; artificial intelligence into analytics. Must be able to code proficiently in one or more of the following languages: Python, R, Scala, Spark, and Maven. Develop algorithms in one or more of the following Machine Learning areas: anomaly detection, one/few-shot learning, deep learning, unsupervised feature learning, ensemble methods, probabilistic graphical models, reinforcement learning. Ability to develop analytics based upon the Mitre ATT&CK Matrix or other applicable CS&D framework to discover, identify, characterize, and/or create signatures for cyberspace threat activity. Ability to assist in the development and implementation of a data analytics program. Develop robust documentation and comprehensive user manuals for all developed projects

Original Hire Document for data scientist below:

Job Responsibilities:

· Perform big data analysis on information technology infrastructure and end-point devices

· Customer outreach and engagement

· Problem solving

· Time management

· Collaborate with others

· Mission focused

· Deliver findings

· Accept and assess customer data, dashboard, requirements

· Identify new ways to visualize and analyze data

· Develop analytics to identify anomalous activity based on customer requirements

· Perform hunt operations identifying anomalous activity

· Produce reports based on misconfigurations and/or anomalous activity discovered through analysis

Knowledge/Skills Ability:

Required:

· Ability to analyze and assess software development or data acquisition requirements and determine optimum, cost-effective solutions.

· Proficiency in one or more big data programming languages, such as R, Python, Scala, or Spark and Maven.

· Experience working with a hybrid team of analysts, visualization experts, engineers, and developers to conduct research, and build and deploy complex, but easy-to-use analytical platforms.

· Previous experience performing research in Data Analytics or big data.

· Be Director of Central Intelligence Directives 6/4 eligible (Top Secret) with a current Single Scope Background Investigation (SSBI)

Minimum Experience/Education:

· At least one (1) of the following:

· One (1) year experience in cyberspace operations

· IAT Level 1 per DoD 8140 (Net+, Sec+, etc.)

· Experience on National/Service cyber weapon system/platform within last five years

Highly Desired:

· Education/ Certifications:

· 4+ years of experience in data analytics or quantitative intelligence analysis

· Four (4) years of experience in an intelligence field at a tactical or operational level

· DoD 8570 IAT related BA/BS degree

EEO Employer

Apex Systems is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate or allow discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, creed, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding, or related medical conditions), age, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, genetic information, registered domestic partner status, marital status, disability, status as a crime victim, protected veteran status, political affiliation, union membership, or any other characteristic protected by law. Apex will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 844-463-6178.",3.8,Apex Systems,"San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,25,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,TX,4022,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
986,986,Data Engineer II,$89k-$111k,"Job Description


Here at Discount Tire, we celebrate the spirit of our people with extraordinary pride and enthusiasm. As America’s largest independent tire retailer, specializing in tires & wheels, we have over 1,000 store locations and continue to grow every year. Our consistent growth over the last 60 years, the loyalty of our customers and passion of our people makes Discount Tire a great place to work.

Under general supervision, Data Engineer II supports Discount Tire’s Data Science and Business Intelligence teams in developing advanced analytic solutions that support the enterprise’s key strategic initiatives. This role is responsible for developing, testing and maintaining our cloud-based analytics platform, including data pipelines, Enterprise Data Warehouse and other Big Data technologies. Embodies IOOGA (Integrity, Our People, Our Customers, Growth and Attitude)

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Develops high performance distributed data warehouse, distributed analytic systems and cloud architectures.
Participates in the development of relational and non-relational data models focusing on design for optimal storage and retrieval
Develops, tests and debugs batch and streaming, data pipelines (ETL/ELT) to populate databases and object stores from multiple disparate data sources; provides recommendations to improve data reliability, efficiency and quality.
Design and develop scalable solutions leveraging using technologies including Docker and Kubernetes
Working along side data scientists, supports the development and promotion of high-performance algorithms, models and prototypes.
Implements data quality metrics, standards, guidelines; automates data quality checks / routines as part of data processing frameworks; validates flow of information.
Ensures that Data Warehousing and Big Data systems meet business requirements and industry practices; including but not limited to, automation of system builds, security requirements, performance requirements and logging/monitoring requirements.
Troubleshoots data and performance related issues; implements adjustments, documents root cause and corrective measure; provides recommendations to stakeholders.
Documents technical specifications and participates with peers in design and code review sessions.
Employ a variety of scripting languages and tools to integrate data from multiple disparate data sources.
Use basic statistical and visualization techniques to analyze the resulting data sets of your processes
Learn and stay abreast of new technologies that can improve the efficacy of the analytics and data science teams
Stays current on the latest industry technologies, trends and strategies.
Other duties as assigned.

Job Requirements


Qualifications:
This position requires a minimum of five years of progressive database development and integration experience.
Strong knowledge of logical and physical data modeling is necessary, including but not limited to entity design, relationships, indexing and star schemas.
Ability to translate a logical data model into a relational or non-relational solution is necessary.
Understanding of multiple relational (RDMS) and non-relational (NoSQL) data platforms is needed.
SQL experience is required.
Scripting knowledge with SQL and Python.
Experience in SQL tuning, indexing, partitioning, data access patterns and scaling strategies is needed.
Experience with data integrations and data processing for business intelligence and analytics workloads is required.
Experience with AWS S3 or other distributed object stores, AWS Redshift, Elastic MapReduce a plus.
Hands-on experience in database development using views, SQL scripts and transformations is needed.
Proficient with Microsoft office, including skills with Word and Excel, is necessary.
Experience working with large complex data sets.
Understanding of Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) methodologies such as Agile and Waterfall is needed.
Proven analytical problem solving and decision making skills is critical.
Ability to communicate across all levels of the organization is necessary; must be able to clearly articulate technical ideas to a non-technical audience both verbally and in writing.
Ability to work independently and in a team is vital.
Customer service skills including the ability to manage and respond to different customer situations while maintaining a positive and friendly attitude is essential.
The ability to multi-task, and manage multiple projects to meet various deadlines simultaneously is required.
The ability to work efficiently and accurately under pressure, meet deadlines and present a professional demeanor is essential.
In addition, troubleshooting and organizational skills with a can-do attitude and the ability to adjust to changing requirements are essential.
Educational Requirements:

This position requires a Bachelors Degree in Computer Science, Computer Information Systems or related or equivalent experience.

Data or cloud related certifications are a plus.

Work Days:

Normal work days are Monday through Friday. Occasional Saturdays and Sundays may be necessary.

Work Hours:

Normal work hours are 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. Additional hours may be necessary.

Apply
Not ready to",4.0,Discount Tire,"Scottsdale, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,60,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,AZ,5242,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
987,987,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Job Purpose:

The Data Scientist reporting to the Chief Information Officer will be responsible for driving the scientific use of Global Supply Chain Data to accelerate speed to market as well as provide dashboards and predictive analytics to clients. Additionally, this role will assist in advancing and shaping Ancillare’s supply chain data strategy through the due diligence on new data providers/vendors and informational support for data surrounding a range of Therapeutic Areas.

Duties and Responsibilities:
Work as the lead data strategist, identifying and integrating new datasets that can be leveraged through our product capabilities.
Work collaboratively with the engineering team to strategize and execute the development of data products.
Execute analytical experiments methodically to help solve various problems and make a true impact across various domains.
Identify relevant data sources and sets to mine for client business needs and collect large structured and unstructured datasets and variables.
Devise and utilize algorithms and models to mine big data stores, perform data and error analysis to improve models, and clean and validate data for uniformity and accuracy.
Analyze data for trends and patterns and interpret data with a clear objective in mind.
Implement analytical models into production by collaborating with software developers and machine learning engineers.
Create expert data visualization applications.
Communicate analytic solutions to stakeholders and implement improvements as needed to operational systems
Ability and desire to work a project to completion meeting and or exceeding timeline deliverables.
Demonstrate and drive the Ancillare mission, values, and strategy.
Participate and contribute positively to process improvement initiatives.
Travel as may be required.
Perform other duties as assigned.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, applied mathematics, or related discipline required. Advanced degree preferred.
7+ years’ experience in data science required.
2+ years of project management experience and/or professional certifications preferred.
Experience working with pharmaceutical and supply chain data
Minimum Requirements:
Ability to effectively communicate in English both written and verbal.
Ability to partner and successfully gain collaboration across all levels of the organization.
Demonstrated proficiency with data mining, mathematics, and statistical analysis.
Advanced pattern recognition and predictive modeling experience required.
Working experience with Excel, PowerPoint, PowerBI, SQL, and programming languages (i.e., Java/Python, SAS).
Knowledge of Hadoop and or Big Data environments a plus.
Working knowledge and experience with building and maintaining Data Warehousing, Datalakes etc.
Comfort working in a dynamic, research-oriented group with several ongoing concurrent projects.
Knowledge in the use of AI a plus.
Knowledge of BlockChain processes and implementations a big plus.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Employee Discount
Flexible Schedule
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Professional Development Assistance
Referral Program
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
8 Hour Shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Data Science: 5 years (Required)
Project Management: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Doctorate (Preferred)
Location:
Horsham, PA 19044 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.ancillare.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.1,Ancillare,"Horsham, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,14,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,PA,3711,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
988,988,Principal Data Scientist I,$89k-$111k,"JOB SUMMARY
The Principal Data Scientist I will serve as a technical lead for the experimentation data science team. This role will support experiment planning and set-up across Charter product teams including video, buyflow, and support portals and own experimentation strategy including validation development of experimentation plans, frameworks, and experimentation metrics. The individual will additionally be responsible for executing advanced analytic projects with the objectives of creating causal inferences, correlations, predictions, and recommendations for improvements to business processes, and the metrics to monitor those improvements. Requires a strong command of statistical and data science oriented techniques and algorithms as well as a demonstrated practical ability to determine where to invest time, synthesize actionable findings across diverse assignments, and present these findings to an audience with varying levels of background in analytics.

MAJOR DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Actively and consistently support all efforts to simplify and enhance the customer experience
Collaborate with stakeholders to understand product / feature plans for development and translate those plans into experimentation objectives and testable hypotheses
Assist product teams with experimental design and analyses, including development of analysis plans and ad hoc reports
Develop experimentation strategy and project plans for stakeholders and lead execution of plans involving members across multiple teams
Synthesize data from experimentation and other data sources to provide stakeholders with answers to research questions and help determine next steps for a product / feature using a data driven approach
Create and present materials communicating quantitative findings and relevant business impacts to internal and external teams as well as an executive audience
Supervise and integrate the work of junior data scientists on experimentation and data science team to produce high quality work products
Refine experimentation processes including leverage of existing data science tools and development of new tools where applicable
Identify new methodologies for advancing experimentation program, develop plans to evaluate these methodologies through simulation studies, and work with software and data engineering teams on implementation strategies
Leverage multiple data sources to produce intelligent data products that solve the needs of business and engineering for business intelligence, operational analytics, descriptive models, predictive models, diagnostic models, and prescriptive models.
Make technical decisions for the organization
Coordinate technical activities across projects and the organization
Interact with various stakeholders to understand their business needs, communicate project status and develop relationships to ensure satisfaction
Develop and deliver materials on experimentation techniques and tools to a broad set of business-intelligence, data, and analytics professionals with varied backgrounds
Exercise thought leadership and discretion in tailoring the tools, approaches, and data used to meet the needs of the particular problem
Deliver results using metrics-driven analysis, and communicating the costs and tradeoffs of ideas to stakeholders and top management
REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS
Skills/Abilities and Knowledge
Ability to read, write, speak and understand English
Able to communicate complex technical, statistical and quantitative concepts to individuals with a variety of backgrounds, explain the importance and relevance of data, and suggest solutions
Works with minimal guidance to set project plans and timelines and prioritize among multiple competing interests
Working knowledge of current industry best practices for online experimentation
Command of advanced statistical concepts including experimental design, hypothesis testing, common and more advance analytic methods
Fluency with regression modeling and the ability to develop and evaluate a model using simple and complex regression, working knowledge of correlated data analysis and ability to identify when more sophisticated ML modeling may be warranted over common approaches
Knowledge of tools to obtain, transform, and store data on Big Data and Streaming systems
Ability to design and implement ETL projects from scratch
Knowledge of tools to develop, test, and deploy production code, modify CICD pipelines and deployment scripts
Background with Cable systems and operations
Experience with Hadoop, HIVE, SPARK, and/or Snowflake
Knowledge of other relevant tools such as SAS, SPSS, Alteryx, Linux
Knowledge of other relevant techniques such as text analysis and text mining
Familiarity with the open-source ecosystems surrounding R (CRAN), Python (PyPi), and/or Hadoop
Broad experience and solid theoretical foundation on the modeling process using a variety of algorithms
Data profiling, distributions, confidence intervals, hypothesis testing
Data pre-processing, exploratory data analysis using a variety of techniques
Knowledge of classification using techniques such as linear models, GLMs, and tree-based methods
Interpretation of model results, consideration of causality, treatment of multicollinearity
Strong synthesis and presentation skills
Ability to communicate results and recommendations to a wide variety of audiences including executive leadership
Understanding of data architecture, data warehouse and data marts
Demonstrated ability and desire to continually expand skill set, and learn from and teach others
Experience with other database and data store technologies, such as NoSQL, key-value, columnar, graph, and document.
Experience in receiving, converting, and cleansing big data
Program, product, or project management experience delivering analytics results
Strong background in Linux/Unix/CentOS and Windows installation and administration
Ability to identify and resolve end-to-end performance, network, server, cloud, and platform issues
Pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Keen attention to detail with the ability to effectively prioritize and execute multiple tasks
Education
Bachelors Degree in a statistics, data science, applied math or related field.

Related Work Experience
3 plus years user and system admin ownership with Linux/Unix/CentOS and Windows
10 plus years Statistical Analysis
8 plus years Business Analysis
8 plus years SQL/R/SAS Programming
2 plus years Database Design or Database Modeling

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Skills/Abilities and Knowledge
Operations-research background, in particular focused on large labor operations such as field ops, technical support, and sales
Background with cable and/ or telecommunications

Education
Masters degree in a statistics, data science, applied math or related field.

WORKING CONDITIONS
Office environment
Charter Technical Engineering Center
Highly collaborative and innovative work space
Occasional Travel",3.0,Spectrum,"Greenwood Village, Arapahoe, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,4,Subsidiary or Business Segment,other_industries,Telecommunications,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,Arapahoe,6960,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
989,989,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Bioinformatics Programmer II

17-Aug-2020

Job Code and Payroll Title
9402 Bioinformatics Programmer II

Job Summary
JOB OVERVIEW
As clinical and medical data is increasingly digitized, there is increasing opportunity to analyze this data for research purposes in a variety of ways that leverage “big data” characteristics of digital medical data.

Our clinical research effort employs novel analytic techniques, which include machine learning techniques, to identify complex patterns medical data derived from various sources - both collected through routine clinical care and expressly collected for research purposes.

Related to this goal, the Bioinformatics Programmer/Data Scientist will assist in managing, cleaning and analyzing large scale medical data using a wide variety of analytic techniques. The Data Scientist will be involved in developing software pipelines, mostly using Python, for data extraction which will need to be developed de novo to obtain data from various clinical systems or sources. Once the data is obtained, pipelines will be created to clean the data and store the data in file-systems appropriate for the size of the data at hand.

Under the supervision of the Principal Investigator (PI), the Data Scientist will also be involved in data analysis, and will be fluent in comparing a variety of techniques, including machine learning and deep learning techniques, to be able to empirically determine which approach is most suitable for the given research hypothesis and data type. This position may also include some administrative duties and will have the opportunity to participate in and lead authorship teams.

CARDIOVASCULAR RESEARCH INSTITUTE / CARDIOLOGY
The primary mission of the Cardiovascular Research Institute (CVRI), the largest organized research unit on the San Francisco campus, is to promote fundamental and clinical research on the cardiovascular and pulmonary respiratory systems and to provide opportunities for postdoctoral training in these fields.

With over 200 faculty, staff, and postdoctoral fellows, the CVRI supports faculty from a variety of departments (Medicine, Biochemistry, Biophysics, Lab Medicine, Pediatrics, Anatomy, Anesthesia, Pharmaceutical Chemistry, Physiology, Cellular and Molecular Pharmacology). The total extramural funding is $29 million annually (direct and indirect costs), with $1M in indirect cost return, and $561K in State funds. Assets include $38 million in endowment income and gifts, $3M in clinical reserves, and $5.8M in opportunity funds.

The Tison lab is also part of the Bakar Computational Health Sciences Institute and the Data Scientist will be part of the larger computational community and infrastructure.

ABOUT UCSF
The University of California, San Francisco (UCSF) is a leading university dedicated to promoting health worldwide through advanced biomedical research, graduate-level education in the life sciences and health professions, and excellence in patient care. It is the only campus in the 10-campus UC system dedicated exclusively to the health sciences.

Organization
Campus

Req Number
55681BR

Location
Mission Bay

Job Title
Data Scientist

Appointment Type
Career

Percentage
100%

Shift Length
8 Hours

Shift
Days

Work Days
Monday- Friday, 8:00 am - 5:00 pm

Required Qualifications
• Bachelor's degree in biological science, computational/programming, or related area and/or equivalent experience/training
• At least 6 months of experience in direct data management and analysis using medical and/or health-related data
• Demonstrated fluency and competency with the Python programming language, including with relevant scientific computing packages including numpy, scipy, sci-kit learn
• Experience with, or a demonstrated ability to learn and implement novel data management and machine learning-based pipelines for management of large-scale data
• Experience with, or demonstrated ability to learn and implement relevant deep learning frameworks such as TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch etc.
• Working knowledge of bioinformatics methods, data structures, statistical analysis, systems programming, and database design
• Working knowledge of databases
• Working knowledge of application and data security concepts
• Ability to lead and maintain data pipelines for real-time data acquisition from clinical systems
• Working project management skills
• Interpersonal skills in order to work with both technical and non-technical personnel at various levels in the organization
• Ability to communicate technical information in a clear and concise manner
• Ability to effectively manage time and see assigned parts of projects through to completion on deadline
• Basic consultation and communication skills
• Ability to multi-task and work well with limited supervision
• Self motivated, able to learn quickly, meet deadlines and demonstrate problem solving skills

Preferred Qualifications
• MS or greater degree in a related science or an equivalent combination of education and experience
• PhD in a field relevant to biomedical research (general biology, molecular biology, cell biology, chemistry, biomedical engineering, biomedical informatics), or computer science (computer science, machine learning, artificial intelligence) or similar
• 12 months or more of demonstrated work experience using medical and/or health-related data, or similar, including developing pipelines for obtaining data, data management and cleaning and data analysis, preferably using Python

License/Certification
n/a

Position Type
Full Time

Department Name
Cardiovascular Research Institute

Equal Employment Opportunity
The University of California San Francisco is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran or disabled status, or genetic information.",4.1,UCSF Medical Center,"San Francisco, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,113,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CA,5959,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,0
990,990,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Exciting opportunityin a thriving company that values and appreciates their employees while acknowledging their contributions!

Company Information
Serving their industry for over 45 years, this company is a leader in global life reinsurance.They deliver expert solutions in individual life reinsurance, individual living benefits reinsurance, group reinsurance, financial solutions and product development.
The firm was recognized by the Asia Insurance Review as ""Life Reinsurer of the Year"" at the 2018 Asia Insurance Industry Awards for the second consecutive year. The honor recognizes innovation, thought leadership, and actions to enhance the stability, security, and image of the Forbes Global 2000: World's Best Employers.
The firm was also ranked #97 among 500 companies in the Forbes 2018 Global 2000: World's Best Employers listing.
Benefits and Features
Skill building: this firm encourages personal & professional growth through ongoing training & skills development
Work/life balance: family friendly culture and flexible work arrangements
Career growth: Performance based compensation & competitive benefits package
Strong retirement benefits
The Role they will Play
Develop and enhance statistical models for the applications in insurance industry, including mortality, morbidity, etc.
Need to be very hands-on, needs to know how the models are built and how they work.
Serve as a client contact/consultant either internally or externally, serving as a subject matter expert.
Actively participate in other research-related initiatives.


Community Information
This opportunity is based at the corporate office in Saint Louis, Missouri.
Saint Louis offers a culture of innovation and excellence paired with historic and iconic city/sites.
With an affordable cost of living, Saint Louis is a great place to live.
Desired Background Profile:
1+ years of experience doing statistical modeling in insurance
Strong experience in R, familiar with other packages including SAS, MATLAB, Python, SQL, etc.
Master’s Degree or PHD in Statistics, Actuarial Science, Business, Finance, Economics or related field",5.0,"Kalos Consulting, Inc.","Saint Louis, MO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,MO,2114,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
993,993,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Apply

Description

Title: Data Scientist

Location: Washington, DC

Terms: Full Time

Duration: 5 years

Clearance: Currently possess or be able to favorably pass a full five (5) year Background Investigation (BI) required by CBP (e.g. Secret, Top Secret, etc.)

Travel: Occasional travel may be required.

Position Overview:

The Data Scientist will build and maintain models to support business use cases. They will work as part of the data science services team. The function of this team is to provide analytical support to address complex business questions. More specifically, the team will work with stakeholders to clearly articulate mission gap problems and process inefficiencies. The team will then suggest and implement appropriate solutions, such as data science reports or machine learning models, for the stakeholders.

Responsibilities:

• Under little or no supervision, applies expert knowledge in statistical analysis, complex data mining, and artificial intelligence to make value out of data.

• Provides consulting relating to the data mining and analysis of data from a range of sources to transform raw data into concise and actionable insights.

• Designs and implements data-driven solutions, with specific focus on advanced analytical methods, data models, and visualizations.

• Develop quantitative simulations and models to provide descriptive and predictive analytics solution recommendations.

• Identifies trends and problems through complex big data analysis.

• Maintains current in emerging tools and techniques in machine learning, statistical modeling, and analytics.

Requirements

Basic Qualifications:

• Eight (8) years relevant experience in applied data science research or big data analytics.

• Advanced Degree (Masters or PhD) in Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Data Science, Computer Science, Operations Research or other closely related other quantitative or mathematical discipline. A PhD degree may be substituted for up to three (3) years of experience.

• Demonstrates knowledge of data mining methods, databases, data visualization and machine learning.

• Ability to communicate analysis techniques, concepts and products

• Ability to develop data-driven solutions, data models, and visualizations

About RIVA:

RIVA Solutions, Inc. is a rapidly growing provider of information Technology and Program Support Services to the United States Federal Government. Headquartered in McLean VA, RIVA has over 400 employees in 20+ states across the US. As we continue to expand our services within Management Consulting, STEM, Cyber AI and Robotic Process Automation, we are looking for highly qualified people to join and thrive with us. VivaLaRIVA!

RIVA is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy, gender identity, and sexual orientation), parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service, or other non-merit based factors.",3.7,RIVA Solutions,"Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,11,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,DC,3088,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
994,994,Data Scientist - Nationwide Opportunities,$89k-$111k,"Want to help the largest global enterprises derive business value through the adoption of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML)? Excited by using massive amounts of disparate data to develop ML models? Eager to learn to apply ML to a diverse array of enterprise use cases? Thrilled to be a part of Amazon who has been pioneering and shaping the worlds AI/ML technology for decades?

At Amazon Web Services (AWS), we are helping large enterprises build ML models on the AWS Cloud. We are applying predictive technology to large volumes of data and against a wide spectrum of problems. AWS Professional Services works together with AWS customers to address their business needs using AI solutions.

AWS Professional Services is a unique consulting team. We pride ourselves on being customer obsessed and highly focused on the AI enablement of our customers. If you have experience with AI, including building ML models, wed like to have you join our team. You will get to work with an innovative company, with great teammates, and have a lot of fun helping our customers. A successful candidate will be a person who enjoys diving deep into data, doing analysis, discovering root causes, and designing long-term solutions.

This is a customer-facing role and you will be required to travel to client locations and deliver professional services as needed.

Major responsibilities include:
· Assist customers by being able to deliver a ML project from beginning to end, including understanding the business need, aggregating data, exploring data, building & validating predictive models, and deploying completed models with concept-drift monitoring and retraining to deliver business impact to the organization
· Use AWS AI services (e.g., Personalize), ML platforms (SageMaker), and frameworks (e.g., MXNet, TensorFlow, PyTorch, SparkML, scikit-learn) to help our customers build ML models
· Research and implement novel ML approaches, including hardware optimizations on platforms such as AWS Inferentia
· Work with our other Professional Services consultants (Big Data, IoT, HPC) to analyze, extract, normalize, and label relevant data, and with our Professional Services engineers to operationalize customers models after they are prototyped

Basic Qualifications

· Bachelors degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.) or equivalent professional or military experience
· Experience with ML fields, e.g., natural language processing, computer vision, statistical learning theory
· 4+ years of industry experience in predictive modeling, data science, and analysis
· Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
· Experience writing code in Python, R, Scala, Java, C++ with documentation for reproducibility
· Experience handling terabyte size datasets, diving into data to discover hidden patterns, using data visualization tools, writing SQL, and working with GPUs to develop models
· Experience writing and speaking about technical concepts to business, technical, and lay audiences and giving data-driven presentations

Preferred Qualifications

· Maters degree of PhD in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, etc.)
· Ability to develop strategic, baselined, data modeling processes; ability to accurately determine cause-and-effect relationships.
· Publications or presentations in recognized ML journals or conferences
· Deep technical skills, consulting experience, and business savvy to interface with all levels and disciplines within our customers organization
· Demonstrable track record of dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in a dynamic environment
Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",3.9,Amazon,"New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,26,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,NY,4217,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,1,0,0
995,995,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Join the INTERACTIVE BROKERS Team!

Interactive Brokers has been at the forefront of the Fintech space for over 42 years and we pride ourselves on being primarily a technology company. We continue to challenge the status quo and push boundaries to offer the best trading platform with the most sophisticated features all for the lowest cost to our customers.

We are looking for a Data Scientist with good knowledge and ability to communicate effectively understanding complex problems and explain their solution. The position is well-suited for an organized individual who can meet deadlines, follow written procedures, and collaborate for improvements

You will be part of:

The data science team, you will work on developing mathematical models in areas such as detecting fraud and suspicious transactions, security lending pricing models and analysis. You will Build supporting architecture for systems to utilize the models and ensure they are working as expected. You will have close interaction with the software and business departments. The best results come when all members of our team understand the business problems we are working to solve.

You will be responsible to:
Work with various internal stakeholders to address their data analysis/modeling needs.
Understand software skills such as business analysis in an analytical framework, development, maintenance, and software improvement
Apply statistical / machine learning methods to solve broad range of business problems including pricing, forecasting, anomaly detection, process performance, inventory optimization, customer acquisition/retention/attrition, etc.
Demonstrates ability to extract meaning from and interpret data using a variety of tools and methods from statistics and machine learning.
Work with developers on implementing the solutions in a production environment
Document steps taken and methods utilized in any project
Generate executive summary of the analysis for stakeholders
eager to learn new tools and business concepts and quickly adapt to changing business requirements
You are someone who will have:
BS in Computer Science or Mathematics or in any related quantitative field.
Adept at exploratory data analysis, data normalization and data visualization methods
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and programming.
Experience using statistical computer languages R (ML), Python (scikit-learn), SQL etc. to manipulate, extract and aggregate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Analytical mind and business acumen
Strong math skills (e.g. statistics, algebra)
Good to haves:
MS or PhD in Mathematics or another quantitative field
Prior experience with financial instruments in trading and brokerage
Experience programming in Java and Oracle
Experience with machine learning tools and methods such as Deep Learning, Convoluted/Adversarial NN, Tensor Flow, H2O
Experience with distributed tools such as Hadoop and Spark
Benefits to work with us:
Competitive salary, annual performance-based bonus, and stock grant
Retirement plan (401K) with company match
Excellent health and welfare benefits including medical, dental, and vision benefits
Wellness screenings and assessments, health coaches and counseling services through Employee Assistance Program (EAP)
Paid time off along and generous parental leave policy
Daily company paid lunch and a fully stocked kitchen with healthy options for breakfast and snack
Corporate events including team outings, dinners, volunteer activities and company sports teams
Education reimbursement and learning opportunities with Udemy
Modern offices with sit/stand desks and multi-monitor setups


Company Overview

Interactive Brokers a subsidiary of publicly-traded Interactive Brokers Group, Inc., based in Greenwich, Connecticut (NASDAQ: IBKR) is a low-cost provider of trade execution and clearing services for active traders, institutional investors, financial advisors and introducing brokers. IBKR's premier technology provides electronic access to stocks, options, futures, forex, bonds, and funds worldwide from a single IBKR Integrated Investment account. IBKR is one of the largest online brokers by trade volume and is consistently ranked at the top of its field.

Our employees are part of a dynamic, multinational, fast-paced, results-oriented team working to provide our customers with state-of-the-art trading technology, superior execution capabilities, worldwide electronic access, and sophisticated risk management tools.

Our headquarters are in Greenwich, CT, USA. IBKR has offices in the United States, Canada, the United Kingdom, Switzerland, Hungary, Estonia, Russia, India, Hong Kong, China, Japan and Australia.

IBKR is a member of NYSE, FINRA, and SIPC. Interactive Brokers Group brokerage affiliates are regulated by securities and commodities agencies around the world.

Click HERE to view a short video with a few words from current Interactive Brokers employees. (if hyperlink is deactivated please copy https://www.interactivebrokers.com/en/index.php?f=31899 to your browser)

For more information, please visit www.ibkr.com/info",3.1,IBKR,"Greenwich, CT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,financial_related,Finance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CT,5190,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,1,0,0
996,996,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"About Lokavant

Lokavant is a technology companywhose mission is to ensure that no clinical trial fails due to operationalerror. By integrating and analyzing the disparate data sources within clinicaltrials, Lokavant provides real-time visualizations and risk alerts to studysponsors and contract research organizations (CROs) to enable data-drivendecisions. These insights expedite trial timelines and reduce the costs ofdevelopment, allowing safe and efficacious treatments to get to patients.

Lokavant centralizes trial data topower a machine learning model that anticipates trial risk, providesdata-driven risk mitigation strategies, and predicts the impact of mitigationstrategy implementation. Lokavant's anticipatory monitoring capability isgrounded in a compendium of data from over 1,000 clinical trials and willimprove with each deployment.

About the Opportunity

How often are you given theopportunity to build something from the ground up, with an abundance ofresources at your disposal; to be part of a team of people accomplished indiverse scientific and engineering disciplines, focused on using the best ofwhat lies at the forefront of technology to address complex, real-worldproblems that have a positive impact on potentially millions of peoples' lives?This is that kind of opportunity.

We are seeking a thoughtful, hands-ondata scientist with an aptitude for or strong interest in clinical trial data tojoin the rapidly growing Lokavant Data Science team in our New York Cityheadquarters. As a part of the data science team, you will work very closelywith Lokavants engineering and product teams. Our platform is fullycloud-based and is being built around modern tools and frameworks in anincredibly fast-moving agile environment. As a Data Scientist at Lokavant, youwill be instrumental in setting and executing upon the vision for Lokavantsdifferentiation in the clinical research technology industry.

Key Responsibilities
Take an active role in defining the developmentroadmap and deliverables for the data science team in an integrated agileproduct development process
Drive development and productizationof end-to-end machine learning models
Work in a small team settingpartnering with engineers and scientists to derive the insights needed tosupport our products and product features
Follow industry standard practices toimplement, optimize, maintain, troubleshoot, and continuously improve the practicesof the data science team
Enable effective workingrelationships across Product Management, Front-End Development, DevelopmentOperations, Commercial and Data Engineering
Mentor and be mentored by datascientists of varied experience levels and subject matter areas
Minimum Requirements
2+ years of relevant experience in ananalytical role involving data science and statistical modeling
Fluency in Python and SQL
Strong understanding of advancedstatistical models and Machine Learning techniques
Experienceworking in an Agile software development environment
Exceptional written and verbal communicationskills
Strong attention to detail and highlyorganized, with effective multi-tasking and prioritization skills
Proactive, self-motivated andself-directed, with the ability to learn quickly and autonomously
Comfortable with ambiguity
Superior problem-solving andtroubleshooting skills
Ability to work as part of acollaborative cross-functional team in a fast-paced environment
Sincere interest in working at arapidly changing start-up and scaling with the company as we grow
Bachelors or masters degree withstrong academic performance in Statistics, Mathematics, Data Science, orequivalent field


Preferred (Nice-to-have) Qualifications
Experience in the life sciences industry
Experience with healthcare data, ideally clinical/operational clinicaltrial data
Knowledge of clinical data standards (e.g. CDISC, FHIR, HL7, etc.)
Knowledge of e-clinical systems and technologies (e.g. EDC, CTMS, IRT,etc.)


Employee Benefits
Competitive salary and equitycompensation
Full medical, dental, and visionbenefits
One Medical membership
401(k) plan
Flexible PTO policy
Flexible remote work policy
Great NYC office located in the heartof Times Square
Team events and outings
Lokavant is an equal opportunityemployer, indiscriminate of race, color, religion, ethnicity, ancestry,national origin, sex, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, maritalstatus, veteran status, disability, medical condition, or any other protectedcharacteristic. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating aninclusive environment for all employees.",-1.0,"Lokavant, Inc.","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,NY,4568,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
997,997,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"About the Role

We are looking for a data scientist who is innovative, highly-motivated, and proactive.

For this role, you will be part of a team that builds cutting-edge trading products in the cryptocurrency industry. You will be responsible for transforming data and generating actionable insights into our customer behavior and measuring the performance of our trading engine. You will collaborate and lead projects with product management, engineering, marketing, and growth teams. You will transform data from complex systems, generate performance metrics, and share the results with stakeholders at all levels of the company.

Great benefits, amazing perks, remote work and travel opportunities, stock incentives, beautiful HQ office, and a flexible PTO policy make Kraken a great place to work. If you value having a seat at the table and want to make a big impact on guiding the direction of marketing and growth at one of the top crypto exchanges in the world, this role is for you.

Responsibilities
Partner with Kraken’s engineering, marketing, product, and finance teams to identify, prioritize, and answer the most important questions where analytics and modeling will have a material impact.
Drive cross functional analytic projects from beginning to end: build relationships with partner teams, frame and structure questions, collect and analyze data, summarize and present key insights in support of decision making.
Work with engineers to evangelize data best practices and implement analytics solutions.
Collaborate with business leaders, subject matter experts, and decision makers to develop success criteria and optimize new products, features, policies, and models.
Communicate key results with self-serve tools (dashboards, analytics tools) for leadership and product management.
Develop anomaly detection, and data modelling tools to monitor key performance indicators to improve the efficiency of the products.
Design experiments for product teams to test hypothesis and help with idea generation and refinement.
Build key datasets and data pipelines using Python/ETL frameworks.
Requirements
A degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Physical Sciences, Economics, Math or a related technical field.
5+ years industry experience in data science or analytics
A consistent track record of performing data analysis using Python, R, and/or SQL
Experience using statistics and predictive analytics to solve complex business problems.
The versatility and willingness to learn new technologies on the job.
The ability to clearly communicate complex results to technical and non-technical audiences.
Familiarity with other data tools such as Hive, Vertica, Tableau & Ruby is a plus
We’re powered by people from around the world with their own unique backgrounds and experiences. We value all Krakenites and their talents, contributions, and perspectives.
Check out all our open roles at our Careers Page. We’re excited to see what you’re made of.
Learn more about us
Watch ""Working at Kraken""
Follow us on Twitter
Catch up on our blog
Follow us on LinkedIn",4.5,Kraken Digital Asset Exchange,Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,9,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,Remote,3075,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
998,998,Data Engineer,$89k-$111k,"About MasterControl:

MasterControl Inc. is a leading provider of cloud-based quality and compliance software for life sciences and other regulated industries. Our mission is the same as that of our customers to bring life-changing products to more people sooner. The MasterControl Platform helps organizations digitize, automate and connect quality and compliance processes across the regulated product development life cycle. Over 1,000 companies worldwide rely on MasterControl solutions to achieve new levels of operational excellence across product development, clinical trials, regulatory affairs, quality management, supply chain, manufacturing and postmarket surveillance. For more information, visitwww.mastercontrol.com.

Summary

At MasterControl we are building our next generation data platform that will leverage AI/ML techniques to help redefine how our customers bring lifesaving and lifechanging products to market. To enable this, we need your help building our data pipeline, DataMart and data lake.

You will be responsible for implementing the data life cycle consumption from the data source to the end model. By gathering requirements from Product, you will transform data in near real-time which will be consumable by AI model training, business intelligence analytic tools, and self-service platforms. You will need a strong emphasis on data modeling, as well as proficiency in data transformation. You will be responsible for integration into the CI/CD pipeline as well as unit and integration testing of all processes. You will need experience with structured, semi-structured, and unstructured data sources. You will need a bachelor's degree in a STEM related field, or equivalent experience. You will have some work experience with and a passion for Big Data.

Responsibilities
Pull data from all customer databases into S3 and put into a queryable format
Model the data for optimal performance (ETL, star-schema like, ORC, partitioning, etc ...)
Pull data from a real-time streaming architecture (Kafka) and do near-real-time aggregations andprojections of the data, storing the results in S3
Help automate the provisioning of AWS Lake Formations, EMR/Spark/S3 and other services in AWS
Analyze data to find patterns worthy to expose to the end-user
Help tie corporate data to customer data from an OLTP store
Help us discover ways to use Big Data technologies in a Machine Learning pipeline (discover, clean, label, train, test)
Other assigned duties
Preferred Skills
Scala/Python/SQL/Java
Apache Spark with EMR and/or other Big Data tools
Kafka Streams experience is big plus
Airflow experience is a plus
Big Data Mindset (Spark/Hive/Hadoop/HCatalog/Hudi). Understanding of the Big Data landscape.
Warehouse Architectures (Star Schema/Snowflake/Vaults/Lakes)
Familiarity with AWS and Cloud Formation or Terraform
Data Modelling
ETL Best Practices
Passionate about creatively solving business problems.
Effectively prioritize and execute tasks in a high-pressure environment.
The ability to non-emotionally coach and mentor others.
The ability to not participate in 'techno-arrogant' conversation.
Meet multiple, challenging deadlines while communicating expectations clearly.
Physical Demands and Working Conditions
Must be able to work well with people.
Ability to operate a computer and work at a desk for extended periods of time.
Ability to communicate effectively in writing, in person, over the telephone and in e-mail.
Why Work Here?

#WhyWorkAnywhereElse

#ExceptionalTeamCulture

MasterControl is a place where Exceptional Teams come together to do their best work. Hiring Exceptional Teams, including the best talent in our industry, is a core value of ours. MasterControl employees are surrounded by intelligent, motivated individuals every day. We like to call it #TheBestTeamOnThePlanet.

We value every employee and their contribution to what makes MasterControl successful. We give right back to the employee through a generous benefits package, great flexibility, and continuous opportunities for advancement.

Not only do we hire Exceptional Teams, but we work hard to keep them here by developing and challenging their skillsets, encouraging professional development and growth, and offering a culture that can't be found elsewhere. Which is why we say - #WhyWorkAnywhereElse?

To put it simply, working at MasterControl is fun, challenging, and rewarding. From our Fitness Clubs to our awards programs, from our company parties to our competitive benefits, you can't really go wrong. MasterControl could be your next (and last) career move!

We are growing quickly and always looking for talented individuals to add to #TheBestTeamOnThePlanet!

Here are some of the benefits MasterControl employees enjoy:
Generous PTO package of three weeks, increasing after just three years of employment
Competitive compensation with annual merit increase reviews
100% medical premium coverage (yes, you read that right!)
Dental/Vision Plans
401k Plan
Employer Paid Life Insurance Policy ($50K)
Great Flexibility
Wellness Programs (every employee gets a Fitbit!)
Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis.

Job Posted by ApplicantPro",4.0,MasterControl,"Salt Lake City, UT",-1,201 to 500 Employees,27,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,UT,5219,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
999,999,Data Scientist,$89k-$111k,"Job Title

Data Scientist
Summary
As a key member of our team at RiverStone, you will be collaborating with different engineering and operations teams and leading development machine learning solutions for a variety of tasks and projects. You will be responsible for delivering projects from end-to-end: problem statement and conceptualization, proof-of-concept, and participation in final deployment. You will also perform ad-hoc statistical and data science analyses. Our ideal candidates are smart, creative, analytical thinkers with attention to detail. You will also work closely with data engineers, developers and modeling analysts to generate seamless business solutions. You will be expected to present results of analyses to a wide range of audiences including executives.
Essential Functions
Collaborate with multiple business and information technology units to understand company needs and propose solutions
Implement new statistical or other mathematical methodologies as needed for specific models or analysis.
Organize and synthesize data into actionable business decisions, focused on insights.
Related Functions:
Establishes and maintains effective working relationships, both internally and externally
Maintains and communicates on a regular basis the progress against department goals/objectives and priorities to Director of Data Science and Innovation
Compile, review, verify and analyze related external and internal insurance data including completed models for benchmarking of results
Organizational
Develops creative ideas and solutions to real time business problems and/or business opportunities; takes reasonable, calculated risks even if failure is possible.
Empowers self and teammates to continuously improve RiverStones business processes/ systems and develops and escalates ideas and solutions.
Consistently delivers superior customer service to both internal and external business partners.
Demonstrates alignment with RiverStones Commitments.
Prioritizes and organizes work in self-directed manner.
Attains and maintains knowledge of assigned department.
Performs other duties as required, including supporting and coordinating with other department colleagues.
Required Skills
Ability to tell meaningful stories with data.
Minimum four years of proven hands-on experience applying machine learning techniques to build models integrated into applications.
Strong working knowledge of machine learning/data mining algorithms (deep learning, classification, clustering, etc), experience with Image Analysis/Computer Vision is a plus.
Understand algorithms (be able to tweak them when needed) as well as infrastructure that enables fast iterations
Strong software development skills with proficiency in Python and R. Experienced user of libraries such as scikit-learn, scipy, R, NetworkX, Spacy, and NLTK.
Good understanding of deep learning algorithms and workflows, and experience with CNTK, Caffe, MXNet or TensorFlow is a plus.
Experience in Hadoop, Spark, Hive, Cassandra, Kafka and NoSQL databases is a plus
Familiarity with SQL programing
Experience
3+ years experience applying machine learning techniques to real business problems.
Property & Casualty Insurance experience encouraged, but not required

Required Education

Master of Applied Math, Machine Learning, Data Science, Statistics, Operations Research or related fields
Preferred Education or Certification

PhD of Applied Math, Machine Learning, Data Science, Statistics, Operations Research or related fields
Supervisory Role

None
Travel

Minimal, less than 10%
Work Environment / Physical Demands

This position operates in a professional cubicle based collaborative environment and must have the ability to timely produce thorough, accurate work with many competing demands, deadlines, and distractions. The position uses standard equipment such as phones, computers, copiers/printers and filing cabinets. Noise level is moderate. While this is a largely sedentary role, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear; stand; walk; bend; use hands to handle or feel; and reach with hands and arms. On occasion the individual must be able to lift and transport boxes weighing up to 30 pounds.

Other Duties (Disclaimer Statement)

RiverStone retains the right to change or assign other duties to this position as needed, OR

Other duties or responsibilities may change or be assigned as needed.
Core Competencies

32.) Learning on the Fly: Learns quickly when facing new problems; a relentless and versatile learner; open to change; analyzes both successes and failures for clues to improvement; experiments and will try anything to find solutions; enjoys the challenge of unfamiliar tasks; quickly grasps the essence and the underlying structure of anything.

51.) Problem Solving: Uses rigorous logic and methods to solve difficult problems with effective solutions; probes all fruitful sources for answers; can see hidden problems; is excellent at honest analysis; looks beyond the obvious and doesnt stop at the first answers.

52.) Process Management: Good at figuring out the processes necessary to get things done; knows how to organize people and activities; understands how to separate and combine tasks into efficient flow; knows what to measure and how to measure it; can see opportunities for synergy and integration where others cant; can simplify complex processes; gets more out of fewer resources.

56.) Sizing Up People: Is a good judge of talent; after reasonable exposure, can articulate the strengths and limitations of people inside or outside the organization; can accurately project what people are likely to do across a variety of situations.

22.) Ethics and Values: Adheres to an appropriate (for the setting) and effective set of core values and beliefs during both good and bad times; acts in line with those values; rewards the right values and disapproves of others; practices what he/she preaches.

61.) Technical Learning: Picks up on technical things quickly; can learn new skills and knowledge; is good at learning new industry, company, product, or technical knowledge like internet technology; does well in technical courses and seminars.

65.) Managing Vision and Purpose: Communicates a compelling and inspired vision or sense of core purpose; talks beyond today; talks about possibilities; is optimistic; creates mileposts and symbols to rally support behind the vision; makes the vision sharable by everyone; can inspire and motivate entire units or organizations.

14.) Creativity: Comes up with a lot of new and unique ideas; easily makes connections among previously unrelated notions; tends to be seen as original and value-added in brainstorming settings.

35.) Managing and Measuring Work: Clearly assigns responsibility for tasks and decisions; sets clear objectives and measures; monitors process, progress, and results; designs feedback loops into work.",3.0,The RiverStone Group,"San Diego, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,100.0,CA,6911,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,1,0,1
1000,0,Data Scientist,$90k-$146k,"Engineering at Postmates

We're building groundbreaking tech solutions that power our revolutionary logistics platform to help connect millions of customers with their favorite merchants every day. We're tackling some of the most complex technical challenges in the modern logistics space to unlock opportunities that positively impact the local businesses and communities we serve.

WHAT WE DO


Postmates relies heavily on our engineering team to realize this vision. Building a software platform that is reliable, scales, and stays agile under demanding product needs is a serious technical challenge. Postmates is a three-part balancing act connecting customers, merchants, and couriers in real-time. If any piece is out of whack, the whole system suffers. Working with the Postmates engineering team offers an opportunity with explosive growth, cutting-edge technology, a highly visible charter, and a cool user-focused product vision.

As a Data Scientist, you'll use your full toolkit - statistical modeling, machine learning, data mining, data visualization, and software engineering - to develop data products and models that are used by millions of users and power the growth of our business. You will collaborate with a strong team of engineers, product managers and data analysts in defining the frontier of data products and models in the three-sided marketplace. Data scientists will work on how to formulate a model from a real business problem, determine evaluation metrics, evaluate different modeling approaches, conduct data analysis, and build features and algorithms for the various challenging problems at Postmates.

YOUR RESPONSIBILITIES
Modeling and forecasting demand and supply to enable more intelligent matching, optimize the overall marketplace efficiency and provide valuable insights to our merchants and Postmates
Large scale Machine Learning algorithms that powers our Search Ranking models and Personalized Recommendation Engine
Predicting the Postmates Delivery Time (PDT) and improving the dispatching algorithm
Determining the optimal pricing strategies to help our Postmates maximize their revenue
Identifying suspicious transactions and malicious users for risk control
Natural Language Processing to understand text content on Postmates platform, including named entity resolution and recognization of reviews, descriptions and interactions between users on our marketplace
OUR REQUIREMENTS
A Bachelor's/Master's degree (or higher) in a technical field (Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Operations Research, Math, Physics, Engineering, etc.) or equivalent work experience required.
minimum of 3+ years of professional experience in Data Science or Applied Machine Learning required
A deep theoretical understanding of modern machine learning algorithms, statistical models, or optimization
Extensive experience with data tools, Python (Pandas, Scipy, Numpy, Scikit-Learn, etc), R, SAS, SQL, etc and strong skills in data analysis, data visualization, and feature engineering
Ability to own your modeling work from model development all the way to production deployment and beyond with minimal help from engineers
Strong communication skills; Explaining complex technical concepts to product managers, data analysts, and other engineers shouldn't be a problem for you
OUR PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Experience with MapReduce, Spark, Hive, HBase, Google BigQuery, and BigTable
Experience with ML frameworks like Tensorflow, PyTorch, Spark MLlib, XGBoost, and Scikit-Learn",3.4,Postmates,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,9,Company - Private,other_industries,Transportation & Logistics,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,118.0,CA,3516,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,1
1001,1,Data Scientist,$90k-$146k,"TOP SKILLS
Experience working directly with business decision-makers to help them use data to create value
Experience building predictive models and measuring the business impact of application of them
Experience in an agile fast-paced environment with continuously evolving priorities, self-sufficiently staying productive

The Data Scientist is responsible for creating recommendations for complex business decisions using predictive analytics. In addition to advanced analytics skills, this role is also proficient at integrating and preparing large, varied datasets, designing and implementing production algorithm scoring, and communicating results. You are primarily a data scientist but are passionate about developing advanced end-to-end analytics and technology solutions that drive value for our business.
RESPONSIBILITIES:
Develop analytical approaches to strategic business decisions
Extract, cleanse, and combine data from multiple sources and systems
Perform exploratory and targeted analyses, with a wide variety of statistical methods including: cluster, regression, decision tree/random forest, time series, neural network and others
Build and publish visualizations supporting measurement of outcomes related to the analytical projects
Collaborate cross-functionally to arrive at actionable insights
Synthesize analytic results with business input to drive measurable change
Effectively communicate technical analyses and results to business management
Develop and continually improve multi-source data architecture and analytics procedures, systems, workflows
Contribute to the development of end-to-end data driven solutions
Integrate and productionalize model results into both cloud and edge compute hardware platforms
QUALIFICATIONS:
2+ years of work experience in a predictive analytics-focused role
Masters degree in Applied Statistics/Mathematics, Data or Computer Science, or work experience equivalent
Strong knowledge of statistical methods and predictive/analytical modeling techniques and practices
Experience synthesizing and presenting analytics outcomes to senior executives
Experience with data preparation, rationalization, and processing in a cloud environment
Highly proficient with one or more data mining/predictive modeling tools: SQL, Snowflake, R, Python
Highly proficient with one or more data visualization tools: Tableau, Power BI
Practical understanding of mechanical systems and diverse hardware integration methods both a plus",4.2,Horizontal,"Plymouth, MN",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,17,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,118.0,MN,2475,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
1002,2,Data Scientist,$90k-$146k,"Job Brief

The ideal candidate will have previous Data Modeling experience. Strong preference will be given to candidates with an actuarial background in the property and casualty insurance space.

Overview

IFG Companies is in search of a Data Scientist to join its growing Predictive Modeling team.

The ideal candidate will have previous Data Modeling experience. Strong preference will be given to candidates with an actuarial background in the property and casualty insurance space.

Responsibilities
Build predictive and/or Machine Learning models in SAS
Research new statistical and mathematical techniques that are suitable and helpful for solving business related problems
Prepare data for modelling and make best/creative use of applicable and available internal or external data
Identifying and integrating new datasets that can be leveraged for modeling efforts
Support related processes around effectively deploying model to business
Effectively communicate results in written, oral and presentation formats to technical and non-technical audiences
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, applied mathematics, or related discipline
3+ years of Data Modeling or similar experience.
Experience with predictive modeling (classification, regression, parameter tuning, optimization criteria, feature selection), preferably with multiple techniques
Experience in model validation techniques, model testing and continuous monitoring of model performance
Experience in Property & Casualty Insurance is strongly preferred.
Demonstrated experience working with large relational data sets.
Working knowledge in SAS, R, Python or another platform to develop and implement predictive models.
Ability and willingness to quickly gain knowledge of SAS enterprise guide and enterprise miner.
Ability to communicate complex technical information in common language to foster teaching and analytics guidance to internal customers.
Advanced experience in analytics, data cleaning, and predictive modeling.
Ability to write queries in SQL.
Detail-oriented and ability to work collaboratively
Physical Demands
Physical demands are considered to be that of an office environment, climate controlled, with minimal physical exertion. This position requires prolonged sitting, ability to utilize a computer and interactions with others in meetings or via phone.
Benefits
We offer a competitive compensation and benefits package including medical, dental, vision, 401(k), flexible spending, short-term and long-term disability insurance, life insurance, long-term care, education assistance and paid time off.
IFG Companies is an equal opportunity employer committed to a diverse workforce. M/F/D/V",2.7,IFG Companies,"Atlanta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,35,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,118.0,GA,2692,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1004,4,Data Engineer,$90k-$146k,"Data Engineer

Benefits Data Trust (BDT)
seeks a capable Data Engineer to help develop our new Google Cloud data platform and run our current data infrastructure. BDT embraces Data4Good and is a fast-growing, digitally enabled non-profit that improves benefits access for thousands of underserved people.

As part of our Data Engineering team in our Data Science department, the Data Engineer will:
Build out our new GCP data platform and collaborate on architectural patterns for it with the Data Engineering team
Support the development of machine learning models with productionizing, monitoring and alerting tools
Write, update, and maintain ETL jobs across our data pipelines (mostly in Airflow)
Implement continuous improvements using our existing tools/technologies, which include SQL, Airflow, Python, Docker/Kubernetes, and others such as Terraform and Apache Beam. May also be expected to research and select other tools when the situation demands
Collaborate with internal customers to identify ongoing platform improvements (teams including Analytics, Projects, Policy, Software Engineering, and others throughout the organization)
Consult to software engineers on data-related changes to BDT’s suite of software applications, including schema/model design, table structure, and data collection
Engage with colleagues and collaborators using curiosity, critical thinking, a drive to completion, empathy, and a focus on impact
Follow existing data access and performance design standards for the data platform, software engineering, and all products and services accessing BDT information
Based in our Center City Philadelphia office, the Data Engineer reports to the Director of Data Science.

Due to COVID-19, BDT is operating under a remote-working protocol, following governmental requirements and CDC guidelines. While this job will begin as fully remote, when BDT determines it is safe to do so based on public health recommendations, we will move back into our Centre Square office. At that time, all Philadelphia-based staff are expected to transition back into the office.

Successful candidates will demonstrate the following through their experience (typically 3-5 years as a Data Engineer):
Communication and Relationship-building – with technical peers and some stakeholders
Cloud-based Solution Implementation, of data platforms and infrastructure, including event-driven architectures, microservices and pattern design, supporting compliance and regulated environments (including PII and PHI)
Workflow and pipeline development to ensure reliability, availability, and consistency
Systems Engineering – on-system service management, typically in *nix environments
Data Modeling and Warehousing – proficient understanding of relational data structures and schemas; some familiarity with semi-structured, unstructured (big data) schemas
Automation, monitoring, and alerting – creating these tools based on existing designs and frameworks; resolving bugs and issues
Cloud engineering – working towards certification on any of the major hyperscale cloud platforms
Data Encapsulation & Transfer methodologies – understands standards for file formats and transfer methods
Also interested in relevant experience including:
o Experience with BI implementations/uplifts (we currently use Looker) and/or Data Governance models and methods
o Machine learning techniques, productionizing machine learning models, and/or creating models
About BDT

Benefits Data Trust (BDT) is a national nonprofit that helps people live healthier, more independent lives by creating smarter ways to access essential benefits and services. Each year, BDT helps tens of thousands of people receive critical supports using data, technology, targeted outreach, and policy change. Since its inception in 2005, BDT has screened more than one million households and secured over $7 billion in benefits and services. BDT employs more than 200 people and provides enrollment assistance to individuals in six states, and policy assistance to states nationwide. For more information, visit bdtrust.org.",3.2,Benefits Data Trust,"Philadelphia, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,15,Nonprofit Organization,other_industries,Non-Profit,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,118.0,PA,4087,0,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1008,8,Data Engineer,$90k-$146k,"Data Engineer Northern, VA

Data Engineer

NuWave Solutions is seeking Data Engineers to design and implement distributed, cloud-native data pipelines, storage systems, and query support. These capabilities will support next-generation defense and intelligence operations with a focus on enabling machine learning and automation. Teams will be working in an Agile development environment and expected to identify and mitigate risks and bottlenecks associated with big data environments. Other responsibilities include:
Architect, design, and implement updates and enhancements to data repositories and indices to support data ingest, enrichment, analysis, visualization, and dissemination
Perform database engineering and management activities associated with designing, developing, maintaining, and enhancing Big Data analytic systems using an Agile DevSecOps model
Integrate data from multiple sources in batches and real-time
Review, design, and develop data quality management processes and automated procedures intended to produce high levels of data integrity
Research and recommend solutions to complex problems
Oversee code reviews and delivering feedback regarding designs/code
Perform research and development and provide technical support to identify and integrate new and emerging technologies into the data environment
Design and implement storage and indexing strategies to provide efficient storage and retrieval to support visualizations such as graph-based and geospatial indices
Support design and development of data access APIs that allow enterprise access (as appropriate) to data
Develop or provide input to engineering artifacts associated with the data repositories
Requirements
Active Top-Secret clearance required
Minimum (positions are available at multiple levels of seniority) of a bachelor’s degree and 3 years of experience in a science or engineering field
Experience with SQL databases
Data transformation experience with scripting (Python, Java, Perl, PL/SQL) or platforms such as Spark, Talend, Knime, or Pentaho
Strong problem-solving skills
Good written and oral communications skills
Preferred Skills
Familiarity with no-SQL databases like Neo4j, ElasticSearch, or Cassandra
Familiarity with SQL query engines, preferably PrestoDB or SparkSQL
Familiarity with distributed platforms (i.e. HBase, Kafka, Spark, NiFi) and the cloud (i.e. AWS, GCP, Azure), preferably Amazon Web Services
Experience integrating open API based data access and processing
DOD8570 IAT Level 1 or 2 certified (A+, Security+, etc. certification)
About NuWave Solutions

NuWave Solutions is a recognized leader in providing anticipatory intelligence and advanced data analytics to the defense, intelligence, and private sectors for over 20 years. Leveraging artificial intelligence and machine learning methodologies, NuWave Solutions streamlines the Data-to-Decision lifecycle faster than traditional practices allowing clients to take action with confidence.

For more information on how NuWave Solutions supports its clients and builds upon success, please visit https://www.nuwavesolutions.com

Position Details

Locations of Positions: Reston, McLean, or Herndon, VA; Joint Base Andrews-Bolling, DC; Suitland, MD

Travel Required (CONUS/OCONUS): CONUS

If Travel is required, how much? 5%

Work Schedule: Day Shift

Authorization to work in US is required

8570 Requirements: N/A

NuWave Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Tagged as: Data Engineer",4.4,NuWave Solutions,Virginia,-1,51 to 200 Employees,21,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,118.0,VA,3490,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1009,9,Data Engineer,$90k-$146k,"Data Engineer

Alignment Healthcare was founded with a mission to revolutionize health care with a serving heart culture. Through its unique integrated care delivery models, deep physician partnerships and use of proprietary technologies, Alignment is committed to transforming health care one person at a time.

By becoming a part of the Alignment Healthcare team, you will provide members with the quality of care they truly need and deserve. We believe that great work comes from people who are inspired to be their best. We have built a team of talented and experienced people who are passionate about transforming the lives of the seniors we serve. In this fast-growing company, you will find ample room for growth and innovation alongside the Alignment community.

Position Summary:
Alignment Healthcare is a data and technology driven healthcare company focused partnering with health systems, health plans and provider groups to provide care delivery that is preventive, convenient, coordinated, and that results in improved clinical outcomes for seniors.

We are experiencing rapid growth (backed by top private equity firms), our Data Services and BI team is looking for the best and brightest leaders. Data drives the way we make decisions. We love our customers and understanding them better makes it possible to provide the best clinical outcome and care experience.

This position will play a key role in building and operating a cloud-based data platform and its pipelines using big data technologies.

As a Data Engineer, you will develop a new data engineering platform that leverage a new cloud architecture, and will extend or migrate our existing data pipelines to this architecture as needed. You will also be assisting with integrating the SQL data warehouse platform as our primary processing platform to create the curated enterprise data model for the company to leverage. You will be part of a team building the next generation data platform and to drive the adoption of new technologies and new practices in existing implementations. You will be responsible for designing and implementing the complex ETL pipelines in cloud data platform and other solutions to support the rapidly growing and dynamic business demand for data, and use it to deliver the data as service which will have an immediate influence on day-to-day decision making.

General Duties/Responsibilities:

(May include but are not limited to)
Interfacing with business customers, gathering requirements and developing new datasets in data platform
Building and migrating the complex ETL/EDI pipelines from on premise system to cloud and Hadoop/Spark to make the system grow elastically
Identifying the data quality issues to address them immediately to provide great user experience
Extracting and combining data from various heterogeneous data sources
Designing, implementing and supporting a platform that can provide ad-hoc access to large datasets
Modelling data and metadata to support machine learning and AI
Minimum Requirements:

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Minimum Experience:
3+ years relevant experience in cloud based data engineering.
Demonstrated ability in data modeling, ETL development, EDI Development and data warehousing.
Data Warehousing Experience with SQL Server, Oracle, Redshift, Teradata, etc.
Experience with Big Data Technologies (NoSQL databases, Hadoop, Hive, Hbase, Pig, Spark, Elasticsearch etc.)
Experience in using Python, .net, Java and/or other data engineering languages
Knowledge and experience of SQL Server and SSIS.
Experience with X12(837,834,278) and HL7 transactions
Education/Licensure:
Bachelors or Masters in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, or related field
Other:
Excellent communication, analytical and collaborative problem-solving skills
Requires Spark and Scala
Building and migrating the complex ETL/EDI pipelines from on premise system to cloud and Hadoop/Spark to make the system grow elastically
Preferred
Healthcare domain and data experience
Healthcare EDI experience is a plus
API development experience is a plus
Industry experience as a Data Engineer or related specialty (e.g., Software Engineer, Business Intelligence Engineer, Data Scientist) with a track record of manipulating, processing, and extracting value from large datasets.
Experience building/operating highly available, distributed systems of data extraction, ingestion, and processing of large data sets
Experience building data products incrementally and integrating and managing datasets from multiple sources
Experience leading large-scale data warehousing and analytics projects, including using Azure or AWS technologies – SQL Server, Redshift, S3, EC2, Data-pipeline, Data Lake, Data Factory and other big data technologies
Experience providing technical leadership and mentor other engineers for the best practices on the data engineering space
Linux/UNIX including to process large data sets.
Experience with Azure, AWS or GCP is a plus
Microsoft Azure Certification is a plus
Demonstrable track record dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in an agile, dynamic startup environment
Problem solving skills and Ability to meet deadlines are a must
Microsoft Azure Certification is a plus
Python and Java are a plus,
Experience with X12(837,834,278) and HL7 transactions preferred
Work Environment
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Essential Physical Functions:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear. The employee regularly is required to stand, walk, sit, use hand to finger, handle or feel objects, tools, or controls; and reach with hands and arms.
The employee frequently lifts and/or moves up to 10 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision and the ability to adjust focus.
Alignment Healthcare, LLC is proud to practice Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action. We are looking for diversity in qualified candidates for employment: Minority/Female/Disable/Protected Veteran.
If you require any reasonable accommodation under the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) in completing the online application, interviewing, completing any pre-employment testing or otherwise participating in the employee selection process, please contact careers@ahcusa.com.
(function() { var ac = document.createElement('script'); ac.type = 'text/javascript'; ac.src = ('https:' == document.location.protocol ? 'https://' : 'http://') + 'click.appcast.io/pixels/grpeople1-1573.js?ent=8&t=' + new Date().getTime(); var s = document.getElementsByTagName('script')[0]; s.parentNode.insertBefore(ac, s); })();",3.5,Alignment Healthcare,"Orange, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,7,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,118.0,CA,7477,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
1010,10,Data Scientist/Architect,$90k-$146k,"JOB RESPONSIBILITIES

· Perform tasks using agile methodologies to solve most complex problems (multiple interfaces with other systems across multiple business units) considering all impacted components from an end-to-end perspective

· Ensure end-to-end traceability of requirements is complete and shall apply specific functional and/or business expertise to assist the development team with project deliverables

· Conduct impact analyses of technology changes on business processes and existing technology and shall remain competent to work at the highest technical capacity on all phases of the business systems analysis

· Assist with the review of Test Planning and Test Execution strategies and create the appropriate User-Interface Model(s) to support projects

· Assess business workflow diagrams; assist in the technical evaluation of data models and interface design specifications; document and track issues related to data quality

· Provide technical expertise to the customer on the design and mapping of data conversion strategies and participate in collaborative system and data design sessions with the user community, technical architecture resources, and development resources

· Complete agile project activities as scheduled and proactively identify and communicate issues that may jeopardize milestones or project budget

· Serve as a Data Architect for overall effort with Data Integration/Migration Architect services

· Review and analyze learning system databases to recommend removal/deletion of old data with an understanding of Databases, Data Warehouses, and Multidimensional Databases

· Provide guidance to the Government on the work of data migration developers

REQUIREMENTS

· US Citizen

· Master's degree in Computer Science or related field

· At least 8 years of relevant experience

· DoD experience highly desired

· Agile methodologies experience required

· Well versed in DoD policy and guidance regarding cloud architecture

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $95,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
agile methodologies : 8 years (Required)
Database, Data Warehouse, and Multidimensional Database: 8 years (Required)
Education:
Master's (Required)
Company's website:
www.akytechconsulting.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1.0,Akytech Consulting LLC,"San Antonio, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,118.0,TX,2445,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
1011,11,Data Engineer,$90k-$146k,"As a Data Engineer, you will have the unique opportunity to curate and organize data for a program advancing state-of-the-art modeling and prediction capabilities. This aim of this program is to discover and curate data as well as develop and curate synthetic data. Then, we will develop machine learning (ML) models and training pipelines to detect and discern features in scenes. Finally, we will inject obfuscations into the data to fool the models.
Our delivery teams are driven to explore new ideas and technology, and care deeply about collaboration, feedback, and iteration. We follow SAFe agile practices, embrace the Ops ethos (DataOps/DevSecOps/MLOps) to “automate-first”, use modern tech stacks, and constantly challenge each other to grow and improve.
If cutting edge data science projects resonate with you, and you care deeply about joining a mission-driven company with a strong growth direction and diverse culture, we'd love to learn more about you. Check out the details below, and let’s connect.

Technical members of our solutions teams require little guidance, but love to learn, collaborate, and problem solve. This position requires a mid to senior level of experience, a passion for mission support, and a strong desire to solve our customers’ hardest technical and data challenges.
The Data Engineer will be responsible for the following:
Assess, transform, organize, and optimize data for use by machine learning algorithms
Generating representative data sets for systems development and data science initiatives
Build data pipelines that enables data scientists and engineers and other stakeholders

Requirements
TS/SCI clearance required
4+ years of experience designing data models and data warehouses supporting analytics, using both relational and non-relational distributed data storage systems
Demonstrated experience building and maintaining ETL pipelines. Bonus points for experience with Apache Beam
Demonstrated experience working with Synthetic Aperture Radar (SAR) data
Demonstrated experience with large-scale distributed processing
Experience building data pipelines in ML frameworks. Kubeflow experience is desired
Experience working in a fast-paced agile environment is a plus
Familiarity with machine and deep learning libraries such as Scikit-learn and PyTorch.
Experience in a high-level programing language, such as Java, Python or GoLang
Demonstrated proficiency with Git version control systems
Experience working in Linux environments
We're looking for a motivated Data Engineer eager to advance not only your professional career, but also the missions of our Intelligence and Defense communities. At NT Concepts, you'll be able to:
Meaningfully impact the company's growth, and share in the rewards accordingly
Develop your own career path through our What’s Next program, which emphasizes person growth through training and certification
Work on programs of importance that directly impact National Security and the world
Work in a fun, “challenging yet rewarding” fast-paced environment

#CJ
#JT",3.6,NT Concepts,"Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,22,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,118.0,VA,3048,0,data engineer,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
1013,13,Senior Data Scientist,$90k-$146k,"Are you a talented and passionate engineer? Do you love solving problems and making ideas come to life? Are you a lifelong learner who thrives in dynamic environments and enjoys the challenge of learning new technologies and techniques? Are you a team player and enjoy collaboration, but you are also self-directed and enjoy the autonomy to be able to manage your own schedule and workload? Do you appreciate the importance of good communication and know that teamwork takes practice, effort and a good attitude? If so, we want to speak with you.

The Senior Data Scientist is responsible for collaborating with the team to design and implement systems that focus on forecasting, allocating, delivering, and reporting of advertising on the internet, TV, and connected devices. The successful candidate will utilize advanced mathematical, optimization, machine-learning, software engineering, and programming skills to solve challenging problems.

Responsibilities
Develop innovative forecasts, models, algorithms, and solutions and build prototypes and production implementations
Dig deep into high volumes of data, engineer features for improved forecast performance
Work cross-functionally to gather feedback and requirements from end users
Be a key contributor to product innovation and company strategy
Communicate technical information clearly to both technical and non-technical people
Required Qualifications
Degree in Operations Research, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Industrial Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or related field; MS/PhD preferred
3+ years of relevant experience
Strong analytical, statistical, and math abilities; Exceptional problem-solving skills
Excellent communication skills
Extreme attention to detail
Ability to work as part of a team in a fast-paced environment
#LI-KR1

About Amobee
The world’s leading independent advertising platform, Amobee unifies all advertising channels—including TV, programmatic and social—across all formats and devices. We provide marketers with streamlined, advanced media planning capabilities powered by in-depth analytics and proprietary audience data. Our platform and technology, provides the most advanced advertising solutions for the convergence of digital and advanced TV— including linear TV, over the top, connected TV, and premium digital video. Enabling advertisers to plan and activate across more than 150 integrated partners, including Facebook, Instagram, Pinterest, Snapchat and Twitter.

Amobee has been named to Fortune’s Top 10 Best Workplaces in Advertising and Marketing. Amobee’s platforms have been widely recognized amongst our industry winning numerous awards in technology innovation, see all Amobee Awards. We are a wholly owned subsidiary of Singtel, one of the largest telco companies in the world, reaching over 700 million mobile subscribers in 21 countries. Amobee operates across North America, Europe, Middle East, Asia and Australia. For more information, visit amobee.com or follow @amobee

In addition to our great environment, we offer a competitive base salary, employee development programs and other comprehensive benefits. Please send a cover letter along with your resume when applying to the position of interest located at Amobee.com. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. No phone calls and no recruiting agencies, please.",3.8,Amobee,"Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,15,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,118.0,MD,3359,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1015,15,Data Scientists with TS/SCI,$90k-$146k,"Veteran Owned Firm Seeking Data Scientists with TS/SCI to support a client in Springfield, VA

My name is Stephen Hrutka, and I am the owner of a Veteran-owned firm in Washington, DC focused on Supply Chain, Strategic Sourcing, and Technical/Cleared Recruiting.

HRUCKUS helps other Veteran Owned businesses recruit for positions across the SBA, HHS, DARPA, and other cutting-edge R&D related defense agencies.

We are looking to hire (2) data scientists to support NGA in Springfield, VA. The role is remote to start, no idea when traditional onsite will begin.

Please see below for the position description. If you’re interested, I'd be glad to provide more details about the role and further discuss your qualifications.

Thanks,

Stephen M Hrutka
Principal Consultant
www.hruckus.com

Position Tasks:
Develop Python or R code to read/categorize large amounts of unstructured data
Develop code to evaluate Intelligence Information Reports (IIRs) for metadata accuracy
Develop code that recognizes and extracts entities from IIRs w/ 90% accuracy
Visualize data derived from structuring of unstructured/semi-structured data
Brief results of code development to leadership to include methods, limitations, and assumptions
Position Deliverables:
Monthly reports
Code modules using Natural Language Processing to analyze multiple unstructured data files and database the information derived
Code modules using Entity Recognition to analyze multiple unstructured data files and identify all people, groups, and categories of objects
Code modules using Latent Semantic Indexing to analyze multiple unstructured data files and database the information derived
Develop code that can be stand-alone or incorporated into existing applications
Visualizations of large data sets, bringing forward unobscured data, and enabling personnel to understand the data quickly
Position Requirements:
Government Security Clearance
Minimum of (3) years of experience related to the following areas: parametric and non-parametric statistical methods; visualizing statistical effects in complex datasets; performing statistical data analysis in Python and/or R; providing and explaining clear analytical results in well-written reports
Ability to write and execute queries in SQL
Ability to visualize data with aid of data visualization tools such as Tableau
Bachelor’s degree in computer science or related field
Ability to work in distributed systems and to develop creative solutions to data problems
Experience with database tools
Preferred Qualifications:
Statistical Modeling: 10 years
Natural Language Processing: 5 years
Python and R: 3 years
Latent Semantic Indexing: 5 years
SQL: 3 years
Tableau: 1 year
Entity Recognition: 5 years",5.0,HRUCKUS,"Springfield, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,7,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,118.0,VA,2719,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1017,17,Data Scientist – Immunoassays and Biomarkers,$90k-$146k,"Job Title: Data Scientist – Immunoassays and Biomarkers

Position Summary:

To continue our solid growth, we are seeking a talented and highly motivated Data Scientist – Immunoassays and Biomarkers to join our growing organization. The role will provide data curation and analysis support for novel biomarker immunoassay and diagnostic test development and validation and will be responsible for developing and/or maintaining analysis tools and databases. The successful candidate will possess proficient analytical capability, solid background with use of statistics in a scientific context, and strong communication skills. We are looking for team oriented, hands on experts with a passion for personalized medicine and precision health.

Key Responsibilities:
Build, manage and query biomarker and clinical sample data repositories
Perform detailed and robust statistical analysis of clinical and laboratory research data
Statistical support for design and development of immunoassay and in vitro diagnostic assay products
Analyze large multisource and/or multivariate immunoassay data sets
Author statistical analysis plans, protocols, and reports for clinical and non-clinical evaluations
Review study reports for accuracy and robustness of statistical content
Adhere to data and documentation standards
Ensure accurate, in-depth results/data are delivered in a timely manner
Requirements:
PhD in Biology, Biostatistics, Bioinformatics, or directly relevant experience in the field of immunoassays or biomarkers
Familiarity with statistical requirements associated with immunoassay data analysis e.g. CLSI standards, Fit-For-Purpose Biomarker Validation, FDA data reporting requirements
Ability to understand scientific questions and formulate statistical and data analysis methods.
Ability to effectively visualize complex biological datasets.
Experience in developing and annotating biological data repositories
Strong proficiency with widely used software tools for visualization and statistical analysis of biological data – examples may include Excel, Prism, JMP, Minitab, SAS
Experience with design of experiments, multivariate data analysis and generating ROC curves strongly preferred
Familiarity with LIMS beneficial
Proficient verbal and written communication skills to clearly explain complex technical details.
Commitment to the successful achievement of team and organizational goals
Quanterix is a company that's digitizing biomarker analysis with the goal of advancing the science of precision health. The company's digital health solution, Simoa, has the potential to change the way in which healthcare is provided today by giving researchers the ability to closely examine the continuum from health to disease. Quanterix' technology is designed to enable much earlier disease detection, better prognoses and enhanced treatment methods to improve the quality of life and longevity of the population for generations to come. The technology is currently being used for research applications in several therapeutic areas, including oncology, neurology, cardiology, inflammation and infectious disease. The company was established in 2007 and is located in Billerica, Massachusetts. For additional Information, please visit https://www.quanterix.com.

Quanterix is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Quanterix is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. Quanterix will make reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with known disabilities, in accordance with applicable law.",3.2,Quanterix,"Billerica, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,13,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,118.0,MA,3692,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0
1021,21,"Senior Data Scientist (Palo Alto, CA or Remote US)",$90k-$146k,"The Opportunity

Eversight is the recognized leader in AI-powered price and promotions. Eversight's proprietary cloud-based SaaS solution brings AI and continuous experimentation to consumer brands and retailers. Our software acts as a coach, enabling market leaders to transform pricing and promotion strategy for the $3.4 trillion spent in consumer goods retail using intelligent, real-time data and insights.

Reporting directly to the Head of Data Science, you will be at the center of what determines Eversight's success as a company. You will analyze the data and develop production code using the newest Data Science and Machine Learning techniques to determine the optimal prices and promotions for major product manufacturers and retailers that sell these products.

Responsibilities
Research, implement and modify modern Data Science techniques. More specifically:
Build Statistical and Machine Learning models that describe the impact of prices and promotions on shopper behavior, including behavioral pricing effects. You'll need to find middle ground between using flexible modern AI methods and proven classical methods.
Develop Optimization and Experiment Design systems, which determine the best prices to set for each product in each store each week. Finding a good balance on the exploration-exploitation tradeoff will be important.
Design and run pricing experiments across hundreds of stores and tens of thousands of products
Create model validation methods to make sure that our models are accurate and to quantify the impact of our solutions on the clients' bottom line
Work with Product Management to generate ideas and quickly turn them into efficient, well-tested, functioning code (we mostly use Python)
Partner with the Engineering team to create highly scalable solutions
Serve as Data Science expert both within Eversight and for our clients
Lead custom analyses and connect them to actionable Business and Product insights
Help prioritize new feature development by assessing potential impact
Be a go-to resource for science-related questions about the product
Behavioral Profile
Analytical, framework thinker
Comfortable in a fast-paced environment
Highly collaborative
Strong at translating Data Science concepts to non-technical audiences
Business focused; measures work in its contributions to business outcomes and prioritizes effort against deliverables accordingly
Minimum Qualifications
5+ years of relevant experience in Data Science and/or Machine Learning with direct impact on business value
B.S., M.S., or PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Operations Research, Machine Learning, Engineering, Economics, Computer Science or relevant quantitative field
Strong understanding of Generalized Linear Models
Ability to write efficient code in Python
Experience with Hypothesis Testing and Maximum Likelihood Estimation
Preferred Qualifications
Team leadership experience strongly preferred
Startup experience strongly preferred
Experience in A/B testing and Design of Experiments
Agile experience
Experience with NumPy and Pandas (or equivalent experience in R)
Strong in math and statistics: Linear Algebra, Bayesian Methods, Regressions, Calculus
Experience in Machine Learning methods: Neural Networks (Deep Learning, Embeddings, Sequence Modeling, CNN), Tree-based methods (GBDT, Random Forest), Regularization Methods (L1/L2 penalties, Feature Selection, Dimensionality Reduction)
Demand Modeling, Pricing, and Causal Inference experience


Location

Palo Alto, CA

About the Company

Eversight is the recognized leader in AI-powered pricing and promotions. Global brands and retailers rely on the Eversight platform to optimize pricing in response to market conditions and to deliver higher ROI on promotional spend. Eversight's Pricing Suite and Offer Innovation Suite solutions are driving strong margin and sales volume improvements for leading companies such as Coca-Cola, General Mills, Raley's, and Rite Aid. Founded in 2013, Eversight is headquartered in Palo Alto, California, with offices in Chicago and New York.",4.2,Eversight,Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,7,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,118.0,Remote,4062,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,1,0,0
1022,22,Senior Data Scientist,$90k-$146k,"Company Overview

Imagine if we could match patients with the treatments that prove the most effective for them . . .
GNS Healthcare applies a powerful form of AI called causal machine learning to predict which treatments and care management programs will work for which patients, improving individual patient outcomes and the health of populations while reducing the total cost of care.

Headquartered in the biotechnology and health IT center of Cambridge, MA, our patented REFS technology is based on recent breakthroughs in causal machine learning and AI that transforms massive quantities of patient data into computer models of disease at molecular, patient, and health system levels. These computer models power up solutions, products, and services that health plans, biopharmaceutical companies, health systems, and patient foundations utilize to slow disease progression, reduce adverse events and hospitalization, and improve therapeutic effectiveness. Our platforms and solutions have been validated across more than 45 diseases including oncology, cardiovascular and metabolic disease, autoimmune diseases, neurology, etc. and have appeared in over 50 peer-reviewed publications.

Position Summary

The Senior Data Scientist will join a dynamic team responsible for start-to-finish work on the analysis and interpretation of real-world datasets using GNS's powerful cloud-based analytics platform. We are looking for someone who thrives working in a fast-paced, exciting, and collaborative environment in one of the most cutting-edge industries where big data analytics meets healthcare. You will help manage real world data, as well as create and interpret data-frames for modeling and analysis. You will collaborate with our research scientists to carry out analysis projects using our proprietary, supercomputer-powered Bayesian network modeling and simulation platform, and will synthesize these results into meaningful reports for clients and product development.

Responsibilities
Collaborate with internal research teams and clients to evaluate study design, define research questions, design data frames, write statistical analysis plans/study protocols, conduct analyses, and participate in the full research process, including client presentation and publication
Communicate highly technical results and methods clearly to clients, discuss how to incorporate information into their processes, and achieve high client satisfaction
Troubleshoot with clients and internal stakeholders to refine and optimize models
Provide scientific communications to peer-reviewed journals and publications
Develop data frames of high complexity while adhering to a project-based timeline
Perform data manipulations and develop algorithms on multi-data sets that create the analytic files necessary to support analyses.
Consult on how to use data to perform predictive and causal modeling using both proprietary and off-the-shelf tools.
Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications:
Master's Degree in a quantitative discipline or equivalent practical experience
3-5 years of experience working with advanced ML techniques, probability theory, Bayesian analysis, or causal inference methods
Experience working with biomedical data/ population health data, EHR or claims data
Demonstrated experience working with programming languages R and SQL
Strong written and verbal communication; an ability to communicate technical material to non-technical audiences simply and clearly and collaborate well on a team
Strong drive for problem solving, especially around data frame construction and interpretation
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience working with large, complex, or unstructured data requiring post-processing to use effectively
Familiarity with the UNIX and cluster computing environment
Company Culture

Our philosophy at GNS is simple: we cannot transform healthcare with anything less than an all-star team. We are seeking smart, driven people who are experts in their field, have a track record of success and a passion for creating change. We believe that strong teams supercharge the performance of individuals, create a fun and dynamic workplace and great results for our clients and the people they serve.

We are passionate about our work and believe in the ability of our technology to change the world. Our core values of integrity, collaboration, value, diversity, and game-changing guide our behaviors with each other and our clients.

GNS offers competitive salaries, stock options, unlimited vacation, health, dental and vision insurance, life insurance, long-term disability, 401(k), generous parental leave, tuition reimbursement, professional development, subsidized parking and gym membership, tasty food, volunteering opportunities, social gatherings, and more.

Equal Employment Opportunity

GNS Healthcare provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, veteran status, disability, pregnancy or conditions related to pregnancy, or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, GNS Healthcare complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities.",3.0,GNS Healthcare,"Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,20,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,118.0,MA,5326,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
1023,23,Associate Data Scientist – Network Analysis and Control,$90k-$146k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE’s Infrastructure and Networking Technical Center is looking for a motivated and passionate early career data scientist to join our Network Analytics department. As part of a collaborative team of scientists and engineers, you will have an opportunity to apply machine learning and data-centric approaches to complex networks. Our multidisciplinary team thrives on the opportunity to tackle new challenges in the public interest, looking for solutions that no one else has considered. We approach problems with an entrepreneurial mindset, a willingness to take risks, and a desire to advance the state of the art for intelligent networks, all while contributing to MITRE’s mission of Solving Problems for a Safer World.

Responsibilities include:
Develop prototypes of intelligent network capabilities in MITRE advanced labs
Work on collaborative research teams to develop innovative solutions using commercial and MITRE developed technologies
Conduct performance assessments of current and emerging technologies
Execute data science research beginning at data wrangling and cleaning all the way through to reporting and visualization
Scale solutions to work across large enterprises and large data sets
Analyze data from network sensor systems and integrate additional data sources for improved outcomes
Communicate technical approach and findings to internal and external stakeholders
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in related fields outlined below, or equivalent knowledge and skills.
Computer Science
Software Engineering
Electrical Engineering
Mathematics
Information Systems, Information Technology, SW Engineering
Operations Research
Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or applicants who are eligible for security clearances.
Required Qualifications:
A passion for technology and a desire to learn
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to apply, modify and formulate algorithms and processes to solve challenging problems
Knowledge of various machine learning paradigms (deep learning, reinforcement learning, neural networks, etc.) with an understanding of mathematical underpinnings of various models
Hands-on software development skills in a modern programming language (e.g. Python, R, Scala, Java)
Working knowledge of data science workflow from data acquisition to reporting findings
Strong understanding of streaming and batch data workflows, including message queues, processing directed acyclic graphs (DAGs) and data stores
Obtain and maintain a Secret level security clearance
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or similar field
Experience working with Big Data tools (e.g. Spark, Hadoop, Kafka)
Experience working with databases (e.g., PostgreSQL, Oracle, MySQL, MongoDB, Neo4j, Elasticsearch)
Familiarity with cloud-based environments like Amazon Web Services, Google Cloud, or Microsoft Azure
Experience conducting original research using data science techniques, including machine learning, statistical modeling, and data visualization
Demonstrated ability to manipulate large datasets and perform calculations leveraging a modern programming language
Familiarity with basic networking and security concepts/capabilities such as TCP/IP stack, routing, and firewalls
Exposure to network programmability concepts such as software define networking and programmable data planes
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,MITRE,"Bedford, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,118.0,MA,5347,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1024,24,Sr Data Science Analyst,$90k-$146k,"Job Summary
The Sr. Data Science Analyst operates as an internal consultant, finding solutions to the most critical organizational challenges in a fast-paced health care environment, leading to improved patient outcomes and performance for our business partners. The challenges that are complex from a methodology or business perspective are frequently the types of projects that this role tackles.
Reponsibilities
Successfully guide Data Science projects from concept to completion as a combination of Data Science subject matter expert, project manager, and business analyst.
Perform Research and Development to generate new products and/or ways to use our data to improve patient outcomes.
Translate identified business challenges or opportunities into actionable project efforts with defined scope and goals.
Create visual concepts/mockups that foster a shared understanding of business challenges or opportunities.
Coalescing stakeholders toward reasonable project objectives that address the most pressing challenges of our business.
Collaborate and coordinate with clinical, business, IT and engineering partners in the design and development of products that address key business challenges using internal and/or external data.
Effectively communicate the practical nature of the results of various analyses to business stakeholders using illustrations and practical language.
Pilot a proposed solution to demonstrate its effectiveness and/or suggest improvements.
Create reports documenting key findings, observations, outcomes, and/or recommendations clearly.
Develop, document and maintain code in a clear and reproducible manner.
Perform other duties and responsibilities as required, assigned, or requested.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Business Information Systems, Mathematics, Economics, Statistics or related technical field required; advanced degree preferred
5+ years of experience in analytics role
3+ years of experience with SQL; fluent in basic operators, joins, date and character functions;
3+ years of experience with R or Python, particularly with ggplot/matplotlib, statistics and analytics packages
3+ years of experience addressing practical business challenges in a Data Science/Analytics role
Professional experience as a project/program manager and/or business analyst preferred
Certifications in Data Science, Health Information Technology, Lean, Six Sigma, project management and/or business analysis a plus
Experience with RegEx, RShiny, R Markdown, Atlassian suite (Jira, Bitbucket, Concurrence), MS Excel (particularly pivot tables) and MS Access (VBA) preferred
Results-oriented mentality, capable of fluidly moving between roles and projects.
Team-first orientation, thriving in a collaborative, team-based work environment.
Self-starter mindset with desire to learn on an ongoing basis.
Problem-solver mentality – one who finds creative solutions instead of accepting obstacles as fixed.
Prioritization skills that allow one to cope well with ambiguity, changing requirements, dynamic scope, competing objectives and changes in direction
Willingness to lead the charge to change assumptions, risks and issues into reasonable project direction
Inquisitive nature and reasonable degree of comfort in asking tough questions when needed
Ability to accept and internalize coaching guidance
Willingness to adapt to approaches that meet stakeholder needs
Solid facilitator skillset – one who can align a room full of stakeholders with competing interests toward a narrow set of key objectives
Ability to tell stories through pictures and whiteboarding, often off-the-cuff
Ability to alter communication styles effectively for stakeholders varying from Specialists to C-Suite
Ability to serve as a liaison between business, clinical and IT professionals
Willingness to unearth, track and resolve the detail-level challenges that frequently derail project efforts
Conceptual understanding of Big Data methods
Ability to identify trends or correlations between factors and responses using methods such as trend analysis, regression modeling, clustering, principal components analysis and various feature engineering methods
Ability to conduct designed experiments to establish cause-effect relationships, as well as optimization experiments
Honesty, integrity, and emotional intelligence
Working knowledge of classical statistical / hypothesis testing techniques.
Experience with geospatial analytics platforms, particularly Esri, a plus
Experience with visualization tools, including Tableau, a plus
Experience with prototype development and/or UI/UX Design a plus
Experience with other programming languages and data exchange formats (Java, C#, XML, JSON) a plus
Experience with deep learning (particularly Tensorflow or other GPU-based) a plus
Experience with Natural Language Processing a plus
Experience with automated machine learning (H20, DataRobot) a plus
Experience with big data environments and methodologies (NoSQL, MongoDB, Spark, Hadoop) a plus",3.7,"naviHealth, Inc.","Brentwood, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,8,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,118.0,TN,5028,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,0
1025,25,Data Engineer,$90k-$146k,"The Data Engineer will work with the data Analyst and project managers to determine logical and physical database designs for new analytics models. The Data Engineer will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for cross functional teams. The Data Engineer will support database architects, data analysts and data scientists on data initiatives and will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout analytics ongoing projects.

Build the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture
Assemble large, complex data sets that meet business requirements
Build analytics tools that utilize the data pipeline to provide actionable insights into operational efficiency, financial reports and other key business performance metrics
Work with stakeholders including the Engineering and Analytic teams to assist with data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs
Create data tools to support business informational technology process
Work with the data analytics team to strive for greater functionality in our data systems
Perform other related duties as required and assigned
Demonstrate behaviors which are aligned with the organization’s desired culture and values

Moderate experience working with relational databases, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases.
Moderate knowledge of AWS cloud services: EC2, EMR, RDS, Redshift
Experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python, Java, C++
Experience building and optimizing AWS data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
Strong project management and organizational skills.
Moderate skill in business intelligence tools such as Tableau or Qlik
Moderate skills with MS Office, including Excel & PowerPoint
Must be a team player with strong attention to detail and able to work independently
Proven track record at delivering timely and accurate information in a fast-paced environment
Excellent critical thinking, problem solving, and mathematical skills, and sound judgment
Strong business acumen and ability to interface with executive management",4.0,PennyMac,"Agoura Hills, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,12,Company - Public,financial_related,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,118.0,CA,2501,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
1032,32,Data Scientist,$77k-$128k,"Every Analyst a Scientist - One of our primary goals is to empower intelligence analysts to be able to study their data like scientists. The tools we develop focus on streamlining intelligence analysis through integrated algorithms and software that provide insight into the geopolitical landscape for use in operational intelligence missions around the world.

The Role:

As a Data Scientist, you will live by our motto that “Data is Destiny.” You will work with a diverse collection of massive datasets, including social media, structured and unstructured text, geospatial, time series, and imagery data. You will design, test, and validate statistical tests and machine learning models in support of cutting-edge problems in the national security space. Your expertise as a data scientist will aid a diverse team of researchers to build state-of-the-art tools and technologies that are deployed to extract and enrich intelligence used by analysts.

If you would like to help intelligence and defense analysts keep pace with technology-driven innovation, then this role is for you!

Who you are:
A U.S. Citizen with the ability to obtain a Security Clearance
A degree in a scientific field such as Statistics, Mathematics, or Computer Science
Experience in statistical modeling including performance evaluation and uncertainty quantification
Proficiency with a scientific programming language, preferably Python, and familiarity with Numpy, Pandas, and/or Scikit-learn packages
Experience in grooming sparse, incomplete, and noisy datasets
Motivated collaborator who is an excellent communicator of ideas to both technical and non-technical audiences
Even better:
Active Clearance
MS or PhD in a scientific field such as Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, or Data Science or 2+ years of relevant work experience
Familiarity with handling and analyzing data at scale, for example using Hadoop, Dask, Spark, and MapReduce
Working knowledge of data store tools such as SQL and Elasticsearch, and experience interacting with databases
Experience with deep learning and neural network training, testing, and evaluation with fluency in Tensorflow or PyTorch
Specialized expertise in a data-rich field such as time-series analysis, graph analytics, geospatial analysis, image processing, or Bayesian programming",4.5,Systems & Technology Research,"Woburn, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,10,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,MA,2314,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,1,0,0
1033,33,Data Scientist,$77k-$128k,"Engineering at Postmates

We're building groundbreaking tech solutions that power our revolutionary logistics platform to help connect millions of customers with their favorite merchants every day. We're tackling some of the most complex technical challenges in the modern logistics space to unlock opportunities that positively impact the local businesses and communities we serve.

WHAT WE DO


Postmates relies heavily on our engineering team to realize this vision. Building a software platform that is reliable, scales, and stays agile under demanding product needs is a serious technical challenge. Postmates is a three-part balancing act connecting customers, merchants, and couriers in real-time. If any piece is out of whack, the whole system suffers. Working with the Postmates engineering team offers an opportunity with explosive growth, cutting-edge technology, a highly visible charter, and a cool user-focused product vision.

As a Data Scientist, you'll use your full toolkit - statistical modeling, machine learning, data mining, data visualization, and software engineering - to develop data products and models that are used by millions of users and power the growth of our business. You will collaborate with a strong team of engineers, product managers and data analysts in defining the frontier of data products and models in the three-sided marketplace. Data scientists will work on how to formulate a model from a real business problem, determine evaluation metrics, evaluate different modeling approaches, conduct data analysis, and build features and algorithms for the various challenging problems at Postmates.

YOUR RESPONSIBILITIES
Modeling and forecasting demand and supply to enable more intelligent matching, optimize the overall marketplace efficiency and provide valuable insights to our merchants and Postmates
Large scale Machine Learning algorithms that powers our Search Ranking models and Personalized Recommendation Engine
Predicting the Postmates Delivery Time (PDT) and improving the dispatching algorithm
Determining the optimal pricing strategies to help our Postmates maximize their revenue
Identifying suspicious transactions and malicious users for risk control
Natural Language Processing to understand text content on Postmates platform, including named entity resolution and recognization of reviews, descriptions and interactions between users on our marketplace
OUR REQUIREMENTS
A Bachelor's/Master's degree (or higher) in a technical field (Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Operations Research, Math, Physics, Engineering, etc.) or equivalent work experience required.
minimum of 3+ years of professional experience in Data Science or Applied Machine Learning required
A deep theoretical understanding of modern machine learning algorithms, statistical models, or optimization
Extensive experience with data tools, Python (Pandas, Scipy, Numpy, Scikit-Learn, etc), R, SAS, SQL, etc and strong skills in data analysis, data visualization, and feature engineering
Ability to own your modeling work from model development all the way to production deployment and beyond with minimal help from engineers
Strong communication skills; Explaining complex technical concepts to product managers, data analysts, and other engineers shouldn't be a problem for you
OUR PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Experience with MapReduce, Spark, Hive, HBase, Google BigQuery, and BigTable
Experience with ML frameworks like Tensorflow, PyTorch, Spark MLlib, XGBoost, and Scikit-Learn",3.4,Postmates,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,9,Company - Private,other_industries,Transportation & Logistics,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,CA,3516,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,1
1035,35,Data Scientist,$77k-$128k,"Data Scientist
In this role, you will be set on a constant “treasure hunt” for new data sources to apply the latest techniques for modeling and data analysis. You will be part of a team driving the profit and customer growth of this growing insurance agency.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities
Working with internal and external data to understand and accurately predict:
Shopping behavior;
Retention behavior;
Quote and conversion rates;
Retention and lifetime customer value;
Contribution to overall margin;
Customer satisfaction; and
Other drivers of success you identify worthy of analysis.
Qualifications and Education
Knowledge of new and innovative modeling and statistical techniques – a relevant specialty is preferred.
Detail orientation – attention and desire to work on large data “crunching” projects.
Strong written and oral communication skills and a proven ability to communicate technical concepts to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Creative thinker with the ability to synthesize information from various sources and apply that information to concrete business problems.
Ability to work with and understanding of the merits of various data structures.
Proficiency with the latest modeling software and techniques, such as SAS, R, Python or Tableau.
Ability to understand the need to balance predictive power, interpretability, and ease of implementation.

Education:
An advanced degree in mathematics, machine learning, economics, statistics or a related field.
About the Company
The Plymouth Rock Company and its affiliated group of companies write and manage over $1.4 billion in personal and commercial auto and homeowner’s insurance throughout the Northeast and mid-Atlantic, where we have built an unparalleled reputation for service. We continuously invest in technology, our employees thrive in our empowering environment, and our customers are among the most loyal in the industry. The Plymouth Rock group of companies employs more than 1,800 people and is headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts. Plymouth Rock Assurance Corporation holds an A.M. Best rating of “A-/Excellent”.",3.6,Plymouth Rock Assurance,"Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,38,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,MA,2121,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1037,37,Machine Learning Engineer,$77k-$128k,"This is Us:
We have a bold vision to connect 25 million vehicles by 2025.
Our customers come first. We lead through innovation. We win as one. We act with integrity.
We adhere to our brand promise – to make the complex simple, the future predictable, and our customers successful.
With nearly 4 million connected vehicles today, Spireon is an exciting player in the growing Connected Car and Internet of Things (IoT) technology categories. We help people and businesses track and protect their most important assets with vehicle intelligence solutions that gather Big Data and provide the critical insights with easy-to-use dashboards and apps.

This is You:

We are looking for a Machine Learning Engineer to design and build Convolutional Neural Networks for Smart Sensors. Spireon develops computer vision based smart sensors to detect environment and reports for the transportation sector. As a Machine Learning Engineer, you will implement CNN algorithms to run on smart sensors.. You must be able to work across multiple teams to ensure project objectives are met.

Responsibilities:
Design and develop algorithms for challenging vision classification and detections problems
Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis
Implementation of Computer Vision and ML algorithms
Collect data and analyze real world data
Deploy ML systems (inference at the edge), monitor metrics
Prototyping ML algorithms
Collaborate with Product Management and Engineering departments to understand company needs and devise possible solutions
Keep up to date with latest technology trends
Communicate results and ideas to key decision makers
Requirements:
Must have solid foundation general machine learning systems
Must have experience in Convolutional Neural Networks Classification, Object Detection, Segmentation.
Must have experience in Computer vision, image processing.
Must have Programming / scripting experience with languages such as Python
Must have experience working with machine learning frameworks and libraries (TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch, scikit-learn)
Highly Desired: Programming language experience with C / C++
Highly Desired: Experience with Embedded systems
Highly Desired: Experience with OpenCV
Experience working with AWS Sagemaker
Experience working with AWS S3
Rewards:
Winner of 2019, 2018 IoT Innovator Awards & 2017, 2018 Stevie Award for Customer Excellence
Work with the Best and Brightest Technical Talent
Stable, High Growth and Profitable Company
Comprehensive Benefits (Medical, Dental, Vision, 401K Plan)
Wellness, Professional Development and Spireon University
Virtual Happy Hours, Team Building Events, Hackathons
Employee Discounts on Spireon Products and Services",3.8,Spireon,"Irvine, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,18,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,CA,2712,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
1038,38,Data Scientist BSLEF8,$77k-$128k,"E3/Sentinel’s Homeland Security Enterprise (HSE) division is an integrated organizational entity fostering increased collaboration and synergies across the Homeland domain. HSE combines the skills and talents of over 245 (and growing) E3S employees and subcontractor staff supporting multiple components across DHS, including but not limited to: U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP), Transportation Security Administration (TSA), U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE), Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), U.S. Coast Guard (USCG), Science and Technology Directorate (S&T), Countering Weapons of Mass Destruction Office (CWMD), Federal Protective Services (FPS), and the DHS Headquarters Management Directorate. Our team provides rapid, innovative and specialized solutions that enable our HSE clients to success at meeting dynamic mission objectives.

Each day U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP) oversees the massive flow of people, capital, and products that enter and depart the United States via air, land, sea, and cyberspace. The volume and complexity of both physical and virtual border crossings require the application of “big data” solutions to promote efficient trade and travel. Further, effective “big data” solutions help CBP ensure the movement of people, capital, and products is legal, safe, and secure.
In response to this challenge, E3/Sentinel, as a trusted mission partner of CBP, seeks capable, qualified, and versatile data scientists to help lead the development and delivery of high-quality predictive modelling solutions. Successful applicants will serve as recognized subject matter experts in the application of quantitative methods, machine learning algorithms, and predictive models to address complex national and homeland security challenges. They will help our team to leverage large structured and unstructured datasets to develop and operationalize models, tools, and applications that drive optimized decision making. Project tasks include data collection, mining, data and text analytics, clustering analysis, pattern recognition and extraction, automated classification and categorization, and entity resolution to implement and enhance automated risk assessment. The products we develop provide actionable insight with real and immediate impact on the safety and security of the United States, its citizens, visitors, and economy.

Lead and perform hands-on analysis and modeling involving the creation of intervention hypotheses and experiments, assessment of data needs and available sources, determination of optimal analytical approaches, performance of exploratory data analysis, and feature generation (e.g., identification, derivation, aggregation).
Collaborate with mission stakeholders to define, frame, and scope mission challenges where big data interventions may offer important mitigations and develop robust project plans with key milestones, detailed deliverables, robust work tracking protocols, and risk mitigation strategies.
Demonstrate proficiency in extracting, cleaning, and transforming CBP transactional and mission data associated within an identified problem space to build predictive models as well as develop appropriate supporting documentation.
Leverage expert knowledge of a variety of statistical and machine learning techniques and methods to define and develop programming algorithms; train, evaluate, and deploy predictive analytics models that directly inform mission decisions.
Execute projects including those intended to identify patterns and/or anomalies in large datasets; perform automated text/data classification and categorization as well as entity recognition, resolution and extraction; and named entity matching.
Brief project management, technical design, and outcomes to both technical and non-technical audiences including senior government stakeholders throughout the model development/ project lifecycle through written as well as in-person reporting.

Bachelor’s Degree (required), Master’s or Ph.D. degree (preferred) in operations research, industrial engineering, mathematics, statistics, computer science/engineering, or other related technical fields with equivalent practical experience
Significant experience in developing machine learning models and applying advanced analytics solutions to solve complex business problems.
Proficiency with statistical software packages: SAS, SPSS Modeler, R, WEKA, or equivalent.
Experience with programming languages: R, Python, Scala, Java, SQL, or equivalent.
Experience constructing and executing queries to extract data in support of EDA and model development.
Experience with unsupervised and supervised machine learning techniques and methods.
Experience working with large-scale (e.g., terabyte and petabyte) unstructured and structured data sets and databases.
Experience performing data mining, analysis, and training set construction.
Completed CBP Background Investigation clearance (active or re-instate-able)

Experience with big data technologies (e.g., Hadoop, HIVE, HDFS, HBase, MapReduce, Spark, Kafka, Sqoop).
Proficiency with Unsupervised Machine Learning methods including Cluster Analysis (e.g., K-means, K-nearest Neighbor, Hierarchical, Deep Belief Networks, Principal Component Analysis), Segmentation, etc.
Proficiency with Supervised Machine Learning methods including Decision Trees, Support Vector Machines, Logistic Regression, Random/Rotation Forests, Categorization/Classification, Neural Nets, Bayesian Networks, etc.
Experience with pattern recognition and extraction, automated classification, categorization, and entity resolution (e.g., record linking, named-entity matching, deduplication/ disambiguation).
Experience working in a team and deploying solutions in an iterative or agile/DevOps continuous integration and delivery environment using lifecycle management methods and tools.
Experience with visualization tools and techniques (e.g., Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, Tableau, SAS Visual Analytics, PowerBI).

E3/Sentinel is an equal opportunity employer and Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (VEVRAA) federal contractor. All qualified applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, or status as a qualified individual with a disability. E3/Sentinel hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.",4.4,E3 Federal Solutions,"Alexandria, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,16,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,VA,6516,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,1
1039,39,Data Scientist,$77k-$128k,"OUR AGENCY

Making a Difference

SWIB is a trusted and skilled global investment organization managing the assets of the Wisconsin Retirement System (WRS) and other separately managed funds. With about $129 billion in total assets under management, SWIB has been recognized by the investment industry for its teamwork and innovation that helps make it a premier asset manager. Sophisticated investment management strategies, forward-looking technologies, and strong internal asset management make SWIB a leading investment organization.

For public employees in Wisconsin, SWIB is a unique and valuable partner. Investing for the financial security of more than 635,000 individuals and for the 1,500 Wisconsin employers who contribute on behalf of their employees SWIBs strong management of the WRS has helped fuel one of only a few fully funded public pension funds in the country. SWIBs long-term investment returns meet the challenges of a constantly evolving investment landscape while helping grow and protect the assets of the WRS, the 8th largest public pension fund in the U.S. and 25th largest public or private pension fund in the world.

We are a mission driven organization and the participants we serve are our mission. By bringing a disciplined, prudent and innovative approach to market opportunities, SWIB has been successful in generating respectable returns and maintaining the trust of the beneficiaries and stakeholders of the funds we oversee.

Join HIGHER PERFORMERS

Home to Top Talent

SWIB has long been recognized as an investment leader because of its success in maintaining the WRS and for the highly-qualified staff overseeing the retirement trust funds. SWIBs internal team invests a majority of its assets under management. This means SWIB is committed to investing in professionals that will keep the organization at the forefront of the investment industry. As an innovative organization, SWIB offers professional development opportunities that enable staff to grow and develop. Approximately 61 percent of SWIBs investment professionals are Chartered Financial Analyst (CFA) charterholders.

About the Team

Partner with, build, maintain, enhance and manage the data and technology for the Asset and Risk Allocation (ARA) division which is responsible for the overall investment structure of the Core and Variable Trust Funds. ARA recommends and implements the asset allocation for the policy portfolio, recommends and implements the active risk budget, and is responsible for overall risk monitoring and management. The Analytics, Data Science, & Development department primarily partners with the Asset & Risk Allocation team as well as work with other internal divisions. There will be opportunities to apply skills in both technology and finance.

This role offers a unique opportunity to learn and contribute to the technology and the business through technology.

Essential activities:
Creating reporting, decisioning systems or outputs, performing rapid analysis on data issues, and instrumenting the system with data quality rules to proactively catch and prevent issues, creating enriched and enhanced datasets with advanced data manipulation and modeling skills, use of primarily Oracle, SQL Server, Snowflake, Python, delivering risk, return, cost metrics and partner with various internal departments to improve the overall state of technology and operations, architecting, developing, testing, documenting and supporting software and technical solutions for the SWIB ARA team as well as other teams, assess and revisit inventory business logic, calculations and reporting, leveraging SQL, Python and communication skills in various avenues, instrument data quality rules and metrics in the system.

Technical Skills:
Oracle SQL, SQL Server
Snowflake (or some equivalent datastore tool)
Python experience
JIRA and Confluence
Alteryx (or some equivalent ETL tool such as Informatica)
PowerBI (or some equivalent BI tool such as Tableau)
Data Skills:
SQL development
ETL (Extract Transform load) exposure
Python experience
Financial Knowledge recommended but candidates in other industries highly recommended to apply:
Understanding of multi-asset products is desirable
Comprehensions of risk, return and cost metrics in industry is desirable
Exposure to the investment management lifecycle is desirable
The ideal candidate:
5-10 years experience in data analytics, data science, or related fields
Bachelor's degree or advanced degree in finance, quantitative finance, or another related field
Ability to take various questions gathered from the business leveraging existing data as well as improving upon that data to deliver complete, consistent and precise answers
Experience in working with/understanding the various lifecycles of data management, extraction, loading, transformation to its applications in analysis, research and solving problems
Extensive knowledge in composing Oracle SQL, SQL Server queries, data modeling, and having a SQL and analytics background
Experience in identifying use cases for the business, contributing to analysis and understanding of existing data models with iterative recommendations on improvement resulting in some improvement in risk, return or cost for the organization
Extensive knowledge of data extraction, transformation and loading
Experience refactoring SQL queries, use of Python
Experience working with large structured and financial data sets
Ability to follow rigor in creating/updating documentation, maintain process (i.e. JIRA tickets) and following technology and business best practices
Ability to present and communicate well and connect business and technology
Ability to tactically understand results in context (i.e. when does something look wrong), and strategically how to resolve those issues via data quality and rule-based instrumentation
Interest in newer data technologies, Snowflake programming, i.e. Python
Interest or experience in investment management, quantitative finance and technology
Background in Agile methodologies and their applications
SWIB Offers:
Competitive McLagan-base salary
Meaningful performance-based incentive compensation
A comprehensive benefit package
Educational and training opportunities
Tuition reimbursement
Challenging work in a professional environment
The position requires U.S. work authorization and residency in, or willingness to relocate to the Madison, Wisconsin area. SWIB is prepared to offer relocation assistance as needed.",3.0,State of Wisconsin Investment Board,"Madison, WI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,69,Government,financial_related,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,WI,6484,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1040,40,(Sr.) Data Scientist -,$77k-$128k,"Thursday, June 11, 2020

Merrick Bank is a top-25 credit card issuer and merchant acquirer in the VISA/MasterCard networks, and a major recreational vehicle lender.
The Bank is a Utah Financial Institution and a member of the FDIC.

At Merrick Bank, we specialize in credit programs that assist people looking to build or rebuild their credit. We are FDIC insured and recognized as a top-20 issuer of Visa® cards. In total, we proudly serve over 2.4 million cardholders and have extended over $5.3 billion in credit.

Our Mission is to make a positive difference in the lives of our customers, our employees, and our community. We work hard to create a work environment that empowers our associates to grow, learn, and reach their potential.

This position is a member (or, a senior member, depending upon qualifications) of the Data Science and Modeling team, and will support and work with other members of the team to produce the models, reports, and analysis as required for the bank. Data science, machine learning and statistical programming are the core competencies of the position, but in addition, the applicant should work well with others, have a desire to learn, be self-motivated, and have excellent communication and presentation skills.

REQUIRED SKILLS, ABILITIES, KNOWLEDGE, AND EXPERIENCE:
Master's degree in a relevant quantitative field, or a bachelor’s degree with a significant amount of relevant work experience.
Firm knowledge of statistical theory, data science, or machine learning algorithms is a requirement.
Expertise with R or Python is required.
Experience with any of the following computer languages is also desirable: CUDA, FORTRAN or C/C++, SAS, SQL, Unix shell scripting, or LaTeX.
Experience with HPC (High Performance Computing), or Parallel Computing would be a plus. Experience with SLURM would be outstanding.
Experience in the banking industry, specifically in credit cards, is not necessary, but would be desirable.


PRIMARY DUTIES:
Statistical programming, model development and implementation.
Communicating results, both verbally and in writing.
Work both individually and in a collaborative manner with a team.
Designing, validating, and improving data driven decision making processes and strategies.
Building key metrics and modeling reports for communication with executives.
Compliant with Laws & Regulations.

What’s in it for you:

Competitive salary (DOE)

Benefits package -Medical, Dental and Vision (plus much more)

401(k) Plan with Company Match

Short & Long Term Disability

Group Life and AD&D Insurance

Paid Vacation, Holidays, and Personal Days

Employee Events, including Employee Appreciation Day, Holiday Party, etc.

Tuition Reimbursement Program
Candidates must have unrestricted authority to work in the
United States without sponsorship.

Merrick Bank is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants
without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability,
veteran status, and other legally protected characteristic. The EEO is the
Law poster is available here: http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/poster.cfm

Please go to our website www.merrickbank.com to apply and learn more about our company

We are an equal opportunity employer. Merrick Bank will do a thorough background check for all hires. This includes a review of your personal credit history, drug testing, background check, and employment/personal references. A good credit history is important.

Other details
Job Family
Account Acquisition & Data Science
Pay Type
Salary",3.5,Merrick Bank,Utah,-1,201 to 500 Employees,23,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,UT,3542,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
1041,41,Data Engineer,$77k-$128k,"Group O is seeking a strong candidate with advanced analytics experience to fill an exciting Data Engineer role for an AI partner to Fortune 500 companies. In this role, you will be a valuable in managing large amounts of data and implement loading disparate data sets while managing the technical communication between the team and client.

Implementation including loading from disparate data sets, preprocessing using Hive and Pig.
Manage the technical communication between the team and client
Work with big data team to deliver cutting edge solutions

2-5 years of demonstrable experience designing technological solutions to complex data problems, developing & testing modular, reusable, efficient and scalable code to implement those solutions.
Ideally, this would include work on the following technologies:
Proficiency in at least one of the following: R, C++ or Python (preferred). Scala knowledge a strong advantage.
Strong understanding and experience in distributed computing frameworks, particularly Apache Hadoop 2.0 (YARN; MR & HDFS) and associated technologies -- one or more of Hive, Sqoop, Avro, Flume, Oozie, Zookeeper, etc..
Hands-on experience with Apache Spark and its components (Streaming, SQL, MLLib) is a strong advantage.
Operating knowledge of cloud computing platforms (AWS, especially EMR, EC2, S3, SWF services and the AWS CLI)
Experience working within a Linux computing environment, and use of command line tools including knowledge of shell/Python scripting for automating common tasks
In addition, the ideal candidate would have great problem-solving skills, and the ability & confidence to hack their way out of tight corners.
Education:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related technical degree",3.1,Group O,"San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,46,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,TX,1740,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1042,42,Data Scientist,$77k-$128k,"E.W. Scripps is a company rich in media history focused on the future. We are one of the nation's largest independent TV station owners with 60 stations nationwide, and we are working to stay ahead of the ways in which people use technology to find news and information. Our commitment to the future means that discovery is commonplace, the status quo is challenged, iteration and collaboration are the norm and new ideas are welcome. Join a team of top performers and help shape the future of the most strategic and well positioned media company – E. W. Scripps. This position will be located in Cincinnati, OH or Washington, DC.

At Scripps, you’ll:
Have a complete modern data science/analytics software stack at your disposal.
Enjoy a broad scope of responsibility – with projects and questions from every part of the business and new businesses under consideration.
Know that your work will have an impact on key strategic decisions – changing and shaping the way we do business. This is why we are so selective in our hiring process.
Grow your talent with constant learning – with substantial investments in on-site and hands-on training and eLearning formats used to fill in the gaps.
Work on projects that are important and interesting to you – with focus on modern media and marketing strategies
Expand your horizons by attending and giving talks at conferences and professional networking opportunities with senior analytics professionals.
Become a leading expert in applied data science for media.
We are looking for someone who knows how to use the latest data analytics tools, will thrive in our fast-paced innovative environment, will deliver results and has the following experience and credentials.

Primary purpose:

The Data Scientist blends the skills of a business thinker with those of a data analyst: asking questions, turning data into knowledge, forming conclusions, and making recommendations that enable the company to innovate, differentiate itself from its competitors, work smarter, make better decisions, and enhance profitability. This individual will partner with the analytics team, analytics products and services director, business leaders and end users to be a change agent - teasing out the questions that are important to our business, and then use statistical analysis and data mining techniques to inform the answers and communicate conclusions both visually and in writing, along with recommendations and next steps. The Data Scientist will also participate in the creation and measurement of new business processes, tools, and products.

Key responsibilities:
Influence the course of the business as a trusted advisor to business leaders, users and clients, using data and analytics as a basis for better, more informed decision making
Creation of analytics and measurement roadmaps
Identify impactful choices or courses of action that drive value for the organization
Evaluate the big picture and solve business problems in addition to focusing on metrics
Influence the direction of the business by effectively communicating conclusions to cross-functional groups
Create automation applications to replace tasks for critical revenue generating teams decreasing time dedicated to non-revenue generating
Mine large amounts of data and perform data analysis to extract useful business insights for a wide range of topics including product development and performance, market dynamics, consumer and audience knowledge, internal operations, and external research
Initial study design, acquisition of data, prototyping and production roll out
Ongoing tracking, monitoring, and periodic follow-up studies
Support the design and implement of reporting dashboards that track key business metrics and provide actionable insights
Use software and other tools to develop analyses that identify patterns, influences, correlations, relationships, predictive factors, risk factors, and that provide better situational awareness
Creation of models, simulations, and optimization routines
Develop of data flows and acquisition strategies to facilitate the capture and sharing of data and analytics within the organization
Support the development of Scripps analytics products and services by providing input into product roadmaps
Be a positive force to cultivate a culture that is passionate about developing analytics as a business competency
Drive accountability for value recognition and business results
Create and contribute to a quality work environment that motivates team members to perform at their highest levels and positively affects employee and business partner relationships
Be a publicly visible presence, including creating communications and leading training sessions, advocating for the benefits of analytics in Scripps and the products/services of the analytics team
Education / work experience:
Bachelor's required, Masters preferred. Applied statistics, Computer Science, business analytics or a related field.
Minimum 3 years, 5+ years preferred, experience in solving analytical problems using quantitative approaches apply to this requirement.
Experience and demonstrated success presenting complex analyses and final recommendations to business leaders and external clients.
Statistical method experience:
Analysis techniques such as marketing mix modeling, scenario modeling, pattern detection, A/B testing, nearest neighbor, cluster analysis, sentiment analysis, decision trees, optimization, simulation, regression analysis, agent-based modeling, ensemble models, collaborative filtering and other types of analysis
Software Proficiency:
Python, RapidMiner, R
Database skills (Snowflake, MySQL) experience preferred
Tableau
About Scripps:

The E.W. Scripps Company (NASDAQ: SSP) advances understanding of the world through journalism. As the nation’s fourth-largest independent TV station owner, Scripps operates 60 television stations in 42 markets. Scripps empowers the next generation of news consumers with its multiplatform news network Newsy and reaches growing audiences through broadcast networks including Bounce and Court TV. Scripps runs an award-winning investigative reporting newsroom in Washington, D.C., and is the longtime steward of the Scripps National Spelling Bee. Founded in 1878, Scripps has held for decades to the motto, “Give light and the people will find their own way.”

As an equal employment opportunity employer, The E.W. Scripps Company and its affiliates do not discriminate in its employment decisions on the basis on race, sex, sexual orientation, gender, color, religion, age, genetic information, medical condition, disability, marital status, citizenship or national origin, and military membership or veteran status, or on any other basis which would be in violation of any applicable federal, state or local law. Furthermore, the company will make reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with known disabilities unless doing so would result in an undue hardship for the company.

If interested, please apply at www.scripps.com/careers.

#LI-CH1

#GD-CH1",3.5,The E.W. Scripps Company,"Cincinnati, OH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,142,Company - Public,other_industries,Media,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,OH,7061,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
1044,44,Senior Data Scientist,$77k-$128k,"The Senior Data Scientist independently develops statistical models that will enable future growth and profitability for our book of business through appropriate pricing and underwriting of risk. He/she is responsible for the formulation of statistical models and direct application of models to address insurance business issues. You will start your Senior Data Scientist role at home and then transition to working in our Woodbridge, NJ office when it reopens.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities
Produces complex predictive models which enable the creation of rating plans and evaluation of risk and profitability.
Develops studies that evaluate new business models for customer retention and growth initiatives as well as estimate the lifetime value of customer segments.
Identifies drivers of insurance costs, understanding the economics of customers’ behavior and estimating the expected losses for segments of risks using advanced statistical and analytical techniques on large data sets.
Develop or participate in the development of the overall analytical framework to support the company’s strategy for growth
Communicates analysis, strategy and recommendations to diverse audiences, including technical and non-technical.
Collaborates with upper management to assess the potential effects of proposed solutions and incorporates these considerations into recommendations.
Manages projects of high complexity.
Perform other job-related duties as assigned.
Advanced skills and training in predictive modeling, data mining and other quantitative and research analytics (Non-Linear Regression Analysis, Multivariate Analysis, Bayesian Methods, Generalized Linear Models, Decision Trees, Non Parametric estimations, etc.).
Ability to apply various predictive modeling techniques to develop solutions to various real-world problems.
Hands-on experience developing and delivering structured, methodology projects.
Exceptional programming ability in SAS, SQL, R or other programming languages.
Excellent written and oral communication and presentation skills.
In-depth understanding of database principles and experience working with large databases.
Ability to influence and guide across departmental boundaries.
Qualifications and Education
3 or more years of experience developing and implementing multivariate predictive models using GLM and other statistical methods. PhD in economics, statistics, or related field required.
Or in the alternative, a Master’s degree in Statistics, Engineering, Mathematics, Economics, or a related field (foreign educational equivalent accepted) and five (5) years of experience as indicated above.
High level of organizational and project management experience handling multiple projects simultaneously
About the Company
The Plymouth Rock Company and its affiliated group of companies write and manage over $1.4 billion in personal and commercial auto and homeowner’s insurance throughout the Northeast and mid-Atlantic, where we have built an unparalleled reputation for service. We continuously invest in technology, our employees thrive in our empowering environment, and our customers are among the most loyal in the industry. The Plymouth Rock group of companies employs more than 1,800 people and is headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts. Plymouth Rock Assurance Corporation holds an A.M. Best rating of “A-/Excellent”.",3.6,Plymouth Rock Assurance,"Woodbridge, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,38,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,NJ,3371,1,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
1046,46,Data Scientist,$77k-$128k,"Job Description

The Data Scientist is responsible for leading the design, development, and implementation of advanced quantitative models to evaluate the ITSM environment and to inform a variety of strategic and tactical business decisions. The Data Scientist works collaboratively across the service delivery teams and MSI to build and drive recommendations that translate into practical, measurable actionable insight and process improvements.

What Youll Get to Do:
Builds queries to monitor the IT Service Delivery environment to analyze demand, usage, and performance
Uses data analytics to provide actionable, timely and accurate reporting to improve service delivery, infrastructure management and proactive problem and incident management.
Works with the Service Providers, retained IT, and management teams to identify and monitor process performance and service provider performance
Lead Technical Exchange Meeting related to data structure, quality assurance, and reporting
Apply the various reporting and presentation tools to provide analysis and recommendations
Evaluate, analysis and interpret data to develop recommendations for service and process improvement
Lead a team of data analysts to identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Define and deliver a solution to clean-up data and provide the appropriate level of data hygiene
Analyze complex data schema (tables, reference, relationships) from multiple data sources/platforms
Define new data collection and analysis processes
Design and develop approaches leading to data automation, integration processes, and improvements
Normalize and redesign existing data schema according to requirements, business direction, and commercial best practices
Youll Bring These Qualifications:
Minimum of 5 years experience in the designing data models and conducting statistical data analysis, data manipulation, data visualization, and value modeling and simulations
B.S. in Mathematics, Computer Science or Engineering
A strong understanding of IT Service Management delivery
Experience developing and implementing data dashboards, data automation, and reporting systems to convert data into actionable information
Strong problem solving, quantitative and analytical abilities
Significant experience with conceptual, logical and physical data modeling
ITIL Foundations certification
Excellent communication skills effectively translating data analysis concepts to a business audience
TS/SCI with Poly
These Qualifications Would be Nice to Have:
M.S. in Statistics, Data Analysis or Information Technology
Experience with the ServiceNow toolset
Hands-on knowledge working with modeling tools: Tableau, Lime Survey, Strata, VBA, and SPSS
ITIL Intermediate Certifications
BITS3

allspark

What We Can Offer You:
Weve been named a Best Place to Work by the Washington Post.
Our employees value the flexibility at CACI that allows them to balance quality work and their personal lives.
We offer competitive benefits and learning and development opportunities.
We are mission-oriented and ever vigilant in aligning our solutions with the nations highest priorities.
For over 55 years, the principles of CACIs unique, character-based culture have been the driving force behind our success.
Job Location

US-Chantilly-VA-VIRGINIA SUBURBAN

CACI employs a diverse range of talent to create an environment that fuels innovation and fosters continuous improvement and success. At CACI, you will have the opportunity to make an immediate impact by providing information solutions and services in support of national security missions and government transformation for Intelligence, Defense, and Federal Civilian customers. CACI is proud to provide dynamic careers for employees worldwide. CACI is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.",3.7,CACI International,"Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,58,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,VA,3877,0,data scientist,0,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
1047,47,Data Scientist,$77k-$128k,"Do you want career growth and development opportunities? We also offer relocation assistance.

The Data Scientist in Diversity and Inclusion will be part of a team working on ground floor change that will continue to strengthen St. Judes culture and work environment. We are looking for someone who is very analytical, has strong critical thinking skills, and is a strong communicator. This position will be responsible for using data to unlock trends, build predictive analytics, and provide key insights that are critical for the success of St. Jude operations. Using the data and trends, the selected individual will be presenting charts, graphs, and presentations to St. Jude management teams. The individual will collaborate with other Data Scientists at St. Jude and members of the Diversity and Inclusion team to gain domain knowledge across all areas of the hospital. If this position excites you, please apply and we look forward to reviewing your application.

Perform all data pre-processing steps including but not limited to collecting data in collaboration with Data Engineers, data cleansing, normalization, feature selection and dimensionality reduction

Develop machine learning models or use stochastic models

Document all technical and business aspects associated with each project
Master's degree in Statistics/Mathematics/Business Analytics or related fields is required
Four (4) years of experience in data analytics/reporting required, with at least two (2) of those years of experience in exclusive data science role
Two (2) years in a data scientist role required with a doctoral degree (PhD)
Must possess implementation experience of data science solutions using R/Python/Scala, Matlab, RapidMiner, SAS, Spark, Excel or related technologies
Clinical/Health Care domain experience preferred
Strong background in statistical analysis and root cause analysis is preferred
Strong verbal and written communication skills is preferred
R/Python/Data Scientist/other related certifications preferred
St. Jude is an Equal Opportunity Employer

No Search Firms:


St. Jude Children's Research Hospital does not accept unsolicited assistance from search firms for employment opportunities. Please do not call or email. All resumes submitted by search firms to any employee or other representative at St. Jude via email, the internet or in any form and/or method without a valid written search agreement in place and approved by HR will result in no fee being paid in the event the candidate is hired by St. Jude.",4.7,St. Jude Children's Research Hospital,"Memphis, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,58,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,TN,2528,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,1,0,1
1049,49,Data Science Software Engineer,$77k-$128k,"The Schneider organization is seeking an experienced Data Science Software Engineer to be responsible for the creation of tools and applications that enable complex Advanced Analytics solutions within the enterprise. You will create conceptual prototypes to test new concepts, develop advanced analytics systems to solve challenging business problems, and deploy these tools and systems into the business and monitor their effectiveness and usefulness. You will also research the use of purchased and open-source technologies and concepts that support the creation of tools and systems for use by technical and non-technical users.

About the role:
Provide expert technical guidance in project working groups. Will frequently be asked to lead technical project discussions.
Gather requirements, design, develop, test, implement, and support applications developed across various development environments and in various languages.
Work with the Engineering team to develop and apply heuristics and mathematical concepts, such as natural language processing (NLP), simulation, optimization, machine learning, and statistical models to business problems. Develops state-of-the-art advanced analytics solutions for complex business problems.
Create prototype applications for complex solutions to implement approved concepts, actively guides and monitors the prototype when deployed to key users, transitions the prototype into a production system and provides production-support after implementation.
Follow appropriate development methodologies while developing applications.
As an associate you will enjoy a strong work/life balance that includes paid vacation and holidays along with paid personal time off. You will also have access to medical, dental, and vision insurance and enjoy our company-paid life insurance and 401k savings with a company funded retirement plan. Schneider is dedicated to continuous individual development and offers a wide variety of opportunities through company-paid training and more than 170 personal development courses. What are you waiting for? You will love it here!

Our ideal candidate will have:
Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, or related field, plus a minimum of 5 years of IT work experience in systems analysis, designing, programming, system admin, implementation and maintenance of applications within an application domain; or the equivalent.
Advanced knowledge of advanced analytics software technologies, technical design, programming, monitoring, and troubleshooting enabling software related technologies. Knowledgeable of advanced analytics strategies, architectural standards and best practices.
Two or more years of experience with two or more programming languages from the following list required: Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, Ruby, C#, Objective-C or R.
Advanced experience with Python or Java specifically.
Experience with any data science tools such as R, SAS, or SPSS a plus. Experience with the HDFS/YARN/Spark and related tools a plus.
Experience with mathematical modeling languages (DOcplex/CPLEX, Matlab, GAMS) a plus.
Experience developing applications in a Linux server environment preferred.
Company overview:

Schneider is a premier provider of transportation and logistics services. Our legacy started in 1935 with one man, one truck and one dream. Since then, we’ve grown and evolved to become a nearly $5 billion company (2019 revenue) with one of the broadest portfolios of services in the industry delivering superior customer experiences.

The Schneider Way:
We treat our customers, associates, shareholders and suppliers with integrity, dignity and respect.
We are a desirable employer due to our dedication to achieving mutually beneficial, lasting relationships.
We are a responsible member of the community.
Core Values:
Safety- first and always
Integrity in every action
Respect for all
Excellence in all that we do
Rise to the challenge and become a part of the Schneider family. Be the difference with a leader in an industry that impacts the world.

Apply today at http://www.schneiderjobs.com/.
Schneider is an equal opportunity employer.",3.2,Schneider,"Green Bay, WI",-1,10000+ Employees,85,Company - Public,other_industries,Transportation & Logistics,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,WI,4149,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
1050,50,Data Engineer,$77k-$128k,"Data Engineer

Benefits Data Trust (BDT)
seeks a capable Data Engineer to help develop our new Google Cloud data platform and run our current data infrastructure. BDT embraces Data4Good and is a fast-growing, digitally enabled non-profit that improves benefits access for thousands of underserved people.

As part of our Data Engineering team in our Data Science department, the Data Engineer will:
Build out our new GCP data platform and collaborate on architectural patterns for it with the Data Engineering team
Support the development of machine learning models with productionizing, monitoring and alerting tools
Write, update, and maintain ETL jobs across our data pipelines (mostly in Airflow)
Implement continuous improvements using our existing tools/technologies, which include SQL, Airflow, Python, Docker/Kubernetes, and others such as Terraform and Apache Beam. May also be expected to research and select other tools when the situation demands
Collaborate with internal customers to identify ongoing platform improvements (teams including Analytics, Projects, Policy, Software Engineering, and others throughout the organization)
Consult to software engineers on data-related changes to BDT’s suite of software applications, including schema/model design, table structure, and data collection
Engage with colleagues and collaborators using curiosity, critical thinking, a drive to completion, empathy, and a focus on impact
Follow existing data access and performance design standards for the data platform, software engineering, and all products and services accessing BDT information
Based in our Center City Philadelphia office, the Data Engineer reports to the Director of Data Science.

Due to COVID-19, BDT is operating under a remote-working protocol, following governmental requirements and CDC guidelines. While this job will begin as fully remote, when BDT determines it is safe to do so based on public health recommendations, we will move back into our Centre Square office. At that time, all Philadelphia-based staff are expected to transition back into the office.

Successful candidates will demonstrate the following through their experience (typically 3-5 years as a Data Engineer):
Communication and Relationship-building – with technical peers and some stakeholders
Cloud-based Solution Implementation, of data platforms and infrastructure, including event-driven architectures, microservices and pattern design, supporting compliance and regulated environments (including PII and PHI)
Workflow and pipeline development to ensure reliability, availability, and consistency
Systems Engineering – on-system service management, typically in *nix environments
Data Modeling and Warehousing – proficient understanding of relational data structures and schemas; some familiarity with semi-structured, unstructured (big data) schemas
Automation, monitoring, and alerting – creating these tools based on existing designs and frameworks; resolving bugs and issues
Cloud engineering – working towards certification on any of the major hyperscale cloud platforms
Data Encapsulation & Transfer methodologies – understands standards for file formats and transfer methods
Also interested in relevant experience including:
o Experience with BI implementations/uplifts (we currently use Looker) and/or Data Governance models and methods
o Machine learning techniques, productionizing machine learning models, and/or creating models
About BDT

Benefits Data Trust (BDT) is a national nonprofit that helps people live healthier, more independent lives by creating smarter ways to access essential benefits and services. Each year, BDT helps tens of thousands of people receive critical supports using data, technology, targeted outreach, and policy change. Since its inception in 2005, BDT has screened more than one million households and secured over $7 billion in benefits and services. BDT employs more than 200 people and provides enrollment assistance to individuals in six states, and policy assistance to states nationwide. For more information, visit bdtrust.org.",3.2,Benefits Data Trust,"Philadelphia, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,15,Nonprofit Organization,other_industries,Non-Profit,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,PA,4087,0,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1051,51,Data Engineer,$77k-$128k,"The Role

The Spur Group is looking for a Data Engineer to join our Data& AI organization. As a Data Engineer, you will lead the design, implementation, and successful delivery of large-scale, critical, and complex data architecture, storage, and pipelines that improve the lives of tens of millions of people every single day. Best of all, you’ll be part of a team-centric culture where fellow consultants and managers support you and encourage you to grow every day.

What You'll Do
Build large-scale distributed data processing systems, data lakes, and optimize for both computational and storage efficiency on cloud platforms like AWS.
Design, implement and automate data pipelines sourcing data from internal and external systems, transforming the data for the optimal needs of various systems.
Design data schema and operate cloud-based data warehouses and SQL database systems.
Write Extract-Transform-Load (ETL) jobs
Design, implement and automate integrations with analytical tool (i.e., jupyter, excel, SAS) and business intelligence (i.e., PowerBI, Tableau) tools
Own the design, development and maintenance of ongoing metrics, reports, analyses, dashboards, etc. to drive key business decisions.
Drive architectural plans and implementation for future data storage, ETL, reporting, and analytic solutions.
Provide insightful code reviews, receive code reviews constructively and take ownership of outcomes (“you ship it, you own it”), working very efficiently and routinely deliver the right things in the front-end UI area.
Who You Are (What you'd bring to Spur)
You have a background in data and software engineering and a passion to learn.
You've made mistakes in the past and have learned a lot from them. You apply this learning regularly.
You believe there are generally multiple ways to solve a technical problem, each with different trade-offs.
You approach projects, tasks, and unknowns with curiosity, and enjoy sharing what you know and what you learn with the people around you.
You believe that a team is strongest when it is diverse and includes multiple perspectives.
You are able to put yourself into your customer's shoes. You frequently immerse yourself in the customer experience to understand how you can better serve them.
Requirements
BS in Computer Science or related field, or an equivalent in relevant work experience.
Experience implementing big data processing technology: Hadoop, Apache Spark, etc.
3+ years of Coding proficiency in at least one modern programming language (Python, Ruby, Java, etc.).
Experience writing and optimizing advanced SQL queries in a business environment with large-scale, complex datasets.
3+ years experience in cloud-first design, preferably AWS (VPC, Serverless databases and functions, dynamic autoscaling, container orchestration, etc.).
Experience in data architecture, databases (e.g., MySQL, Redshift, PostgreSQL), SQL and DDD/ER/ORM design.
Interest and curiosity in emerging technologies on the web like GraphQL, web assembly, Lambda functions, MLaaS, etc
Knowledge of software engineering practices& best practices for the software development life cycle, including coding standards, code reviews, source control management, build processes, testing, and operations.
Why Spur

We are go-to-market consultants who drive results that matter. As the leading authority on go-to-market solutions, we act as an extension of our client teams, providing the support, tools, and strategies to achieve important outcomes. If you tackle challenges with unmatched persistence and believe learning is critical to ongoing growth, we want you on our team.

At The Spur Group, we’re committed to diversity, inclusion, equity and belonging. We live and breathe our core values of Inclusion, Courage, Accountability, Respect and Excellence, and we hope to see them in every employee. Visit our to learn more about us and why we’ve been voted one of the best places to work in Seattle.

The Spur Group is an equal employment opportunity employer. We are committed to building a diverse and inclusive culture that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, and skills. We consider all candidates regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, disability status, or characteristic protected by federal, state, and local law.",3.6,The Spur Group,"Redmond, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,16,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,WA,4380,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1052,52,Data Scientist,$77k-$128k,"A trusted partner at nearly three million commercial customer locations, Ecolab (ECL) is the global leader in water, hygiene and infection prevention solutions and services. With annual sales of $13 billion and more than 45,000 associates, Ecolab delivers comprehensive solutions, data-driven insights and personalized service to advance food safety, maintain clean and safe environments, optimize water and energy use, and improve operational efficiencies and sustainability for customers in the food, healthcare, hospitality and industrial markets in more than 170 countries around the world.

Ecolabs Institutional division, serving the restaurant and hospitality market, is seeking a business focused Data Scientist to unlock the value in data assets while creating new and unique offerings for customers. As a data scientist in the Advanced Analytics organization, you will play a pivotal role in planning, executing and delivering machine learning-based projects. The bulk of the work will be in machine learning (ML) modelling, management and problem analysis, data exploration and preparation, data collection and integration, as well as operationalization. You will be a key interface between the advanced analytics team and the business unit and various other departments (such as IT). Candidates need to be very much self-driven, curious and creative.

In this role, we are looking for:
A problem-solving mindset with the ability to understand business challenges and how to apply your analytics expertise to solve them.
The unique person who can present complex mathematical solutions in a simple manner that most will understand including customers.
An individual excited by innovation and new technology and eager to finds ways to employ these innovations in practice.
A team mentality empowered by the ability to work with a diverse set of individuals.
Whats in it For You:
Opportunity to take on some of the worlds most meaningful challenges, helping customers achieve clean water, safe food, abundant energy and healthy environments.
Ability to make an impact and shape your career with a company that is passionate about growth.
Support of an organization that believes it is vital to include and engage diverse people, perspectives and ideas to achieve our best.
What you will do:
Problem Analysis and Project Management.
Inspire the organization about the business potential and strategy of artificial intelligence.
Collaborate across the business to understand IT and business constraints.
Manage data science projects and the corresponding key performance indicators (KPIs) for success.
Data Collection and Integration.
Understand new data sources and process pipelines and catalog/document them.
Acquire access to various databases and other sources systems such as SQL or graph databases.
Create data pipelines for more efficient and repeatable data science projects.
Data Exploration and Preparation.
Apply statistical analysis and visualization techniques to various data.
Generate hypotheses about the underlying mechanics of the business process.
Test hypotheses using various quantitative methods.
Display drive and curiosity to understand the business process to its core.
Network with domain experts to better understand the business mechanics that generated the data.
Machine Learning.
Apply various ML and advanced analytics techniques to perform classification or prediction tasks.
Acquire domain knowledge and integrate it into ML solutions, for example, from an understanding of financial risk, customer journey, quality prediction, sales, marketing.
Testing of ML models, such as cross-validation, A/B testing, bias and fairness.
Operationalization.
Collaborate with ML operations, data engineers, and IT to deploy ML solutions.
Follow established best practices around ML production infrastructure.
Network with internal and external partners.
Upskill yourself (through conferences, publications, courses, local academia and meetups).
Collaboration with other technical teams within the organization.
Encourage and leverage the reuse of artifacts.
Be encouraged and expected to innovate and be creative in your data analysis, problem solving and presentation of solutions.
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics with 3+ years related experience, or
Masters Degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics with 1+ years of related experience
Experience working with statistics/analytics/visualization tools, preferably in the Microsoft Azure Suite.
Preferred Qualifications:
Ph.D. degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics.
Experience working in Python/SQL/Jupyter.
Self-driven, curious and creative with a collaborative mindset.
Demonstrated ability to work in diverse, cross-functional teams in a dynamic business environment.
Strong communication and presentation skills.
Our Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion

At Ecolab, we believe the best teams are diverse and inclusive, and we are on a journey to create a workplace where every associate can grow and achieve their best. We are committed to fair and equal treatment of associates and applicants. We recruit, hire, promote, transfer and provide opportunities for advancement on the basis of individual qualifications and job performance. In all matters affecting employment, compensation, benefits, working conditions, and opportunities for advancement, we will not discriminate against any associate or applicant for employment because of race, religion, color, creed, national origin, citizenship status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expressions, genetic information, marital status, age, disability, or status as a covered veteran.

In addition, we are committed to furthering the principles of Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) through Affirmative Action (AA). Our goal is to fully utilize minority, female, disabled and covered veteran individuals at all levels of the workforce. Ecolab is a place where you can grow your career, own your future and impact what matters.

We will consider for employment all qualified applicants, including those with criminal histories, in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable state and local laws, including the City of Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance and the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance.",3.7,Ecolab,"Saint Paul, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,97,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,MN,6517,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
1058,58,Data Engineer,$77k-$128k,"Description

NJVC, LLC

Company Job Title: Data Engineer

Clearance: Top Secret with ability to obtain SCI

Location: Springfield, VA

Reports To: Program Manager

FLSA Status: Exempt, Full Time, Regular

Summary:

The Data Engineer will work with product owners and data stewards to deliver high quality technical solutions in response to business requirements. You will be counted on to provide your peers with technical expertise that will offer solutions for difficult programming problems.

Duties and Responsibilities:

SQL Server Integration Services (SSIS) including UI and custom code features.
Write or create stored procedures, SQL scripts, SSIS packages that can be used to:
Move data from source databases to target databases
Clean / Condition data
Convert or transform data
Reconcile and confirm converted data
Find data errors
Validate data to business rules
Ability to examine existing ETL scripts and track data back to source
SQL Server administration, tuning, and workbench.
Work with business experts to understand data and complete data mappings.
Focus on the development of extract, transform, and load (ETL) jobs currently using Microsoft SQL, Server, and SSIS.
The environment currently supports hundreds of related ETL jobs that move data between 30 different source systems and between multiple classifications.
Part of the challenge as a data engineer will be to find scalable and efficient coding solutions that plug into this extensible system in order to add more data to the Enterprise data store.
Other duties as assigned

Minimum Qualifications: (To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.)

Bachelor’s Degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field
Equivalent years of experience in lieu of degree
4 years of relevant experience with the following software / tools:
Experience with Microsoft SQL
Prior experience supporting IC/DoD
The existing data warehouse is built on Microsoft SQL hosted on Amazon Web Services (AWS), so experience developing solutions that scale well in these environments is a plus.
Active Top-Secret Clearance with ability to obtain SCI

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:

Ability to work independently and yet be effective within a team setting
Must be capable of managing multiple efforts with time related constraints in a fast-paced contracting environment
Demonstrated ability to effectively communicate and collaborate with diverse internal and external stakeholder groups and individuals
Friendly presence, helpful attitude, good interpersonal skills, and ability to work well with others.
Excellent skills in Microsoft Word, Excel, and other Office applications
Proficient with Microsoft Office Applications, and experience working in a home office setting as well as the ability to train end users on frequently asked technical issues.
Ability to provide technical assistance and support over the phone; good phone skills, professional demeanor, previous customer service experience strongly desired.

Good problem-solving skills; ability to visualize a problem/situation and think abstractly to solve it

Physical Demands: (The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.)

While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee is frequently required to walk; use hands to finger, handle, or feel and reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to stand; climb or balance and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision.

Work Environment: (The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.)

The employee will normally work in a temperature-controlled office environment, with frequent exposure to electronic office equipment.
During visits to areas of operations, may be exposed to extreme cold or hot weather conditions. Is occasionally exposed to fumes or airborne particles, toxic or caustic chemicals, and loud noise.

Chenega Corporation and family of companies is an EOE.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Native preference under PL 93-638.

We participate in the E-Verify Employment Verification Program.

Primary Location: United States-Virginia-Springfield

Organization: NJVC

Strategic Business Unit: Military Intelligence and Operations Support

Security Requirements: Top Secret

Job Schedule: Full Time Exempt

Recruiter: Jonas Patterson

Req ID: 2000001203",2.9,Chenega Corporation,"Springfield, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,46,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,VA,4885,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
1059,59,"Data Scientist, Health Economics & Advanced Analytics",$77k-$128k,"Overview


Avalere Health is seeking a Data Scientist to join our Health Economics & Advanced Analytics (HEAA) Practice. The HEAA practice works with life sciences companies and other healthcare sectors to quantify and communicate the real-world value of healthcare interventions and to align our clients’ business strategies with the evidentiary demands of an increasingly value-driven marketplace. We are driven by deep subject matter expertise, differentiated and proprietary real-world data assets, and an emphasis on sound business strategy coupled with rigorous research and advanced analytic capabilities. The data scientist will serve at the Research Scientist II level and lead and participate in the conceptualization, execution, and delivery of analyses in health economics, comparative effectiveness, performance measure development and testing, outcomes research, and epidemiology.

Responsibilities

Principal Duties and Responsibilities:


Lend deep statistical, epidemiological, and/or econometric expertise to the development of proposals, statements of work, and study protocols/statistical analysis plans
Perform descriptive and advanced statistical analyses using large patient and/or claims databases in support of data mining, predictive modeling, and health outcomes research projects
Develop and author study reports, scientific publications, conference abstracts, and posters
Independently manage workflow and make direct contributions to the research process
Collaborate with cross-functional project teams (project leads, project managers, programmers, research assistants, etc.) to support exceptional execution for clients
Support the growth and development of junior staff focused on related areas
Qualifications

Skills, Experience, and Other Job Related Requirements:


Minimum Requirements:
MA/MS or PhD in epidemiology, data science, health economics, health policy, pharmacy administration, public health, statistics, or related discipline
5+ years of consulting, healthcare, or pharmaceutical/device industry experience
Broad technical knowledge of computational science, including applied statistics, econometrics, predictive modeling, and/or AI/machine learning theory and methods
Proficiency designing and executing observational/outcomes research studies using large administrative medical and pharmacy claims, EMR, and other data derived from various public and private databases
5+ years of experience using statistical software packages such as SAS, R, Python, and/or STATA
3+ years of SQL programming experience
Knowledge of advanced analytics, AI/machine learning theory and methods, and/or econometrics
Experience presenting research results at scientific conferences and/or a record of peer-reviewed publications
Additional Skills and Competencies:
Consulting background preferred
Excellent writing, project management, communication, and presentation skills
Ability to independently manage multiple work streams with limited supervision
Demonstrated problem solving, analytical reasoning, and decision-making skills and strong commitment to meeting goals and deadlines
Excellent teamwork skills and ability to work in a fast-paced, multi-disciplinary environment
Self-motivated with a positive, flexible attitude",3.2,Avalere Health,"Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,20,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,DC,3260,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1060,60,Data Engineer,$77k-$128k,"Data Engineer Northern, VA

Data Engineer

NuWave Solutions is seeking Data Engineers to design and implement distributed, cloud-native data pipelines, storage systems, and query support. These capabilities will support next-generation defense and intelligence operations with a focus on enabling machine learning and automation. Teams will be working in an Agile development environment and expected to identify and mitigate risks and bottlenecks associated with big data environments. Other responsibilities include:
Architect, design, and implement updates and enhancements to data repositories and indices to support data ingest, enrichment, analysis, visualization, and dissemination
Perform database engineering and management activities associated with designing, developing, maintaining, and enhancing Big Data analytic systems using an Agile DevSecOps model
Integrate data from multiple sources in batches and real-time
Review, design, and develop data quality management processes and automated procedures intended to produce high levels of data integrity
Research and recommend solutions to complex problems
Oversee code reviews and delivering feedback regarding designs/code
Perform research and development and provide technical support to identify and integrate new and emerging technologies into the data environment
Design and implement storage and indexing strategies to provide efficient storage and retrieval to support visualizations such as graph-based and geospatial indices
Support design and development of data access APIs that allow enterprise access (as appropriate) to data
Develop or provide input to engineering artifacts associated with the data repositories
Requirements
Active Top-Secret clearance required
Minimum (positions are available at multiple levels of seniority) of a bachelor’s degree and 3 years of experience in a science or engineering field
Experience with SQL databases
Data transformation experience with scripting (Python, Java, Perl, PL/SQL) or platforms such as Spark, Talend, Knime, or Pentaho
Strong problem-solving skills
Good written and oral communications skills
Preferred Skills
Familiarity with no-SQL databases like Neo4j, ElasticSearch, or Cassandra
Familiarity with SQL query engines, preferably PrestoDB or SparkSQL
Familiarity with distributed platforms (i.e. HBase, Kafka, Spark, NiFi) and the cloud (i.e. AWS, GCP, Azure), preferably Amazon Web Services
Experience integrating open API based data access and processing
DOD8570 IAT Level 1 or 2 certified (A+, Security+, etc. certification)
About NuWave Solutions

NuWave Solutions is a recognized leader in providing anticipatory intelligence and advanced data analytics to the defense, intelligence, and private sectors for over 20 years. Leveraging artificial intelligence and machine learning methodologies, NuWave Solutions streamlines the Data-to-Decision lifecycle faster than traditional practices allowing clients to take action with confidence.

For more information on how NuWave Solutions supports its clients and builds upon success, please visit https://www.nuwavesolutions.com

Position Details

Locations of Positions: Reston, McLean, or Herndon, VA; Joint Base Andrews-Bolling, DC; Suitland, MD

Travel Required (CONUS/OCONUS): CONUS

If Travel is required, how much? 5%

Work Schedule: Day Shift

Authorization to work in US is required

8570 Requirements: N/A

NuWave Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Tagged as: Data Engineer",4.4,NuWave Solutions,Virginia,-1,51 to 200 Employees,21,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,VA,3490,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1061,61,Data Engineer,$77k-$128k,"Why you'll love working here:

Zylotech is a fast-growing company that rewards autonomy and creativity. Our team works hard, is fast and collaborative, and we encourage personal growth. There are many opportunities to work with other departments where you can interact with some incredibly talented people.

What you’ll do:
Coordinate with Product management and technical stakeholders to continue building our SaaS product data + decision pipe
Perform architecture design, data modeling, and implementation of Big Data platform or Data pipe
Architect and develop big data solutions on either AWS or GCP cloud platforms
Set up and manage big data infrastructure to ingest and process data from multiple sources for Enterprise customer deployment
Create scalable & robust data pipelines to transfer data from source to destination data stores
Player and coach across a team of big data engineers, ML engineers, data scientist towards agile shipping of features and milestone
What we seek:
Prior experience in building, developing, architect scalable big data applications from grounds up preferably in product startups.
2+ years of experience in Data Engineering
Experience working with Big Data stack, Big Map Reduce, Hive, Kafka, Impala, Hadoop, Big Query, Spark SQL, Spark Streaming, HBase etc
Experience in Databases (NoSQL and SQL)
Experience in creating Data-warehouses and scheduling automated ETL jobs
Experience in Docker and Kubernetes
Good Communication Skill, both verbal & written. Confident in communicating with business & technical stakeholders alike.
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science or a related field of study.
Important Personal Attributes:
You are curious about technology & science.
Team matters.
Challenging yourself is an intrinsic part of who you are.
Sharing and debating ideas to get to the right answer is important to you.
You seek to act and don’t wait to be told.
You like to teach those around you.
You are serious about your work but also believe that laughter and levity are important.
You work hard and you also have passions outside of work that enrich your life.
Winning is important to you, but so is how you win.
You take pride & ownership in building a Product and company who is disrupting an industry.
About Zylotech:

Zylotech is a self-learning customer intelligence platform that helps marketers create complete customer profiles for targeting revenue opportunities more effectively. Powered by AutoML, the platform continuously unifies and enriches internal and external data, and performs ongoing micro-segmentation, pattern discovery, and recommendations, all while integrating with a variety of marketing clouds for on-demand accessibility. Zylotech’s cross-industry clients have reported up to a 6x increase in customer lift. For more information, visit Zylotech.com.

Zylotech is an equal employment opportunity employer and does not discriminate against any applicant because of race, creed, color, age, national origin, ancestry, religion, gender, sexual orientation, disability, genetic information, veteran status, military status, application for military service or any other class protected by state or federal law.

To all recruitment agencies: Zylotech does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Zylotech employees or any other company location. Zylotech is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes. Unsolicited resumes received will be considered our property and will be processed accordingly.

Qualified Applicants must be legally authorized for employment in the United States. Qualified Applicants will not require employer-sponsored work authorization now or in the future for employment in the United States.",3.4,Zylotech,"Cambridge, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,6,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,102.5,MA,3748,0,data engineer,0,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
1063,63,"Data Scientist (JavaScript, Python, SQL, Geospatial) REMOTE",$95k-$154k,"Tasks and Responsibilities
· Propose, design, develop, and implement new ways to visualize geospatial data for a variety of projects in JavaScript/React. The focus of this role will be more on prototyping and research visualizations rather than building enterprise systems.
· Build and curate geospatial data sets, integrating remote sensing, proximal sensing, and field trial measurements
· Create filters and aggregations with geospatial data sets, e.g. averaging measurements per unit area across time
· Provide data science input across the project including data ingestion, data cleansing and wrangling, visualization, and downstream analyses required to tell stories present in our data
· Assist in website creation and maintenance during prototyping phase
· Work with users to incorporate feedback regarding usability and information content of geospatial visualizations
· Evaluate the limitations of existing data sources and provide recommendations to address unmet data needs
· Work in close collaboration with scientists to identify opportunities for state-of-the art integrative data science and visual analytics projects
· Be accountable for & ensure solutions meet business requirements
· Write robust and well-documented research code
· Engage with diverse research groups to understand their models and products and develop visualization solutions to meet their data needs
· Undertake written & verbal communication with stakeholders in various parts of the organization
· Deliver results in a timely and efficient manner
· Be part of innovative data analytics projects by creating novel scientific and/or business insights and knowledge across R&D phases and technologies

Qualifications & Competencies
· Masters with a focus in Math, Statistics, Informations Systems Management, Computer Science or GIS; PhD with scientific visualization experience preferred
· 5+ years of relevant development experience with recent experience in JavaScript, Python & SQL with a focus on scientific/geospatial visualizations
· 1+ year of experience with geospatial visualizations preferred
· Experience working with AWS cloud tools and Domino data science platform
· Strong organizational skills, interpersonal skills, written and oral communications
· Strong problem solving and proven project delivery skills
· Demonstrated experience with global multi-disciplinary teams
· Creative, proactive, bold and out-of-box thinking",4.3,The Syllogisteks Company,"Cary, NC",-1,Unknown,28,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,124.5,NC,2427,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,1,1,0,1
1064,64,"Data Scientist, Product Analytics",$95k-$154k,"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started. Were looking for Data Scientists to work on our core and business products (ex. Instagram, Messenger, FB App, Ads, What's App, Integrity, etc.) to help shape the future of what we build at Facebook. You will enjoy working with one of the richest data sets in the world, cutting edge technology, and the ability to see your insights turned into real products on a regular basis. You should have a background in a quantitative or technical field, experience working with large data sets, and experience in data-driven decision making. You are focused on results, a self-starter, and have demonstrated success in using analytics to drive the understanding, growth, and success of a product. Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, data mining, and the presentation of data to see beyond the numbers and understand how our users interact with both our consumer and business products Partner with Product and Engineering teams to solve problems and identify trends and opportunities Inform, influence, support, and execute our product decisions and product launches The Data Scientist Analytics role has work across the following four areas: Product Operations: Forecasting and setting product team goals. Designing and evaluating experiments. Monitoring key product metrics. Understanding root causes of changes in metrics. Building and analyzing dashboards and reports. Building key data sets to empower operational and exploratory analysis. Evaluating and defining metrics Exploratory Analysis: Proposing what to build in the next roadmap. Understanding ecosystems, user behaviors, and long-term trends. Identifying new levers to help move key metrics. Building models of user behaviors for analysis or to power production systems Product Leadership: Influencing product teams through presentation of data-based recommendations. Communicating state of business, experiment results, etc. to product teams. Spreading best practices to analytics and product teams Data Infrastructure: Working in Hadoop and Hive primarily, sometimes MySQL, Oracle, and Vertica. Automating analyses and authoring pipelines via SQL and Python based ETL framework Bachelors/Masters/PhD 4+ years of experience doing complex quantitative analysis and working with distributed (i.e. Hive, Hadoop or similar databases) or highly complex datasets 4+ years of experience with data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R, SAS, MATLAB) 4+ years of experience with applied statistics or experimentation (i.e. A/B testing) in an industry setting 2+ years of experience communicating the results of analyses to leadership teams to influence the strategy Experience in a consumer technology company 6+ years of experience in all the above minimums Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.

Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,Facebook,"Austin, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,16,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,124.5,TX,4314,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
1065,65,Data Scientist,$95k-$154k,"PIC Groups client is currently seeking a Data Scientist for a Direct hire position in Atlanta, GA!

As part of its continued business development program PIC has established a Remote Operating Center (ROC) within its Atlanta, GA Corporate Office with the capability to monitor, operate and evaluate plant anywhere in the world. The current focus of the ROC is wind, solar, reciprocating engine and simple cycle gas turbine-based power plant but coverage is also provided for process plant and other industrial facilities.

In order to provide the maximum value to its Clients PIC has a requirement to analyze and interpret the large quantity of plant data being received and stored in the ROC. While day-to-day operational issues are handled by our team of experience control room operators we have now identified a requirement for a Data Scientist to join our team to develop and implement the data analysis techniques and systems by which we can provide additional insight to improve facility availability, efficiency and performance.

In this role, you should be highly analytical with a proven talent for data analysis, math and statistics. Critical thinking and problem-solving skills are considered essential for interpreting data, and a passion for machine-learning and research will be a key requirement of the job.

Responsible for analyzing large amounts of raw information to identify patterns and trends that will help improve our performance and that of our Clients. An additional responsibility will be the identification and selection of the necessary tools and support required to accomplish these goals. We will rely on you to build data products to extract valuable business insights and help our company to make better decisions.

Objectives of this Role
•Collaborate with PIC management and operations to develop an understanding of needs.
•Identifying the data-analytics problems that offer the greatest opportunities to the organization
•Determining the correct data sets and variables
•Collecting large sets of structured and unstructured data from disparate sources
•Clean and validate the data to ensure accuracy, completeness, and uniformity
•Devise and apply models and algorithms to mine the stores of big data
•Analyze the data to identify patterns and trends
•Interpret the data to discover solutions and opportunities
•Propose solutions and strategies to business challenges
•Collaborate with engineering, sales and operations teams
•Communicate findings to stakeholders using visualization and other means
•Evaluate and select software tools and systems to support the data analysis process
•Keep current with technical and industry developments
•Write case studies and papers to promote PIC’s capabilities for presentation at industry shows and for industry publications.

Required Experience:

•Bachelor’s degree in statistics, applied mathematics, or related discipline
•Problem-solving aptitude
•5+ years demonstrable successful experience in data science
•Proficiency with data mining, mathematics, and statistical analysis
•Understanding of machine-learning and operations research
•Knowledge of R, SQL and Python; familiarity with Scala, Java or C++ is an asset
•Advanced pattern recognition and predictive modeling experience
•Analytical mind and business acumen
•Excellent communication and presentation skills
•Comfortable working in a dynamic, results-oriented group with multiple ongoing concurrent projects

Preferred Experience and Qualifications:
•Familiarity with, and understanding of, power generation technologies including wind, solar, reciprocating engine and gas turbines.
•Previous experience analyzing and interpreting power plant data
•Master’s or PhD degree in stats, applied math, or related discipline
•2+ years of project management experience.

We are proud to offer competitive wages and benefits. Prior to beginning work, all applicants must be willing to submit to a drug and alcohol screen as well as a background check, inclusive of criminal. We seek out and employ talented individuals who meet the qualifications for each position. PIC Group, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Due to the large number of responses we receive to our postings, only those applicants with the required experience and qualifications will be contacted.",2.9,PIC Group Inc.,"Atlanta, GA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,32,Company - Private,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,124.5,GA,4304,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
1067,67,Data Scientist (Remote/ Virtual),$95k-$154k,"We Are Hiring

This is a remote opportunity to join our growing and innovative Ascension Data Science Institute!

The Ascension Data Sciences Institute (ADSI) was created in July 2019 with the mission of supporting Ascension in achieving its Quadruple Aim with uniquely skilled, high-performing associates who develop analyses, models and applications to enable Ascension in providing higher value healthcare and making strategic decisions. ADSI is comprised of 6 domains addressing 1) Clinical quality and patient safety; 2) Health Economics and Clinical Outcomes; 3) Strategic Operations and Financial Analytics; 4) Actuarial and Managed Care Analytics; 5) Registry Abstraction Healthcare Solutions; and 6) Healthcare Data Intelligence. We recognize that the healthcare environment is a complex ecosystem of rapidly evolving clinical and economic practices that affect patient and provider experience and demands increasingly sophisticated and complex measurement. Our objective is for advanced analytics and data science to play a critical and foundational role in the transformation of care delivery, quality and financial outcomes to enable our organization’s competitive advantage. To meet these objectives, Ascension is investing in its analytics capabilities and the following positions have been opened to address this expansion.

Why Join Ascension?
Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, with special attention to persons living in poverty and those most vulnerable. In FY2019, Ascension provided $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.

Ascension includes more than 150,000 associates and 40,000 aligned providers. The national health system operates more than 2,600 sites of care – including 150 hospitals and more than 50 senior living facilities – in 20 states and the District of Columbia, while providing a variety of services including clinical and network services, venture capital investing, investment management, biomedical engineering, facilities management, risk management, and contracting through Ascension’s own group purchasing organization.

What You Will Do

As an Associate with Ascension, you will have the opportunity to develop predictive and prescriptive analytics models, creating efficient algorithms, and innovating use of data.

Responsibilities:
Integrates data from multiple sources and supports/performs complex statistical data analysis including multivariate statistical analysis, multilevel modeling, dyadic analysis and/or coarsened exact matching analysis.
Analyzes complex business and competitive issues and discerns the implications for systems support.
Identifies, defines, directs and performs project issue analysis to resolve issues, including analysis of technical and economic feasibility of proposed data solution.
Communicates highly technical information to numerous audiences, including senior management, the user community, and less experienced staff.
Presents data to drive business decisions.
Proposes and leads projects required to support the development of the organization's data infrastructure needs.
Parses, validates and scrubs data of widely differing formats.
Analyzes structured and unstructured data for business insight.
Interpret large amounts of data using advanced visualization techniques and tools.
What You Will Need

Education:

High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required
Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Analytics, Data Science, Engineering, Operations Research, Decision Sciences, Computer or Information Science, Physics, Behavioral and Social Sciences or other related technical or quantitative fields strongly preferred.
Master's level or higher is strongly preferred.
Preferred Skills:
Scripting language experience in Python, R and SQL
Knowledge of and some experience with Google Cloud Platform preferred
1-3 years experience with business intelligence and data visualization tools such as Tableau, Microsoft Power BI, QlikView, or Microstrategy
Knowledge of machine learning algorithms and techniques: Logistic Regression, Decision Trees, Random Forests, Gradient Boosting, SVMs, Time Series, KMeans, Clustering, NMF)
Advanced modeling and statistical knowledge one or more of the following areas: multivariate analysis, logistic regression, poisson and negative binomial regression, experimental design, structural equation modeling, principal component analysis, educational measurement, psychometrics, factor analysis, mathematical modeling, simulation, operations research, optimization
Experience writing the methodology sections of research publications in academic or industry settings strongly preferred
Experience with conducting research in human behavior, medical sciences, behavioral sciences, associate or patient experience, education, business, clinical operations, performance improvement, process optimization and/or healthcare preferred
Web and social media analytics
Sentiment analysis
Text mining and natural language processing knowledge strongly preferred
Consulting experience with external clients or internal stakeholders
Presentation and storytelling skills
Equal Employment Opportunity
Ascension is an EEO/AA employer: M/F/Disabled/Vet. For further information regarding your EEO rights, click on the following link to the “EEO is the Law” poster:
http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/eeoc_self_print_poster.pdf”
Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

Ascension participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify link below for more information.

E-Verify (link to E-verify site)",3.3,Ascension,Missouri,-1,10000+ Employees,21,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,124.5,MO,6146,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
1068,68,Data Engineer,$95k-$154k,"Data Engineer

Alignment Healthcare was founded with a mission to revolutionize health care with a serving heart culture. Through its unique integrated care delivery models, deep physician partnerships and use of proprietary technologies, Alignment is committed to transforming health care one person at a time.

By becoming a part of the Alignment Healthcare team, you will provide members with the quality of care they truly need and deserve. We believe that great work comes from people who are inspired to be their best. We have built a team of talented and experienced people who are passionate about transforming the lives of the seniors we serve. In this fast-growing company, you will find ample room for growth and innovation alongside the Alignment community.

Position Summary:
Alignment Healthcare is a data and technology driven healthcare company focused partnering with health systems, health plans and provider groups to provide care delivery that is preventive, convenient, coordinated, and that results in improved clinical outcomes for seniors.

We are experiencing rapid growth (backed by top private equity firms), our Data Services and BI team is looking for the best and brightest leaders. Data drives the way we make decisions. We love our customers and understanding them better makes it possible to provide the best clinical outcome and care experience.

This position will play a key role in building and operating a cloud-based data platform and its pipelines using big data technologies.

As a Data Engineer, you will develop a new data engineering platform that leverage a new cloud architecture, and will extend or migrate our existing data pipelines to this architecture as needed. You will also be assisting with integrating the SQL data warehouse platform as our primary processing platform to create the curated enterprise data model for the company to leverage. You will be part of a team building the next generation data platform and to drive the adoption of new technologies and new practices in existing implementations. You will be responsible for designing and implementing the complex ETL pipelines in cloud data platform and other solutions to support the rapidly growing and dynamic business demand for data, and use it to deliver the data as service which will have an immediate influence on day-to-day decision making.

General Duties/Responsibilities:

(May include but are not limited to)
Interfacing with business customers, gathering requirements and developing new datasets in data platform
Building and migrating the complex ETL/EDI pipelines from on premise system to cloud and Hadoop/Spark to make the system grow elastically
Identifying the data quality issues to address them immediately to provide great user experience
Extracting and combining data from various heterogeneous data sources
Designing, implementing and supporting a platform that can provide ad-hoc access to large datasets
Modelling data and metadata to support machine learning and AI
Minimum Requirements:

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Minimum Experience:
3+ years relevant experience in cloud based data engineering.
Demonstrated ability in data modeling, ETL development, EDI Development and data warehousing.
Data Warehousing Experience with SQL Server, Oracle, Redshift, Teradata, etc.
Experience with Big Data Technologies (NoSQL databases, Hadoop, Hive, Hbase, Pig, Spark, Elasticsearch etc.)
Experience in using Python, .net, Java and/or other data engineering languages
Knowledge and experience of SQL Server and SSIS.
Experience with X12(837,834,278) and HL7 transactions
Education/Licensure:
Bachelors or Masters in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, or related field
Other:
Excellent communication, analytical and collaborative problem-solving skills
Requires Spark and Scala
Building and migrating the complex ETL/EDI pipelines from on premise system to cloud and Hadoop/Spark to make the system grow elastically
Preferred
Healthcare domain and data experience
Healthcare EDI experience is a plus
API development experience is a plus
Industry experience as a Data Engineer or related specialty (e.g., Software Engineer, Business Intelligence Engineer, Data Scientist) with a track record of manipulating, processing, and extracting value from large datasets.
Experience building/operating highly available, distributed systems of data extraction, ingestion, and processing of large data sets
Experience building data products incrementally and integrating and managing datasets from multiple sources
Experience leading large-scale data warehousing and analytics projects, including using Azure or AWS technologies – SQL Server, Redshift, S3, EC2, Data-pipeline, Data Lake, Data Factory and other big data technologies
Experience providing technical leadership and mentor other engineers for the best practices on the data engineering space
Linux/UNIX including to process large data sets.
Experience with Azure, AWS or GCP is a plus
Microsoft Azure Certification is a plus
Demonstrable track record dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in an agile, dynamic startup environment
Problem solving skills and Ability to meet deadlines are a must
Microsoft Azure Certification is a plus
Python and Java are a plus,
Experience with X12(837,834,278) and HL7 transactions preferred
Work Environment
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Essential Physical Functions:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear. The employee regularly is required to stand, walk, sit, use hand to finger, handle or feel objects, tools, or controls; and reach with hands and arms.
The employee frequently lifts and/or moves up to 10 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision and the ability to adjust focus.
Alignment Healthcare, LLC is proud to practice Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action. We are looking for diversity in qualified candidates for employment: Minority/Female/Disable/Protected Veteran.
If you require any reasonable accommodation under the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) in completing the online application, interviewing, completing any pre-employment testing or otherwise participating in the employee selection process, please contact careers@ahcusa.com.
(function() { var ac = document.createElement('script'); ac.type = 'text/javascript'; ac.src = ('https:' == document.location.protocol ? 'https://' : 'http://') + 'click.appcast.io/pixels/grpeople1-1573.js?ent=8&t=' + new Date().getTime(); var s = document.getElementsByTagName('script')[0]; s.parentNode.insertBefore(ac, s); })();",3.5,Alignment Healthcare,"Orange, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,7,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,124.5,CA,7477,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
1069,69,Technical Data Engineer: Engines,$95k-$154k,"POSITION TITLE: Technical Data Engineer: Engines

PROGRAM: Korea Country Standard Technical Order Sustainment

In this role, your primary functions would include the following:
The Technical Data Engineer II is responsible for the overall execution and day to day operation of all areas of the Korean F-15 Aircraft Engine Country Standard Technical Orders (CSTOs)
Interpret engineering data, engineering change proposals and other changes and directives and incorporate them into F-15 Aircraft Engine CSTOs
Develop maintenance data on new systems incorporated into the aircraft
Interface with USAF, Customer and other contractor personnel
Help other team members during periods of peak production requirements
Continue building the technical strength of the group to support future program needs
Ability to utilize Adobe FrameMaker, Photoshop and Distiller software to update existing and develop new CSTOs and illustrations a plus
REQUIREMENTS:
US Citizenship
Valid DOD Secret Clearance
Possess the advanced knowledge, experience and recognized ability to be considered an expert in technical field
Possess the ability to perform tasks and oversee the efforts of junior and mid-level personnel within the technical field
Travel in support of technical data conferences, meetings, reviews, validations, verifications, and other technical data related activities when requested (Such travel may be both CONUS and OCONUS)
Familiar with U.S. Air Force (USAF) field and depot level maintenance activities, USAF technical data, material qualification and acquisition systems, and USAF maintenance policies & programs
EDUCATION/OTHER:
Associate’s Degree or equivalent experience in a related field
Min 5 yrs technical data update experience in a related field
Min 5 yrs directly related experience or 10 years of experience with proper certifications
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
technical data: 5 years (Preferred)
related: 5 years (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location",-1.0,Ascension Global Solutions,"Warner Robins, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,124.5,GA,2131,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1070,70,Data Scientist/Architect,$95k-$154k,"JOB RESPONSIBILITIES

· Perform tasks using agile methodologies to solve most complex problems (multiple interfaces with other systems across multiple business units) considering all impacted components from an end-to-end perspective

· Ensure end-to-end traceability of requirements is complete and shall apply specific functional and/or business expertise to assist the development team with project deliverables

· Conduct impact analyses of technology changes on business processes and existing technology and shall remain competent to work at the highest technical capacity on all phases of the business systems analysis

· Assist with the review of Test Planning and Test Execution strategies and create the appropriate User-Interface Model(s) to support projects

· Assess business workflow diagrams; assist in the technical evaluation of data models and interface design specifications; document and track issues related to data quality

· Provide technical expertise to the customer on the design and mapping of data conversion strategies and participate in collaborative system and data design sessions with the user community, technical architecture resources, and development resources

· Complete agile project activities as scheduled and proactively identify and communicate issues that may jeopardize milestones or project budget

· Serve as a Data Architect for overall effort with Data Integration/Migration Architect services

· Review and analyze learning system databases to recommend removal/deletion of old data with an understanding of Databases, Data Warehouses, and Multidimensional Databases

· Provide guidance to the Government on the work of data migration developers

REQUIREMENTS

· US Citizen

· Master's degree in Computer Science or related field

· At least 8 years of relevant experience

· DoD experience highly desired

· Agile methodologies experience required

· Well versed in DoD policy and guidance regarding cloud architecture

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $95,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
agile methodologies : 8 years (Required)
Database, Data Warehouse, and Multidimensional Database: 8 years (Required)
Education:
Master's (Required)
Company's website:
www.akytechconsulting.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1.0,Akytech Consulting LLC,"San Antonio, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,124.5,TX,2445,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
1071,71,Data Engineer,$95k-$154k,"As a Data Engineer, you will have the unique opportunity to curate and organize data for a program advancing state-of-the-art modeling and prediction capabilities. This aim of this program is to discover and curate data as well as develop and curate synthetic data. Then, we will develop machine learning (ML) models and training pipelines to detect and discern features in scenes. Finally, we will inject obfuscations into the data to fool the models.
Our delivery teams are driven to explore new ideas and technology, and care deeply about collaboration, feedback, and iteration. We follow SAFe agile practices, embrace the Ops ethos (DataOps/DevSecOps/MLOps) to “automate-first”, use modern tech stacks, and constantly challenge each other to grow and improve.
If cutting edge data science projects resonate with you, and you care deeply about joining a mission-driven company with a strong growth direction and diverse culture, we'd love to learn more about you. Check out the details below, and let’s connect.

Technical members of our solutions teams require little guidance, but love to learn, collaborate, and problem solve. This position requires a mid to senior level of experience, a passion for mission support, and a strong desire to solve our customers’ hardest technical and data challenges.
The Data Engineer will be responsible for the following:
Assess, transform, organize, and optimize data for use by machine learning algorithms
Generating representative data sets for systems development and data science initiatives
Build data pipelines that enables data scientists and engineers and other stakeholders

Requirements
TS/SCI clearance required
4+ years of experience designing data models and data warehouses supporting analytics, using both relational and non-relational distributed data storage systems
Demonstrated experience building and maintaining ETL pipelines. Bonus points for experience with Apache Beam
Demonstrated experience working with Synthetic Aperture Radar (SAR) data
Demonstrated experience with large-scale distributed processing
Experience building data pipelines in ML frameworks. Kubeflow experience is desired
Experience working in a fast-paced agile environment is a plus
Familiarity with machine and deep learning libraries such as Scikit-learn and PyTorch.
Experience in a high-level programing language, such as Java, Python or GoLang
Demonstrated proficiency with Git version control systems
Experience working in Linux environments
We're looking for a motivated Data Engineer eager to advance not only your professional career, but also the missions of our Intelligence and Defense communities. At NT Concepts, you'll be able to:
Meaningfully impact the company's growth, and share in the rewards accordingly
Develop your own career path through our What’s Next program, which emphasizes person growth through training and certification
Work on programs of importance that directly impact National Security and the world
Work in a fun, “challenging yet rewarding” fast-paced environment

#CJ
#JT",3.6,NT Concepts,"Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,22,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,124.5,VA,3048,0,data engineer,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
1072,72,Data Engineer,$95k-$154k,"Lucid Perspectives, and E/3 Sentinel Company, provides proven problem solvers to our customers and their diverse needs. We help them achieve success by offering comprehensive management and technical solutions with a clear focus on their mission

The successful candidate will manipulate data and data flows for both existing and new systems performing ETL, analytical support and maintenance of critical data.

The data engineer will provide support in the areas of data extraction, transformation and load (ETL), data mapping, analytical support, operational support, database support, and maintenance support of data and associated systems.
As a member of the team, the data engineer will research, design, develop and/or modify enterprise-wide systems and/or application software.
The data engineer will research emerging technologies to determine impact on application execution. Troubleshoot complex problems and provide support for the ETL process. Prepare reports on analyses, findings and project progress

Ability to develop complex data flows, or make significant enhancement to existing pipelines
Experience building and maintaining data flows in NiFi or Pentaho
Experience with the following languages: Java/J2EE, C, C++, SQL, XML, XQuery, XPath, Ruby on Rails, HTML/XHTML, CSS, Python, Shell Scripting, JSON
Knowledge of servers operating systems; Windows, Linux, Distributed Computing, Blade Centers, and cloud infrastructure
Strong problem solving skills
Ability to comprehend database methodologies

Lucid Perspectives, an E/3 Sentinel Company, understands that our people are what make us great. We believe in a work/life balance while supporting the customers and mission we love. Our benefits are as follows: 7 weeks PTO (10 Federal Holidays along w/ 25 Vacation days), 10% 401K Contribution (100% vested on Day 1), 100% paid premiums Medical/Dental/Vision for the family, Life/Disability Insurance, Generous Tuition Reimbursement, Monthly Internet & Cell phone allowance, Technology Allowance, and Referral/Growth Incentive Bonus.
During the COVID19 pandemic we are actively taking measures to protect and support our employees. This includes support to our workforce that has returned to work on-site, those working remotely, and those employees supporting in a ready state or isolating at home.

Lucid Perspectives, E3/Sentinel Company, is an equal opportunity employer and Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (VEVRAA) federal contractor. All qualified applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, or status as a qualified individual with a disability. Lucid Perspectives, an E3/Sentinel Company, hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.",4.4,E3 Federal Solutions,"Chantilly, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,16,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,124.5,VA,2870,0,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1073,73,Data Scientist,$95k-$154k,"At White Ops, we are all about keeping it human. We are the global leader in bot mitigation. We protect more than 200 enterprises—including the largest internet platforms—from sophisticated bots by verifying the humanity of nearly one trillion online interactions every week. The most sophisticated bots look and act like humans when they click on ads, visit websites, fill out forms, take over accounts, and commit payment fraud. We stop them.

Founded in 2012 in a Brooklyn sci-fi bookstore, our Bot Mitigation Platform protects enterprises from the sophisticated bots that threaten them. It's an ongoing war that we fight passionately every day. Join our mission to stop bots, disrupt the economics of cyber crime, and keep it human.

The Data Science team at White Ops is building the algorithms that run behind the scenes and power our bot detection engine. We deploy state-of-the-art statistical and machine learning models at a massive scale that distinguish human activity from automated bots.

What you'll do:
Develop algorithms (i.e. rule based, statistical, machine learning) that automatically detect emerging threats
Evaluate and implement data analysis strategies to improve detection efficacy at internet-scale
Ad hoc investigations to respond to emerging threats with velocity and quality
Collaborate with product, engineering, customer success, to define and develop new product features that will delight our customers
Research for case studies and white papers on bot detection
Contribute to toolkits and platforms that scale detection analytics
Who you are:
You have a strong sense of ownership which drives you to find ways to do things better, faster, and cheaper
You look to find new and innovative ways to solve complex problems through rigorous experimentation, all by yourself
You are open, transparent and work in tight collaboration with anyone
You constantly drive for correctness and performance, in that order
You are a data scientist, analyst, engineer and have solved difficult problems to prove it
You have proficiency with SQL, Python
You have familiarity with tools, libraries and platforms such as Jupyter notebooks, Pandas, NumPy etc
Track record of independent, creative problem solving with large amounts of complex data
Knowledge of how the Internet works
Comfort with ad tech terminology
Background in data science for security is a plus
Knowledge of how web browsers work is a plus
Benefits and Perks
Unlimited vacation policy
Stock options, 401(k), and commuter benefits
Competitive salary and commission structure
Medical and dental insurance for all full-time employees
Fully paid parental leave
Professional development fund
Great coaching from senior leaders and challenging development opportunities
Life at White Ops:

Our HQ office is located in the heart of New York City. We are growing the company deliberately with a keen eye towards maintaining a culture that values diversity, lifestyle, and career growth. We are doing meaningful work and we need people to join our mighty team. We are proud of our overwhelmingly positive presence on Glassdoor and Built in NYC. We have offices located in NYC, DC, Victoria, and London.",3.8,White Ops,"New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,8,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,124.5,NY,3178,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1076,76,Senior Data Scientist,$95k-$154k,"Are you a talented and passionate engineer? Do you love solving problems and making ideas come to life? Are you a lifelong learner who thrives in dynamic environments and enjoys the challenge of learning new technologies and techniques? Are you a team player and enjoy collaboration, but you are also self-directed and enjoy the autonomy to be able to manage your own schedule and workload? Do you appreciate the importance of good communication and know that teamwork takes practice, effort and a good attitude? If so, we want to speak with you.

The Senior Data Scientist is responsible for collaborating with the team to design and implement systems that focus on forecasting, allocating, delivering, and reporting of advertising on the internet, TV, and connected devices. The successful candidate will utilize advanced mathematical, optimization, machine-learning, software engineering, and programming skills to solve challenging problems.

Responsibilities
Develop innovative forecasts, models, algorithms, and solutions and build prototypes and production implementations
Dig deep into high volumes of data, engineer features for improved forecast performance
Work cross-functionally to gather feedback and requirements from end users
Be a key contributor to product innovation and company strategy
Communicate technical information clearly to both technical and non-technical people
Required Qualifications
Degree in Operations Research, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Industrial Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or related field; MS/PhD preferred
3+ years of relevant experience
Strong analytical, statistical, and math abilities; Exceptional problem-solving skills
Excellent communication skills
Extreme attention to detail
Ability to work as part of a team in a fast-paced environment
#LI-KR1

About Amobee
The world’s leading independent advertising platform, Amobee unifies all advertising channels—including TV, programmatic and social—across all formats and devices. We provide marketers with streamlined, advanced media planning capabilities powered by in-depth analytics and proprietary audience data. Our platform and technology, provides the most advanced advertising solutions for the convergence of digital and advanced TV— including linear TV, over the top, connected TV, and premium digital video. Enabling advertisers to plan and activate across more than 150 integrated partners, including Facebook, Instagram, Pinterest, Snapchat and Twitter.

Amobee has been named to Fortune’s Top 10 Best Workplaces in Advertising and Marketing. Amobee’s platforms have been widely recognized amongst our industry winning numerous awards in technology innovation, see all Amobee Awards. We are a wholly owned subsidiary of Singtel, one of the largest telco companies in the world, reaching over 700 million mobile subscribers in 21 countries. Amobee operates across North America, Europe, Middle East, Asia and Australia. For more information, visit amobee.com or follow @amobee

In addition to our great environment, we offer a competitive base salary, employee development programs and other comprehensive benefits. Please send a cover letter along with your resume when applying to the position of interest located at Amobee.com. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. No phone calls and no recruiting agencies, please.",3.8,Amobee,"Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,15,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,124.5,MD,3359,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1077,77,Senior Data Scientist,$95k-$154k,"Klaviyo is looking for Senior Data Scientists to join our team which is still in its early days. You'll have a big impact on our direction and how we operate. You'll be central to upfront research and shipping products that help our customers learn and grow from their data.

The ideal candidate has a background in data science, statistics and machine learning and has done work ranging from exploratory analysis to training and deploying models. We use a wide variety of data mining and machine learning algorithms. The right candidate will have both a solid fundamental understanding and deep practical experience with at least a few modeling and machine learning techniques.

You should have experience building models that are used by people to make better decisions. We're focused on shipping early and often. We prefer iterative solutions that are incrementally better to the perfect solution.

How you will make a difference:


Analyze large data sets (we're collecting billions of individual actions every month).
Build models and ship products that enable businesses to grow faster and communicate with their customers.
Democratize and open up that technology to everyone (Our background as a team is building these models for the Fortune 50).
Match the right assumptions and models to the right problem.
Measure and know what impact your models had on the decisions people made -- e.g. did they outperform the previous best model or a human decision maker?

Who You Are:


Bachelor's or advanced degree in statistics, applied mathematics, computer science or other relevant quantitative discipline, or equivalent industry experience.
Have worked in a data science role for 5+ years professionally or academically and can talk about your projects and the techniques you used.
Have a strong fundamental understanding and deep experience with at least a few machine learning algorithms (e.g. regressions, decision trees, k-means clustering, neural networks).
Understand Bayesian modeling techniques.
Are capable of analyzing data and making rigorous statements about what can or cannot be concluded.
Have experience designing and implementing model performance/validation assessments.
Have a background in statistics and understand different distributions and the conditions under which they're valid.
Know how code and have used data science tools and packages.
Have demonstrated a measurable impact based on the models you've created. It's not always easy getting a model correct and we love talking about places we got stuck and working as a team to think through ideas that could unblock us.
Have a desire to ship features powered by data science (in other words, you're excited by both upfront research and actually getting models into production at cloud scale).

Get to know Klaviyo

Klaviyo is the world's leading owned marketing platform known for accelerating revenue for online businesses using the channels they own like email, web, and mobile. Enabling companies to leverage these owned marketing channels, Klaviyo makes it easy to store, access, analyze and use transactional and behavioral data to power highly-targeted customer and prospect communications. And unlike other marketing platforms, Klaviyo doesn't force companies to compromise between advanced functionality or ease of use - so companies of all sizes are able to maximize their sales quickly. That's why over 45,000+ innovative companies like Unilever, Custom Ink and Eventbrite sell more with Klaviyo.",4.9,Klaviyo,"Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,8,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,124.5,MA,3490,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1082,82,Artificial Intelligence/Machine Learning Data Scientist,$95k-$154k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

The Aviation Safety & Analysis department is individuals with interest in applying their data science skills to deep and challenging problems in the aviation domain. We have a treasure trove of data including time series, text and sensor data and challenging problems to solve. We are seeking skills in machine learning, deep learning, text mining, big data and software/application development.

If Sklearn, pyTorch, Keras,TensorFlow, LSTM, LDA, anomaly detection, entity extraction, summarization mean something to you, we want to talk to you. You are not required to have skills in all of these but should have hands-on skill in at least one area and the ability to dive deep in the data, and learn the necessary skills to get the job done.

The candidate will work with the FAA and international customers, leveraging one of the largest repositories of aviation data to improve the capabilities, safety, and efficiency of the aviation system.

The candidate will be responsible for supporting a team of more senior AI/ML staff and Data Scientists in the following tasks:
Leveraging AI/ML techniques and solutions to identify complex patterns for predicting safety hazards
Increasing the efficiency and quality of the vulnerability discovery process by tightly integrating automated processes, AI/ML techniques and human SME/analyst expertise
Develop and prototype AI algorithms and software tools.
Enhance and maintain current analysis tools, including automation of current processes using AI/ML algorithms.
Conduct quantitative data analysis using a variety of datasets, including developing retrieval, processing, fusion, analysis, and visualization of various datasets
Develop techniques that make use of both digital flight data, text-based safety reporting, and a variety of other aviation data sets both in a silo and in a fused environment to identify potential safety vulnerabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related fields
Hands-on Software Development Skills (Python-Preferred)
Experience or educational courses/projects in Machine Learning, and/or Text Mining Algorithms.
Ability to work closely with Domain experts to develop tools/algorithms needed to answer research questions in their studies
Excellent Communication Skills (with the abilty to explain developed tools and ML algorithms to a non-technical audience)
Ability to formulate operational problems in aviation domain as technical problems that allows for reuse of leading research in the area.
Proven ability to work independently to learn new technologies, techniques, processes, languages, platforms, systems
Strong analytic, inferencing, critical thinking, and creative problem-solving skills
Self-starter with ability to work both independently and with a team

Preferred Qualifications:
1 to 2 years of relevant experience
Experience with Deep Learning Frameworks such as Keras, Tensorflow, PyTorch,Mxnet etc. Ability to apply these frameworks to real problems in the ‘time -series’ domain
Experience with interpretability of deep learning models
Big Data Skills (Hadoop, Spark, recent deep learning platforms)
Visualizations/Web Development Skills (e.g. Tableau, MEAN stack - MongoDB, ExpressJS, AngularJS, NodeJS).
Practical experience with statistical analysis
Experience with text mining tools and techniques including in areas of summarization , search (e.g. ELK Stack) , entity extraction, training set generation (e.g. Snorkel) and anomaly detection
Expert software development skills lifecycle including developing and maintain good production quality code
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,MITRE,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,124.5,VA,5495,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,0
1084,84,Sr. Data Scientist,$95k-$154k,"The Commercial Lines BI team at Woodruff Sawyer is a newly founded capability to enhance the organizations capacity in providing data-backed insights to its clients seeking P&C and liability insurance. The members of this team will work closely with the VP of Commercial Lines Business Intelligence and other enterprise stakeholders to develop and roll out analytics solutions. A successful candidate will apply data science methodologies, actuarial methods, knowledge of insurance, and the latest technological tools to create reusable business intelligence assets.

What you will be doing:

With limited guidance from the leaders, managers, or project leads:
Primarily collects, prepares and analyzes data from various sources.
Executes formal exploratory data analysis for data science projects.
Develops re-usable templates and reports for the review and feedback by other team members.
Prepares analysis summaries and provides to the colleagues and leaders.
Conducts data research and presents findings.
Identifies areas of more in-depth analysis and builds prototypes for IT implementation.
Required Qualifications:
A graduate degree in any of the quantitative disciplines, e.g., Actuarial Science, Math, Engineering, Stats, Finance, or a related discipline.
Knowledge of basic data science algorithms demonstrable through internships, coursework, or a combination.
2+ years of experience in visual analysis packages such as Tableau / Power BI.
2+ years of experience in programming using Python or R.
Skilled in developing presentations in PowerPoint or equivalent.
2+ years of work experience in an insurance or FINTECH environment as a data scientist or BI analyst. (4+ for an undergraduate).
Knowledge of common insurance terminologies. A couple of actuarial exams is a plus.
What you'll be getting from us:
The opportunity to work with sharp, motivated co-workers in a collaborative and entrepreneurial team
A flexible work schedule
A fun office in vibrant downtown San Francisco
Security for your future: Employee Stock Option Program (ESOP), 401K with company match and profit sharing
Medical, Dental and Vision benefits for employees and families (including domestic partners)
Life Insurance, short term and long-term disability benefits
Paid vacation, holiday and sick days
Tuition reimbursement
Access to an Employee Assistance Program
Fun company and team outings",4.0,Woodruff Sawyer,"San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,102,Company - Private,financial_related,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,124.5,CA,2380,1,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0
1087,87,Data Scientist,$95k-$154k,"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

As a Data Scientist you'll use your skills model and analyze a variety of data in support of analytical questions. Successful candidates in this role will be able to use theirs statistical and mathematical backgrounds to solve complex problems for not only analytical questions but also problems of large scale data. With huge volumes of data at your disposal, you'll be asked to find the most important items in a sea of information. A strong candidate is someone with a desire for continual learning and strong problem-solving, analytic and interpersonal skills who communicate and collaborate effectively.

Basic Qualifications:
Data Normalization
Data Visualization
Statistical Analysis
Graph Theory
Bachelor's degree required
Level 1:
Minimum one years' experience or a Bachelor's Degree or participating in a program that will lead to a Bachelor's Degree in an appropriate Computer Science or related field.
Level 2:
Minimum five years' experience with in-depth demonstrated experience in Computer Science or related field.
Level 3:
Minimum 10 years' experience with in-depth demonstrated experience in Computer Science or related field.
Desired Skills:
Experience with writing, compiling, and debugging a variety of programming languages
Containerization
Jupyter
Spark
Cloud Analytics
Special consideration given for the following skills:
Machine Learning
High Powered Computing
Any of a number of active Cyber Certifications including but not limited to: GPEN, GXPN, GCFE, GCFA, and OSCP.
C++
Experience with intelligence analysis skills (e.g., traffic analysis) mixed with detailed knowledge of network architectures, protocols, and communications.
SIGINT experience
Security Clearance Requirements:
Active TS/SCI with favorable polygraph

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.


Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.


Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,Novetta,"Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,8,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,124.5,MD,3516,0,data scientist,0,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1091,91,Senior Machine Learning Engineer,$95k-$154k,"SkySync is a dynamic, fast-paced, venture-backed software innovator based in the Ann Arbor tech cluster, with remote Syncopaths in all US time zones. Our quirky and unique workforce excels at managing our customers’ content migration, synchronization, and orchestration challenges like no other in our space. We are poised for rapid growth and need a Machine Learning Engineer to contribute to building a large-scale machine learning, natural language processing (NLP) system and developing our understanding of the data we encounter. This role will be a cross between an ML/NLP researcher and a software engineer, and good candidates will have prior experience doing both. We are looking for someone from the southeastern Michigan area and preference will be given to candidates within this geographic location.

You’ll be doing a lot of this:
Rapidly iterating over different techniques in a solution space, and effectively analyzing the performance of models on various tasks
Contributing to several large-scale production machine learning and natural language processing efforts
Developing and building guidelines for evaluation datasets
Understanding the decision-making process, workflows, and business and information needs of business unit heads and service manager/owners
Translating business needs into analytics/reporting requirements to support executive decisions and workflows with required information
Visualizing information and developing engaging reports on the results of experiments
Advising product teams on new products, features or updates through evidence-based recommendations
Supporting user experience specialists and information architects to enhance information visualization through the development of dashboards and user interfaces
Distributing best practices to analytics and product teams and provides consultations for their data-based experimentations
Other duties as assigned
So you should have this:
Up-to-date knowledge of machine learning, natural language processing (NLP), and data analytics tools and techniques
Strong knowledge of Python, and related machine learning tools (e.g. TensorFlow, PyTorch)
Strong experience with Docker, AWS
Familiarity with current SOTA NLP models like BERT
4+ years of work experience with Python and machine learning
Willingness and ability to learn new technologies on the job
Demonstrated ability to communicate complex results to technical and non-technical audiences
Demonstrated ability to work with minimal supervision
Experience building and deploying predictive models, web scraping, and scalable data pipelines
Master’s degree or PhD in computer science, electrical engineering, computer engineering, statistics, or related fields preferred
Ability to think critically while solving problems in a rapidly changing product
Nice to have:
Publications from ML/NLP venues such as ACL, NAACL, EMNLP, NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR

This position is a great fit for you if you like keeping up with the cutting edge of machine learning and NLP and helping build a position and product from the ground up. Knowing how to engage with new challenges daily and handle competing priorities is a must.
This position is not a great fit for you if you like established processes for every situation or a static set of duties and responsibilities.

Qualities Needed for Success
Excellent listening, writing, and professional communication skills are a must. You should be able to demonstrate proficiency in most of the duties and responsibilities listed above. In our fast-paced world, a great attitude combined with enthusiasm is key to individual success along with embodying our entrepreneurial spirit.",5.0,SkySync,"Ann Arbor, MI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,9,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,124.5,MI,3661,1,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,1,1,1,0,1
1093,93,Data Scientist,$95k-$154k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

As an early to mid-career Data Scientist, you might be wondering what makes MITRE different than other government contractors and consulting firms. Many of our recent hires answered YES to at least one of the questions below:
Are you interested in contributing to technical projects that you can feel passionate about?
Are you tired of having your performance tied to billable hours?
Do you want to work in the public interest?
Do you want to feel like your ideas are valued and you are more than just an FTE?
Are you interested in working for a company where a 40-hour week is the norm and not the exception?
Do you want exceptional benefits, including tuition reimbursement for coursework towards an advance degree in a technical discipline?
The Model-Based Analytics Department is seeking a motivated, creative Data Scientist for MITRE’s Mclean, VA or Bedford, MA locations to apply cutting edge tools and techniques to challenging problems facing the US government. This position offers the opportunity to interact directly with government leaders in a fast-paced and dynamic atmosphere with the ability to make a difference and impact outcomes with solid analysis.

Our employees are expected to work on multiple projects, cross-pollinate good ideas across the government and continuously learn. We are truly an interdisciplinary department that thrives on having a large toolbox to support data- and model-driven decision making. We value people who can bring diverse perspectives.

Our department works to solve problems in the public interest, in partnership with the government. We also actively conduct independent research in areas of interest to our government partners. Once established with a proven track record of quality delivery and consistent performance, members of our department have latitude to select projects

To be successful you will:
Be passionate about applying data analytics to real world problems.
Have an innate curiosity and interest in developing research questions and testing hypotheses with open ended tasking.
Work with a spectrum of government sponsors to gain understanding of their challenges, evaluate possible solutions and conduct insightful, actionable analyses.
Support the development and application of a variety of analytical models to sponsor challenges, with a willingness to adapt and learn.
Present results in an intuitive, actionable manner that can be understood by all sponsor audiences, regardless of technical expertise.
Work on or lead projects throughout their life cycle, including conceptualization, requirements definition, data procurement, development, integration, and socialization.
Required Qualifications

Candidates will be required to have:
Ability to obtain a DoD Secret Clearance.
Significant academic background in a quantitative field such as Operations Research, Computer Science, Mathematics, or Statistics.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Demonstrated ability to manipulate large datasets and perform calculations with at least one modern programming language like Python (utilizing packages like scikit-learn, pandas, or dask), SAS, R (utilizing packages like caret, dplyr, or data.table), Matlab, C++, or Java or a business intelligence platform like Tableau, Looker, or QlikView.
Experience visualizing multi-dimensional data using tools like Tableau, ggplot2, Plotly, matplotlib, seaborn, or D3.js.
Ability to apply, modify and formulate algorithms and processes to solve challenging problems.
Familiarity with working in cloud-based environments like Amazon Web Services, Google Cloud, or Microsoft Azure.
Demonstrated experience working on or leading customer facing engagements emphasizing data analytics.
Preferred Qualifications

Preference will be given to candidates with desired experience including:
Advanced degree in Operations Research, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or other related technical field of study.
Experience leading or conducting research.
Experience designing data science tasking and/or leading a team of data scientists.
Experience applying various machine learning approaches (e.g., random forest, neural networks, support vector machines).
Prior experience working with databases (e.g., PostgreSQL, Oracle, MySQL, MongoDB, Neo4j).
Experience using version control (e.g., Git, Mercurial, SVN) to support collaborative development.
Experience utilizing notebooks (e.g., Jupyter, R Markdown, Zepellin),
Prior experience developing interactive data visualizations using open source web technologies (e.g., Angular, Vue, React, D3.js) or other frameworks (e.g., Shiny, Plotly Dash).
Prior experience developing data-intensive full stack containerized web applications using Node.js, Flask, Django, or other technologies.
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,MITRE,"Bedford, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,124.5,MA,6589,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1095,95,Data Scientist II,$56k-$98k,"Nolij Consulting LLC is a certified Women-Owned Small Business (WOSB) that provides information technology services in test and evaluation (T&E), enterprise architecture (EA), electronic health record (EHR) modernization, infrastructure operations and maintenance (O&M), data analytics and visualization, and agile transformation. Our mission is to understand the challenges and goals of our clients, address them with innovative solutions, and work together to achieve project success. Were eager to hear from candidates like you that can join and contribute to our team.

Nolij Consulting has an opening for a Data Scientist II to join our team based in Vienna, VA.

Responsibilities:
Must be able to design, modify, develop, write and implement software programming applications.
Must be able to support and/or install software applications/operating systems.
Must be able to participate in the testing process through test reviews and analysis, test witnessing and certification of software.
Must be able to design, plan, and coordinate work teams.
Must be able to provides technical support to project team members.
Must be familiar with a variety of the field concepts, practices, and procedures.
Must be able to rely on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
Must be able to perform a variety of tasks.
Must be able to lead and direct the work of others.
Must exhibit a wide degree of creativity and latitude.
Must typically be able to report to a head of a unit/department
Requirements:
Required a bachelor's degree in science or a related area.
Required 6-8 years of experience in the field.
Note: Since this position is for a Federal Project, a candidate must possess US Citizenship to obtain Clearance.
Do you like the idea of being a driver on a team of distinction? If so, we want to hear from you. To apply, go to https://www.nolijconsulting.com/careers/

Nolij is an EEO/Affirmative Action employer and encourages all qualified applicants to apply.",4.1,Nolij Consulting,"Vienna, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,8,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,VA,1978,1,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1096,96,NLP Data Scientist,$56k-$98k,"Job Description:


Are you interested in changing the world of work? We’re building a world-class analytics team to apply data science to the soft side of how work gets done. We’re working hard, having fun, and making history; come join us!

Workhuman is seeking a Natural Language Processing (NLP) Data Scientist to join our Workhuman iQ team as a domain expert. This role focuses on analyzing unstructured data for over 37 million workplace recognition moments. This person is expected to become an expert in uncovering insights hidden in recognition moments across dozens of countries for our customers, the industry and our company.

You will apply cutting-edge AI and Machine Learning approaches to solving an enormous variety of NLP problems across several industries.  For example, you will build NLP models to accomplish outcomes such as rating sentiment, uncovering hidden bias, identify meaning behind recognition moments, and identify semantic patterns that lead to workplace outcomes (e.g., reduced turnover, increased productivity, etc).

Your work will be project-oriented, and you will often be responsible for the data findings and interpretation of results and transferring capabilities to colleagues, clients and internal product teams. You will constructively discuss your findings while always looking for the best solution.

This position will report to the NLP Manager.

**This position can be located in Framingham, MA office OR remotely

Responsibilities
Build large-scale deep learning models for Workhuman NLP product
Experiment with advanced deep learning architectures and NLP techniques to improve the performance of NLP systems
Provide support on maintaining and improving the systems and data pipelines for Workhuman NLP product
Create test sets and run evaluation on NLP systems for Workhuman products
Analyze usage data from Workhuman NLP product and run error analysis
Explore the advanced deep learning framework and infrastructure and apply it to the data generated by Workhuman products
Required skills and experience:

Master’s or PhD in computer science, computational linguistics, machine learning, artificial intelligence or related field require
2+ years of NLP experience; more specifically working within Machine Learning and Deep Learning
Experience with natural language processing and machine learning projects such as text classification, sentiment analysis, and sequence tagging
Programming skills in Python
Experience with state-of-art machine learning and natural language processing toolkits such as Sklearn, Gensim, Spacy, NLTK, etc
Experience with at least one of the deep learning toolkits, such as Tensorflow, Pytorch, Keras, etc.
Experience working with speech and/or language data
Expertise in building ontologies, taxonomies, and semantic relation frameworks
3+ years of analytics experience
Practical knowledge of data processing needs and trade-offs
Comfortable handling a high volume of work daily
Comfortable working in a fast paced, highly collaborative, dynamic work environment
Willingness to support several projects at one time, and to accept reprioritization as necessary
Strong attention to detail
Exceptional level of organization
Experience with process design and documentation
Experience communicating research findings and analysis in both written and spoken channels
The Company:


Workhuman® is the world’s fastest-growing integrated Social Recognition® and continuous performance management platform. Our human applications are shaping the future of work by helping organizations connect culture to shared purpose. With a consistent stream of gratitude fueling unparalleled, provocative workplace data and human insights, Workhuman® Cloud is a critical software engine for global companies seeking to motivate and empower their people to do the best work of their lives. Workhuman® (formerly known as Globoforce) was founded in 1999 and is co-headquartered in Framingham, Mass., and Dublin, Ireland.

Did you know:
We are #1 Great Place to Work in Ireland for the 2019 medium-sized workplace category and have been named one of the 2018 Top Places to Work in Massachusetts by the Boston Globe
Workhuman® is used by 4.5 million employees across 160 countries.
Our core values are; Respect, Determination, Innovation and Imagination
Perks & Benefits for our Happy Healthy Humans:
Comprehensive Health Plans
Fully paid parental leave (12-week maternity/4-week paternity) effective day 1
Peer-to-peer recognition program
401(k)
Tuition Reimbursement
Commuter bus from downtown Boston
On-site fitness center
Wellness rewards and reimbursements
Fully stocked kitchen (cold brew on tap - snacks and coffee machines as far as the eye can see…)
Regular celebrations for employees, families and special guests
At Workhuman, we love what we do because we’re shaping the future of work through our people and our technology. Our human cloud-based applications are helping some of the world’s leading global brands connect culture to shared purpose. The Workhuman Cloud empowers employees to thank, talk and celebrate each other, creating an environment that sparks gratitude and human connection while increasing employee engagement and productivity.

Workhuman is an Equal Opportunity Employer and is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees. We proudly provide a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. Employment decisions at Workhuman are based on solely on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Workhuman believes that diversity and inclusion among our teammates is critical to our success as a global company, and we seek to recruit, develop and retain the most talented people from a diverse candidate pool.",4.1,Workhuman,"Framingham, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,21,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,MA,6110,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,1,0,1
1098,98,Technical Data Engineer: Electrical,$56k-$98k,"PROGRAM*: Korea Country Standard Technical Order Sustainment
In this role, your primary functions would include the following:
The Technical Data Engineer II is responsible for the overall execution and day to day operation of all areas of the Korean F-15 Electrical System Country Standard Technical Orders (CSTOs)
Ensures production/development and timely/quality delivery of F-15 Electrical CSTOs
Interpret engineering data, engineering change proposals and other changes, directives and incorporate them into F-15 Electrical system CSTOs
Utilize Adobe FrameMaker, Photoshop and Distiller software to update existing and develop new CSTOs and illustrations
Develop maintenance data on new systems incorporated into the aircraft and support technical data
Interface with USAF, Customer and other contractor personnel
Help other team members during periods of peak production requirements
Continue building the technical strength of the group to support future program needs
REQUIREMENTS: *
US Citizenship
Valid DOD Secret Clearance
Possess the advanced F-15 knowledge, experience and recognized ability to be considered an expert in technical field
Possess the ability to perform tasks and oversee the efforts of junior and mid-level personnel within the technical field
Travel in support of technical data conferences, meetings, reviews, validations, verifications, and other technical data related activities when requested. Such travel may be both CONUS and OCONUS.
Familiar with U.S. Air Force (USAF) field and depot level maintenance activities, USAF technical data, material qualification and acquisition systems, and USAF maintenance policies & programs
EDUCATION/OTHER: *
Associate’s Degree or equivalent experience in a related field
Min 5 yrs technical data update experience in a related field
Min 5 yrs F-15 related experience *_or 10_* years of directly related experience with proper certifications
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
technical data: 5 years (Preferred)
F-15 related: 5 years (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location",-1.0,Ascension Global Solutions,"Warner Robins, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,GA,2206,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1100,100,Data Science Support Analyst,$56k-$98k,"Overview


JM&A Group is one of the largest independent providers of finance and insurance (F&I) products in the automotive industry. For nearly 40 years, the company has helped automobile dealers achieve unsurpassed levels of performance. JM&A Group provides more than 3,800 dealerships with a variety of products and services, such as new and used vehicle protection plans, pre-paid maintenance plans and GAP protection programs. Among JM&A Group’s competitive advantages is its robust training and consulting services for F&I professionals, and the company is actively evolving to meet consumer preferences to remain a market leader and a partner of choice.

Job Description


JM&A, a division of JM Family Enterprises, Inc., is looking for an experienced Data Science Support Analyst to join its Customer Services Admin team. The Support Analyst will partner with the Data Scientists to: support production deployment of models and web applications related to technologies developed by the Data Science team; participates in new development of web applications and restful api’s; gain exposure to production machine learning model pipelines and the design and creation of new models using statistical techniques.

Responsibilities:
Continually check metrics and validate models, compute model performance metrics.
Access, analyze, cleanse, pre-process data.
Retrieve data from multiple stores CSV/Teradata/Oracle/API/.
Train new models per specifications from Data Scientist.
Deploy new models and determine when to replace existing.
Configure Linux server web sites and update code base as needed.
Monitor web application performance and fix issues accordingly.
Configure SQLite/SQL/Mongo databases and stored queries, updating as needed.
Participate in meetings and offer ideas and solutions to present problems.
#LI-JD1

Job Requirements
Python (numpy/pandas/matplotlib/sklearn/flask)
Version control (git)
SQL and database APIs (cx_oracle, pymysql, sqlalchemy)
Cloud deployment experience (AWS, containerization) and familiarity with AWS services
Experience working in an Agile/Scrum environment
Machine Learning algorithm development experience.
Ability to learn new technologies rapidly and turn around implementations.
Excellent communication skills (both written and verbal) with ability to effectively communicate to all levels with varying degrees of technical knowledge
Critical thinking Independent problem resolution
Ability to work in a team and collaborate with others
Bachelor's Degree (Data Science, Analytics, Business, Finance, Computer Science, Engineering or related field)
2-4 years experience (candidates with a relevant Masters degree and less experience will also be considered).",4.0,JM&A Group,"Deerfield Beach, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,42,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,FL,2708,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
1101,101,Data Scientist - Risk,$56k-$98k,"Job Title: Data Scientist (Risk)

Location: Orlando, Florida

Manager: Head of Data Science

About LSQ

LSQ is a technology-driven provider of accounts receivable financing to companies who need working capital but may not be able to obtain sufficient financing from their bank. Our focus is to help businesses release the liquidity tied up in their accounts receivable. With financing from LSQ, a business can purchase more inventory, fill more orders, and take advantage of new growth opportunities. Our technology and data driven approach to providing working capital, along with our accounts receivable management services, allows our clients to driving business success.

Job Overview

LSQ is searching for a Data Scientist (Risk) to join our growing team of analytics experts. The hire will be responsible for building data driven tools to automate and scale risk decisions decision points include, fraud detection, commercial credit analysis, and invoice payment behavior. The ideal candidate is an experienced researcher and data wrangler who enjoys applying complex theories to solve real world business problems. The Data Scientist will need to collaborate effectively with both technical (engineers, data experts) and non-technical (business users) colleagues to bring the data to life.

Responsibilities of Data Scientist (Risk)
We have 20+ years of real-world commercial data weve observed businesses and their interactions with other businesses across market cycles, industries, and catastrophic events. Build risk tools that optimize for velocity and scale.
Build risk tools that optimize science & art you will work with risk experts who have been in the trenches (and learned from losses). Augment human decisions with machine.
Lay the foundation for scale. A data science framework for optimal data acquisition, model training and deployment. Dont take short-cuts. Bring quantitative and statistical rigor to your body of work.
Lead by example. You are joining a data team at ground-level. Building and inserting a data team, into a 20+ year old company (organism) will be hard, but rewarding.
Qualifications for Risk Data Scientist
Curiosity, Grit, and Humility
5+ years of experience of hands-on data science role
Previous experience of building commercial finance risk tools should be beneficial, but not required
Bachelor or Masters degree in Data Science, Operations Research, Computer Science, Industrial Engineering, Statistics, or another quantitative field
A toolkit of modern data science techniques
Experience with any data science tools/packages: Python, R, SAS, XGBoost, TensorFlow, NLTK
Experience with any big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, Data Bricks
Experience with any reporting tools: Tableau Server, Power BI, SSRS, Excel
Experience with any AWS cloud services: EC2, EMR, RDS, Redshift, Aurora, S3
Experience with any Stream-processing systems: Storm, Spark-Streaming
Position Type and Expected Hours of Work:

This is a full-time position. Days and hours of work are Monday through Friday, 8:00 a.m. to 5 p.m. Occasional evening and weekend work may be required as job duties demand.

Physical Demands:

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit and use hands to finger, handle, or feel. The employee is frequently required to reach with hands and arms and talk or hear. The employee is occasionally required to stand; walk and stoop, kneel, crouch.

Travel:

There will be minimal travel required for this position.

LSQ is an Equal Opportunity Employer that does not discriminate on the basis of actual or perceived, race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy and gender identity), sexual orientation, parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service, any other non-merit based factor or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws. Our leadership team is dedicated to this policy with respect to recruitment, hiring, placement, promotion, transfer, training, compensation, benefits, employee activities and general treatment during employment. If youd like more information about your EEO rights as an applicant under the law, please click here http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/poster.cfm",4.4,LSQ,"Orlando, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,24,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,FL,4301,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,1
1104,104,Aviation AI/ML Data Scientist,$56k-$98k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

The Aviation Safety & Analysis department is individuals with interest in applying their data science skills to deep and challenging problems in the aviation domain. We have a treasure trove of data including time series, text and sensor data and challenging problems to solve. We are seeking someone with aviation experience and skills in machine learning, deep learning, text mining, big data and software/application development.

If Sklearn, pyTorch, Keras,TensorFlow, LSTM, LDA, anomaly detection, entity extraction, and summarization mean something to you and you’ve applied them to aviation data, we want to talk to you. You are not required to have skills in all of these but should have hands-on skill in at least one area and the ability to dive deep in the data, and learn the necessary skills to get the job done.

The candidate will work with the FAA and international customers, leveraging one of the largest repositories of aviation data to improve the capabilities, safety, and efficiency of the aviation system. The candidate will be responsible for working both individually and with a team of data scientists in the following tasks:
Performing anomaly detection and capability development using a variety of aviation safety data
Leveraging AI/ML techniques and solutions to identify complex patterns for predicting safety hazards
Increasing the efficiency and quality of the vulnerability discovery process by tightly integrating automated processes, AI/ML techniques and human SME/analyst expertise
Develop and prototype AI algorithms and software tools.
Enhance and maintain current analysis tools, including automation of current processes using AI/ML algorithms.
Conduct quantitative data analysis using a variety of datasets, including developing retrieval, processing, fusion, analysis, and visualization of various datasets
Develop techniques that make use of both digital flight data, text-based safety reporting, and a variety of other aviation data sets both in a silo and in a fused environment to identify potential safety vulnerabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Demonstrable aerospace/aviation knowledge or experience, this is a must
Bachelor’s Degree in Aerospace Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related fields
Hands-on Software Development Skills (Python-Preferred)
Experience or educational courses/projects in Machine Learning, and/or Text Mining Algorithms.
Ability to work closely with domain experts to develop tools/algorithms needed to answer research questions
Excellent Communication Skills (with the ability to explain tools and ML algorithms to a non-technical audience)
Proven ability to work independently to learn new technologies, techniques, processes, languages, platforms, systems
Strong analytic, inferencing, critical thinking, and creative problem-solving skills
Self-starter with ability to work both independently and with a team
Preferred Qualifications:
5 years of relevant experience
Experience with Deep Learning Frameworks such as Keras, Tensorflow, PyTorch, Mxnet, etc. Ability to apply these frameworks to real problems in the ‘time -series’ domain
Experience with interpretability of deep learning models
Big Data Skills (Azure, Hadoop, Spark, recent deep learning platforms)
Visualizations/Web Development Skills (e.g. Tableau, D3, etc).
Practical experience with statistical analysis
Experience with text mining tools and techniques including in areas of summarization, search (e.g. ELK Stack), entity extraction, training set generation (e.g. Snorkel) and anomaly detection
Expert software development skills lifecycle including developing and maintaining good production quality code
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,MITRE,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,VA,5560,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,0
1105,105,"Data Engineer - Journeyman - Patuxent River, MD (2020-2881) Virtual Hiring Event",$56k-$98k,"Sabre Systems, Inc. Hiring Event! - Lexington Park, MD, Patuxent River, MD, and Dahlgren, VA

Event Details
Date: Tuesday, September 29, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Senior Data Scientist - Patuxent River, MD (2020-3002)

Linux Systems Administrator - Patuxent River, MD (2020-2997)

Software Engineer - Patuxent River, MD (2019-2644)

Systems Administrator - Patuxent River, MD (2020-2804)

Engineering Technician IV Fabrication - Dahlgren, VA (2020-2976)

Data Engineer - Journeyman - Patuxent River, MD (2020-2881)

Journeyman Information Security Analyst - Patuxent River, MD (2020-2908)

Intake Details:

Requirements

An active DoD secret clearance or higher is required

Candidate is required to pass a Background Investigation

Technical requirements

The interview will take place on Indeed's virtual interviewing platform. After RSVP, you will find a link in your email that will lead you directly to the virtual interview lobby during the event. Try to find a quiet place with good lighting and a stable internet connection.

What to bring to this event

An electronic copy of your resume

Specific jobs you are interested in speaking about, preferably job code (i.e. 2020-1234)

Completing our online application prior to the event is strongly encouraged and will speed up the process.

What to wear

Dress code is Casual (come as you are, but please be presentable).

About Sabre Systems, Inc.

Sabre Systems, Inc. is a quality driven, customer focused large business providing innovative solutions in the areas of Cyber, C4ISR, Business Intelligence and Data Analytics, and Enterprise Modernization to federal and civilian customers. Our mission is to ensure our customers have the technology, services, and expertise to overcome threats, maintain superiority, and quickly adapt to emerging obstacles. At Sabre, we're more than just a job - we're a team - and we care for and nurture our employees like family. If you want to be a part of creating and implementing enduring solutions that transform mission challenges into mission success – join Sabre!

Read more about us here: https://www.sabresystems.com/about-sabre/

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

The NAVAIR Digital Group leads the digital transformation of NAVAIR and works to accelerate and scale digital/analytic technologies and capabilities across the NAVAIR Enterprise as a means to increase speed in the delivery and sustainment of warfighting capability.

Selected canddiate will:

Discovers opportunities for data acquisition and sensor integration; performs systems engineering for databases and data processing systems; develops data systems, architectures and models; leverages high-performance computing infrastructures into systems architecture; recommends best architectures, tools, and technologies to address organizational needs.

Interact with the government customer, military personal and other contractors as required

Qualifications:

Bachelors degree is required is related field and (3) three to (10) years of experience
Candidate is required to pass a background Investigation
Security+ certification is required.
An active DoD secret clearance is required or higher

For the full positing, please visit: https://careers-sabresystems.icims.com/jobs/2881/data-engineer-journeyman/job",4.8,"Sabre Systems, Inc.","Lexington Park, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,31,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,MD,3551,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1106,106,Data Engineer,$56k-$98k,"Kingfisher Systems, Inc. specializes in providing a full range of Information Technology, Cybersecurity, Intelligence, and support services to the U.S. Government. Kingfisher Systems core competency is technology-enabled services, with a specific focus on national security. Since 2005, Kingfisher has established itself as a recognized and trusted mission partner whose mission is safeguarding sensitive information, operations, and programs for our Federal customers and warfighters.

Responsibilities:

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is seeking a Data Engineer to provide data flows and transformations to automate, script, visualize, and modeling subnational wealth. Day to day technical tasks include meeting with the customer to understand and refine the requirements. The candidate will use Nifi and Python to create data flows and transformations and understand the workflow of the project. They will work with the customer to implement any requested updates, move data storage to RDS, and work with security to ensure the entire system is compliant. They will compile security controls and artifacts and contribute to the Standard Operating Procedures and other related documents.

Skills Requirements:
The successful candidate should have experience with scripting in Python and using Nifi. Some knowledge of geospatial software such as ArcGIS, QGIS is preferred or willingness to learn.
Knowledge of best practices for data standards, data management, data quality.
Experience with SQL, PostGreSQL/PostGIS. Ability to communicate analysis to experts and lay persons alike.
Years of Experience: Minimum of 3 years experience.

Degree Requirement: Bachelor's degree in computer science, geography, or related field.

Minimum Clearance Requirement: Minimum Top Secret clearance with SCI Eligibility. Applicants selected will be subject to an additional security investigation and thus may have additional eligibility requirements to meet.

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, among other things, or status as a qualified individual with a disability.",4.5,Kingfisher Systems,"Falls Church, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,15,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,VA,2236,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1108,108,"Senior Data Scientist, FP&A",$56k-$98k,")TITLE

Senior Data Scientist, FP&A

LOCATION

Orrville, OH (Close proximity to Cleveland/Akron)

REPORTS TO

Vice President FP&A & U.S. Business Finance

POSITION SUMMARY

The Senior Data Scientist, FP&A role is primarily responsible for developing new analytical capabilities across FP&A (and across finance), including the design of visual, predictive, and prescriptive analysis to drive business results. This role will contribute to the identification and communication of key insights utilized by leadership and the broader finance team(s) to execute our financial strategy. The development of new financial processes, models, and visualizations will be a key component of the role. Contributions from this role directly link to the Corporate Financial Strength strategic initiative and the Finance Transformation initiative. In addition, the person in this role will be expected to connect with the Finance Technology team and broader Corporate data science initiatives in order to maintain community and develop best practices in Finance.

KEY RESPONSIBILITIES

Apply data science techniques on disparate financial data sources to simplify processes and generate insights to execute the Company’s financial strategy and initiatives
Develop financial models and predictive analytics, specifically contributing to the Company’s ability to deploy its annual plan, monthly forecast, and strategic long-range plan
Work cross functionally and engage across FP&A (Corporate, SBA, and Customer Finance teams) to elevate level of data driven insigh ts an d decision-making capabilities and present findings and assumptions to key stakeholders
Develop new capabilities including dashboards and flash reporting to support issue resolution, insight generation and decision making
Enhance financial analytical capabilities and insights effectiveness around product innovation, product margins, cost management and customer financials
Identify opportunities to leverage machine learning, text mining, driver-based planning
Collaborate with finance colleagues and business partners to ideate, identify, prioritize and deliver business opportunities
Identify new data sources , inclusive of external sources, to enhance results and unveil opportunities
Increase the capability across the finance organization by researching and sharing new analytic techniques and tools
Share analytics tools and techniques with the broader organization analytics team and business partners to enhance the organizational finance and analytics acumen
Partner with finance colleagues to present findings, assumption and recommendations to key stakeholders

SELECTION CRITERIA

Education

Bachelor's or Master’s degree in Data Analytics, Statistics, Applied Math, Computer Science, or related field
Certification in Finance a plus

Experience

4+ years in a Data Scientist / Statistician / Quantitative Analyst type role is required
Experience/deep knowledge and use of a number of these tools:
Statistical modeling/forecasting (including experience explaining statistical models and coaching on techniques)
Python or R
SQL
PowerBI, Spotfire, or Tableau
Knowledge of multiple business functional areas and financial processes
Proven ability to work independently and as part of a cross-functional team required
Leadership interactions
Ability to influence and implement change
Prior experience in financial analysis and modeling preferred
Prior experience working with financial data, systems, or statements preferred

Other

Passionately curious
Ability to “connect-the-dots” applying concepts/ideas/learnings from one project/functional group to another and/or combining ideas from several areas into a larger idea/project
Demonstrated ability of balancing and prioritizing numerous requests while providing visibility to stakeholders

IND123

#LI-123",3.2,The J. M. Smucker Company,"Orrville, OH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,123,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,OH,3825,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
1109,109,Data Scientist,$56k-$98k,"C3.ai is a leading enterprise AI software provider for accelerating digital transformation. The comprehensive and proven C3 AI Suite uses a model-driven abstraction layer to enable organizations to develop, deploy, and operate enterprise scale AI applications 40x to 100x faster than alternative approaches. www.c3.ai

As a Data Scientist, you will participate in the definition of new analytics capabilities able to provide our customers with the information they need to make proper decisions to support our customers in operating the internet of things (IoT). In addition, you will help find the appropriate machine learning / data mining algorithms to answer these questions. Finally, you will be responsible for implementing this into the product and making it available to our customers.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve similar results at large-scale.

Your Responsibilities:
Driving adoption of Deep Learning systems into next-generation of C3.ai products.
Designing and deploying Machine Learning algorithms for industrial applications such as fraud detection and predictive maintenance.
Collaborating with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields.
Applied Machine Learning experience (regression and classification, supervised, and unsupervised learning).
Strong mathematical background (linear algebra, calculus, probability and statistics).
Experience with scalable ML (MapReduce, streaming).
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team.
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference.
Excellent verbal and written communication.
Preferred
Experience with JavaScript and prototyping languages such as Python and R. Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
Knowledge in electrical engineering and cyber-physical systems is a plus.
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.) is a plus.
C3.ai provides a competitive compensation package and excellent benefits including:
Competitive salary, generous stock options, 401K, medical, dental, and vision benefits. At the office, we offer a fully stocked kitchen with catered breakfast and lunch, table tennis and pool table, free membership at our on-site gym, Friday evening social hours with food, drink and music and a fun team of great people.
C3.ai is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status.",4.5,C3.ai,"Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,11,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,CA,2849,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1111,111,Associate Data Scientist,$56k-$98k,"Job Description

As an Associate Data Scientist, you will apply modern data storage, movement, and transformation architectures and techniques to extract and engineer features from any scale structured or unstructured data in health, IT system, business processes, or external data. You will also access, cleanse, compile, and transform disparate data sets to conduct exploratory and pre-defined analyses using scientifically valid techniques and generate meaningful insights as well as assist with feasibility studies to identify data availability, quality and modeling requirements, and dependencies.

Qualifications

Basic Qualifications
Master’s Degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Analytics, Biostatistics, Applied Mathematics, Software Engineering, Data Science, or related field, or equivalent relevant work experience
At least 1 year of statistical programming and applied programming work experience
At least 1 year Data mining, quantitative analysis, and/or statistical modeling including predictive performance and algorithm optimization work experience
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with relational databases and SQL; NoSQL databases (hBase, Cassandra, MongoDB, Couch DB, Riak) and unstructured data; Spark; Pig and Avro
Experience with agile software development methodologies
Expectations
Willing to travel up to 20% of the time as needed
Must be currently residing in or willing to relocate to the Kansas City metro area",3.9,Cerner,"North Kansas City, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,41,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,MO,1445,0,data scientist,0,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,1
1113,113,Data Scientist for Detector Physics,$56k-$98k,"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311174

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Signature Science and Technology Division

Group: Detection Physics
*Job Description**
The Detection Physics Group within the National Security Directorate at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is seeking a research scientist who will focus on studies of radiation detection physics using Artificial Intelligence/ Machine Learning (AI/ML) techniques. The Detection Physics Group includes research ranging from low background and high energy fundamental particle physics to radiation detection related to non-proliferation and national security applications. This position will focus on the expanding role of AI/ML within the group. It will provide the opportunity to perform analysis of data from existing experimental setups, and to propose, develop, and demonstrate relevant techniques on new data sets for advanced applications.

Major duties and responsibilities: Contribute to the development of the analysis of a variety of types of radiation detectors and experiments. Perform, analyze, and interpret detector characterizations for detectors of interest, including semiconductor detectors, scintillators, proportional counters, silicon photomultipliers, and others. Develop a detector-physics-focused AI/ML strategy with an eye toward fostering new funding streams and research directions. Engage in research activities with the broader AI/ML community at PNNL.
*The hiring level will be determined based on the education, experience and skill set of the successful candidate based on the following:**
*Level 2:** Works on problems of moderate scope where analysis of situations or data requires a review of a variety of factors. Exercises judgment within defined procedures and practices to determine appropriate action. Builds productive internal/external working relationships. Works under general supervision. Follows established procedures. Infrequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts on routine matters.
*Level 3:** A seasoned, experienced professional with a full understanding of area of specialization; resolves a wide range of issues in creative ways. This job is the fully qualified, careeroriented, journey-level position. Independently determines and develops approach to solutions. Frequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 2 years of experience, or Masters degree with 0-2 years of experience, or PhD with 0 years of experience.

+ Programming capability with languages such as C/C++, Python, MatLab, and R.

+ Experience with ""standard"" and AI/ML data analysis techniques.

+ Experience with particle detection software and hardware.
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with at least 5 years of well-aligned prior experience or a masters degree with 3 years of relevant experience or a PhD degree with at least 1 year of experience.

+ PhD in experimental nuclear or high energy particle physics, or related fields.

+ Experience with software tools such as PyTorch, Tensorflow, and Keras.

+ Experience with data analysis and simulation packages such as ROOT, Geant4, and MCNP.

+ Implementation experience with high-performance parallel codes and/or accelerators (FPGAs/GPUs).

+ High level of motivation and ability to work with, form, and lead collaborative research teams.

+ Adaptability to thrive in a rapidly evolving, multitasked, research environment.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Detection Physics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-09-09_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-12-08_",3.8,PNNL,"Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,55,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,WA,5622,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,1
1114,114,Data Scientist,$56k-$98k,"DATA SCIENTIST JOB DESCRIPTION
We are looking to hire a highly creative Data Scientist to address data analytics challenges in our organization, to collect large volumes of data from varying sources, clean and interpret data, create solutions to overcome challenges and communicate with interested parties.

To succeed in this position; you need to be curious, creative and tech savvy.

You need to stay up to date with data programming software and apps,

have outstanding understanding of statistics and mathematics, and be

proficient in writing algorithms. Top candidates will be persistent, and

have excellent analytical and problem-solving skills.
Data Scientist Responsibilities:
Having meetings with team members regarding projects
Collecting and interpreting data
Automating and integrating processes.
Researching solutions to overcome data analytics challenges
Communicating and meeting with engineers, IT teams and other interested parties
Sharing complex ideas verbally and visually in an understandable manner with non-technical stakeholders.
Deploys solutions so that they provide actionable insights to the organization and are embedded or integrated with application systems
Supports and drives analytic efforts designed around organization’s strategic priorities and clinical/business problems
Works in a team to drive disruptive innovation, which may translate into improved quality of care, clinical outcomes, reduced costs, temporal efficiencies and process improvements.
Builds and extends our analytics portfolio supported by robust documentation
Works with autonomy to find solutions to complex problems using open source tools and in-house development
Stays abreast of state-of-the-art literature in the fields of operations research, statistical modeling, statistical process control and mathematical optimization
Creates and communicates project plans and other required project documentation and provides updates to leadership as necessary
Works with the analytics team and clinical/business stakeholders to develop pilots so that they may be tested and validated in pilot/incubator settings
Performs analysis to evaluate primary and secondary objectives from such pilots
Data Scientist Responsibilities Continued:
Assists leadership with strategies for scaling successful projects across the organization and enhances the analytics applications based on feedback from end-users and clinical/business consumers
Assists leadership with dissemination of success stories (and failures) in an effort to increase analytics literacy and adoption across the organization.
Data Scientist Requirements:
A MS or PhD degree in Applied Mathematics or Statistics preferred.
5+ years public health experience.
Advanced coursework in analysis and programming.
Experience using data visualization tools.
Experience with data querying languages, and statistical or mathematical software.
Proficient in writing algorithms, and knowing when to apply them.
Excellent understanding of statistics, multi-variable calculus and linear algebra.
Outstanding communication skills.
Ability to present and speaking in front of audiences.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $55,000.00 - $60,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Our staff is currently working from home due to COVID-19 until further notice.

Experience:
Public Health Experience: 5 years (Required)
data visualization tools & querying languages: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Master's (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",1.4,"Sickle Cell Disease Association of America, Inc.","Hanover, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,MD,3729,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
1116,116,Machine Learning Engineer,$56k-$98k,"Machine Learning Engineer

US Citizenship is required due to security clearance requirements.

Are you a motivated engineer who is passionate about embracing new challenges and solving the hardest technical problems in a team-oriented environment? Every day, the engineers at Expedition Technology work together to solve our Nations defense and intelligence challenges by using Machine Learning and Deep Learning to demystify data obtained from signals and images.

Our applied research and development mindset afford our people the opportunity to work on the most cutting-edge methods of optimizing deep learning networks, developing state-of-the-art algorithms and ultimately producing software products that are critical to our nations defense infrastructure.

The success we have already achieved has made Expedition Technology one of the top Machine Learning/Deep Learning research organizations in the Defense and Intelligence communities and we need additional intelligent, passionate, creative people to join our team.

When you join our team, youll have the opportunity to:
Dive directly into the latest computer vision and signal processing research to replicate new techniques published in academia and find ways to make those ideas work on a larger scale
Use your strong Python coding skills to research, design, develop and expand upon algorithms that will train neural networks to deliver actionable intelligence faster and more effectively
Develop deep-learning software prototypes that demonstrate potential usefulness to our customers
Analyze data from disparate sources including images, video, radar, signals and more
Brainstorm solutions to the toughest problems alongside a team of smart, creative, passionate engineers
Participate in machine learning brownbag sessions and other forms of collaborative learning to keep abreast of the constant changes in Machine and Deep Learning
Required skills:
Strong problem-solving skills combined with deep intellectual curiosity and the desire to push technical boundaries
Strong coding skills- preferably in Python, C/C++, Julia or other object-oriented language in a Linux environment
Software development skills and the desire to work on cutting edge development in a Cloud environment
Deep understanding of data structures and algorithms
Knowledge of computer vision and/or signal processing including techniques for classification and feature extraction
Excellent oral, written, presentation and communication skills
Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or related field. Advance degrees welcome
US Citizenship- Must be a US Citizen eligible to maintain a US Government security clearance
Desired skills:
Experience with deep learning frameworks like Tensorflow, PyTorch, Caffe or Keras
About Expedition Technology

At Expedition Technology, we push the boundaries of what is possible every day. Our engineers work on the most challenging problems in Computer Vision, Digital Signal Processing and Software Engineering from a Machine Learning/Deep Learning perspective and collaborate to find the answers. We are a research-focused company whose mission it is to solve our customers most pressing needs in a creative, novel manner.

Expedition Technology offers self-directed, company-paid Medical, Dental and Vision benefits and the freedom to allow you to select which benefits matter most. We offer a 401k with a generous company match, a student loan repayment program, equity shares, paid holidays, paid time off and an education reimbursement allowance. Most importantly, we offer an environment where we are encouraged to push boundaries, take risks and enjoy the rewards.

Interested in joining our team? Lets explore together.

EXP is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer that believes a diverse range of talent creates an environment that fuels creativity and innovation. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, national origin, genetic information or protected veteran status.

Powered by JazzHR",5.0,"Expedition Technology, Inc.","Herndon, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,7,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,VA,4151,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
1117,117,Senior Data Scientist,$56k-$98k,"Company Overview

Imagine if we could match patients with the treatments that prove the most effective for them . . .
GNS Healthcare applies a powerful form of AI called causal machine learning to predict which treatments and care management programs will work for which patients, improving individual patient outcomes and the health of populations while reducing the total cost of care.

Headquartered in the biotechnology and health IT center of Cambridge, MA, our patented REFS technology is based on recent breakthroughs in causal machine learning and AI that transforms massive quantities of patient data into computer models of disease at molecular, patient, and health system levels. These computer models power up solutions, products, and services that health plans, biopharmaceutical companies, health systems, and patient foundations utilize to slow disease progression, reduce adverse events and hospitalization, and improve therapeutic effectiveness. Our platforms and solutions have been validated across more than 45 diseases including oncology, cardiovascular and metabolic disease, autoimmune diseases, neurology, etc. and have appeared in over 50 peer-reviewed publications.

Position Summary

The Senior Data Scientist will join a dynamic team responsible for start-to-finish work on the analysis and interpretation of real-world datasets using GNSs powerful cloud-based analytics platform. We are looking for someone who thrives working in a fast-paced, exciting, and collaborative environment in one of the most cutting-edge industries where big data analytics meets healthcare. You will help manage real world data, as well as create and interpret data-frames for modeling and analysis. You will collaborate with our research scientists to carry out analysis projects using our proprietary, supercomputer-powered Bayesian network modeling and simulation platform, and will synthesize these results into meaningful reports for clients and product development.

Responsibilities
Collaborate with internal research teams and clients to evaluate study design, define research questions, design data frames, write statistical analysis plans/study protocols, conduct analyses, and participate in the full research process, including client presentation and publication
Communicate highly technical results and methods clearly to clients, discuss how to incorporate information into their processes, and achieve high client satisfaction
Troubleshoot with clients and internal stakeholders to refine and optimize models
Provide scientific communications to peer-reviewed journals and publications
Develop data frames of high complexity while adhering to a project-based timeline
Perform data manipulations and develop algorithms on multi-data sets that create the analytic files necessary to support analyses.
Consult on how to use data to perform predictive and causal modeling using both proprietary and off-the-shelf tools.
Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications:
Masters Degree in a quantitative discipline or equivalent practical experience
3-5 years of experience working with advanced ML techniques, probability theory, Bayesian analysis, or causal inference methods
Experience working with biomedical data/ population health data, EHR or claims data
Demonstrated experience working with programming languages R and SQL
Strong written and verbal communication; an ability to communicate technical material to non-technical audiences simply and clearly and collaborate well on a team
Strong drive for problem solving, especially around data frame construction and interpretation
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience working with large, complex, or unstructured data requiring post-processing to use effectively
Familiarity with the UNIX and cluster computing environment
Company Culture

Our philosophy at GNS is simple: we cannot transform healthcare with anything less than an all-star team. We are seeking smart, driven people who are experts in their field, have a track record of success and a passion for creating change. We believe that strong teams supercharge the performance of individuals, create a fun and dynamic workplace and great results for our clients and the people they serve.

We are passionate about our work and believe in the ability of our technology to change the world. Our core values of integrity, collaboration, value, diversity, and game-changing guide our behaviors with each other and our clients.

GNS offers competitive salaries, stock options, unlimited vacation, health, dental and vision insurance, life insurance, long-term disability, 401(k), generous parental leave, tuition reimbursement, professional development, subsidized parking and gym membership, tasty food, volunteering opportunities, social gatherings, and more.

Equal Employment Opportunity

GNS Healthcare provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, veteran status, disability, pregnancy or conditions related to pregnancy, or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, GNS Healthcare complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities.

Powered by JazzHR",3.0,GNS Healthcare,"Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,20,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,MA,5343,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
1118,118,Senior IT Data Scientist - Operations,$56k-$98k,"Job Description

Job Title: Senior IT Data Scientist - Operations

City: Lake Forest / State: Illinois

Job Description

Join Reynolds Consumer Products… a world of opportunities! At Reynolds Consumer Products, we are passionate about achieving results and have fun winning as a team! We provide amazing job opportunities for growth with competitive salaries and benefits in an exciting, dynamic, fast-paced, and fun workplace environment. Are you looking to build a strong career and make a positive impact? Then we have an opportunity for you! We currently have an opportunity for an Operations Senior Data Scientist to join our team located at our Company Headquarters in Lake Forest, IL.

Your Role:

As an Operations Senior Data Scientist, you will primarily be responsible for solving operations problems by processing and analyzing data from multiple sources to identify meaningful relationships, patterns and trends. You will prepare data insights and proposals in narrative and visual forms and leverage advanced data science methods to discover opportunities to increase equipment effectiveness, reduce costs and provide insights to plants on process disruptions. You will have the opportunity to:
Improve the manufacturing process by formulating hypotheses, conducting experiments and delivering improvements to KPIs based on findings
Maintain and tune analytical models to predict and monitor the condition of plant equipment
Influence manufacturing decision makers by presenting statistical insights
Ensure our manufacturing operations operate at peak efficiency
Ultimately, you will be a vitally important team member in our Digital Manufacturing Group and help Reynolds Consumer Products succeed by leveraging data insights.

You will love it here if…
You are not only a team-player, but you foster a collaborative team environment
You are analytic, enjoy new challenges and thrive in a fast paced manufacturing operation
You are committed to operational excellence and to keeping others safe in the workplace
We need you to have:
A strong proficiency in statistical analysis methods and tools, e.g., Python, Machine Learning
3-5 years of experience in data model development, data visualization, and application of advanced analytics to drive business outcomes
3-5 years of experience in the design and implementation of data infrastructures and data hierarchies
Experience in AWS Analytics platform
SQL query skills
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
BA/BS in Data Analytics, Engineering, Business, or a related field
Icing on the cake:
Experience developing and implementing predictive maintenance and predictive quality models
Data visualization skills in Power BI
Prior experience working in operations research or related field, e.g., Industrial Engineering or Manufacturing
For applicants or employees who are disabled, or require a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application or hiring process, you may request assistance by calling us at (847)482-3550 or email Recruitment@ReynoldsBrands.com.

No recruiter calls or emails please.

Reynolds Consumer Products is an Equal Opportunity Employer EEO AA M/F/Vet/Disability.

Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, national origin, sex, protected veteran status or disability.

Reynolds Consumer Products is an Equal Opportunity Employer that complies with the laws and regulations set forth in the following EEO is The Law Poster: http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf

The Pay Transparency Policy Statement can be found on this link:

http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/PayTransparencyNondiscrimination.html

The poster and the supplement can be found on this link.

http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/ofccpost.htm

For applicants or employees who are disabled, or require a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application or hiring process, you may request assistance by calling us at (847)482-3550 or email Recruitment@ReynoldsBrands.com.

No recruiter calls or emails please.",3.6,Reynolds Consumer Products,"Lake Forest, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,10,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,IL,4082,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1119,119,Data Engineer,$56k-$98k,"Now Hiring a Data Engineer

As a Data Engineer, you will use cutting edge cloud and data technologies to streamline services to our clients. Join our team of Data and Cloud professionals and accomplish what others only dream of. This is a remote position, but may require travel to Chevy Chase, Maryland as needed.

Profile of Success:
Work in a team using cutting edge technologies to solve challenging business problems and build solutions
Interact directly with our client(s) to understand their needs and meet, or exceed their expectations by meeting delivery deadlines
Work in an agile environment with participation in daily stand-ups/scrum
Design, write, test, troubleshoot, and document data transformations
Learn new technologies and be aware of industry standards, best practices, and trends.
Required Skills
3+ years of experience working with Scala
Hands on Programming experience in Scala with Spark for ETL
Advanced SQL skills
Possess Hive skills with HiveQL.
Experience in designing efficient and robust ETL/ELT workflows, schedulers using Oozie, and event-based triggers
Experience as a Big Data Developer
Exposure to NoSQL databases, HBase, and the Hadoop Ecosystem
Proven ability to work with clients to understand requirements and envision data ingestion solutions
Desirable Skills
Experience with the Azure storage technologies (Azure Data Lake, Azure SQL Data Warehouse, Azure SQL Database)
Knowledge of Azure data movement and transformation capabilities (Azure Data Factory, Data Lake Analytics, Data Bricks, Stream Analytics)
Knowledge of Talend ETL
Microsoft related certifications such as the MCSD/MCSE",4.5,Applied Information Sciences,"Chevy Chase, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,38,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,MD,1628,0,data engineer,0,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1120,120,Data Engineer,$56k-$98k,"Summary Description

nbkc isn’t your average bank. We take your traditional financial institution and make it better. Personal checking and savings accounts, home loans, business accounts— we do all of that. We’re cool about it, though.

We know what we offer our customers is only as good as the people behind the scenes who keep it going. That’s why we make sure you’re supported and encouraged along the way. You’ll work with awesome people in a fun and forward-thinking environment and accomplish plenty of things you’ll wanna brag about.

We are currently looking for adata engineer to join our rockstar Data Analytics team. Check out the details below.

What you’ll do

• Deploy your problem solving and modeling capabilities on one of the most data-rich industries around: finance
• Contribute to all facets of the data ecosystem (storage, pipelines, reporting, etc.)
• Work directly with key business leaders to deliver insight that has a real impact on the bank and its customers
• Play an integral role in designing and building nbkc’s data architecture
• Keep pace with the latest research and cutting-edge open source projects in the field today.
• Automate the movement of data throughout the bank
• Support the progression and maturation of nbkc into the data science space

What you’ll bring

• Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Analytics or related field
• 3+ years of work experience in data engineering, software development, data visualization or related topics
• 3+ years of experience writing production-oriented Python including major data libraries (Pandas, NumPy, etc.)
• 3+ years of experience with SQL
• A positive, self-motivated disposition and an excitement to tackle challenging problems
• Ability to communicate precisely on complex topics
• Knowledge of ETL and data warehousing best practices and processes
• Proficiency with relational and non-relational databases
• Ability to work comfortably in a Linux command line environment
• Familiarity working with cloud platforms
• Experience with git or other VCS
• Familiarity with machine learning principles

Bonus Points
• Experience building components in Microsoft Azure
• Familiarity with Microsoft Power BI or other visualization tools
• Experience with data pipelines like Luigi or AirFlow

Our Hiring Process
After our HR team reviews your application and feels you’re a potential fit we will reach out with next steps. Things move fast at nbkc bank, and we work hard to meet our candidates on their time- sometimes that’s a phone screen, video interview, or even a cup of coffee before coming in to check out our space and meet our team. We are committed to keeping you updated along the way.
Here’s what you can look forward to when you join our team:
Benefits:
• Take care of yourself and your family with our comprehensive health coverage
• Save more for your future with our 401k retirement savings plan + a sweet company match with immediate vesting.
• Enjoy 4 weeks of paid time off, 10 paid holidays, and 8 paid volunteer hours per year
• Spend time bonding with your family with paid parental leave options

Wellness:
• On-site gym facilities, personal trainer, and yoga instructor will get you moving
• On-site flu shots and health screenings make it easy to stay healthy
• Professional coaching and learning sessions help you build the career you want

Working here:
• Casual dress code and work environment let you be yourself
• Arcade games and open spaces to meet and work on every floor keep your brain moving
• Flexible schedules let you take care of what you need to in and out of the office
• Enjoy a $1000 travel voucher or an extra week of PTO for your 5-year anniversary
• Take a 4-week paid sabbatical for your 10-, 18-, and 25-year anniversaries

Awards + accolades
We’ve been named one of KC’s Best Places to Work by Glassdoor in 2019 and the KCBJ in 2017, 2018,& 2019 ( yes, that’s a three-peat)... won a Glassdoor Top-Rated CEO Award, are Health KC Platinum certified, and were nominated as one of KCBJ’s coolest office spaces in town.
Our customers love us too. All our 5-star reviews? We know that’s a direct result of our employees feeling supported, valued, and invested in everything they do at nbkc.
Needless to say... people really like working here.
And we think you will too.
Join us to find out!

Work Authorization/Sponsorship
At this time, we're not able to consider candidates needing sponsorship now or in the future or those needing work authorization for this role. (This includes students on F1-OPT, F1-CPT, J-1, etc.) However, we’d hope you continue to keep us in mind for future opportunities.

nbkc bank is an Equal Opportunity-Affirmative Action Employer– Minority/Female /
Disability / Veteran / Gender Identity / Sexual Orientation",4.7,NBKC Bank,"Kansas City, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,21,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,MO,4774,0,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1122,122,Senior Data Engineer,$56k-$98k,"Brain Corp is a San Diego-based AI company creating transformative core technology for the robotics industry. Our diverse engineering teams in Software, Hardware Design, and Embedded Systems are creating comprehensive solutions to support the builders of today's autonomous machines in successfully producing, deploying, and supporting commercial robots across industries and applications. Brain Corp is funded by the SoftBank Vision Fund and Qualcomm Ventures. For more information please visit: https://www.braincorp.com/

Position Summary:

As a member of the Software Engineering team, the Senior Data Engineer owns the definition, execution, and delivery of technical architecture for Brain Corporation's Product Analytics team. Your work will improve the quality, reliability, accuracy, and consistency of our data. You will help build project-specific data pipelines and validation tools. You will have a hands-on role with product specialists and be responsible for working with them to understand data requirements and then implement those requirements in software.

Duties and Responsibilities:
Fully own critical portions of Brain Corporation's product analytics data model.
Collaborate with stakeholders to understand needs, model tables using data warehouse best practices, and develop data pipelines to ensure the timely delivery of high-quality data.
Work with technical and product stakeholders to understand data-oriented project requirements.
Write code that is understandable, simple, and easy to maintain.
Design, implement and ensure the accuracy of validation and related services for data models.
Think and work agile, including automated testing, continuous integration and deployment.
Manage numerous requests concurrently and strategically, prioritizing when necessary.
What you need:
Bachelor's in Computer Science or other related field.
5-8+ years software development experience.
Passionate about data quality and delivering effective data to impact the business.
Experience with sourcing and modeling data from application REST-like APIs.
MPP/Cloud data warehouse solutions (Snowflake, etc).
Proficiency in SQL, experience writing ETLs.
Proficiency in JavaScript/Node.js, Python, or willingness to translate experience in equivalent language.
Things that make a difference:
Master's in Computer Science or other related field.
Experience with Kafka, AMQP or other message bus.
OpenAPI/Swagger.
Express.js, NestJS.
SAML, OKTA.
Azure experience is a plus.
Being comfortable outside of your comfort zone - explore new tech, make your own tool, or find a new way to address an old problem.
Physical Demands:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Essential functions may require maintaining the physical condition necessary for sitting, walking or standing for periods of time; operating a computer and keyboard; talk and hear at normal room levels; using hands to finger, grasp, and feel; repetitive motion; close visual acuity to prepare and analyze data and figures; transcribing; viewing a computer terminal; extensive reading; lift, push, carry, or pull up to 10 pounds.

Work Environment:

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. The noise level in the work environment is usually quiet to moderate. Employee is exposed to the typical office environment with computers, printers and telephones.",3.5,Brain Corp,"San Diego, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,11,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,CA,3677,1,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
1124,124,Aviation Data Scientist and Machine Learning Engineer,$56k-$98k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE has an immediate opening for an Aviation Data Scientist with a specialization in machine learning to be part of a dynamic team of professionals working to improve the efficiency of traffic flow management operations in the United States National Airspace System (NAS). We are looking to expand our team with someone with demonstrated technical excellence involving analysis of aviation data and the application of machine learning techniques to solving complex problems. Key Functions: The successful candidate will be part of a team conducting analyses of multiple, integrated sets of aviation, weather, and other related data to identify ways to improve predictive models, identify trends impacting operations, and apply machine learning techniques to solve complex problems. Qualifications: Preferred Qualifications: - Experience using tools such as Java, R, and Python to prepare and analyze time series data. - Coding, data modeling, simulation, and data visualization experience (e.g., Tableau). - Excellent statistical and mathematical skills. - Excellent written and verbal communications skills. - Experience with machine learning techniques and algorithm development. - Familiarity with machine learning frameworks (like TensorFlow, Keras, or PyTorch) and libraries (like scikit-learn). - Knowledge of Hadoop (e.g., Pig, Spark) or another distributed computing system. - Past experience working in the aviation domain and with aviation data. Skill is desired, but not required. Minimum Qualifications: BS in Data Science, Machine Learning, or related field of study.

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,MITRE,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,VA,3412,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,0
1125,125,Data Engineer,$56k-$98k,"About the Position


Mist, a Juniper Company, is the first vendor to bring enterprise-grade Wi-Fi, BLE and IoT together through a highly scalable cloud architecture. Our mission is to deliver personalized location-based wireless services by making Wi-Fi predictable, reliable and measurable. At Mist, we built the first AI-empowered platform to provide an unprecedented visibility into the user experience. Mist is the new global standard for many fortune 500 companies.

The mission of the Data Science team at Mist is to deliver AI driven self-driving network solution. We build analytics infrastructure, insights, models and tools, to empower our AI platform. Data Engineers on the team will be the enabler and amplifiers. This position offers limitless opportunities for an ambitious data science engineer to make an immediate and meaningful impact within a hyper growth team.

We are looking for a talented and driven individual to partner closely with data scientists, build and scale our self-driving network solution. He/she is encouraged to think out of the box and play with the latest technologies while exploring their limits. Successful candidates will have strong technical capabilities, a can-do attitude, and are highly collaborative.

Minimum Qualifications:
Fluent with Python, Java, or Scala
5+ years of experience of developing and managing streaming or batch data pipelines. Hands on experience with either one or all, Storm, Spark, Kafka and Flink .
Familiarity with cloud based platforms - AWS or GCP
Working knowledge of message queuing, stream processing, and highly scalable ‘big data’ data stores.
Highly motivated to build a great product and great codebase in a fast-paced environment
Strong communication skills with a growth and learning mindset
Preferred Qualifications:

MS in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering or other Engineering majors with 10+ years of total experience.
Knowledge and experiences of using machine learning tools such as Numpy, ScikitLearn, MLlib, Tensorflow
Juniper Networks is enrolled in E-Verify® and will be participating in E-Verify in addition to our Form I-9 process. www.dhs.gov/E-Verify
Juniper Networks is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer.",3.9,Juniper Networks,"Cupertino, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,24,Company - Public,other_industries,Telecommunications,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,CA,2226,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,0
1126,126,Machine Learning Engineer,$56k-$98k,"Machine Learning Engineer Northern, VA

Machine Learning Engineer

NuWave Solutions is seeking Machine Learning (ML) Engineers to produce automated anomaly/object detection and characterization, forecasting, optimization, and recommendation solutions to national security challenges using modular, cloud-native, API-centric approaches. These solutions will support next-generation defense and intelligence operations with a focus on incorporating machine learning insights to automate and scale analysis and improve decision support. Teams will be working in a highly collaborative environment and expected to identify opportunities to apply and improve data-driven insights and support related design and development within big data environments. Other responsibilities include:
Engage with mission owners/operators to discover applications for ML, set project expectations, define requirements, and review results
Design and develop reusable workflows for data integration, transformation, and feature engineering required to train models
Train and validate models, often in big data, distributed environments
Perform exploratory data analysis to understand data and model-derived insights
Perform model introspection to understand model behaviors and explain predictions
Visualize data and model-derived insights to communicate internally and externally
Integrate models into operational systems
Lead trade studies, analyses of alternatives, and assessments of existing systems
Develops or provides input to engineering artifacts
Requirements
Active Top-Secret clearance required
Minimum (positions are available at multiple levels of seniority) of a bachelor’s degree and 5 years of experience in a science or engineering field
Ability to describe the data assumptions and processing steps of common machine learning methods, and which methods are appropriate for a variety of use cases
Expertise with ML libraries, like Scikit-learn, Pandas, Numpy, PySpark, MXNet, MLib, and Weka
Experience with ML platforms, like KNIME, Spark, SageMaker, H2O, and TensorFlow
Familiarity with Java, Python, and SQL including related ecosystems and frameworks, like Eclipse and Jupyter Notebook
Familiarity with visualization tools, preferably Qlik, Tableau, Plotly, Kibana, Matplotlib, and QGis
Strong problem-solving skills
Strong written and oral communications skills
Able to work independently and self-identify tasks
Ability to review and maintain existing code and applications
Ability to research and evaluate new concepts and processes to improve performance
Preferred Skills
Familiarity with time series forecasting
Familiarity with distributed platforms (i.e. HBase, Kafka, Spark, NiFi) and the cloud (i.e. AWS, GCP, Azure), preferably Amazon Web Services
Familiarity with no-SQL databases like Neo4j, ElasticSearch, or Cassandra
About NuWave Solutions

NuWave Solutions is a recognized leader in providing anticipatory intelligence and advanced data analytics to the defense, intelligence, and private sectors for over 20 years. Leveraging artificial intelligence and machine learning methodologies, NuWave Solutions streamlines the Data-to-Decision lifecycle faster than traditional practices allowing clients to take action with confidence.

For more information on how NuWave Solutions supports its clients and builds upon success, please visit https://www.nuwavesolutions.com

Position Details

Locations of Positions: Reston, McLean, or Herndon, VA; Joint Base Andrews-Bolling, DC; Suitland, MD

Travel Required (CONUS/OCONUS): CONUS

If Travel is required, how much? 5%

Work Schedule: Day Shift

Authorization to work in US is required

8570 Requirements: N/A

NuWave Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Tagged as: Machine Learning Engineer",4.4,NuWave Solutions,Virginia,-1,51 to 200 Employees,21,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,VA,3773,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,0
1127,127,Data Scientist BSLEF8,$57k-$97k,"E3/Sentinel’s Homeland Security Enterprise (HSE) division is an integrated organizational entity fostering increased collaboration and synergies across the Homeland domain. HSE combines the skills and talents of over 245 (and growing) E3S employees and subcontractor staff supporting multiple components across DHS, including but not limited to: U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP), Transportation Security Administration (TSA), U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE), Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), U.S. Coast Guard (USCG), Science and Technology Directorate (S&T), Countering Weapons of Mass Destruction Office (CWMD), Federal Protective Services (FPS), and the DHS Headquarters Management Directorate. Our team provides rapid, innovative and specialized solutions that enable our HSE clients to success at meeting dynamic mission objectives.

Each day U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP) oversees the massive flow of people, capital, and products that enter and depart the United States via air, land, sea, and cyberspace. The volume and complexity of both physical and virtual border crossings require the application of “big data” solutions to promote efficient trade and travel. Further, effective “big data” solutions help CBP ensure the movement of people, capital, and products is legal, safe, and secure.
In response to this challenge, E3/Sentinel, as a trusted mission partner of CBP, seeks capable, qualified, and versatile data scientists to help lead the development and delivery of high-quality predictive modelling solutions. Successful applicants will serve as recognized subject matter experts in the application of quantitative methods, machine learning algorithms, and predictive models to address complex national and homeland security challenges. They will help our team to leverage large structured and unstructured datasets to develop and operationalize models, tools, and applications that drive optimized decision making. Project tasks include data collection, mining, data and text analytics, clustering analysis, pattern recognition and extraction, automated classification and categorization, and entity resolution to implement and enhance automated risk assessment. The products we develop provide actionable insight with real and immediate impact on the safety and security of the United States, its citizens, visitors, and economy.

Lead and perform hands-on analysis and modeling involving the creation of intervention hypotheses and experiments, assessment of data needs and available sources, determination of optimal analytical approaches, performance of exploratory data analysis, and feature generation (e.g., identification, derivation, aggregation).
Collaborate with mission stakeholders to define, frame, and scope mission challenges where big data interventions may offer important mitigations and develop robust project plans with key milestones, detailed deliverables, robust work tracking protocols, and risk mitigation strategies.
Demonstrate proficiency in extracting, cleaning, and transforming CBP transactional and mission data associated within an identified problem space to build predictive models as well as develop appropriate supporting documentation.
Leverage expert knowledge of a variety of statistical and machine learning techniques and methods to define and develop programming algorithms; train, evaluate, and deploy predictive analytics models that directly inform mission decisions.
Execute projects including those intended to identify patterns and/or anomalies in large datasets; perform automated text/data classification and categorization as well as entity recognition, resolution and extraction; and named entity matching.
Brief project management, technical design, and outcomes to both technical and non-technical audiences including senior government stakeholders throughout the model development/ project lifecycle through written as well as in-person reporting.

Bachelor’s Degree (required), Master’s or Ph.D. degree (preferred) in operations research, industrial engineering, mathematics, statistics, computer science/engineering, or other related technical fields with equivalent practical experience
Significant experience in developing machine learning models and applying advanced analytics solutions to solve complex business problems.
Proficiency with statistical software packages: SAS, SPSS Modeler, R, WEKA, or equivalent.
Experience with programming languages: R, Python, Scala, Java, SQL, or equivalent.
Experience constructing and executing queries to extract data in support of EDA and model development.
Experience with unsupervised and supervised machine learning techniques and methods.
Experience working with large-scale (e.g., terabyte and petabyte) unstructured and structured data sets and databases.
Experience performing data mining, analysis, and training set construction.
Completed CBP Background Investigation clearance (active or re-instate-able)

Experience with big data technologies (e.g., Hadoop, HIVE, HDFS, HBase, MapReduce, Spark, Kafka, Sqoop).
Proficiency with Unsupervised Machine Learning methods including Cluster Analysis (e.g., K-means, K-nearest Neighbor, Hierarchical, Deep Belief Networks, Principal Component Analysis), Segmentation, etc.
Proficiency with Supervised Machine Learning methods including Decision Trees, Support Vector Machines, Logistic Regression, Random/Rotation Forests, Categorization/Classification, Neural Nets, Bayesian Networks, etc.
Experience with pattern recognition and extraction, automated classification, categorization, and entity resolution (e.g., record linking, named-entity matching, deduplication/ disambiguation).
Experience working in a team and deploying solutions in an iterative or agile/DevOps continuous integration and delivery environment using lifecycle management methods and tools.
Experience with visualization tools and techniques (e.g., Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, Tableau, SAS Visual Analytics, PowerBI).

E3/Sentinel is an equal opportunity employer and Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (VEVRAA) federal contractor. All qualified applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, or status as a qualified individual with a disability. E3/Sentinel hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.",4.4,E3 Federal Solutions,"Alexandria, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,16,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,VA,6516,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,1
1128,128,"Senior Data Scientist, Masters Degree",$57k-$97k,"Do you enjoy designing enterprise level research and analytic frameworks? At Procter & Gamble, you will use Big Data and advanced analytics to direct the engagement of our marketing business leaders as well as collaborating actively across functional partners to accomplish various project objectives! We are looking for someone who can execute research and analytics, including data source identification, processing, model/algorithm development. Ultimately your models will result in meaningful recommendations which will drive business value creation.

You will be active in the data and algorithm development, using artificial intelligence and analytic tools (R, Python, Scala, Spark, Hadoop, KNIME, etc.) to unlock business building insights in our mountains of data. Your skills should include demonstrating such technologies for solving ad hoc business problems, innovating on potential future solutions, and working with technology partners to translate your innovations into robust, scaled, analytic solutions applied to retail problems.

At P&G, Data Scientists are Business Leaders! You should be an effective communicator, self-motivated, and able to drive insights into actions that improve P&G's business results. Your Business knowledge, interpersonal/communication skills are therefore a requirement to thrive in a multi- functional leadership team.

We need someone who is passionate about analytics. Your analytic skills are the foundation of this role. The ability to mine terabytes of data, derive impactful insights, and then translate those insights into business improving action is crucial in our work. You will need to be the primary evangelist to the business for the power of predictive analysis and develop business cases to illustrate the potential for change in decision-making that occurs when you begin to anticipate what will happen, versus just reflecting on what has occurred.

To be a good fit for the Senior Data Scientist position, you will have:

Required:
Masters Degree in degree in Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Data Science, Business Analytics, Operation Research, Software Development, or a similar quantitative field.
At least 3 years experience as a Data Scientist
Scientific Computing: R or Python
Hands on capability in applying and scaling large and complex Data Science Algorithms or Models.
Machine Learning, including Deep Learning
Preferred(at least three of the below):
Experience working with granular media data including programmatic environments, .com, search optimization, customer-relationship management.
Bayesian Analysis, Bayesian Decision Theory
Optimization (global, local, stochastic methods)
Dynamic (state-space) Models (Kalman Filter, Data Assimilation)
Model Reduction, Dimensionality Reduction
Big Data Ecosystem: Hadoop, Spark, MapReduce, SQL, Hive
High-Performance Parallel and Distributing Computing
Business Intelligence tools: such as KNIME, Tableau, Power BI
About us
We produce globally recognized brands and we grow the best business leaders in the industry. With a portfolio of trusted brands as diverse as ours, it is paramount our leaders are able to lead with courage the vast array of brands, categories and functions. We serve consumers around the world with one of the strongest portfolios of trusted, quality, leadership brands, including Always®, Ariel®, Gillette®, Head & Shoulders®, Herbal Essences®, Oral-B®, Pampers®, Pantene®, Tampax® and more. Our community includes operations in approximately 70 countries worldwide.

Visit http://www.pg.com to know more.

Our consumers are diverse and our talents - internally - mirror this diversity to best serve it. That is why we're committed to building a winning culture based on Inclusion and our ideal candidate is passionate about the same principle: you will join our daily effort of being ""in touch"" so we craft brands and products to improve the lives of the world's consumers now and in the future. We want you to inspire us with your unrivaled ideas.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, age, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, marital status, citizenship, HIV/AIDS status or any other legally protected factor.

Immigration sponsorship is not available for this role. As a general matter, Procter & Gamble does not sponsor candidates for nonimmigrant visas or permanent residency. However, Procter & Gamble may make exceptions on a discretionary basis. Any exceptions would be based on the Company's specific business needs at the time and place of recruitment as well as the particular qualifications of the individual.

Procter & Gamble participates in e-verify as required by law.

Qualified individuals will not be disadvantaged based on being unemployed.

MQualificlearly detai",4.2,Procter & Gamble,"Cincinnati, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,183,Company - Public,-1,-1,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,OH,4916,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,1
1129,129,Data Engineer,$57k-$97k,"Cadent powers the evolution of TV brand advertising. We provide marketers, agencies, operators, and media owners with data-driven solutions for buying and selling TV advertising. By connecting brands with opportunities across national inventory sourcescable, broadcast, and digital mediaour technology improves efficiencies and boosts the results of linear, addressable, and cross-screen campaigns.

Right now we are looking for a self motivated Data Engineer to join the team responsible for ingesting, processing, and distributing the data used by Cadent's data-driven business systems. This position will work directly with our Data Science, Business Intelligence and Software Development teams to produce these systems.

About you:
You have a strong aptitude for querying data sets from heterogeneous sourcesboth structured and unstructured
You have commercial experience with both distributed systems, e.g. Hadoop and Spark, cloud ecosystems like AWS and Azure, and traditional relational database systems
You have a conceptual understanding of advanced numerical programming and will be able to verbalize the story of the data in business terms.
You can easily work with a diverse team to achieve a common goal
What you will do:
Process unstructured data into a form suitable for data consumers
Create data pipelines from various data sources through the different data lake zones to make data available for query and reporting
Collaborate with data scientists on data selection, preprocessing and formatting for analysis
Collaborate with software development teams to productize analytical tool prototypes
Collaborate with business stakeholders and third parties to improve external data sources
Support business decisions with ad hoc data analysis as needed
Actively participate in architecting Cadent's Data Lake solution.
Your education and experience:
B.S. or higher in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or related field
3 years of commercial development of efficient and robust ETL and data processing workflows
2 years of commercial experience with AWS or Azure ecosystem and Spark programming
Experience with AWS S3, Glue, Athena, Lambda, EC2 desirable
3 years of commercial experience programming in a functional programming language such as Scala and/or an object-oriented programming language such as Java/C#/Python
Commercial experience with relational database management systems and SQL queries
Demonstrable analytical and quantitative numerical programming experience
Good presentation and communication skillsvisual and verbal
Experience working in both Unix/Linux and Windows environments is a plus.


If the leading edge of media technology is the place you want to be, please contact us today and let's start the conversation!

/CADENT/ is an EOE M/F/D/V. We do not work with 3rd Party Staffing Agencies.

]]>",2.9,Cadent,"Philadelphia, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,other_industries,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,PA,2840,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
1130,130,Data Scientist,$57k-$97k,"About Imperfect

Imperfect Foods was founded in 2015 with a mission to reduce food waste and build a better food system for everyone. We offer imperfect (yet delicious) produce, affordable pantry items, and quality meat and dairy. We deliver them conveniently to our customers’ doorsteps and pride ourselves on offering up to a 30% discount compared to grocery store prices. Our customers can get the healthy, seasonal produce they want alongside the grocery staples they rely on, without having to compromise their budget or values. We’re proving that doing the right thing for the planet doesn’t have to cost more, and that shopping for quality ingredients can support the people and resources that it takes to grow our favorite foods.

We're headquartered in San Francisco with operations all over the country. Check our website to see if there is an Imperfect near you!

We're looking for folks who are positive, motivated, and ready to change the world. If that sounds like you, drop us a line!

How we are protecting employees from COVID-19

At Imperfect Foods, employee health and safety is our top priority. We have implemented processes and precautions to prevent the spread of COVID-19 in our facilities. We provide gloves, masks, and hand sanitizer to all essential employees who must report to work. Before entering our warehouse, employees have their temperatures checked. In addition, we take great care to ensure frequently touched surfaces are sanitized throughout the day and all warehouses are fully sanitized weekly.

We have also implemented an Emergency Sick Leave policy providing full-time and part-time employees 2 additional weeks of paid time off and up to 26 weeks paid leave if they have a confirmed case of COVID-19.

About the Role:

We're looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join our Business Intelligence team. The ideal candidate will develop and automate algorithms that integrate with various parts of the business to better our customer understanding, improve our customer experience, and drive operational efficiency. Our Data Scientist will collaborate with departments across the company, including Marketing, Operations, and Engineering, for a wide and deep impact. Some example projects include demand forecasting to help with warehouse labor and inventory planning, optimizations to improve warehouse efficiency, personalization and recommendation algorithms to enable customers to discover relevant products, and product subscription cadence optimization. As an early member of the data science team, your role will influence the tech stack and frameworks we develop. This role requires analytical horsepower to efficiently analyze, and communication skills to tell a story with data.

If you like the idea of swimming in data, fighting food waste, and working with a cohesive and productive team, we want to hear from you!
Responsibilities:
Build production grade models on large-scale datasets by utilizing sophisticated statistical modeling, machine learning, or data mining techniques
Provide in-depth analyses and insights for strategic and business initiatives, while maintaining analytics roadmap to prioritize initiatives, communicate timelines, and ensure successful, timely completion of projects
Collaborate cross-functionally to identify impactful business problems and translate them into structured analyses, measurable insights, and reports and dashboards
Assist with the development and deployment of analytical tools and develop custom models to observe progress, uncover insights in the data, and automate analyses
Participate in code reviews and software development standard methodologies
Skills and Qualifications:
3+ years of professional experience as a data scientist, including deploying and maintaining code in a production environment
Confident with machine learning techniques and sophisticated analytics (e.g. regression, classification, clustering, time series, econometrics, mathematical optimization)
Highly skilled in SQL and Python. Experience running complex analytics in a scripting language
Bonus: experience using R and other languages
Has a solid grasp of statistical applications and methods (experimentation, probabilities)
Experience with preparing large data sets for analysis
About You:
You're able to clearly and dynamically translate data into a relevant story with initiative partners, including technical and non-technical audiences
You demonstrate intellectual curiosity, and a knack for translating information into impactful insights, with data big, small, structured, and imprecise
You have the insight to take ambiguous problems and tackle them in a structured, hypothesis-driven, data-supported way
You're a self-starter with the ability to prioritize multiple projects at once
You're passionate about our mission to eliminate food waste and create a better food system for all
Details of the Position:
Full-time exempt position reporting to the Director of Business Intelligence
Candidate can be remotely located within the US
Salary and employee stock options commensurate with experienceCompetitive benefits package including health care, paid vacation, 401K, paid parental leave, and recurring credit towards your Imperfect account!
Physical Requirements:
Sedentary work; involves sitting most of the time
Occasional movement around the office may be necessary
Regular work with computers, including keyboards, mouses, and screens
Regular use of mobile devices, including smartphones and tablets
Individuals seeking employment at Imperfect Foods are considered without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, gender, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, or sexual orientation.

U.S. E-Verify Notice: Imperfect Foods participates in E-Verify in the United States. Imperfect will provide the U.S. Social Security Administration (SSA) and, if necessary, the U.S. Department of Homeland Security (DHS), with information from each new employee's Form I-9 to confirm work authorization.",3.4,Imperfect Foods,Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,5,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,Remote,6041,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1132,132,Senior Research Statistician- Data Scientist,$57k-$97k,"Acuity is seeking a Senior Research Statistician- Data Scientist to use statistical knowledge and research skills to solve business problems. The Research Statistician will develop, implement, and interpret statistical models with a strong emphasis on data mining and statistical/predictive modeling. Provides work direction.
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Identifies and acquires additional data sources, both internal and external, that can be used to enhance analyses.
Lead the development of analytical models to drive superior business outcomes.
Develop in-depth understanding of drivers for optimization by utilizing statistics and data mining techniques.
Using latest PC tools, develop, enhance and monitor reports and models for other business areas.
Evaluate and use Data Mining Tools.
Support, train, encourage, consult other areas in the company and provide actionable information to management.
Continually monitor database information and future needs.
Explore and acquire data from outside sources.
Use database tools to support other departments
Regular and predictable attendance.
Perform other duties as assigned.
EDUCATION:
Masters/PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Economics, Operations Research or Computer Science
EXPERIENCE:
5 years P&C insurance, modelling and project leader experience. Programming skills including SAS and R.
OTHER QUALIFICATIONS:
Strong interpersonal, quantitative, problem-solving, computer and conceptual skills.
Aptitude in predictive modeling, multivariate analysis, statistical modeling, data mining techniques and mathematical statistics.
Ability to apply strong programming and data management skills.
Knowledge of and experience with at least one major computer programming language or advanced syntax in a major statistical package.
This job is classified as exempt.",4.9,Acuity Insurance,"Sheboygan, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,95,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,WI,1806,1,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
1133,133,Data Scientist,$57k-$97k,"Required Skills:

• Ph.D. (or MS with 4+ years of post MS experience) in Statistics, Mathematics, or closely related field

• 2 years of experience in using statistical or machine learning methodologies to solve research problems

• Proficiency in R and/or Python or in another high-level programming language

• Experience in developing statistical, and machine learning models

• Experience analyzing and presenting complex data and proven problem-solving abilities

• Strong publication record in leading scientific journals

• Strong organizational, interpersonal, and written communication skills

Desired Skills:

• Experience working with time-series data and forecasting is highly desired

• Experience with building data and analytics pipeline and automation is highly desired

• Drive for translating business problems into research initiatives that deliver business value

• Creativity in defining challenging exploratory projects",4.5,Envision LLC,"Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,26,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,MO,941,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1135,135,Data Scientist,$57k-$97k,"Date: Sep 8, 2020

Ericsson Inc. does not sponsor US work authorization for this job position including H-1B, O-1, L-1 and TN. Ericsson also does not hire F-1’s working on EAD for this position.

As the tech firm that created the mobile world, and with more than 54,000 patents to our name, we’ve made it our business to make a mark. When joining our team at Ericsson you are empowered to learn, lead and perform at your best, shaping the future of technology. This is a place where you're welcomed as your own perfectly unique self, and celebrated for the skills, talent, and perspective you bring to the team. Are you in?

Come, and be where it begins.

Our Exciting Opportunity!


— You get to work with an outstanding local and international team, while interacting closely with our customers

— You have the ability to influence and drive exciting, complicated projects

— You can remove barriers and address sophisticated situations with regards to technical challenges in applications development

You will


—Define how we instrument, prioritize, and store data that powers AI/ML solutions

—Design and implement scalable and durable data models for our data

—Evolve and optimize our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as, optimizing data flow and collection for multi-functional teams. You will also be responsible for integrating them with the architecture used across the company

— Support our Data Science teams, partners on data initiatives and ensure efficient data and model architecture is crafted and implemented optimally

—Develop the end-to-end automation of data pipelines, making datasets readily-consumable by the data science teams or downstream AI/ML applications

— Empower junior team members and lead by example

To be successful in the role you must have


— Have Advanced degree in Computer Science, Math, Statistics or a related discipline

— Have 2-3 years hands on experiences on building data pipeline, data models, data solutions from scratch, industry experience preferred

— Have expertise in Data Engineering and relevant technologies (e.g. Spark, Python, Kubernetes)

— Comfortable with complex SQL

— Balance the practical considerations on resources, efficiency, footprint requirement when designing a solution or architecture

— Have experience in batch and streaming data architectures like Kafka, Kinesis, Flink, Storm, Beam

— Have expertise in various types of data base structures (object storage, document or key-value stores, graph databases, column-family databases)

— Have excellent coding skills (python, Java, C++ or Scala)

— Ability to work in different time zones supporting cross geographical teams

— Understand the Data Lifecycle and concepts such as lineage, governance, privacy, retention, anonymity, etc

— Expertise in production support and troubleshooting

— Be self-directed and comfortable supporting the data engineering needs of multiple teams, systems and products.

— Excel at taking vague requirements and crystallizing them into scalable data solutions

What´s in it for you?


Here at Ericsson, our culture is built on over a century of courageous decisions. With us, you will no longer be dreaming of what the future holds – you will be redefining it. You won’t develop for the status quo, but will build what replaces it. Joining us is a way to move your career in any direction you want; with hundreds of career opportunities in locations all over the world, in a place where co-creation and collaboration are embedded into the walls. You will find yourself in a speak-up environment where empathy and humanness serve as cornerstones for how we work, and where work-life balance is a priority. Welcome to an inclusive, global company where your opportunity to make an impact is endless.

**LI-SP1


Do you believe that an organization fostering an environment of cooperation and collaboration to execute with speed creates better business value? Do you value a culture of humanness, where fact based decisions are important and our people are encouraged to speak up? Do you believe that diverse, inclusive teams drive performance and innovation? At Ericsson, we do.

DISCLAIMER: The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by employees assigned to this classification. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of employees assigned to this position. Therefore employees assigned may be required to perform additional job tasks required by the manager.

We are proud to be an EEO/AA employer M/F/Disabled/Veterans. We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse testing.

Ericsson provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, pregnancy, parental status, national origin, ethnic background, age, disability, political opinion, social status, protected veteran status, union membership or genetics information. Ericsson complies with applicable country, state and all local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location across the world in which the company has facilities. In addition, Ericsson supports the UN Guiding Principles for Business and Human Rights and the United Nations Global Compact.

This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, training and development.

Ericsson expressly prohibits any form of workplace harassment based on race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, pregnancy, parental status, national origin, ethnic background, age, disability, political opinion, social status, protected veteran status, union membership or genetic information.

Ericsson will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by Ericsson or (c) consistent with Ericssons legal duty to furnish information.

Employee Polygraph Protection Act Notice - Employers are generally prohibited from requiring or requesting any employee or job applicant to take a lie detector test, and from discharging, disciplining, or discriminating against an employee or prospective employee for refusing to take a test or for exercising other rights under the Act. For more information, visit https://www.dol.gov/whd/regs/compliance/posters/eppac.pdf.

Ericsson is an equal opportunity employer and is committed to providing reasonable accommodation for qualified disabled individuals during the application and hiring process. Ericsson will make modifications or adjustments to the job application or interview process that will enable a qualified applicant to be considered for a position. If you require an accommodation due to a disability, please contact Ericsson at hr.direct.dallas@ericsson.com or (866) 374-2272 (US) or (877) 338-9966 (Canada) for further assistance.

Primary country and city: United States (US) || || Santa Clara || ProdMgt",3.5,Ericsson-Worldwide,"Santa Clara, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,144,Company - Public,other_industries,Telecommunications,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,CA,7736,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1136,136,Sr Data Scientist,$57k-$97k,"We are looking for a Senior Data Scientist to work with one of our US-based clients, which is one of the oldest and most trusted sources of global and financial news. In addition to print news, our client owns one of the most popular websites in the world and diversified its business across a range of media including information services, book publishing, and digital real estate services.

The team will be architecting a highly-scalable platform to power data acquisition, categorization, calculations, and visualization.
You are the one if you have:
At least five years of experience working in data analysis and data mining
Experience using R and Python
Knowledge in business intelligence
Proven experience regarding data and server security and manipulating large amounts of survey data
Strong communications skills
AdTech experience is a plus
Text Mining and Sentiment Analysis is a big plus
Our Engineers bring the vision and goals of our clients to life by bringing experience and passion to the software development process. Spark Digital Engineers take pride in elegant and robust solutions that bring peace of mind to those who rely on them.

Do you bring experience and passion to your work and team? Does seeing a software product take shape and come to life make you happy? If yes, you’d fit right in at Spark Digital and we’d love to talk about the Senior Data Scientist role we’re looking to fill.",4.5,Spark Digital,"New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,9,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,NY,1415,1,data scientist,1,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
1137,137,Data Scientists with TS/SCI,$57k-$97k,"Veteran Owned Firm Seeking Data Scientists with TS/SCI to support a client in Springfield, VA

My name is Stephen Hrutka, and I am the owner of a Veteran-owned firm in Washington, DC focused on Supply Chain, Strategic Sourcing, and Technical/Cleared Recruiting.

HRUCKUS helps other Veteran Owned businesses recruit for positions across the SBA, HHS, DARPA, and other cutting-edge R&D related defense agencies.

We are looking to hire (2) data scientists to support NGA in Springfield, VA. The role is remote to start, no idea when traditional onsite will begin.

Please see below for the position description. If you’re interested, I'd be glad to provide more details about the role and further discuss your qualifications.

Thanks,

Stephen M Hrutka
Principal Consultant
www.hruckus.com

Position Tasks:
Develop Python or R code to read/categorize large amounts of unstructured data
Develop code to evaluate Intelligence Information Reports (IIRs) for metadata accuracy
Develop code that recognizes and extracts entities from IIRs w/ 90% accuracy
Visualize data derived from structuring of unstructured/semi-structured data
Brief results of code development to leadership to include methods, limitations, and assumptions
Position Deliverables:
Monthly reports
Code modules using Natural Language Processing to analyze multiple unstructured data files and database the information derived
Code modules using Entity Recognition to analyze multiple unstructured data files and identify all people, groups, and categories of objects
Code modules using Latent Semantic Indexing to analyze multiple unstructured data files and database the information derived
Develop code that can be stand-alone or incorporated into existing applications
Visualizations of large data sets, bringing forward unobscured data, and enabling personnel to understand the data quickly
Position Requirements:
Government Security Clearance
Minimum of (3) years of experience related to the following areas: parametric and non-parametric statistical methods; visualizing statistical effects in complex datasets; performing statistical data analysis in Python and/or R; providing and explaining clear analytical results in well-written reports
Ability to write and execute queries in SQL
Ability to visualize data with aid of data visualization tools such as Tableau
Bachelor’s degree in computer science or related field
Ability to work in distributed systems and to develop creative solutions to data problems
Experience with database tools
Preferred Qualifications:
Statistical Modeling: 10 years
Natural Language Processing: 5 years
Python and R: 3 years
Latent Semantic Indexing: 5 years
SQL: 3 years
Tableau: 1 year
Entity Recognition: 5 years",5.0,HRUCKUS,"Springfield, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,7,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,VA,2719,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1139,139,Aviation Data Scientist & Machine Learning Engineer,$57k-$97k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE has an immediate opening for an Aviation Data Scientist with a specialization in machine learning to be part of a dynamic team of professionals working to improve the efficiency of traffic flow management operations in the United States National Airspace System (NAS). We are looking to expand our team with someone with demonstrated technical excellence involving analysis of aviation data and the application of machine learning techniques to solving complex problems.

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,MITRE,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,VA,2306,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1140,140,Senior Data Scientist,$57k-$97k,"Formation provides personalization for the largest enterprise businesses in the world. We work with high-volume data streams and apply Data Science to bring individualized multi-step promotions to customers. Our Data Science Team is transforming the relationships between Fortune 500 companies and their customers.

You'll work in small teams with a common goal: create excellent data science solutions anchored in a culture of quality, customer focus, and growth.

As a Senior Data Scientist at Formation you will work in an agile environment to prioritize and test hypotheses using principles of rigorous experimental design. You understand that Data Science is an expansive area and no line of code is written until you have clearly defined the problem, methods, and definition of done. Your guidance on causal inference, machine learning techniques, and work prioritization will be sought by other team members. You will contribute to process documentation, and methodology design and review. You will create platform architecture specifications as you work with Engineering and Product Management to integrate Data Science processes into the product platform.

You understand that bugs, inadequate processes, and less than ideal code are part of building a startup. You welcome the challenge of solving these kind of problems while building a great product with the Data Science team.

You will report to the Manager of Data Science.

Key Responsibilities:
Work with Solution Architects and Customer Success to determine how to best apply Formation's product to client use cases
Explore and understand unfamiliar data-sets with tools such as Apache Spark and AWS Athena
Determine metrics and conduct power analysis to determine the feasibility and design of experiments
Implement processing pipelines to clean and process source data
Present experimental methodology and results to Fortune 500 clients
Work with Engineering and Product to standardize and integrate DS workflows into Formation's product
Provide mentorship and prioritization of DS work to junior Data Scientists
Skills and Experience:
Minimum 5 years experience as a Data Scientist, or 3 years experience as a Data Scientist at a startup
Proficient with the Python scientific ecosystem, Apache Spark, and SQL
Have foundational software engineering skills such as bash scripting, version control, and continuous integration
Have worked with job schedulers such as Apache Airflow
Knowledge of experimental design and analysis of results
Understand common concepts related to e-commerce, e.g. lifetime value, net incremental revenue, and churn
Machine learning proficiency with a focus on recommender systems and supervised learning techniques
Experience with optimization techniques such as constrained linear optimization and contextual bandits
Experience in customer onboarding and long-term customer engagement
Experience participating in talent screening and interviewing
About Formation:

Formation distills complex customer data into uniquely tailored experiences; we orchestrate physical and digital exchanges into one seamless journey. Our business is building lasting, trusted relationships between people and brands—and making it look easy.

We're already reaching millions of people a day, and we're just getting started. Our founding leadership is equal parts business, design, and engineering—because we believe differing perspectives + passionate discourse achieve the greatest outcomes. We give our whole selves. We love learning new things.

Formation is committed to inclusion and diversity and is an equal opportunity employer. You will receive consideration without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or veteran status.

If you're up for the challenge of a lifetime, we're looking for outstanding talent to join our team.

Benefits:

Among our many benefits:
100% medical, dental, and vision
Discretionary PTO policy in addition to 11 paid holidays per year
401K
Commuter Benefits",2.8,Formation,Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,5,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,Remote,4040,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1143,143,Data Engineer,$57k-$97k,"At Alteryx, Inc., we live for the thrill and delight that happens when we help free the world’s thinkers to innovate in new ways. As you spend half of your waking hours at work, we make sure that time is spent pushing limits and fueling remarkable business outcomes for our customers. Our culture empowers associates to make a difference every day, as they collaborate with their colleagues to implement the Alteryx platform to achieve heart-pounding, fist-pumping moments of insight, preparing the new workforce for the jobs of the future.

Overview:

As a Data Engineer on the Alteryx Data Science team, you will be part of an innovative and groundbreaking team, being primarily responsible for engineering a world class enterprise data management platform and driving continuous improvement for a world class analytics company. You will work closely with data architects, other data engineers, data scientists, and line of business associates to build out new system features/functionality and help bring thoughtfully curated data system and products to the Alteryx organization. Success in this role is critical to our mission of becoming a world-class Data Science team and fostering Alteryx’s Data Science journey!
** The company will not provide sponsorship for work visas or other employment authorization for this position. ***
Position details/requirements:

Build, test, monitor and maintain a highly scalable data management ecosystem
Execute architected techniques and solutions for data collection, management and usage
Take business requirements and produce data sets for efficient cross-business analysis
Extreme focus on detail and data quality validation
Deep interest in the data and analytics market with ability to constantly evaluate new ways to enhance the telemetry system and train it to be smarter and more scalable

Qualifications:

3+ years of data engineering / development / integration experience
Experience with SQL required
Experience with Alteryx platform preferred, but not required
Experience with Enterprise Data Warehouse development and ETL processes
Knowledge of at least one modern scripting language (Python, R, etc.)
Understanding of cloud infrastructure
Experience with automated software testing and deployment
Ability to work with geographically distributed teams
Ability to work with other teams across an organization
Strong oral and written communication
BA/BS degree in Information Science, Data Analytics, Computer Science, Software Engineering or related technical field

#LI-JE1",3.5,"Alteryx, Inc.","Ann Arbor, MI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,23,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,MI,2531,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
1146,146,Machine Learning Engineer,$57k-$97k,"Description

Job Description:

Leidos is a Fortune 500™ company aimed at embracing and solving some of the world’s most pressing challenges. Through science and technology, Leidos makes the world safer, healthier and more efficient.

Our Civil Group offers an array of exciting career opportunities for the best IT, energy, logistics and engineering professionals. Driven by our talented workforce, the Security Detection & Automation Operation is the cornerstone of Leidos’ comprehensive suite of fully integrated security detection and automation solutions for aviation, ports and borders, and critical infrastructure customers around the world, with more than 24,000 products deployed across 120 countries. Leidos is positioned to address emerging and evolving threats through rapid development of innovative solutions for our global customers. Leidos’ SDA Operation, in conjunction with the TSA, also performs on-call, onsite installation servicing of X- Ray Detection Equipment using leading edge technology to ensure the safety of our clients, customer and passengers. The Security Detection and Automation Operation is comprised of four divisions to align with our customers’ missions and needs:

· Checkpoint

· Hold Baggage

· Ports & Borders

· General Automation

We are seeking a motivated and talented machine learning engineer to join an algorithm development team and participate with hands-on contributions to advanced detection and computer vision algorithms, and supporting software infrastructure.

A successful candidate will apply strong software development skills with knowledge of machine learning, deep learning, and computer vision to contribute to the development of advanced algorithms for next-generation threat detection security systems. The candidate will collaborate with team members to propose and implement improvements to algorithms and supporting software, tools, and compute infrastructure.

Responsibilities will include

Contributing to a team that is developing object detection and image processing system architectures that will be implemented in real-time decisioning processes in security screening systems fielded across the world
Hands on development of advanced machine learning, object detection, image processing, and computer vision algorithms
Development of machine learning software infrastructure to support algorithm development, visualization, and evaluation.

Education:

BS in Computer Science or a related field
Masters degree preferred

Required Qualifications

Minimum 6 years software development experience
Minimum 3 years experience developing machine learning algorithms and supporting software infrastructure
Proficient with Linux
Proficient with Python and Scientific Python Libraries
Proficient with PyTorch or similar deep learning framework
Familiarity with deep neural network architectures and concepts

Desirable Experience

Experienced with algorithm performance evaluation and optimization
Proficient with C++
Experienced with NVIDIA CUDA development
Experienced creating data visualizations using QT and OpenGL frameworks

Leidos is growing! Connect with us on LinkedIn and Facebook. We value and support the well-being and mobility of our employees with competitive benefit packages, complementary e-learning training, work-life flexibility, an exciting External Referral Program, and a diverse, inclusive and ethical work place. In fact, in 2020, Leidos was ranked as one of the “World's Most Ethical Companies” by the Ethisphere Institute for the third consecutive year.

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
None

Travel:
Yes, 10% of the time

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Software Engineering

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world's toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company's 33,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Virginia, Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $10.19 billion for the fiscal year ended December 28, 2018. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.6,Leidos,"Saint Petersburg, FL",-1,10000+ Employees,51,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,FL,5566,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,1
1147,147,Data Scientist in Artificial Intelligence - Intermediate,$57k-$97k,"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311093

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing and Analytics

Group: Data Sciences and Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and deep learning research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to geo-spatial analytics, AI assurance, adversarial machine learning, human language technologies, computer vision, disaster response and recovery, health security, and other related fields.

The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as geospatial intelligence, natural language processing, few-shot learning, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery.

+ Publication record in scientific conferences such as NIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelor's degree with 2 years of experience, a Masters degree with 0-2 years of experience, or a PhD with 0 years of experience is required.
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Computation and Information Sciences_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",3.8,Pacific Northwest National Laboratory,"Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,55,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,WA,5339,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,1
1149,149,Principal Data Scientist,$57k-$97k,"You will integrate disparate EHR, clinical, claims, and other medical data sources, extracting consistent information across ontologies, and deriving insights from disparate data sources to allow experts to rapidly understand the meaning, applicability, and extensibility of results from observational and randomized clinical experimentation. You will build ML tools for anomaly-tracking to enable rapid, more effective clinical trialing and the integration of data sources throughout the life sciences. You will model the trajectory of disease across patient populations to identify key opportunities and indications and to rapidly test and develop candidate medicines.
You will map and optimize the complex interrelationships of pharma companies, drug manufacturers, pharmacy benefit managers, payors, and patients to drive EQRx’s strategy to dramatically lower drug prices while promoting equity and access. You will use novel computational techniques to design, refine, and select novel drug candidates. Using the tools of modern data science and machine learning, you will help to build a data driven, end-to-end digital native life sciences company, enabling our core mission of rapid, equal, and equitable access to medicines.
The Impact You'll Have
You will help to radically lower drug prices and expand access, by identifying novel opportunities for partnerships and delivery across the complex web of interrelationships that bring drugs from pharma companies to patients. You will speed the development and trialing of novel medicines through the unification, comprehension, and modelling of human health and disease across data sources. You will drive the adoption of machine learning for the improvement of human health in building a radically different, digital-native and data-first life sciences company, where we bootstrap our way to rapid increases in scale and efficacy across functions. You will enable experts across EQRx to see further, connecting data from biology and chemistry, to the clinic and patients, to drug pricing and delivery, powering a novel, modern paradigm in drug development.
Your Superpowers
You have 5+ years of experience in data science in the life science/healthcare industry.
You have a PhD (preferred) or Masters (with 3+ additional years exp) in a quantitative scientific field such as physics, computational biology, chemistry, engineering, etc.
You are fluent in python (strongly preferred) or R and cloud native data science.
You thrive working with messy and complex data, understanding key nuances behind its generation and able to model them with quantitative and machine learning tools to achieve understanding.
You are an excellent communicator, able to translate complex analyses into insightful visuals and presentations for audiences with a wide range of technical backgrounds.
You are empathetic with end users; proficient at turning business and scientific questions into testable, clean, and reproducible data scientific workflows.
You have a quick, flexible mind, able to rapidly learn new fields and use data science and machine learning to improve decision making and workflows.
You are an avid reader of the literature; excited to try novel tools and techniques to solve problems.
EQRx is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",5.0,EQRx,"Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,MA,3546,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,1,0,1
1150,150,Data Engineer - RPA,$57k-$97k,"BRMi Technology is seeking a Data Engineer - ETL/PEGA to support a large client in the Northern Virginia area. This data engineer will be responsible for supporting Information System Division and the enterprise to deliver a personalized member experience, unify inbound and outbound member marketing, orchestrating experiences across channels, and make our clients marketers & ISD more efficient. The PEGA implementation will help streamline disjointed and manual campaign development processes.

The Data Engineer will support the ETL development for feeding Pega cloud application with 700+ member and account data elements.

Required:

• Extensive experience in engineering and designing data integration and delivery solutions using Informatica Power Center, SQL, and Unix /Shell scripts.
• Experience with SSIS in Azure Cloud is a huge plus.
• Experience with Azure Data Factory.
• Experience with Azure Data Factory and Data Bricks.
• Excellent written and oral communication skills
• Hands-on experience creating automated data integration applications using data models, data mappings and business rules specifications, to load data warehouses, operational data stores, data marts, and data lakes while programmatically handling exceptions including late arriving, missing, or erroneous data.
Desired:

• Experience using Informatica PowerExchange CDC
• Ability to interpret complex mainframe copybooks, XML data feeds
• Experience configuring and using APIs
• Proficient in the data ingestion pipeline process, exception handling, and metadata management on Hadoop platforms.
• Advanced degree in MIS, computer science, statistics, marketing, management, finance or related field
• Experience providing technical and data leadership to the application development terms, IT and the enterprise.
• Prior experience in the Financial Industries and large banks
** BRMi will not sponsor applicants for work visas for this position.**
**This is a W2 opportunity only**
EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disabled
We are an equal opportunity employer that values diversity and commitment at all levels. All individuals, regardless of personal characteristics, are encouraged to apply. Employment policies and decisions on employment and promotion are based on merit, qualifications, performance, and business needs. The decisions and criteria governing the employment relationship with all employees are made in a nondiscriminatory manner, without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, marital status, physical or mental disability, medical condition, veteran status, or any other factor determined to be unlawful by federal, state, or local statutes.",4.3,BRMi,"Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,16,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,VA,2668,0,data engineer,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1152,152,Data Engineer Virtual Hiring Event,$57k-$97k,"LMI Hiring Event!

Event Details
Date: Wednesday, September 30, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Data Engineer

Data Scientist

Software Engineer

Network Engineer

Information Security Analyst

Intake Details:

Requirements

Active US Secret Clearance (or above)

Technical requirements

The interview will take place on Indeed’s virtual interviewing platform. After RSVP, you will find a link in your email that will lead you directly to the virtual interview lobby during the event. Try to find a quiet place with good lighting and a stable internet connection.

What to bring to this event

An electronic copy of your resume

Completing our online application prior to the event is strongly encouraged and will speed up the process.

What to wear

Dress code is Casual (come as you are, but please be presentable).

About LMI

LMI is a consultancy dedicated to powering a future-ready, high-performing government, drawing from expertise in digital and analytic solutions, logistics, and management advisory services. We deliver integrated capabilities that incorporate emerging technologies and are tailored to customers' unique mission needs, backed by objective research and data analysis. Founded in 1961 to help the Department of Defense resolve complex logistics management challenges, LMI continues to enable growth and transformation, enhance operational readiness and resiliency, and ensure mission success for federal civilian and defense agencies.

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

Bachelor’s degree with a major in analytical (e.g., engineering, statistics, mathematics, information technology, etc.) or social science discipline is preferred.
Must have at least 5-10 years of experience, preferably with a federal government customer.
Must have at least 5-10 years of experience building data pipelines.
Must have knowledge of standard data modeling tools (e.g., ERWin, ER Studio) and SQL.
Must possess an active Secret clearance or higher
Experience with business process engineering, change management, and/or systems engineering is desired.",4.2,LMI,"Baltimore, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,59,Nonprofit Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,MD,2326,0,data engineer,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1153,153,Data Scientist,$57k-$97k,"Company Description:

Quartet is a pioneering healthcare technology company striving to improve the lives of people with mental health conditions. We connect people to a personalized care team to get them the right care at the right time. Our collaborative technology platform and range of services brings together physicians, mental health providers, and insurance companies to effectively improve patient outcomes and drive down healthcare costs. Backed by $153MM in venture funding from top investors like Oak HC/FT, GV (formerly Google Ventures), F-Prime Capital Partners, Polaris Partners, Centene Corporation and Echo Ventures. Quartet is headquartered in NYC and is currently operating in several markets across the United States Pennsylvania, Washington, Northern California, New Jersey, North Carolina, Louisiana, and Illinois.

About the team & opportunity:

As a Data Scientist at Quartet, you will work on a range of projects -- developing statistical analyses to study impact of Quartet interventions; predicting mental health needs among populations; building machine learning models to suggest timely and appropriate behavioral health care interventions for patients. You'll develop a deep understanding of Quartet interventions and the predictive models and algorithms.

You will design and develop effective models, features, and algorithms involving multiple datasets, including user activity, Electronic Health Records (EHR), admissions, discharges and transfers (ADT), medical claims, pharmacy claims, and lab test claims. Leverages knowledge of computer science, machine learning, data mining and software architecture to build high-quality data products. Supports the design of Quartet products, including: an entity resolution and de-duplication library for linking patients and providers data, which is collected from multiple sources; a machine learning application for the detection of opioid use disorder in patients using supervised learning and deep learning; and an optical mark recognition (OMR) computer vision application for transcribing paper assessments.

Accountabilities:
Research and develop machine-learning and statistical models in Quartet Health's platform to improve software personalization and recommendations for users
Drives a data-informed process for experimenting with new products to improve patient outcomes and operational efficiency.
Performing ML research, exploratory data analysis, and computer-vision modeling; developing model evaluation and online maintenance methodologies, including confidence estimation, calibration, and concept drift
Develop general-purpose frameworks to support machine learning applications in production.
Minimum Qualifications:
2-3 years experience as a data scientist.
Formal training in statistics and computer science.
Knowledge of mathematical fundamentals: probability theory, linear algebra and statistics.
Strong data transformation and extraction skills with SQL databases.
Strong statistical programming skills in both Python and R.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with Amazon Web Services infrastructure.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with Linux command line.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with git for version control.
Ability to work on projects from initial to final phase- beginning by defining a problem, developing an implementation plan, and overseeing deployment and maintenance.
Ability to clearly communicate across disciplines and work collaboratively.
Experience with any of the following: Docker, TensorFlow, Keras, Numpy, Scipy, Pandas, Gensim, Scikit-learn, NLKT, Jupyter
Employee Benefits for Quartet include: Unlimited vacation, volunteer opportunities, team events, mental healthcare coverage of 15 free therapy sessions + unlimited copay reimbursements, medical, dental + vision coverage, generous parental and military leave, commuter benefits, 401K, and stock option grants.

Want to know what Quartet life is like? Click here to meet our team.

Quartet is committed to building a diverse team and fostering an inclusive culture, and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We embrace and encourage our employees' differences in race, religion, color, national origin, gender, family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, veteran status, disability, pregnancy, medical conditions, and other characteristics. Headhunters and recruitment agencies may not submit resumes/CVs through this Web site or directly to managers. Quartet does not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes. Quartet will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with Quartet.

Please note: Quartet interview requests and job offers only originate from quartethealth.com email addresses (e.g. jsmith@quartethealth.com). Quartet will also never ask for bank information (e.g. account and routing number), social security numbers, passwords, or other sensitive information to be delivered via email. If you receive a scam email or wish to report a security issue involving Quartet, please notify us at: security@quartethealth.com.

Have someone to refer? Email talent@quartethealth.com to submit their details to us.",3.9,Quartet Health,"New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,6,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,NY,5176,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
1154,154,Data Scientist,$57k-$97k,"POSITION SUMMARY:

The Data Scientist is a highly motivated and experienced individual who likes to work in a multi-disciplinary team. The Data Scientist will be instrumental in the analysis and interpretation of high-throughput molecular data. Additionally, the individual in this role should have solid Data Science background and be strongly goal-oriented with a focus on real-world impact.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Statistical and bioinformatics analyses of high-throughput molecular data
Interaction with internal and external collaborators to understand, design, and develop the requested solutions
Development and execution of data analysis protocols to support the company's discovery pipeline
Presentation of scientific results internally and externally
Preparation and submission of scientific manuscripts for review and publication
Other duties as assigned
REQUIREMENTS:
Requires a Ph.D. in Bioinformatics, Statistics, Applied Math, Computer Sciences or related field with 0-3 years of experience; or an MS with 5-7 years of industry experience
Proficiency in R is required. Experience in Bioconductor is preferred
Experience in Linux and Big Data technologies
Experience in Scala, C, Python and MySQL is a plus
Experience in working with Graph Neural Networks (GNNs) is a plus
Proven ability to find creative and practical solutions to complex problems
Proven experience in applying Data Science methodologies to extract, process, and transform data from multiple sources
Proven ability to deliver outputs in a comprehensive format that highlights major trends, avoid miss-interpretations and value the conclusions
Proven ability to demonstrate attention to detail and record-keeping
Quick learner, extremely flexible and adaptable to the needs of internal collaborators in a dynamic environment
Ability to efficiently work in multiple projects
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills
Must be able to work in a team-oriented environment",4.0,Berg Health,"Framingham, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,14,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,MA,1972,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1158,158,Machine Learning Engineer,$57k-$97k,"Description
This role will be part of our Applied Data Team and will be responsible for providing Machine Learning Engineering support.
Tasks & responsibilities required of this role include but are not limited to:
Construct machine learning models including data collection, normalization, and standardization, data pipeline construction, model selection and hyperparameter tuning, working ml systems that can add new data into ml model.
Create apps to present ml models and host them in the cloud or locally.
Create pipelines to query and retrieve and update data for existing applications to keep them updated
Supervise the scaling and management of the machine learning modeling ecosystem
Find orthogonal data sets to supplement models and increase alpha
Stay abreast of new technology and machine learning methodologies and implement them into the model building architecture
Work alongside (re)insurance domain experts to improve predictive aspects of their lines of business
Requirements:
3+ years of demonstrative excellence in building, scaling, and productizing machine learning models
Experience working with sparse, high dimensional, and time series data
Python ml stack
Experience dealing with imbalanced classes
Deep Learning Architectures
ML Optimization Techniques
Cloud Services: Azure, AWS, Google Cloud
Distributed systems: Hadoop, MapReduce, Spark
Databricks
Ensemble Stacking and Meta Learners
Classification and Regression Metrics
Regularization Methods
Version Control
Quant trading experience welcome but not required
Kaggle ranking of expert or higher a plus",3.6,TransRe,"New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,43,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,77.0,NY,1583,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1159,159,Senior Data Scientist,$89k-$149k,"The Senior Data Scientist independently develops statistical models that will enable future growth and profitability for our book of business through appropriate pricing and underwriting of risk. He/she is responsible for the formulation of statistical models and direct application of models to address insurance business issues. You will start your Senior Data Scientist role at home and then transition to working in our Woodbridge, NJ office when it reopens.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities
Produces complex predictive models which enable the creation of rating plans and evaluation of risk and profitability.
Develops studies that evaluate new business models for customer retention and growth initiatives as well as estimate the lifetime value of customer segments.
Identifies drivers of insurance costs, understanding the economics of customers’ behavior and estimating the expected losses for segments of risks using advanced statistical and analytical techniques on large data sets.
Develop or participate in the development of the overall analytical framework to support the company’s strategy for growth
Communicates analysis, strategy and recommendations to diverse audiences, including technical and non-technical.
Collaborates with upper management to assess the potential effects of proposed solutions and incorporates these considerations into recommendations.
Manages projects of high complexity.
Perform other job-related duties as assigned.
Advanced skills and training in predictive modeling, data mining and other quantitative and research analytics (Non-Linear Regression Analysis, Multivariate Analysis, Bayesian Methods, Generalized Linear Models, Decision Trees, Non Parametric estimations, etc.).
Ability to apply various predictive modeling techniques to develop solutions to various real-world problems.
Hands-on experience developing and delivering structured, methodology projects.
Exceptional programming ability in SAS, SQL, R or other programming languages.
Excellent written and oral communication and presentation skills.
In-depth understanding of database principles and experience working with large databases.
Ability to influence and guide across departmental boundaries.
Qualifications and Education
3 or more years of experience developing and implementing multivariate predictive models using GLM and other statistical methods. PhD in economics, statistics, or related field required.
Or in the alternative, a Master’s degree in Statistics, Engineering, Mathematics, Economics, or a related field (foreign educational equivalent accepted) and five (5) years of experience as indicated above.
High level of organizational and project management experience handling multiple projects simultaneously
About the Company
The Plymouth Rock Company and its affiliated group of companies write and manage over $1.4 billion in personal and commercial auto and homeowner’s insurance throughout the Northeast and mid-Atlantic, where we have built an unparalleled reputation for service. We continuously invest in technology, our employees thrive in our empowering environment, and our customers are among the most loyal in the industry. The Plymouth Rock group of companies employs more than 1,800 people and is headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts. Plymouth Rock Assurance Corporation holds an A.M. Best rating of “A-/Excellent”.",3.6,Plymouth Rock Assurance,"Woodbridge, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,38,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,119.0,NJ,3371,1,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
1160,160,Data Scientist for Detector Physics,$89k-$149k,"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311174

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Signature Science and Technology Division

Group: Detection Physics
*Job Description**
The Detection Physics Group within the National Security Directorate at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is seeking a research scientist who will focus on studies of radiation detection physics using Artificial Intelligence/ Machine Learning (AI/ML) techniques. The Detection Physics Group includes research ranging from low background and high energy fundamental particle physics to radiation detection related to non-proliferation and national security applications. This position will focus on the expanding role of AI/ML within the group. It will provide the opportunity to perform analysis of data from existing experimental setups, and to propose, develop, and demonstrate relevant techniques on new data sets for advanced applications.

Major duties and responsibilities: Contribute to the development of the analysis of a variety of types of radiation detectors and experiments. Perform, analyze, and interpret detector characterizations for detectors of interest, including semiconductor detectors, scintillators, proportional counters, silicon photomultipliers, and others. Develop a detector-physics-focused AI/ML strategy with an eye toward fostering new funding streams and research directions. Engage in research activities with the broader AI/ML community at PNNL.
*The hiring level will be determined based on the education, experience and skill set of the successful candidate based on the following:**
*Level 2:** Works on problems of moderate scope where analysis of situations or data requires a review of a variety of factors. Exercises judgment within defined procedures and practices to determine appropriate action. Builds productive internal/external working relationships. Works under general supervision. Follows established procedures. Infrequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts on routine matters.
*Level 3:** A seasoned, experienced professional with a full understanding of area of specialization; resolves a wide range of issues in creative ways. This job is the fully qualified, careeroriented, journey-level position. Independently determines and develops approach to solutions. Frequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 2 years of experience, or Masters degree with 0-2 years of experience, or PhD with 0 years of experience.

+ Programming capability with languages such as C/C++, Python, MatLab, and R.

+ Experience with ""standard"" and AI/ML data analysis techniques.

+ Experience with particle detection software and hardware.
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with at least 5 years of well-aligned prior experience or a masters degree with 3 years of relevant experience or a PhD degree with at least 1 year of experience.

+ PhD in experimental nuclear or high energy particle physics, or related fields.

+ Experience with software tools such as PyTorch, Tensorflow, and Keras.

+ Experience with data analysis and simulation packages such as ROOT, Geant4, and MCNP.

+ Implementation experience with high-performance parallel codes and/or accelerators (FPGAs/GPUs).

+ High level of motivation and ability to work with, form, and lead collaborative research teams.

+ Adaptability to thrive in a rapidly evolving, multitasked, research environment.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Detection Physics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-09-09_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-12-08_",3.8,PNNL,"Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,55,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,119.0,WA,5622,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,1
1161,161,Data Scientist,$89k-$149k,"Entefy’s Senior Data Scientist is a highly visible position both internally and externally. Join the intelligence revolution, where we can push the state-of-the-art boundaries of data science. This is where deep experience and multi-dimensional insights intersect with an amazing opportunity to shape the future of productivity for people everywhere.

Skills and Experience:

We’re not looking for “good.” Entefy is on a mission to find exceptional talent. The success of our mission depends on our team’s ability to be creatively analytical, insatiably curious, and absolutely fearless in tackling big challenges.
Requirements
Master's degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, or a compatible field. PhD is preferred.
3+ years of applicable work experience.
Demonstrable proficiency in Python, Scala, SQL, or R.
Strong data visualization and reporting skills.
Proven track record delivering high-value, advanced analytics.
Experience leading the work of other data scientists or analysts is preferred.
World-class ability to extract and communicate insights from real-world datasets.
Startup agility and versatility.
Visit www.entefy.com and www.blog.entefy.com.",4.3,Entefy,"Palo Alto, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,8,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,119.0,CA,1188,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
1164,164,Data Scientist- Streetsboro Ohio Office,$89k-$149k,"The Step2 Company is the largest American manufacturer of preschool and toddler toys and one of the world’s largest rotational molders of plastics. It’s our mission to be the leading innovator of children's products that build imaginations and enrich the family's celebration of childhood.

Step2 proudly employs moms, dads, grandparents, aunts, uncles and everyone in between. We offer an environment of fun and hard work. Our mission of bringing families together isn’t just for our customers. The Step2 family starts with our employees and we’re excited that you’re interested in joining our team!

PRIMARY FUNCTION: Reporting to the IT Director, and in close collaboration FP&A, the Data Scientist will support our product, sales, operations, and marketing teams with insights gained from analyzing company data. The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. They must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. They must have a proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights. They must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams. The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

SPECIFIC DUTIES/ACCOUNTABILITIES:
Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis
Keep up-to-date with latest technology trends
Communicate results and ideas to key decision makers
Implement new statistical or other mathematical methodologies as needed for specific models or analysis
Optimize joint development efforts through appropriate database use and project design
Functions as Oracle subject matter expert and ensures end users are properly trained to use system and reports appropriately; troubleshoots issues.
Serves as the System Administrator for the Daily Operating System (D.O.S.) Report and supporting network.
Ensures functionality and accuracy of reports which make up the D.O.S. report (i.e. Mold Placement Master, Mold Placement Report, Attendance Rosters).
Keeps D.O.S. supporting data updated (i.e. labor standards, NSP pricing, tooling information, goals, etc.)
Data mines and analyzes data from Oracle to provide user-friendly ad-hoc reports as request by various departments and upper level management.
Design and create a data repository to achieve the above objectives
BASIC QUALIFICATIONS:
5-7 years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models, a degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field.
Experience working with and creating data architectures.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across teams.
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques.
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Google Analytics, Site Catalyst, Adwords, Content Analytics, Facebook Insights, etc.


ADDITIONAL QUALIFICATIONS:
Excellent project management skills
Ability to explain complex issues clearly and succinctly
Effectively summarizes and communicates results
Ability to forecast potential problems and pitfalls
What are the perks?
· Parental Leave
· 401k with Employer Match
· Tuition Assistance
· Company Paid Life& Disability Insurance
· Adoption Assistance
· Medical, Dental and Vision
· Premium FREE Medical Plan
· Employee Discount
· 10 Paid Holidays
· Advancement Opportunities
Join our family!

Apply today or text Step2Jobs to 97211 to connect with a recruiter.

Step2 is an Equal Opportunity Employer



Step2 is an Equal Opportunity Employer",3.3,Step2,"Streetsboro, OH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,29,Company - Private,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,119.0,OH,4210,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
1167,167,Data Scientist,$89k-$149k,"Description

SAIC is seeking a Data Scientist to help advance the mission of NGA’s Office of Special Programs performing duties including algorithm and tool design, creation, and maintenance, technology transition, algorithm verification and validation, and software test.
Design, test, and modify data processing algorithms using real and/or surrogate data
Design, test, and modify geospatial big-data processing algorithms and enable implementation in either Python or Java suitable for a cloud-based architecture using Spark, Elastic Search and/or Hadoop
Engage with users to understand needs an analytic strength/weakness of developed algorithms
Perform data analysis to identify algorithms technical limitations or defects, document findings and suggest solutions
Process/manipulate geospatial data and provide recommendations to provide additional utility beyond manual exploitation
Interact professionally with senior-level executives and other personnel prioritizing and accomplishing assigned tasks in a fast-paced environment with deadlines
Qualifications
MA/MS programing, computer science disciplines plus work experience (8+ years)
Must currently possess an active Top Secret/SCI Clearance and IC Polygraph
Working knowledge of Oracle, Java, C++, Linux, HTML, Python and/or parallel processing algorithm
Experience in GEOINT, SOM (NGA), data science, imagery science, GIS domains
Familiarity with systems integration, software test and V&V activities",3.8,SAIC,"Springfield, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,7,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,119.0,VA,1463,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1168,168,Data Scientist/Machine Learning,$89k-$149k,"Data Scientist/Machine Learning

Mist, a Juniper Company, is the first vendor to bring enterprise-grade Wi-Fi, BLE and IoT together through a highly scalable cloud architecture. At Mist, we built the first AI-empowered platform to provide an unprecedented visibility into the user experience. Mist is the new global standard for many fortune 500 companies.

The mission of the Data Science team at Mist is to leverage state-of-art ML and AI technologies to build the next-generation self-driving network solution, which can take actions on behalf of or together with human experts to automatically monitor, detect and remediate common network issues. The team includes a group of experienced and talented data scientists and data science engineers, and builds the end-to-end data analytics infrastructure and ML models of the product.

Now we are looking for a Senior Data Scientist to help define and expand this mission. As a data scientist, you will collaborate with product managers and domain experts to identify use-impacting real customer problems, use your deep DS/ML knowledge to develop data-driven solution with terabytes data, and work closely with data engineers to implement and scale the models in production.

Qualifications/Requirements:
• MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, Applied Math or equivalent fields with strong mathematical background
• Excellent understanding of machine learning techniques and algorithms, including clustering, anomaly detection, optimization, neural network etc
• 3+ years experiences building data science-driven solutions including data collection, feature selection, model training, post-deployment validation
• Strong hands-on coding skills (preferably in Python) processing large-scale data set and developing machine learning models
• Familiar with one or more machine learning or statistical modeling tools such as Numpy, ScikitLearn, MLlib, Tensorflow
• Good team worker with excellent communication skills written, verbal and presentation

Desired Experience:
• Experience with AWS, S3, Flink, Spark, Kafka, ElasticSearch
• Knowledge and experience with NLP technology
• Previous work in a start-up environment

Juniper Networks is enrolled in E-Verify® and will be participating in E-Verify in addition to our Form I-9 process. www.dhs.gov/E-Verify
Juniper Networks is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer.",3.9,Juniper Networks,"Cupertino, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,24,Company - Public,other_industries,Telecommunications,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,119.0,CA,2407,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,1,0,0
1169,169,Data Scientist in Artificial Intelligence Early Career,$89k-$149k,"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311096

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing & Analytics

Group: Data Sciences & Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and deep learning research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to geo-spatial analytics, AI assurance, adversarial machine learning, human language technologies, computer vision, disaster response and recovery, health security, and other related fields.

The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as geospatial intelligence, natural language processing, few-shot learning, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery.
*Minimum Qualifications**
Bachelor's with 0-1 years of experience or a Master's degree with 0 years of experience is required.
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-20_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-10-19_",3.8,PNNL,"Seattle, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,55,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,119.0,WA,4798,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,1
1170,170,Data Scientist - AI/ML Specialist,$89k-$149k,"Our team Our team is looking for a Data Scientist with experience in Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML). The selected Data Scientist - AI/ML Specialist will support a U.S. Government customer who is applying new and innovative methods in computer vision and object detection in order to address some of our most pressing intelligence problems.

Maxar is looking for a Data Scientist with experience in Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML) to join our team in Northern VA. The selected Data Scientist - AI/ML Specialist will support a U.S. Government customer who is applying new and innovative methods in computer vision and object detection in order to address some of our most pressing intelligence problems.

Life with Us

Your Career: Were very serious about professional development and continuing education. We offer
everyone the opportunity to define their own career trajectory. Our group has some amazing resources at its
disposal specifically for this purpose. You will work with your direct supervisor and/or a mentor to set
appropriate goals and design a plan to help you make consistent progress.

Day-to-day with your colleagues:
Youll be supporting an R&D, rapid prototyping office whose mission is to apply new and cutting-edge tools and methods to intelligence problems. This office loves innovators, self-starters, and people passionate about our nations security.

These AI/ML applications and experiments are used to:
Extract meaningful insight.

Narrow search areas.

Tip/cue.

Find rare objects.

Predict vulnerabilities.

Encouraging further analytic exploration.

Reducing the friction of flawed workflows.

Youll collaborate with our geographically dispersed team primarily via Zoom & Slack.

Minimum Requirements:
Must be a US Citizen with a current/active TS/SCI security clearance with Polygraph.

Bachelors degree in a relevant field (physics, mathematics, computer science, operations research, etc.).

5 years of relevant experience with Data Science and Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning.

Experience with Data Science Tools (eg R, Python, SAS, Matlab, TensorFlow).

Experience with applying Data Science techniques to overhead imagery - ie; computer vision, object detection.

Preferred Education and Experience:
Experience with NoSQL databases.

Ability to provide subject matter guidance.

Ability to manage personal project priorities and deliverables.

Ability to provide controls for technical rigor and quality of output.

#cjpost",3.5,Maxar Technologies,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,119.0,VA,2518,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
1171,171,Data Scientist,$89k-$149k,"Zynga is a leading developer of the world’s most popular social games that are played by people around the world every single day. To-date, more than 1 billion people have played our games across Web and mobile, including Words With Friends, FarmVille, Zynga Poker, Merge Dragons, Empires & Puzzles, Hit it Rich! Slots and CSR.

Zynga’s Marketing Data Science and Analytics team uses our outstanding and expansive data to deliver fundamental insights on who our audience is, how they engage with our games, and what are the best ways to acquire them. We strive for a better understanding of our players which translates into challenges and features that delight them.

Here’s where you would come in: identify and formalize problems related to campaign optimization. Design and develop systems and services to optimize campaigns at scale. Be innovative, be creative, use every bit of that key commodity – data. Millions of people play Zynga games every day, so our data is tremendously rich, and we have a lot of it!

We will rely on you to communicate your findings to your peers – both technical and non-technical. Your solutions to difficult problems will need to be demonstrably impactful, visual and maintainable. You will collaborate with engineering teams to build proof-of-concept and MVPs of campaign bidders and optimizers. You will collaborate with User Acquisition Managers, Product Managers, and Engineers to deliver business impact.

Responsibilities:
Design and implement scalable systems and models to experiment with campaigns and creatives across channels and acquire users at scale
Work with large amounts of data to find and realize opportunities to acquire and re-target users profitably delivering unambiguous business metric impact
Craft effective campaign strategies to acquire users across a multitude of user acquisition channels
Drive and empower user acquisition team to make quantitatively informed, evidence based decisions - through custom visualizations, and ETLs to augment user data
Design, test, verify and implement machine learning models with Zynga’s games that impact millions of users. Models may include but not limited to LTV modelling, campaign bid recommendations, budget allocation, clustering/segmentation, forecasting, fraud detection, and / or reinforcement learning
Build prototypes and MVPs of services and applications that improve effectiveness of campaigns, creatives, ad networks and/or user segments.
Required Skills and Experience:
B.S. or B.A. in Math, Statistics, Comp Sci, Engineering, or other quantitative field required; Masters, MBA or PhD preferred
5+ years of relevant work experience in data science or analytics role in a Marketing Analytics or a User Acquisition Analytics Team
Familiar with mobile performance marketing and/or user acquisition landscape
Strong experience in SQL;
Proficient in Python; Proven fundamental programming skills (algorithms, data structures, OOP, OS, Networking, AWS Cloud); Ability to design distributed systems
Ability to build and maintain software services and systems at scale; experience in deploying services in at least one cloud provider (AWS, Google Cloud or Azure)
Proven experience with some of the following: machine learning, predictive modeling, deep learning
Experience in analyzing large datasets, preferably in a Hadoop or Spark environment, and deploying production ready systems at scale
Strong written and oral communication skills
Strong passion for gaming and performance marketing!
Zynga is an equal opportunity employer. We are proud of our broad community; we do not discriminate on the basis of race, sex, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, medical condition, disability, or any other class or characteristic protected by applicable law. We welcome job-seekers, players, employees, and partners from all backgrounds. Join us!

We will consider all qualified job-seekers with criminal histories in a manner consistent with applicable law.

Zynga is committed to providing reasonable accommodation to applicants with disabilities. If you need an accommodation during the interview process, please let us know.",4.1,Zynga,"Austin, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,13,Company - Public,Video Games,Media,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,119.0,TX,4195,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,1,0,1
1173,173,Data Engineer,$89k-$149k,"Overview

ID.me is a digital identity network and our mission is to make the world a more trusted place by facilitating transparent and efficient interactions between people and organizations.

We are looking for a Data Engineer to join our Product team to design and build a robust set of tools and pipelines to support data analytics efforts. You’ll manage and optimize our core infrastructure by creating and maintaining data pipelines. You will work with other engineers and analysts from the Product and Business teams to design, implement, and maintain a data ecosystem that delivers actionable insights to make key business decisions. You have technical chops but can also work independently to prioritize issues, work within ambiguity, and manage conflicting deadlines. You are creative, data-driven, results-oriented, and eager to help us solve data problems of varying complexities.

Responsibilities
Develop technical solutions using proven techniques in data and analytics processes
Develop, prototype, and build frameworks based on open source and commercially available tools
Orchestrate and maintain data pipelines that meet security standards and ensure the integrity and quality of data
Demonstrate a passion for serving the needs of internal and external customers by enabling them with self-service reporting tools and analytics capabilities
Drive the execution of data initiatives that provide key performance metrics
Understand the data related challenges, nuances, and requirements to identify and recommend the optimal technical approach
Train and educate team members as well as stakeholders about best practices in data engineering and governance
Collaborate closely with the engineering and devops team to implement DataOps, thus reducing our analytics development cycle
Research and improve our data platform to ingest, process, transform, and distribute insightful data to our audience ranging from executives, analysts, and engineers to customers, vendors, and partners
Evangelize data driven culture by breaking down silos and encouraging data sharing
Qualifications
3+ years of hands-on experience in data engineering for a SaaS company or a mature startup
Proven experience working with various tools but more importantly, familiarity with how to best assemble and deploy production ready data stack to any cloud environment
BS in a quantitative or scientific field such as computer science, computer engineering or equivalent experience
Experience in applying agile software development approach - Git, CI/CD, Jira, etc - to data engineering
Familiar with SQL and other popular programming languages (such as Ruby, Python, .NET, etc)
Exceptional fluency with SQL; you conquered the join venn diagram long ago and have moved on to explaining cost based optimization to your peers on the engineering team
Some level of experience working in the cloud - AWS, Azure, or GCP
Experience with ingesting, processing, and visualizing data sources of varying types - structured/relational and unstructured
Experience in developing, managing, and manipulating large, complex datasets
Data-driven, detail-oriented individual with excellent storytelling and problem-solving abilities
Ability to work independently and autonomously, as well as part of a team
Superb time management, prioritization of tasks and ability to meet deadlines with little supervision
Vision: To be the world's leading digital identity network empowering people to control their own information and to prove their credentials across all channels: online, call center, and in-person.

Mission: To make the world a more trusted place by delivering the highest level of security with the least amount of friction at the lowest possible cost.

People: We have an audacious mission. We aim to fix the identity layer of the internet. Billions of people will live better lives with more trust and convenience thanks to ID.me. We are like Special Forces. We take on the most difficult challenges with amazing teammates.

ID.me Core Values: *Don't be a jerk. *Always compete. *Ask questions like a 5-year old. *Inspire people with your passion. *Make something better every day. *Treat each customer like your favorite family member. *Own your mistakes so you can learn from them. *Details are everything. *Communicate like a scientist. *Be truthful (even when it's hard). *Reflect ID.me's values in your actions. *Act like an owner.

ID.me Career Site & Culture Deck: https://www.id.me/careers",3.3,Id.me,"McLean, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,9,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,119.0,VA,4480,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
1174,174,Data Scientist,$89k-$149k,"Job Capsule


The Data Scientist analyzes complex and unstructured data using state-of-the-art data science methods for data driven decision making. This role uses knowledge of data science methods and applies analytics to solve real world problems. The Data Scientist will work with customers to collect and understand data, perform wrangling, develop applications and collaborate actively across the organization and with senior management to accomplish various objectives.

Job Duties/Roles
Apply advanced data science concepts to deliver data driven digital offerings and insights
Be able to write independent source code, validate and test for model quality assessment and improvement
Experience with Data Visualization tools such as Power BI or Tableau or Spotfire
Use machine learning and artificial intelligence methods, classification, regression algorithms
Comfortable working independently on data engineering, pre-processing and data preparation tasks to prepare data for further analysis
Generate Intellectual Property for the company
Stay current in the field of advanced analytics and take initiative to apply new technologies
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Required (KSAR)
Python - Numpy, Pandas, lamdas, keras, Tensorflow, MS Cognitive AI, Matlab, R, SQL
OOP(Object Oriented Programming)
ANN, RNN, Classification, Clustering, CNN, Regression tools
Exposure to building RestFul APis for data science modelling is a plus
Practical experience using predictive analytics, multiple approaches, to ID abnormalities and failures using time series and unstructured data sources.
Knowledge of data architectures and systems is a plus
Minimum years of Experience


Minimum 3 years of relevant experience in data / analytics.

Country Requirements


Must be a US Citizen or Permanent Resident (US Person) and able to work on Government Data with ITAR classification

Required/Preferred Education Requirements


BS degree required in Data Science or Computer Science or Engineering or another relevant field",3.5,American Bureau of Shipping,"Houston, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,158,Other Organization,other_industries,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,119.0,TX,2013,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
1176,176,Lead Data Scientist,$89k-$149k,"At the intersection of technology, science, business and sports, Strivr offers an end-to-end, VR-based immersive learning platform that changes the way people around the world train, learn and perform. With a mission to elevate performance through immersive experience, we are redefining an industry in real time and shaping the future of learning.

Strivr was founded in 2015 out of Stanford University’s Virtual Human Interaction Lab, using the football field as our proving ground. Since then, we have quickly expanded from the athlete to the enterprise, partnering with leading Fortune 500 companies including Walmart, Verizon and Fidelity to innovate and elevate employee development.

More than just content inside a headset, immersive learning provides realistic, high-impact experiences driven by L&D experts, instructional designers, data scientists, and immersive content specialists. Strivr offers the only end-to-end solution available today, bringing together the software, hardware, content and services needed to deliver effective training at scale.

Recognized by Fast Company’s Most Innovative Companies of 2019 and 2020, we take pride in our passion for innovation and we use that energy to fuel our work. Our culture thrives on teamwork, grit, transparency and impact, and celebrates every win. It’s an exciting time to join our fast growing team!

At Strivr, our Data Science team develops cutting-edge techniques to improve people’s performance in the real world based on their experiences in the virtual world. As a Data Scientist at Strivr, you will be at the forefront of defining approaches to Immersive Data Science and will be evaluating and optimizing user experience in the virtual world.

Your responsibilities:
Develop innovative approaches to measuring user behavior and evaluating performance in the virtual environment
Collaborate with partners such as Engineering and Solutions teams to instrument the data collection process and build ETL pipelines to obtain data required for your analyses
Implement approaches and communicate insights in a compelling narrative
Incorporate your research outcomes into the data product offering
Minimum Qualifications:
5+ years of industry experience as a Data Scientist
An advanced degree in a quantitative field (e.g Economics, Statistics, Sciences, Engineering)
Experience developing and implementing in-depth approaches, including statistical and econometric analyses and/or ML models
Experience building ETL pipelines
Proficiency with Python (or R), and SQL
Strong communication skills
Passion for using data to improve immersive experiences",4.5,Strivr,"Palo Alto, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,5,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,119.0,CA,2616,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1177,177,Data Scientist (Fraud & Game Surveillance),$89k-$149k,"WHO WE ARE

NCSOFT is a premiere digital entertainment company and global publisher with worldwide locations and more than 4,000 employees focused on bringing extraordinary games to life for millions of fans around the world. Established in 1997 and headquartered in Seoul, South Korea, we quickly became a key leader in online games. Best known for critically acclaimed franchises including Lineage, Aion, Guild Wars, and Blade & Soul, NCSOFT is also one of the world's top mobile developers with Lineage 2M occupying the #1 grossing revenue slot on Google Play. Our core goal is making people in this world happier by delivering games that entertain a globally connected audience has remained the same.

We are looking for a Data Scientist to join our Fraud and Game Surveillance Unit and help us keep our games safe and fun for all our players. We are looking for someone with a burning curiosity about our players and our games, someone who can go deep to find answers and bring back actionable insights. The ideal candidate is equally passionate about machine learning and improving the player experience. This role will partner closely with design, engineering, and customer service to help create and maintain a safe and welcoming environment for all our players. You will help build tools to detect toxic chat and sift PvP match records to find cheats and bots. This is your chance to help make our games safer, friendlier, and more fun.

WHY JOIN THE CUSTOMER CARE TEAM?
You are a passionate gamer. You will join us in supporting multiple AAA titles. We are all gamers and we love helping our fellow players!
You enjoy creating positive user experiences. This is at the core of what we do. You think about how we best prevent players from having to contact us and how to make their interactions with our team seamless. You learn from negative feedback and get satisfaction from positive outcomes.
You love a challenge. You will encounter daily opportunities to overcome new challenges and problems. You thrive in a fast-pasted, high-volume work environment.
You love to share your knowledge and experience. We know our games and our player base inside and out and we leverage that knowledge to drive improvement. You are good at finding ways to best impart your knowledge to internal teams and our customers.
WHAT YOU'LL DO
Use SQL, Tableau, and other tools to query gameplay data.
Conduct quantitative and statistical analyses on gameplay and financial data.
Create and maintain accurate and comprehensible data visualizations and dashboards.
Create and deploy machine learning models to model and predict player behavior.
Work collaboratively with designers, engineers, customer service, and the community team.
Stay actively engaged in our games and develop a deep understanding of game mechanics including gameplay and economy.
WHAT YOU'LL NEED TO BE SUCCESSFUL
A passion for games and the gaming industry.
Demonstrated history of turning raw data into actionable insights.
Advanced SQL proficiency, including experience querying and visualizing large, complex data sets.
Strong quantitative skills, and experience utilizing scientific analytic methods, qualitative methods, and quantitative analysis techniques, as well as predictive modeling.
Ability to effectively communicate with people at various levels of business and technical expertise, including the ability to simplify difficult technical concepts.
Ability to translate academic research into application.
EDUCATION/TRAINING/EXPERIENCE
Bachelor's degree in statistics, analytics, data science, psychology, or related quantitative field. MS or PhD strongly preferred.
5+ years hands-on experience working with data.
Experience with natural language processing would be very useful.
PLUSES
Prior experience in fraud detection.
Experience playing NCSOFT and ArenaNet games.
Experience with big data software like Hadoop.
Experience with other Business Intelligence backend and analytics applications.",3.0,NCSOFT,"Aliso Viejo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,23,Company - Public,Video Games,Media,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,119.0,CA,3972,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1178,178,Big Data Engineer,$89k-$149k,"The Big Data Engineer is responsible for engaging in the design, development and maintenance of the big data platform and solutions at Quicken Loans. This includes the platform host data sets that support various business operations and enable data-driven decisions as well as the analytical solutions that provide visibility and decision support using big data technologies. The Big Data Engineer is responsible for administering a Hadoop cluster, developing data integration solutions, resolving technical issues, and working with Data Scientists, Business Analysts, System Administrators and Data Architects to ensure the platform meets business demands. This team member also ensures that solutions are scalable, include necessary monitoring, and adhere to best practices and guidelines. The Big Data Engineer helps mentor new team members and continues to grow their knowledge of new technologies.

Responsibilities
Develop ELT processes from various data repositories and APIs across the enterprise, ensuring data quality and process efficiency
Develop data processing scripts using Spark
Develop relational and NoSQL data models to help conform data to meet users needs using Hive and HBase
Integrate platform into the existing enterprise data warehouse and various operational systems
Develop administration processes to monitor cluster performance, resource usage, backup and mirroring to ensure a highly available platform
Address performance and scalability issues in a large-scale data lake environment
Provide big data platform support and issue resolutions to Data Scientists and fellow engineers
Requirements
Master's degree in computer science, software engineering or a closely related field
2 years of experience with Hadoop distribution and ecosystem tools such as Hive, Spark, NiFi and Oozie
2 years of experience developing batch and streaming ETL processes
2 years of experience with relational and NoSQL databases, including modeling and writing complex queries
Proficiency in at least one programming language, such as Python or Java
Experience with Linux system administration, scripting and basic network skills
Excellent communication, analytical and problem-solving skills
Who We Are

Were Americas largest mortgage lender, closing loans in all 50 states. J.D. Power ranked Quicken Loans Highest in Customer Satisfaction in Primary Mortgage Origination for the past nine consecutive years, 2010 2018. The company was also ranked highest in the nation for client satisfaction among mortgage servicers by J.D. Power for five consecutive years, 2014 through 2018, each year the company was eligible. Theres a simple reason weve been so successful: We care about the people we work with.

If youre tired of stuffy, bureaucratic workplaces, then youll be delighted to find something different here. We strive to make a creative, fun and collaborative environment you simply wont find anywhere else. Quicken Loans was named #1 in ESSENCE Magazines first ever list of Best Places to Work for African Americans in 2015. We've been on Computerworld's ""Best Places to Work in IT"" list for 13 years running, hitting #1 the last five years. We were also ranked #14 in FORTUNE Magazines list of ""100 Best Companies to Work For"" in 2018, remaining in the top-30 for the past 15 years.",3.8,Quicken Loans,"Detroit, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,35,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,119.0,MI,3298,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,1
1180,180,"Data Scientist, Machine Learning",$89k-$149k,"Job Description

At Shipt, we are transforming the grocery shopping experience and giving time back to consumers. Shipt shoppers handpick fresh groceries and household essentials, then deliver them to your door in as little as one hour.

Shipt is growing and we are searching for a Data Scientist, Machine Learning to join our team! At Shipt, we're using machine learning (ML) and analytics to drive our business forward. We're looking for help understanding our data, optimizing our processes, and making predictions to improve our product and customer experience.

The data science team builds data driven solutions using machine learning and modeling techniques. Our solutions include predictive models, clustering, segmentation, complex reporting, and quantitative research. Our ideal candidate will be data-driven, intellectually curious, and a clear communicator with experience building machine learning models.

What You'll Gain
You will get experience working with a cross-disciplinary team shipping real-world products to our customers around the nation. You will also receive hands-on mentorship from your friendly teammates on topics ranging from design to career advice

Your Responsibilities
Develop a thorough understanding of our data and interpret them as they relate to shopper behavior, search performance, profitability, and product development
Build predictive models and optimization routines to capture opportunities and solve problems. Applications include modeling demand in a given market, delivering search recommendations, and optimizing internal processes
Collaborate with other members of the Data Science and engineering teams on ways to approach problems, augment code, and share new techniques
Work with functional team leaders (in Product, Operations, Marketing, etc.) to explain your analysis, findings, and recommendations
Find opportunities for improvement across the business and assist in decision-making across teams
Stay abreast of developments in the field and contribute to its advancement
Requirements
At least 2 years of experience with machine learning, predictive modeling, and/or optimization techniques
High degree of proficiency with one of R or Python
Proficiency with SQL
Experience with a data visualization tool (Tableau, Chartio, Looker, Spotfire, Power BI, etc.)
Experience with cloud computing services or platforms
Comfortable giving verbal presentations and communicating with technologies like Zoom and Slack
Bachelor's degree in a quantitative field or related experience
Nice to Haves
Experience deploying predictive models in a cloud environment
Experience with batch processing framework
Familiarity with AWS, version control, and peer code review systems
Familiarity with on-demand and/or multi-sided marketplaces
Proficiency in both R and Python
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",3.5,Shipt,"Birmingham, AL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,6,Subsidiary or Business Segment,other_industries,Consumer Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,119.0,AL,3050,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1181,181,Data Scientist – Immunoassays and Biomarkers,$89k-$149k,"Job Title: Data Scientist – Immunoassays and Biomarkers

Position Summary:

To continue our solid growth, we are seeking a talented and highly motivated Data Scientist – Immunoassays and Biomarkers to join our growing organization. The role will provide data curation and analysis support for novel biomarker immunoassay and diagnostic test development and validation and will be responsible for developing and/or maintaining analysis tools and databases. The successful candidate will possess proficient analytical capability, solid background with use of statistics in a scientific context, and strong communication skills. We are looking for team oriented, hands on experts with a passion for personalized medicine and precision health.

Key Responsibilities:
Build, manage and query biomarker and clinical sample data repositories
Perform detailed and robust statistical analysis of clinical and laboratory research data
Statistical support for design and development of immunoassay and in vitro diagnostic assay products
Analyze large multisource and/or multivariate immunoassay data sets
Author statistical analysis plans, protocols, and reports for clinical and non-clinical evaluations
Review study reports for accuracy and robustness of statistical content
Adhere to data and documentation standards
Ensure accurate, in-depth results/data are delivered in a timely manner
Requirements:
PhD in Biology, Biostatistics, Bioinformatics, or directly relevant experience in the field of immunoassays or biomarkers
Familiarity with statistical requirements associated with immunoassay data analysis e.g. CLSI standards, Fit-For-Purpose Biomarker Validation, FDA data reporting requirements
Ability to understand scientific questions and formulate statistical and data analysis methods.
Ability to effectively visualize complex biological datasets.
Experience in developing and annotating biological data repositories
Strong proficiency with widely used software tools for visualization and statistical analysis of biological data – examples may include Excel, Prism, JMP, Minitab, SAS
Experience with design of experiments, multivariate data analysis and generating ROC curves strongly preferred
Familiarity with LIMS beneficial
Proficient verbal and written communication skills to clearly explain complex technical details.
Commitment to the successful achievement of team and organizational goals
Quanterix is a company that's digitizing biomarker analysis with the goal of advancing the science of precision health. The company's digital health solution, Simoa, has the potential to change the way in which healthcare is provided today by giving researchers the ability to closely examine the continuum from health to disease. Quanterix' technology is designed to enable much earlier disease detection, better prognoses and enhanced treatment methods to improve the quality of life and longevity of the population for generations to come. The technology is currently being used for research applications in several therapeutic areas, including oncology, neurology, cardiology, inflammation and infectious disease. The company was established in 2007 and is located in Billerica, Massachusetts. For additional Information, please visit https://www.quanterix.com.

Quanterix is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Quanterix is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. Quanterix will make reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with known disabilities, in accordance with applicable law.",3.2,Quanterix,"Billerica, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,13,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,119.0,MA,3692,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0
1182,182,Senior Data Scientist,$89k-$149k,"At Recursion, our mission is to decode biology to radically improve lives. To accomplish this bold goal, we have already generated one of the largest biological datasets in existence in our own labs— tens of billions of images of cells under millions of different biological and chemical perturbations.

With treatments for hundreds of diseases in our sights, Recursion has constructed a world-class team of specialists in biology, drug discovery, automation, engineering, management, and data science that work side by side. Our data science team is no less diverse. We bring together domain expertise in computer science, physics, biology, mathematics, applied statistics, and more. Together, we analyze experimental results, develop best-practice analytical methods for a field that has none, and build the computational tooling required to fuel Recursion's drug-discovery engine.

HOW YOU'LL CONTRIBUTE:

You will help us accomplish all of this by applying your domain expertise, technical experience, and years working on a data science team to deliver scalable solutions that immediately impact decisions— in whatever area that expertise may be:
Biologists just generated a novel dataset and need help developing a new analytical approach.
Our Chemistry team needs a new tool to register and recommend molecules with specific properties from an X-million compound registry.
Our analysis toolkit needs to level-up to support the growing needs of the company.
A production ML model is underperforming on new data, and needs both a redesign and additional experimental data to support the desired objectives.
You will identify and then own projects that suit your expertise— meaning conception, planning, development, implementation, and delivery— with the support of whatever other data science and cross-team expertise is required.

THE EXPERIENCE YOU'LL NEED:
Minimum of 4 years in industry setting on a data science team
Experience working with production repositories and developing deployable data-science products.
High fluency with the Python data stack (pandas, sklearn, etc).
Professional experience in project leadership and team mentorship
Curiosity and the professional skill-set to excel in an open, highly collaborative environment.
A track record of outstanding past projects, publications, or presentations.
NICE TO HAVE:
Experience developing computational analysis for imaging-based biological datasets or bioinformatics for sequencing-based datasets.
Code you can share. Send a link along with your email.
THE BENEFITS/PERKS YOU'LL ENJOY
100% Coverage of health, vision, and dental insurance premiums
401(k) with generous matching (immediate vesting)
Stock option grants
Two one-week paid company closures (summer and winter)
Flexible vacation/sick leave
Onsite daycare facility*
Commuter benefit and vehicle parking to ease your commute*
Complimentary chef-prepared lunches and well-stocked snack bars*
Generous paid parental leave (including adoptive)
Fully-paid gym membership to Metro Fitness, located just feet away from our headquarters*
One-of-a-kind 100,000 square foot headquarters complete with a 70-foot climbing wall, showers, lockers, and bike parking*
*Subject to change during the COVID-19 pandemic

More About Us

Recursion is a digital biology company industrializing drug discovery. Recursion does this by combining automation, artificial intelligence, machine learning, in vivo validation capabilities and a highly cross-functional team to discover novel medicines that expand our collective understanding of biology. Recursion's rich, relatable database of over 4 petabytes of biological images generated in-house on the company's robotics platform enables advanced machine learning approaches to reveal drug candidates, mechanisms of action, novel chemistry, and potential toxicity, with the eventual goal of decoding biology and advancing new therapeutics that radically improve people's lives. Recursion is proudly headquartered in Salt Lake City.

Check out what it is like to work at Recursion here

Recursion is an equal opportunity employer and complies with all applicable federal, state, and local fair employment practices laws. Recursion strictly prohibits and does not tolerate discrimination against applicants because of race, color, religion, creed, national origin or ancestry, ethnicity, sex, pregnancy, gender (including gender nonconformity and status as a transgender individual), age, physical or mental disability, citizenship, past, current, or prospective service in the uniformed services, or any other characteristic protected under applicable federal, state, or local law.",4.6,Recursion Pharmaceuticals,"Salt Lake City, UT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,7,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,119.0,UT,4642,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1184,184,Data Scientist,$89k-$149k,"Job Description


Avlino Inc. is seeking experienced data scientists to join our growing team
of AI engineers, analysts, and quantitative developers. The role involves
model construction, information extraction, prediction and finding solutions
to large-scale problems for mission critical applications using large
derived from a broad spectrum of domains for industry specific sectors. The
ideal candidate will have comprehensive expertise in machine learning,
time-series analysis modeling, statistical data analysis, and deep neural
networks. Experience with dynamic programming and reinforcement learning is
a plus.

Demonstrate your experience in creating real-world artificial intelligence
applications using pulsing customer data sets!

This is a great opportunity for an experienced Data Scientist with 4+ years
of relevant experience to work in a fast-paced environment where they can
share their passion for numbers and AI.

Responsibilities
Develop, implement, and use a broad set of machine-learning models and
quantitative techniques for prediction and classification for mission
critical applications.
To find problems in industrial and service sector applications.
Strong background in numerical techniques, optimization, and gradient
methods.
Development of new machine learning algorithms and/or substantial
modification of pre-existing techniques.
Analysis of high-volume, noisy, heterogeneous real-time data.
Collaborate with business analysts to transform customer needs into
actionable insights.
Design custom end user reports that are easy to read and interpret for
multiple business unit audiences.
Architect the next generation analytical platform.
Capable of de novo implementation of mathematical models, or to avail
widely used open source programming platforms and libraries (Scala, R,
python, TensorFlow).

Requirements
MUST: Solid 5 years of experience in machine learning, statistical
modeling, data mining, time-series forecasting, and neural networks.
MUST: Solid 5 years of experience working with big data technologies
distributed computing such as Hadoop/Spark, Map/Reduce, TensorFlow.
MUST: Solid 5 years of experience in multiple programming languages –
C#/.NET, C++, C, Scala, Python, R, Java.
Experience in developing or implementing enterprise class Data Analytics
and BI solutions.
Extremely analytical and able to solve problems independently.
Assesses customer requirements and translate them to appropriate
deliverables.
MUST: Have an analytical mind, and on point with detailed specifics.
MUST: Education: MS/Ph.D. (Preferred) in Computer Science, Physics, or a
related discipline.
PLUS: Experience in the logistics or transportation industry.",4.6,Avlino,New Jersey,-1,1 to 50 Employees,7,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,119.0,NJ,2689,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,0
1185,185,Director of Data Science,$89k-$149k,"Overview


Analysis Group is one of the largest international economics consulting firms, with more than 1,000 professionals across 14 offices in North America, Europe, and Asia. Since 1981, we have provided expertise in economics, finance, health care analytics, and strategy to top law firms, Fortune Global 500 companies, and government agencies worldwide. Our internal experts, together with our network of affiliated experts from academia, industry, and government, offer our clients exceptional breadth and depth of expertise.

Analysis Group provides economic, financial, and strategy consulting to law firms, corporations, and government agencies. At Analysis Group, Data Science is a center of excellence within a company that already has decades of experience focused on analysis involving data. Within Data Science, the Director of Data Science is charged with collaborating with leading internal and external academic experts to find creative solutions to some of the most challenging and high-value problems we face.

The Director of Data Science contributes to both client engagements and to the design and development of internal data science tools and infrastructure. The client work is diverse, utilizing a wide variety of complex and novel data sources, and supporting cases across industries including: finance, healthcare, antitrust, intellectual property, energy, and technology. The tool and infrastructure work assists the firm in developing cutting-edge data science and high-performance computing techniques for common business challenges.

The Director of Data Science helps Analysis Group in maintaining our leadership position in terms of advancing methodology and data computations, and works to increase Data Science knowledge within the firm, both through mentorship to more junior Data Science team members and via interactions with Consulting teams. The Director also is involved in recruiting, assisting in building out the team over time.

Essential Job Functions and Responsibilities:
Work with project teams to creatively address data science/computing challenges
Take initiative to identify opportunities for technology to enhance service offerings
Act as a resource and participate in client engagements and research as part of the project team
Maintain up-to-date knowledge of data science and computing tools, providing technical training and helping to grow the in-house knowledge base
Present research at selected conferences; serving as an expert
Maintain individual contributions while providing mentorship to other data scientists and analysts conducting work such as:
Optimize procedures for managing and accessing large databases (e.g., insurance claims, electronic health records, financial transactions)
Create interactive analytics portals and data visualizations (e.g., using R/Shiny, Python/Flask, D3)
Build and maintaining high performance computing (HPC) tools on grid and cloud computing environments
Develop and reviewing open source macros and packages in R, Python and other Object Oriented Languages
Establish optimized procedures for repetitive or computationally intensive tasks (C, C++, Cuda-C)
Use natural language processing methodologies to work with EMR data, social media data and other unstructured data
Contribute to team growth/development via assistance with advisorship and recruiting
Contribute to firm’s strategy for data science tools and infrastructure
Qualifications
Track record of using data to solve real-world problems
Experience applying multiple software tools and languages to provide data-driven analytical solutions to decision makers or research teams
Strong credentials and experience in database management and data visualization
PhD or advanced degree in computer science or data science-related field, with relevant experience. Other candidates with at least three years of relevant experience in the field will also be considered
Background in Statistics/Econometrics or Biostatistics
Extensive experience in programming languages like Python, C++, Java
Knowledge of R, Shiny and SQL
Familiar with online/cloud computing/storage (e.g., AWS)
Linux and basic system administration experience
Demonstrated experience working on project teams and collaborating with others
Strong communication skills
­
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.
Please view Equal Employment Opportunity Posters provided by OFCCP here.
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor's legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.7,Analysis Group,"Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,39,Private Practice / Firm,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,119.0,MA,5230,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,1,1,0,0
1191,191,Lead Data Scientist,$111k-$178k,"At the intersection of technology, science, business and sports, Strivr offers an end-to-end, VR-based immersive learning platform that changes the way people around the world train, learn and perform. With a mission to elevate performance through immersive experience, we are redefining an industry in real time and shaping the future of learning.

Strivr was founded in 2015 out of Stanford University’s Virtual Human Interaction Lab, using the football field as our proving ground. Since then, we have quickly expanded from the athlete to the enterprise, partnering with leading Fortune 500 companies including Walmart, Verizon and Fidelity to innovate and elevate employee development.

More than just content inside a headset, immersive learning provides realistic, high-impact experiences driven by L&D experts, instructional designers, data scientists, and immersive content specialists. Strivr offers the only end-to-end solution available today, bringing together the software, hardware, content and services needed to deliver effective training at scale.

Recognized by Fast Company’s Most Innovative Companies of 2019 and 2020, we take pride in our passion for innovation and we use that energy to fuel our work. Our culture thrives on teamwork, grit, transparency and impact, and celebrates every win. It’s an exciting time to join our fast growing team!

At Strivr, our Data Science team develops cutting-edge techniques to improve people’s performance in the real world based on their experiences in the virtual world. As a Data Scientist at Strivr, you will be at the forefront of defining approaches to Immersive Data Science and will be evaluating and optimizing user experience in the virtual world.

Your responsibilities:
Develop innovative approaches to measuring user behavior and evaluating performance in the virtual environment
Collaborate with partners such as Engineering and Solutions teams to instrument the data collection process and build ETL pipelines to obtain data required for your analyses
Implement approaches and communicate insights in a compelling narrative
Incorporate your research outcomes into the data product offering
Minimum Qualifications:
5+ years of industry experience as a Data Scientist
An advanced degree in a quantitative field (e.g Economics, Statistics, Sciences, Engineering)
Experience developing and implementing in-depth approaches, including statistical and econometric analyses and/or ML models
Experience building ETL pipelines
Proficiency with Python (or R), and SQL
Strong communication skills
Passion for using data to improve immersive experiences",4.5,Strivr,"Palo Alto, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,5,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,CA,2616,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1192,192,Senior Data Scientist,$111k-$178k,"About Us

At GutCheck, we pioneered agile market research to provide our clients with actionable insights at the speed of their business. As the marketplace rapidly evolves, we're evolving with it. By combining qualitative, quantitative, and behavioral methodologies, our team of full-service research experts synthesizes insights to help clients make more confident business decisions -- connecting them with their target consumers earlier and more often in the development process.

What Makes Our Approach Different

We create heroes out of our clients by providing them with contextualized insights to more efficiently and effectively connect with their target audiences. Enabled by technology and automation, we are dedicated partners who take a human-first approach to delivering powerful insights. Today, we are bringing agile to strategy: enabling brands to gather robust foundational insights in an agile, iterative way to inform key business within the demands of today's innovation timelines.

Here's where you come in:

As our Senior Data Scientist, you will be the primary contributor that will operationalize predictive models built with machine learning and advanced analytic technologies. GutCheck owns years of structured and unstructured data. We've started to identify patterns in our world-class market research using machine learning technologies such as TensorFlow. You will help us by providing expertise on mathematical concepts for the broader cross-functional analytics team and inspire the adoption of advanced analytics and data science across the entire breadth of our organization.

You will work closely with our talented and agile Product and Engineering teams to craft scalable, well-designed solutions that address the technical and architectural challenges inherent to making sense of our data. We have a focus on quality, automation, and innovation. We encourage our Engineers to think creatively and flexibly when choosing solutions, tools, and techniques. Our team offers an environment where trust and innovation are encouraged, egos aren't accepted, and collaboration is core to our DNA.

You will advocate, evangelize and build data-fueled products that help our internal and external customers gain deeper insights into direct, targeted consumer feedback. This data can and will be coupled with third-party data sources to help our clients be heroes by making well informed business decisions. You'll help research and choose which data sources will provide unique and compelling insights, and then you'll dig in and become an expert on that data. You will provide insight into leading analytic practices, design and lead iterative learning and development cycles, and ultimately produce new and creative analytic solutions that will become part of our core deliverables.

For more information on the company and the GutCheck team, please go to www.gutcheckit.com

This job description is not a complete list of your qualifications or position roles. GutCheck is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to equal opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, gender, gender identity, genetic information, parental or pregnancy status, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, or Veteran status.",3.9,GutCheck,"Denver, CO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,11,Company - Private,other_industries,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,CO,3310,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
1194,194,Senior Data Scientist,$111k-$178k,"We are looking for a Data Scientist who will be responsible for shaping our company’s data strategy innovating the $85B digital and linear television advertising market. You are passionate about all things data and tech, and have extensive knowledge of the digital space. You are accomplished in the areas of creating new analysis and deriving business-changing insights and you are ready to support the strategic objectives of a highly cross-functional organization.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Your work will have an outsized impact on tools we’re building, forecasting, planning, allocation, and audience behavior prediction
Work with Pb-scale data sets representing the total US video and TV audiences
You will build new, and support scaling out existing models in support of audience segmentation
You will be working with the data-engineering team to product ML pipelines and coordinating data models with other engineering teams
Building Data Models and managing machine learning pipelines
QUALIFICATIONS:
Managing ML pipelines with tools such as Python, Julia, and Apache Spark
SQL fluency and an understanding of relational data models
Comfortable in the Linux environment
A master of all trades mentality and an ability to embrace new challenges regularly
Eager and energized to work with some of the latest open source technologies
Able to work on-site in Los Angeles, CA
PhD in Data Science, Physics, Mathematics or other scientific field
PERKS:
Unlimited paid time off each year
Annual vacation stipend
Onsite gym, fitness classes and personal trainer
Casual dress code
Kitchen stocked with healthy snack snacks
Health, dental and vision benefits
Parental leave
Epic growth
ABOUT

At VideoAmp, we believe in challenging advertising paradigms to maximize value for clients. We do this by enabling companies to execute on business outcomes across their media investment instead of more traditional media metrics. VideoAmp is the software and data solutions company powering the convergence of the linear TV and digital video advertising. Our solutions connect linear TV viewership with addressable data assets to benefit the marketing and media industries. This enable marketers and content owners to holistically plan, transact, and measure deduplicated audiences across digital video, OTT, connected and linear TV advertising.

Come and join us!",3.4,VideoAmp,"Los Angeles, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,6,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,CA,2348,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,1,0,1
1195,195,"Scientist/Machine Learning Engineer, Applied Science",$111k-$178k,"The Scientist/Senior Scientist/Lead Scientist - (Machine Learning Engineers) will work with the rest of the team to research, invent, and implement the next generation prediction, optimization, and analytics technology. You are a brilliant, motivated self-starter and an extremely fast learner with top notch problem solving, and analytical skills. You have a deep sense of curiosity and innate desire to dig deep into terabytes of data and love to play with the innards of complex algorithms, mathematical constructs and code.

Responsibilities
Research, design and/or implement solutions to challenging problems in real-time bidding domain, such as all kinds of optimization problems, audience understanding, etc.
Research and improve features and machine learning models for production pipeline.
Provide insights and suggestions on customer campaign optimization problems and product/platform optimization problems through statistical data analysis when needed.
Drive innovation by identifying and formulating new problems, publishing papers, filing patents, etc.
Required Qualifications
PhD degree in a closely related field (e.g.: computer science/engineering, optimization) with publications in the area is strongly preferred
Or Masters with significant experience in advertising and Machine Learning
Experience in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, data mining, statistical modeling, optimization, algorithms, big-data, game theory
Proficiency with one or more programming languages - ability to write/debug production code.
Excellent communication skills – ability to present and communicate complex ideas in simple terms
Strong statistical/math/analytical abilities; Exceptional problem solving skills
Desired Qualifications
Previous experience in the advertising industry
Strong programming experience with Java, C/C++, Python and/or Scala
Excellent knowledge in algorithms and data structures
#LI-KM1

About Amobee
The world’s leading independent advertising platform, Amobee unifies all advertising channels—including TV, programmatic and social—across all formats and devices. We provide marketers with streamlined, advanced media planning capabilities powered by in-depth analytics and proprietary audience data. Our platform and technology, provides the most advanced advertising solutions for the convergence of digital and advanced TV— including linear TV, over the top, connected TV, and premium digital video. Enabling advertisers to plan and activate across more than 150 integrated partners, including Facebook, Instagram, Pinterest, Snapchat and Twitter.

Amobee has been named to Fortune’s Top 10 Best Workplaces in Advertising and Marketing. Amobee’s platforms have been widely recognized amongst our industry winning numerous awards in technology innovation, see all Amobee Awards. We are a wholly owned subsidiary of Singtel, one of the largest telco companies in the world, reaching over 700 million mobile subscribers in 21 countries. Amobee operates across North America, Europe, Middle East, Asia and Australia. For more information, visit amobee.com or follow @amobee

In addition to our great environment, we offer a competitive base salary, employee development programs and other comprehensive benefits. Please send a cover letter along with your resume when applying to the position of interest located at Amobee.com. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. No phone calls and no recruiting agencies, please.",3.8,Amobee,"Redwood City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,15,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,CA,3460,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
1196,196,Data Scientist/Business Intelligence Engineer,$111k-$178k,"Homesite Insurance was founded in 1997 and was one of the first companies to enable customers to purchase home insurance directly online, during a single visit. Since then, we've continued to innovate rapidly to meet the needs of our customers and their changing expectations.

One thing that's stayed the same since our founding: our commitment to our customers, partners and employees.

Join us on our journey as we continue to grow into a powerful contender in the field of insurance.

Homesite Insurance Company is seeking an experienced, passionate and motivated, Data Scientist/ Business Intelligence Engineer, to provide strategic leadership in the areas of Insurance Operations. The ideal candidate must be able to make an immediate impact by working with stakeholders throughout the organization to plan and execute change to impact the bottom line. Their skill set will support the growth of the Commercial line of business by utilizing data to drive decisions that optimize operational results.

This role is part of our Operations Department, which is responsible for managing post sales processing and servicing activities to meet/exceed operational service level agreements in a cost effective manner. This department has business responsibility for policy processing, billing, claims processing, in-sourced and outsourced back office operations, service platform, and business ownership of call center technology platform and operations-based IT initiatives. The Operations Department drives continuous improvement in servicing capabilities through process and IT changes and partner with Underwriting, Finance, Claims, and IT.

The Data Scientist/Business Intelligence Engineer is a highly quantitative problem solver who loves to dig into different kinds of data and can confidently and successfully communicate their findings to stakeholders in different departments. They will act as a strategic change agent to drive the change management and adoption of key initiatives to support the growth of Homesite by leveraging enterprise data to model outcomes and create anomaly detection capabilities. The incumbent will work closely with Customer Service, Billing, Claims, Policy Operations, IT, KTC, Training and external vendors, developing solutions that optimize all areas of operations.

Responsibilities:

-Mine and analyze data from internal and external databases to drive optimization of operations, financial outcomes, customer experience and retention.

-Use statistical and machine learning/deep learning to build supervised, semi-supervised and unsupervised models per business needs.

-Ensure data quality throughout all stages of acquisition and processing, including areas such as data sourcing/collection, ground truth generation, normalization and transformation.

-Communicate proposals and results in a clear manner backed by data and coupled with actionable conclusions to drive business decisions.

-Work with other analysts and team members to translate models into business solutions and collaborate with other departments in the company when necessary.

-Interface with stakeholders and develop innovative approaches to communicate the value add of the models being built.

-Participate in the transfer of knowledge of methodologies and best practices to peers and colleagues through collaboration, mentoring, and formal presentation and consulting.

Required skills:

-Master’s degree or higher in Statistics, Machine Learning, Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Physics or other quantitative discipline.

-Three to five years business experience in statistical modeling, data mining, machine learning, artificial intelligence, and applying data base queries.

-Proficiency in programming in Python, R and SQL.

-Ability to extract and clean data from a variety of structured and unstructured sources.

-Ability to drive both individual and team projects to completion.

-Demonstrated ability to work with executives, such as CEO, CFO, and CIO on strategic direction setting and decision making.

-Demonstrated ability to build relationships and accomplish goals across a highly matrixed organization.

-Clearly communicate complex findings to colleagues and external customers.

-Monitor the results of statistical models through the use of dashboards and ad hoc analyses.

#LI-TD1",3.1,Homesite Group,"Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,23,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,MA,4327,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
1197,197,Senior Data Engineer,$111k-$178k,"At Tend, we’re combining top-notch care with soothing and safe environments, elevated hospitality, consumer-grade technology, and curated products to redefine going to the dentist as a whole-you wellness experience.

Reimagining dentistry takes a unique and diverse team, all working together through commitment, collaboration, and creativity to create the world’s first dental wellness experience. Join the team that makes going to the dentist an experience people look forward to.

We’re looking to add a Senior Data Engineer to our team who is experienced in creating SQL databases for a variety of applications and business uses. You’ll work across teams and use cutting edge tech to solve interesting, large-scale problems. Creating at a rapid pace you’ll make a direct and lasting impact anywhere that technology powers our business.
About the Role*
Design, implement and maintain reporting databases, data warehouse and OLAP data structures
Design, develop, test, deliver, and implement SQL solutions within ETL processes.
Manage day to day operations of multiple Microsoft SQL Server/Postgres databases.
Optimize databases for performance and scalability.
Develop, implement and optimize stored procedures and functions using T-SQL
Analyze, define, and document system requirements for data, workflow, logical processes, interfaces with other systems, internal and external checks and controls, and outputs.
Responsible for problem resolution, database configuration, capacity planning, performance tuning and optimizations.
Create and maintain database master plans, data dictionaries and disaster recovery documentation
Consults with internal and external clients to prototype, refine, test, and debug databases and obtain client approval.
Writes and maintains documentation to describe program development, logic, coding, testing, changes, and corrections.
Design, build, and deploy BI solutions (Looker)
Responsible for on-call emergency response during database failure.
Develops and maintains professional relationships
Promotes good working relationships among staff and between other disciplines and departments. Assumes individual accountability for own conduct and maintenance of professional attitude and appearance.
Approaches change in a positive manner, motivate staff to work as a team, accept constructive criticism and learn from it.
Must be able to apply principles of critical thinking to a variety of practical and emergent situations and accurately follow standardized procedures that may call for deviations.
Must be able to apply sound judgment beyond a specific set of instructions and apply knowledge to different factual situations.
Must be able to work under stress on a regular or continuous basis.
About You*
5+ years of experience with MSSQL/TSQL/BI
3+ years or more ETL concept exp
Bachelor’s degree.
Knowledge of dimensional and relational database models
Experience with web services (Both REST and SOAP).
Some programming experience.
Experience with MSSQL and/or Postgres
Our Goodie Bags are Pretty Impressive! *
Our comprehensive benefits & perks program will make you grin. Employer-sponsored healthcare coverage, 401(k) with an employer match, generous paid time off, a pre-tax commuter benefit, and much more!
Keeping the Tend Community Safe *
We’ve always been committed to providing the highest quality of care for our team and members. During this time, we are taking extra precautions to promote the health and safety of those who work and receive treatment at our studios. From enhanced PPE to sterilized equipment and staggered visit times with on-site temperature checks, we prioritize your health every step. For more information on how we’re making our dental visits safer, please visit: https://www.hellotend.com/notice
EEO Statement*
We are committed to promoting a work environment in which differences are respected, employees are treated fairly and individual contributions are valued and rewarded. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.

This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $102,859.00 - $130,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Application Question:
Will you now, or in the future, require sponsorship for employment visa status (e.g. H-1B visa status)?
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.7,Tend,"Nashville, TN",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,TN,4666,1,data engineer,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
1198,198,Senior Data Scientist 3 Artificial Intelligence,$111k-$178k,"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311094

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing & Analytics

Group: Data Sciences & Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and artificial intelligence research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to AI assurance, remote sensing and geo-spatial analytics, human language technologies, computer vision, and other related fields.

+ The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as geospatial intelligence, natural language processing, few-shot learning, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery (e.g., publication in conferences such as NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred)

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 5 years of experience, Masters with 3 years of experience or PHD with 1 year of experience
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",3.8,Pacific Northwest National Laboratory,"Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,55,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,WA,5240,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,1
1199,199,"Senior Data Scientist (Palo Alto, CA or Remote US)",$111k-$178k,"The Opportunity

Eversight is the recognized leader in AI-powered price and promotions. Eversight's proprietary cloud-based SaaS solution brings AI and continuous experimentation to consumer brands and retailers. Our software acts as a coach, enabling market leaders to transform pricing and promotion strategy for the $3.4 trillion spent in consumer goods retail using intelligent, real-time data and insights.

Reporting directly to the Head of Data Science, you will be at the center of what determines Eversight's success as a company. You will analyze the data and develop production code using the newest Data Science and Machine Learning techniques to determine the optimal prices and promotions for major product manufacturers and retailers that sell these products.

Responsibilities
Research, implement and modify modern Data Science techniques. More specifically:
Build Statistical and Machine Learning models that describe the impact of prices and promotions on shopper behavior, including behavioral pricing effects. You'll need to find middle ground between using flexible modern AI methods and proven classical methods.
Develop Optimization and Experiment Design systems, which determine the best prices to set for each product in each store each week. Finding a good balance on the exploration-exploitation tradeoff will be important.
Design and run pricing experiments across hundreds of stores and tens of thousands of products
Create model validation methods to make sure that our models are accurate and to quantify the impact of our solutions on the clients' bottom line
Work with Product Management to generate ideas and quickly turn them into efficient, well-tested, functioning code (we mostly use Python)
Partner with the Engineering team to create highly scalable solutions
Serve as Data Science expert both within Eversight and for our clients
Lead custom analyses and connect them to actionable Business and Product insights
Help prioritize new feature development by assessing potential impact
Be a go-to resource for science-related questions about the product
Behavioral Profile
Analytical, framework thinker
Comfortable in a fast-paced environment
Highly collaborative
Strong at translating Data Science concepts to non-technical audiences
Business focused; measures work in its contributions to business outcomes and prioritizes effort against deliverables accordingly
Minimum Qualifications
5+ years of relevant experience in Data Science and/or Machine Learning with direct impact on business value
B.S., M.S., or PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Operations Research, Machine Learning, Engineering, Economics, Computer Science or relevant quantitative field
Strong understanding of Generalized Linear Models
Ability to write efficient code in Python
Experience with Hypothesis Testing and Maximum Likelihood Estimation
Preferred Qualifications
Team leadership experience strongly preferred
Startup experience strongly preferred
Experience in A/B testing and Design of Experiments
Agile experience
Experience with NumPy and Pandas (or equivalent experience in R)
Strong in math and statistics: Linear Algebra, Bayesian Methods, Regressions, Calculus
Experience in Machine Learning methods: Neural Networks (Deep Learning, Embeddings, Sequence Modeling, CNN), Tree-based methods (GBDT, Random Forest), Regularization Methods (L1/L2 penalties, Feature Selection, Dimensionality Reduction)
Demand Modeling, Pricing, and Causal Inference experience


Location

Palo Alto, CA

About the Company

Eversight is the recognized leader in AI-powered pricing and promotions. Global brands and retailers rely on the Eversight platform to optimize pricing in response to market conditions and to deliver higher ROI on promotional spend. Eversight's Pricing Suite and Offer Innovation Suite solutions are driving strong margin and sales volume improvements for leading companies such as Coca-Cola, General Mills, Raley's, and Rite Aid. Founded in 2013, Eversight is headquartered in Palo Alto, California, with offices in Chicago and New York.",4.2,Eversight,Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,7,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,Remote,4062,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,1,0,0
1200,200,Principal Data Scientist,$111k-$178k,"Principal Data Scientist, Oncology
The Machine Learning and AI team in AstraZenecas Oncology Data Science group is where we develop and apply sophisticated algorithms and techniques to solve the hardest problems in oncology drug discovery and development. The team uses their scientific, quantitative, and problem-solving skills to work on a broad range of challenges across the whole oncology portfolio, working collaboratively with other scientists across a range of disciplines to scope, define, and deliver projects that both advance the state of the art in data science and accelerate the delivery of innovative medicines to patients.

NOTE: This position can be filled in either GAITHERSBURG MARYLAND OR WALTHAM, MASSACHUSETTS

As a Principal Data Scientist, you will play a key role on the front line in this rapidly growing team working to extract insight from complex biomedical data. You will develop your leadership skills and apply and develop your expertise in rigorous quantitative data science to provide solutions to a variety of data science problems, researching, recommending and delivering novel methodologies to solve the problems that matter to the oncology pipeline.

Examples of projects the team works on include developing machine learning models for digital biomarkers, patient risk stratification for clinical trials, new algorithms for survival analysis, approaches to quantitatively analyse wearable data, linking of medical imaging data with omics and longitudinal outcomes to identify and/or validate new drug targets, and much more!

Day-to-Day:
Developing novel data science and machine learning solutions where off-the-shelf methodologies do not fit.
Leading small (2-3 person) data science projects of defined scope.
Coaching/mentoring junior data scientists and others to drive the development of data science as an AZ capability.
What You'll Need:

Essential:
MSc degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering)
Extensive hands-on experience applying data science tools in practice.
Practical software development skills in standard data science tools (such as R or python)
Extensive knowledge of mathematical modelling and statistical modelling techniques and drive to continue to learn and develop these skills
Outstanding communication, business analysis and consultancy
Desirable:
PhD degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering).
Experience within the pharmaceutical industry.
In-depth experience of working in a global organization with complex/geographical context",4.0,AstraZeneca,"Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,107,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,MD,2602,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1201,201,NLP Data Scientist,$111k-$178k,"Job Description:


Are you interested in changing the world of work? We’re building a world-class analytics team to apply data science to the soft side of how work gets done. We’re working hard, having fun, and making history; come join us!

Workhuman is seeking a Natural Language Processing (NLP) Data Scientist to join our Workhuman iQ team as a domain expert. This role focuses on analyzing unstructured data for over 37 million workplace recognition moments. This person is expected to become an expert in uncovering insights hidden in recognition moments across dozens of countries for our customers, the industry and our company.

You will apply cutting-edge AI and Machine Learning approaches to solving an enormous variety of NLP problems across several industries.  For example, you will build NLP models to accomplish outcomes such as rating sentiment, uncovering hidden bias, identify meaning behind recognition moments, and identify semantic patterns that lead to workplace outcomes (e.g., reduced turnover, increased productivity, etc).

Your work will be project-oriented, and you will often be responsible for the data findings and interpretation of results and transferring capabilities to colleagues, clients and internal product teams. You will constructively discuss your findings while always looking for the best solution.

This position will report to the NLP Manager.

**This position can be located in Framingham, MA office OR remotely

Responsibilities
Build large-scale deep learning models for Workhuman NLP product
Experiment with advanced deep learning architectures and NLP techniques to improve the performance of NLP systems
Provide support on maintaining and improving the systems and data pipelines for Workhuman NLP product
Create test sets and run evaluation on NLP systems for Workhuman products
Analyze usage data from Workhuman NLP product and run error analysis
Explore the advanced deep learning framework and infrastructure and apply it to the data generated by Workhuman products
Required skills and experience:

Master’s or PhD in computer science, computational linguistics, machine learning, artificial intelligence or related field require
2+ years of NLP experience; more specifically working within Machine Learning and Deep Learning
Experience with natural language processing and machine learning projects such as text classification, sentiment analysis, and sequence tagging
Programming skills in Python
Experience with state-of-art machine learning and natural language processing toolkits such as Sklearn, Gensim, Spacy, NLTK, etc
Experience with at least one of the deep learning toolkits, such as Tensorflow, Pytorch, Keras, etc.
Experience working with speech and/or language data
Expertise in building ontologies, taxonomies, and semantic relation frameworks
3+ years of analytics experience
Practical knowledge of data processing needs and trade-offs
Comfortable handling a high volume of work daily
Comfortable working in a fast paced, highly collaborative, dynamic work environment
Willingness to support several projects at one time, and to accept reprioritization as necessary
Strong attention to detail
Exceptional level of organization
Experience with process design and documentation
Experience communicating research findings and analysis in both written and spoken channels
The Company:


Workhuman® is the world’s fastest-growing integrated Social Recognition® and continuous performance management platform. Our human applications are shaping the future of work by helping organizations connect culture to shared purpose. With a consistent stream of gratitude fueling unparalleled, provocative workplace data and human insights, Workhuman® Cloud is a critical software engine for global companies seeking to motivate and empower their people to do the best work of their lives. Workhuman® (formerly known as Globoforce) was founded in 1999 and is co-headquartered in Framingham, Mass., and Dublin, Ireland.

Did you know:
We are #1 Great Place to Work in Ireland for the 2019 medium-sized workplace category and have been named one of the 2018 Top Places to Work in Massachusetts by the Boston Globe
Workhuman® is used by 4.5 million employees across 160 countries.
Our core values are; Respect, Determination, Innovation and Imagination
Perks & Benefits for our Happy Healthy Humans:
Comprehensive Health Plans
Fully paid parental leave (12-week maternity/4-week paternity) effective day 1
Peer-to-peer recognition program
401(k)
Tuition Reimbursement
Commuter bus from downtown Boston
On-site fitness center
Wellness rewards and reimbursements
Fully stocked kitchen (cold brew on tap - snacks and coffee machines as far as the eye can see…)
Regular celebrations for employees, families and special guests
At Workhuman, we love what we do because we’re shaping the future of work through our people and our technology. Our human cloud-based applications are helping some of the world’s leading global brands connect culture to shared purpose. The Workhuman Cloud empowers employees to thank, talk and celebrate each other, creating an environment that sparks gratitude and human connection while increasing employee engagement and productivity.

Workhuman is an Equal Opportunity Employer and is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees. We proudly provide a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. Employment decisions at Workhuman are based on solely on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Workhuman believes that diversity and inclusion among our teammates is critical to our success as a global company, and we seek to recruit, develop and retain the most talented people from a diverse candidate pool.",4.1,Workhuman,Texas,-1,201 to 500 Employees,21,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,TX,6110,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,1,0,1
1203,203,Azure Databricks Data Engineer,$111k-$178k,"Collaborate with business stakeholders to identify and meet data requirements
Management of data workflows and pipelines
Responsible for collecting, moving, storing, and preparation of data infrastructure
Manage and secure the flow of structured and unstructured data from multiple sources like ingest, egress , and transform data
Manage, monitor, and ensure the security and privacy of data to satisfy business needs
Other duties as assigned

5 +yrs of Azure experience
Experience with PySpark, Spark SQL, Databricks (notebooks), and Azure Synapse.
** BRMi will not sponsor applicants for work visas for this position.**
**This is a W2 opportunity only**
EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disabled
We are an equal opportunity employer that values diversity and commitment at all levels. All individuals, regardless of personal characteristics, are encouraged to apply. Employment policies and decisions on employment and promotion are based on merit, qualifications, performance, and business needs. The decisions and criteria governing the employment relationship with all employees are made in a nondiscriminatory manner, without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, marital status, physical or mental disability, medical condition, veteran status, or any other factor determined to be unlawful by federal, state, or local statutes.",4.3,BRMi,"Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,16,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,VA,1351,0,data engineer,0,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
1205,205,Clinical Data Scientist,$111k-$178k,"You will conduct analyses using various disparate types of healthcare data (e.g., clinical trial data, insurance claims data, Electronic Health Record (EHR) data, etc.). You will explore these data with a critical eye and transform these data into meaningful insights, creating outputs that may be used for publication, regulatory submissions, internal decision-making, market tracking, or other uses. Working closely with the other members of the Clinical Computational Sciences team, you will be encouraged to use new and emerging data sources and technologies to drive innovation and to conduct analyses at scale.
The Impact You Will Have
Our mission is to make innovative drugs affordable and accessible. You will be instrumental in making that vision a reality. We are working to build a truly modern and efficient clinical development organization, with data at the core of what we do. You will play a key role in analyzing this data in support of our development programs.
Your Superpowers
You hold a Masters or PhD in biostatistics, epidemiology, health economics, public health, computational biology or another quantitative scientific discipline, with 1-3 years of work experience
You are problem focused, creative, and practical in how you apply data to problems
You love working with data and live for the “aha!” moments where you use it to answer meaningful questions
You have experience applying observational and statistical methods to conduct rigorous scientific analyses
You’re energized by the prospect of rolling up your sleeves to tackle important problems in drug development and reimbursement
You can program fluently in a modern statistical programming software (e.g., R) and want to develop your skills further.
You’ve worked with data scientists and software engineers to put code into production – you think about scalable ways to improve the reach of your work.
You want to build a career in clinical data analysis (biostatistics, health economics, RWE, etc.)
Bonus points if you have experience in genomic data analysis or oncology data experience
You are an excellent communicator – you can use data to tell a clear and compelling story and can communicate complex analyses to many types of stakeholders
You have a curious mind and are excited to learn new skills, tools, and about novel types and uses of data.
EQRx is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",5.0,EQRx,"Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,MA,2640,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
1206,206,Data Engineer,$111k-$178k,"WHO WE ARE

NCSOFT is a premiere digital entertainment company and global publisher with worldwide locations and more than 4,000 employees focused on bringing extraordinary games to life for millions of fans around the world. Established in 1997 and headquartered in Seoul, South Korea, we quickly became a key leader in online games. Best known for critically acclaimed franchises including Lineage, Aion, Guild Wars, and Blade & Soul, NCSOFT is also one of the world's top mobile developers with Lineage 2M occupying the #1 grossing revenue slot on Google Play. Our core goal is making people in this world happier by delivering games that entertain a globally connected audience has remained the same. Our culture is innovative, creative, collaborative and impactful, and we are passionate about creating the best gaming experiences for our players.

WHY JOIN THE BUSINESS INTELLIGENCE PLATFORM TEAM?
We are a passionate and positive team that is always working on new data engineering technology and exciting projects including new game launches.
We feel team members are most effective in working on what they are passionate about. We are all capable of working on any given project, and often shift tasks based on preference.
We own the data platform, contributing to the design, implementation, and maintenance of these data services so we aren't shy about experimenting with new tech. However, we take a measured approach in order to minimize introducing unnecessary technical debt.
We collaborate with Analytics, Game Development, Platform and Publishing teams. Our data platform supports all kinds of data in an efficient environment that helps with analysis, customer care and company wide data-driven decisions.
WHAT YOU'LL DO

As a Data Engineer, you'll be responsible for gathering and collecting data, storing it, doing batch processing or real-time processing on it, and serving it to data scientists and data analysts to easily query.
Understanding data source (10%)
Develop data processes for construction, mining, and modeling that are delivered to the data analyst/science team (30%)
Create large data warehouses by running some ETL (Extract, Transform and Load) that is used for analysis by the analyst/scientists (30%)
Install continuous pipelines of huge pools of filtered information so that data analyst/scientists can pull relevant data sets for their analyses (20%)
Develop, construct, test and maintain architectures such as databases and large-scale data processing systems (10%)
WHAT YOU'LL NEED TO BE SUCCESSFUL
BS in Computer Science or equivalent experience
3+ years of day-to-day working experience as data engineer
Experience with object-oriented and functional programming languages: Python, Scala etc.
Experience with RDBMS (MS-SQL, MYSQL etc.) and NoSQL (MongoDB, DynamoDB etc.)
Experience with Big Data query and application knowledge: Hive, Impala, Fluentd, Spark, Sqoop, Pig etc.
Experience with ETL and data integration tool : Airflow, Informatica PowerCenter
Experience with AWS cloud services: EC2, S3, EMR, Glue, RedShift, Athena etc.
Proficiency in general database administration concepts and efficient query writing
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
An eagerness to continually improve your skills, learn new technologies a willingness to take initiative beyond basic responsibilities
This is a full time, on-site position at our office in Aliso Viejo, CA. A casual, friendly work environment, a comprehensive benefits package, a competitive salary, and more are all part of what makes NCSOFT West a great place to work.",3.0,NCSOFT,"Aliso Viejo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,23,Company - Public,Video Games,Media,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,CA,3584,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
1207,207,Journeyman Data Scientist/Analyst,$111k-$178k,"Description

Job Description:

JOB SUMMARY:

The Intelligence and Homeland Security Group of Leidos is seeking a Journeyman Data Scientist for an Intelligence Community (IC) program in Northern Virginia. An Active TS/SCI with polygraph security clearance is required in order to be considered for this position. The candidate will support Government staff in developing a broad range of written products in support of senior leadership and USG policymakers.

PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES:

Provide expert and professional data scientists to implement effective and innovative solutions meshing disparate data types to discover insight and trends in Human Capital information. Perform work on a data science team to advance Human Capital Analysis across the IC. Centralize Intelligence Community Chief Human Capital Office (IC CHCO) data collection and synthesis, including survey data enabling strategic and predictive analytics to guide business decisions. Develop or utilize complex programmatic and quantitative methods to find patterns and relationships in data sets; lead statistical modeling, or other data driven problem solving analysis to address novel or abstract business operations questions; and incorporate insight and findings into a range of products

BASIC QUALIFICATIONS:

Active TS/SCI with polygraph.
8+ years demonstrated core experience in the Labor Category area.
Demonstrated knowledge of the Intelligence Community.
Demonstrated experience performing data analysis and modeling on an independent (i.e., without significant guidance or direction) basis.
Demonstrated experience in developing and applying quantitative methods to find patterns and relationships in large human capital data sets (such as the Human Capital Data Call, Foreign Language Data Call, FAIR act data, etc.) using statistical and graphical packages.
Applied knowledge in the mathematical sciences such as probability, statistics, predictive modeling, computational social sciences; computer programming such as but not limited to Python, R, SAS, SPSS; and COTS data visualization packages such as but not limited to Tableau. Experience with Oracle Database and Procedural language/Structured Query Language (PUSQL).
Preferred experiences include but not limited to C#.NET, ASP.NET Model View Controller (MVC), jQuery, and Cascading Style Sheets (CSS), etc.
Demonstrated experience with structuring data, natural language processing, database technologies, and machine learning algorithms.
Ability to translate complex, technical, or analytic findings into an easily understood narrative - tell a story with the data in graphical, verbal, or written form.
Demonstrated five (5) years expertise in supporting quantitative and analytic efforts and knowledge of workforce planning. Experience should include engagement with the Intelligence Community and expertise with using analytical software.
Demonstrated professional experience in developing quantitative financial analysis related to budget formulation and execution. Experience in development of financial procedural guidance data formats related to CBJB workforce displays and analytic support, resource management and planning.
Demonstrated experience in human resource management supporting the federal government.
Demonstrated experience in the use of programming, design, development, and implementation of on*line and automated survey instruments.
Bachelor's or advanced degree in social sciences or related fields and requisite experience. Related fields may include statistics, mathematics, computer science, physical science, economics, or engineering.

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph

Travel:
No

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world's toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company's 33,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Virginia, Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $10.19 billion for the fiscal year ended December 28, 2018. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.6,Leidos,"Bethesda, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,51,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,MD,5625,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1209,209,Data Scientist,$111k-$178k,"WHAT WE DO MATTERS:

Here at The Knot Worldwide, we believe in doing work that matters. In 15 countries around the world, our leading family of brands (The Knot, WeddingWire, Bodas, GigMasters, The Bump, How They Asked, Lasting, and more) inspire, inform, and celebrate our communities as they move through life's milestones. From the proposal to creating a home, and starting a family together, we're there for every step of the journey. Our couples and business partners depend on us. They're all in. So are we.

ABOUT THE ROLE AND OUR TEAM:

The Knot Worldwide is in search of a full-time Data Scientist. Our Data Scientists work with stakeholders across all departments within the company. They answer strategic questions and provide insight to internal decision makers ranging from executives and senior management to product managers and team leads. They also work with our product team to develop data driven algorithms that improve features on the website.

This opening is for our Marketplace zone which connects over 2 million engaged couples with +50,000 local wedding vendors (e.g. Venue, DJ, Florist, etc.) across the US each year. This position plays an essential role in solving complex problems across our two-sided marketplace in areas such as pricing, product strategy, and go-to-market optimization.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Create smarter product solutions for our couples and vendors
Answer strategic questions by analyzing behavioral data
Communicate, collaborate and present results to clients within The Knot Worldwide
Explore novel ways to look at our data
SUCCESSFUL DATA SCIENTIST CANDIDATES HAVE:
Master's Degree or Ph.D. preferred
Experience implementing auction based business models
Strong product experience
Proficiency in key statistical and machine learning techniques (predictive modeling, classification, clustering, text analytics, recommender systems , data mining methods, forecasting, and other advanced techniques)
Proficiency with R or Python
Familiarity with common Linux command line tasks and version control software like git or svn preferable
Ability to communicate effectively and influence others
Ability to work in a fast paced environment and shift gears quickly
At The Knot Worldwide, we believe you are more than a resume and invite you to go for it, take the leap of faith, and apply for this job if it sparks your passion to join TKWW and make a difference!

WHAT WE LOVE ABOUT YOU:
You Dream Big. You iterate and experiment to drive innovation.
You Love Our Users. You keep our global community at the center of everything you do.
You Respect All Voices. Inclusion strengthens us and powers your decisions.
You Hustle Every Day. You favor urgency and own your outcomes.
You Win Together. People are at the heart of our success and you play as a team.
WHAT YOU LOVE ABOUT US:

The Knot Worldwide offers a unique employee experience and we are deeply proud of our award-winning culture. From flexible vacation and generous parental leave benefits to promoting wellness and giving back to our community, we believe in happiness above all else—in and out of the office.

----

The Knot Worldwide provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, or disability. In addition to federal law requirements, The Knot Worldwide complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. The Knot Worldwide expressly prohibits any form of workplace harassment based on race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status.

--

This position is not eligible for sponsorship.

--

If you are a resident of California, by submitting your application, you acknowledge that you've read the California Privacy Notice.",3.7,The Knot Worldwide,Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,Remote,3947,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
1210,210,Geospatial Programmer/Data Scientist,$111k-$178k,"Maxar is looking for a Geospatial Programmer/Data Scientist join our team in Northern VA. We use quick iteration and regular feedback to the prototype for our government customers before ultimately discovering the perfect fit. We embed our Geospatial Programmers with analytic teams in order to create custom-tailored web apps.

Life with Us
Project: Were improving upon models that use Artificial Intelligence / Machine Learning (AI/ML) to search for and identify objects. You would be the leader in this effort to design a scalable cloud-based solution and turn it into a real-world solution.

Career: Were very serious about professional development and continuing education. We offer everyone the opportunity to define their own career trajectory. Our group has some amazing resources at its disposal specifically for this purpose. You will work with your direct supervisor, and/or a mentor, to set appropriate goals and design a plan to help you make consistent progress.

Day-to-day with your colleagues:
Youll be developing and enhancing a geospatial app and the supporting infrastructure. This app is used to facilitate greater workforce performance by:

Building and training Deep Learning models to accurately identify specified objects.

Accessing large and various data sets

Working with multiple mission partners to identify and evaluate data sources.

We work in a very Lean-Agile environment without the overhead associated with traditional Scrum. Weve eliminated unnecessary development meetings and we love it!

We work together with our govt. stakeholders in their spaces in a very free-flowing and technology-forward environment.

Minimum Requirements:
Must be a US Citizen with a current/active TS/SCI clearance with Polygraph

Bachelor's degree in a related field, e.g. Computer Science, Systems Engineering, etc.

8 years of relevant experience

Recent experience with some of the following technologies:
AWS: EC2, S3, RDS, Lambda, Cloudfront

Programming and Data Science Tools: Python or Java & experience using PyTorch, TensorFlow, or similar Machine Learning packages

Experience building and training ML computer vision models, classification or object detection

Understanding of methods for labeling training data for Machine Learning models

Experience in data engineering and methods to handle large quantities of data for Machine Learning

Linux Terminal

Preferred Skills:
Willingness to learn new tasks and tools

Experience in Continuous Integration/Continuous Delivery (CI/CD) Pipeline techniques and tools

Experience in building and publishing anaconda packages

Experience performing AI/ML projects in a cloud environment

Experience in model deployment for enterprise applications

Experience leading other developers

Strong interpersonal skills.

Exposure to GIS technologies, e.g. PostGIS, Esri ArcGIS Enterprise

#cjpost",3.5,Maxar Technologies,"Chantilly, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,VA,2865,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
1211,211,Data Scientist/ Data Automation Engineer,$111k-$178k,"JSR is a global leader in material sciences and chemical engineering committed to contributing to social good by supplying materials to serve future generations and providing new value today for our customers and society in the areas of digital solutions, life sciences, elastomers, and next generation solutions.
We value Innovation, Quality, Customers, and People!  JSR combines a deep Japanese heritage of materials innovation, with speed propelled by our strong customer partnerships with premier tech & life sciences companies.  Are you interested in taking JSR and your career to the next stage?
The Opportunity
The role of the successful candidate is to accelerate the technology and product development cycles through focused automation initiatives. This engineer will lead cross functional teams to develop tools and applications to manage data from multiple chemical manufacturing sites as well as quality and development data to enable proactive process management and system troubleshooting.
Collaborates with the Manufacturing teams and Digital Transformation Office to develop product roadmaps in the digital space.
Works closely with technology development, product design teams and IT teams to rapidly establish the data science infrastructure necessary to meet the above goals
Communication of project updates including status, needs, and risks throughout the management chain.
Establish Way-of-Working guidelines and deliver communication and training sessions to ensure seamless implementation of the automation framework.
About You
7+ years plus B.S. or 5+ years with M.S. desired
B.S. degree in Engineering, Data Science, Material Science, or equivalent. M.S. a plus
Experience in chemical processing, organic chemistry, and analytical chemistry a plus
Proficiency and experience with Solution Focused Thinking - evaluating current problem patterns and devising a workable plan/process/solution
Experience working in an Agile environment.
Excellent data analysis proficiency required. Ability to do data manipulation via basic scripting techniques, macros or programming languages (i.e., Python) is preferred.
Knowledge of chemical processes and basic chemical structures, reactions and interactions needed to tie data into current troubleshooting or experimental work.
Proficiency and experience with Statistical Process Control (SPC) needed.
Strong computer skills essential – JMP, Access, Excel, PowerPoint, database and statistical software experience highly desired.
Detail-oriented and strong organizational skills. Quick problem-solving skills, able to communicate in-depth to customers, internal and external.
Experience in working within a cross-functional team is necessary.
Here's More of What You'll Be Doing
Work safely by observing safety rules, policies and procedures. Identify unsafe conditions or actions to the immediate supervisor.
Perform analyses and report results with minimal supervision.
Identify and execute improvements to existing quality procedures for data analytics, following guidelines on accuracy and validation
Act as Product Owner for development of digital solutions that assist in more efficient and effective issue resolution.
Do deep, wide and detailed data analysis using existing across a variety of platforms (databases, LIMS, other operational flows).
Work on and resolve various issues with data sets, including standardization of values, units and naming conventions, as well as bigger problems with current calculation methods and any underlying assumptions behind the calculations.
Initiate and perform a variety of analyses and recommend statistically designed experiments to address customer issues with general instructions.
Maintain and verify reliability of calculation methods, language or programming behind current macros or other scripts for data analysis.
Create reports and group presentations using Excel, Access, JMP and PowerPoint, to communicate data to other teams – Production, Quality Control, R&D, Sales and Management.
Independently design experiments using statistical methods (Does) towards developing and optimizing new test methods for products and raw materials and facilitate the implementation of these procedures by educating and assisting other members of the Data Automation Team.
Work in a team environment, especially the cross-departmental Data Automation Team (Cleans Engineering, Quality Control, Production, Litho Engineering, Sales, Logistics and Materials).
Make suggestions to management for improving this position or improving work processes

JSR is an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, protected veteran status, or disability status.
**Recruitment agencies/Headhunter do not submit resumes/CVs through our Web site or directly to managers. JSR will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with JSR. JSR do not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes. **",3.8,JSR Micro,"Sunnyvale, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,30,Company - Private,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,CA,5148,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1212,212,Data Scientist,$111k-$178k,"Responsibilities:
Bring Creativity to Data products.
Apply machine learning methods to a variety of finance and accounting problems.
Responsible for building and maintaining the machine learning systems, data, platform and processes.
Build, integrate and deploy machine learning solutions into the BlackLine application in collaboration with product management, cloud, engineering and data science teams.
Perform qualitative and quantitative data analysis.
Cleanse and transform raw data used in machine models.
Perform data munging, data mining, clustering & classification methods, pattern recognition.
Comfortable with statistics, calculus and multivariate analysis.
Participate in ML POCs, validate the results and develop production implementations.
Build and optimize scalable machine learning solutions in the public cloud.
Familiar with SQL, Python, R, SparkML, TensorFlow, GCP, AWS, SQL Server.
Develop production systems in Python.
Work independently to research and solve business and technical problems.
Plan their work individually and as part of a team.
Mentor and train other Data Scientists on the team.
Qualifications:
Strong practical experience with machine learning techniques in the industry, accounting and financial industries is a plus.
Extensive experience solving analytical problems using quantitative approaches.
Experience with machine learning algorithms for building ML models, their accuracy, cleanliness, reliability.
Experience with predictive and prescriptive analyses, modeling, and segmentation.
Have strong passion for empirical data research for practical applications.
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in clear, precise, and actionable
Comfortable with complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources.
Very comfortable with data engineering methods and pipelines.
Expert knowledge of analysis tools such as R, Matlab, or SAS
Experience with data warehousing, relational databases, ETL, BI, data mining.
Experience in SQL, R, Python languages.
Strong familiarity with GCP and AWS, SQL Server.
Practical experience with GIT version control.
Comfortable working with open source tools in a Unix/Linux environment.
Experience with and ownership of data-informed decision-making.
Experience translating business requirements into functional, and non-functional requirements.
Strong sense of product and data ownership.
Works independently without the need for supervision.
Strong written and verbal skills – able to explain the work in plain language.
MS/PhD in Computer Science or other quantitative disciplines",3.9,BlackLine,"Woodland Hills, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,19,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,CA,2587,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,1,0,0
1214,214,Data Engineer,$111k-$178k,"The Data Engineer will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture. The ideal candidate is experienced at data wrangling, enjoys data systems, and enjoys building things from the ground up. The data engineer will support the analytics teams at our client’s site by creating processes and programs to ingest the many unstructured files we receive, transform the data into a standard form and load it into the ecosystem. The right candidate will be excited with the prospect of optimizing and redesigning the client’s data architecture for the next set of data initiatives.
Use tools to build processes to extract, transform and load data from multiple sources
Assemble complex data sets that meet business requirements
Identify, design and implement processes to automate manual processes
Create structured datasets from unstructured data from multiple sources
Experience working with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment
QUALIFICATIONS
3-5 years of experience with SQL query language plus experience creating complex queries
3-5 years of experience with Hadoop; specifically, Hive, HiveQL and HDFS
3-5 years of experience building processes supporting ETL work
1-3 years of experience building and optimizing big data pipelines and data sets
1-3 years of experience with programming languages: Python, Scala, PySpark
Strong Analytical skills
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Information Systems or some other related field
OneMagnify powers business performance for its clients with actionable analytics, compelling marketing communications through brand strategy, and technology solutions for companies here and around the world. We think that’s pretty cool, making us an exciting place to work. But there is so much more to this employee-centric company. For example, it’s all the fun and important things we do—like our charitable giving team program, summer poker walks, quarterly cake day and, of course, the creative client solutions we deliver daily. It all stems from a culture of caring—for each other, our clients and the world around us.

OneMagnify is an equal opportunity employer.
OneMagnify is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",4.7,OneMagnify,"Dearborn, MI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,53,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,MI,2208,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
1216,216,Data Science Analyst,$111k-$178k,"Description

Job Description:

We have an exciting opportunity for a Data Science Support Analyst to support a client’s requirements in a challenging, dynamic setting located in the Washington Metropolitan Area. The position is for the Pathfinder contract. This Analyst will be responsible for constructing scripts and configuration controls to facilitate analysts performing repeatable complex database queries in multiple databases. This Analyst will be responsible for creating automated-scripting to assist analysts with data discovery. The Analyst will be required to work both independently and collaboratively with teams to create solutions in support of the customer.

Requirements:

• 3 to 10 years of experience is required

BA/BS degree is required. However, 6 years of work experience may be substituted

for a Bachelor's degree

Knowledge of IC mission, organizations, policies, procedures, and requirements

• Experience in IC related data science research and analysis

Experience supporting complex data science and analytic projects
Experience/knowledge of computer science concepts including programming, statistics, data architecture, and data analytics
Skill and experience in programming, statistics, and/or data architecture
Experience with quantitative and qualitative content analytics
Experience constructing and performing complex database search queries across multiple databases
TS/SCI with Polygraph security clearance is required

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph

Travel:
No

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Software Development

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world's toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company's 33,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Virginia, Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $10.19 billion for the fiscal year ended December 28, 2018. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.6,Leidos,"McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,51,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,VA,3482,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
1217,217,Data Scientist,$111k-$178k,"As a part of the Data Science team, you will run the development of next-generation platforms for customers micro-segmentation, clusterization, behavior analysis, and prediction as well as building up new improved recommendation systems for the customers.

You will use your expertise to design data science models and frameworks, data processing pipelines, and lead efforts of the ML models productization.

You will use project management skills to manage the deliverables and ensure all stakeholder work is complete on time. You will also manage stakeholder communications and present your project across a wide spectrum of management levels.

The position requires excellent communication skills and experience working directly with technical teams as well as with business stakeholders. Being able to present findings in a meaningful and clear way is a must.

Responsibilities:
Work with a team of skilled data scientists
Plan the R&D process to fit sprint goals as well as the project milestones.
Drive the collection, cleaning, processing, and analysis of new and existing data sources.
Lead ML models development using Python/Tensorflow/Keras/Spark stack.
Communicate with business stakeholders to clarify their requirements and present the teamwork results.
Requirements:
Bachelors or Masters Degree in Computer Science or relevant field and with 3+ years’ experience in related data science and software engineering roles.
Experience with look-alike modeling and sequential-input models, RNNs (LSTM, GRU, etc.)
Strong working experience in Python, SQL and NoSQL DBs.
Practical skills in usage of big data technologies and tools including Hadoop, MapReduce, Hive, Spark.
Fluency in such technologies like Scikit-learn, Pandas,Tensorflow, keras, gensim, stanfordNLP, PySpark.
Great communication and presentation skills. Proven ability to present progress made by the team to senior business management and the project stakeholders.
Familiarity with Container Development (using dockers)
Familiarity with cloud ML Platforms (Google AI Platform, Amazon Sagemaker, MS Azure AI Platform) is a plus.
We offer:
Opportunity to work on bleeding-edge projects
Work with a highly motivated and dedicated team
Very competitive salary
Flexible schedule
Medical insurance
Benefits program
Corporate social events
Professional development opportunities
NB:

Placement and Staffing Agencies need not apply. We do not work with C2C at this time. At this moment, we are not able to process H1B transfers. Applicants with CPT and OPT visas are welcome to apply.

About Us:

Grid Dynamics is the engineering services company known for transformative, mission-critical cloud solutions for retail, finance and technology sectors.

We architected some of the busiest e-commerce services on the Internet and have never had an outage during the peak season.

Founded in 2006 and headquartered in San Ramon, California with offices throughout the US and Eastern Europe, we focus on big data analytics, omnichannel services, DevOps, and cloud enablement.",3.9,Grid Dynamics,"Plano, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,14,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,TX,3037,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,1
1220,220,Lead Data Scientist,$111k-$178k,"Our mission is to make the best mental health tools radically accessible for everyone.

We are pioneers in building personalized digital mental health tools to help millions of people with mental health difficulties. We are building a suite of regulated, prescription only digital therapeutics as well as a sophisticated delivery platform capable of responding to the lived experience of our users.

Our tools are powered by the latest research in NLP and ML, use scientifically proven techniques from Cognitive Behavior Therapy, and are based on 10 years of intervention science at Stanford University. Our founder has an international reputation in Digital Mental Health intervention development. And our Chairman is Andrew Ng; and Dan Jurafsky is a member of our advisory board, both globally recognized leaders in AI/NLP.

There has never been a better time to use your data science skills for good. Given the recent acceleration in infrastructure to allow for the meaningful adoption of DTx, our strong product reputation and existing relationships within health systems, Woebot is in a period of explosive growth. We are looking for a product-minded data scientist to continue to create value for our users, customers, and execute on our IP strategy.

What you will do:

As a leader in the Product team, you will work cross-departmentally with clinical and engineering team members to build machine learning and AI algorithms that are the core of Woebot's intelligence. There are four areas we want you to own and drive:

Drive An Insights & Analytics Culture
You will help create data analysis and analytics pipelines that improve not only the underlying ML algorithms but also the product and the user's experience.
You will lead a team of Analysts and be responsible for good data driven hygiene, including the creation, redesign, and maintenance of analytics dashboards and BI tools such as BigQuery, Google Data Studio, or Tableau.
You will also advise on data labeling strategy so that Woebot's conversational engine is continuously improved and informs changes in features, content, and UX.
Improve User Personalization:
Woebot exchanges 4.7 M messages with our users every week. You will create & lead a data-driven personalization strategy for this audience.
We consider personalization to be key for developing a relationship over time while delivering precision interventions, that is; the right method to the right person at the right time.
Contribute To Evidence:
In the next 6 months, you'll help Woebot develop evidence & trends to demonstrate the value of our highest priority products.
You're helping answer the most pressing questions in the mental health field around engagement, dose, and treatment outcomes.
In partnership with our Clinical team and academic partners, we expect you to contribute to our pipeline of peer-reviewed published research.
In addition to some platform-related pieces, you will lead publication in Data Science and HCI research.
What Your First 90 Days Could Look Like
By Day 30 - Assess the lay of the landscape & team - and make suggestions around in house analytic tools, dashboard and strategies.
By Day 60 - understand the roadmap with our founder and reverse engineer our tailored interventions. Deliver a prioritized list of roadmap items.
By Day 90 - Submit your first publication. Execute on a plan for improving user outcomes with our analytics and ML.
Role Specific Competencies:
PhD in Data Analysis or ML/AI or computational field with 8-10+ years of applied experience
Knowledge of one or more modern ML/NLP frameworks, such as PyTorch, Tensorflow, or Keras
Track Record of publishing in peer reviewed academic literature
You've led and managed other analysts and data scientists.
Strong written and verbal communication skills
What you will add to our culture:
Strong work-ethic: Works hard to get a job done.
Proactive & flexible: Able to hit the ground running, takes responsibility for finding a way to get the job done.
Empathic: Place a high value on user-experience, are a team player motivated to help others be successful.
High standards: Applies high standards toward everything.
Humble: You want to learn and grow in the role, and are open to feedback on how to do that.
What we offer:
Competitive Salary
Stock Options
Flexible PTO
Health, Dental & Vision
Healthy Snacks & Meals
Woebot is an equal opportunity employer and we deeply value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",4.1,Woebot Health,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,3,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,CA,4608,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,0
1221,221,Data Scientist - Two Sigma Insurance Quantified,$111k-$178k,"Two Sigma is a different kind of investment manager. Since 2001, we have used data science and technology to derive insights that forecast the future and discover value in markets worldwide. Our team of scientists, technologists and academics looks beyond traditional finance to understand the bigger picture and develop creative solutions to some of the world’s most challenging economic problems. Our work spans across markets and industries, from insurance and securities to private investments and new ventures.

Two Sigma IQ works closely with its industry partners to deliver products and solutions, which lead to enhanced automation and data-driven decision making. Comprised of a diversified and growing team of highly skilled data scientists, engineers, and business professionals, Two Sigma IQ possesses the agility and innovation of a dynamic startup with the resources and long-term view of Two Sigma. Learn more about TSIQ at https://twosigmaiq.com/

You will take on the following responsibilities:
Work with large, possibly unstructured datasets;
Perform exploratory data analysis and develop predictive models using large data sets
Carry out independent investigations/research studies and produce reports and visualizations to communicate your results;
Generate statistical models for a variety of phenomena;
Interact with industry professionals to understand their business and propose technical/statistical approaches;
Write libraries and research tools, developing and maintaining a research infrastructure to accelerate future results.

You should possess the following qualifications:
A strong academic record with at least one degree in a technical discipline.
Solid knowledge of Computer Science and Statistics.
Experience with data analysis tools (R, numpy/pandas/scikit-learn) and SQL.
Advanced programming skills in Python
Experience producing research reports and predictive models.
Good communication skills, both written and verbal.
Interest in working in a fast-paced and dynamic environment.

You will enjoy the following benefits:
Core Benefits: Fully paid medical and dental insurance premiums for employees and dependents, competitive 401k match, employer-paid life & disability insurance
Perks: Onsite gyms with laundry service, wellness activities, casual dress, snacks, game rooms
Learning: Tuition reimbursement, conference and training sponsorship
Time Off: Generous vacation and unlimited sick days, competitive paid caregiver leaves

We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or any other applicable legally protected characteristics.",4.5,Two Sigma,"New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,19,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.5,NY,2791,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1223,223,Senior Data Scientist,$82k-$134k,"As a leading mobile games developer, Jam City is looking to “level up” our talent. We’re on the hunt for innovators who consider themselves dynamic, collaborative, and thrive in a fast-paced environment.

PERKS & BENEFITS
Unlimited Vacation, Paid Sick Days & Holidays
100% Employee Covered Medical, Dental, Vision Plan Base Plan
Life Insurance, 401k, Flexible Spending Accounts, Commuter Benefits & More
Catered Lunches & Well-stocked Kitchens
Yoga & Wellness Activities
Happy Hours
Company Events
Dog Friendly

Jam City is looking for passionate, engaged and data driven individuals to join our growing Data Science team. We are searching for Data Scientists ready to work across our portfolio of games and be involved in every part of the process of delivering fun to millions of users worldwide. Working with our state of the art data infrastructure and diverse team you will see your contributions influence every aspect of our games, from marketing to production and even gameplay. As part of a data driven gaming and entertainment company you’ll be well placed to see your models and analysis shape the future of the company.

Our ideal candidate has experience working with large scale data sets and driving projects from conception to completion. Additionally they are able to take models or analysis one step farther and use data to tell stories and create understanding both within the analytics team and across the entire company. If doing a deep dive into the latest cutting edge literature on neural networks or probabilistic programming in the morning and working with game designers or engineers to turn findings into product in the afternoon sounds fun then you’ll fit right in at Jam City.
RESPONSIBILITIES:
Use your knowledge of data cleaning, statistical analysis and visualization to turn numbers into results that make Jam City’s games better.
Collaborate with stakeholders ranging from marketers to product managers and artists to make sure that data informs decisions at all levels of Jam City.
Work on a mixture of short term tactical analysis that deals with immediate needs and long term strategic projects that drive major change within the company.
Create data visualizations and analysis pipelines that turn complicated problems into simple solutions for stakeholders.
Experiment with cutting edge techniques to help drive the next generation of analytics at Jam City.
QUALIFICATIONS:
An advanced or postgraduate degree in a quantitative field.
The ability to use SQL or a scripting language such as Python or Scala to generate, clean and explore complex datasets.
A demonstrated track record of using statistical languages/packages such as R or Python to build features, create models and explore datasets.
Experience presenting and describing complex datasets or statistical processes to audiences without a technical background.
The ability to learn and use skills that you already have to tackle new problems in a creative way.
NICE TO HAVE:
Evidence of presentations/publications demonstrating the ability to drive research projects from start to finish.
Experience with neural network frameworks such as Tensorflow/Torch.
Knowledge of Apache Spark and associated products.
Or some other unique skill that you can teach the team to help us level up our analytical capabilities!
ABOUT JAM CITY
Jam City is an award-winning mobile entertainment studio providing unique and deeply engaging games that appeal to a broad, global audience.

Led by CEO Chris DeWolfe, former MySpace co-founder and CEO, and COO Josh Yguado, former 20th Century Fox executive, Jam City is the creative powerhouse behind some of the highest-grossing and most enduring mobile games. Jam City’s global franchise Cookie Jam has generated more than half a billion dollars, and Panda Pop has more than 120 million downloads to date.

The company also is the go-to studio for Hollywood, having developed immersive, narrative-rich mobile games around iconic entertainment brands. The company’s popular RPG game Harry Potter: Hogwarts Mystery was the #1 game in more than 40 countries at its launch in April 2018.

Jam City has nine studios located in Los Angeles (HQ), Berlin, Buenos Aires, Bogotá, Burbank, Cedar Falls, San Diego, San Francisco, and Toronto.",3.9,Jam City,"Culver City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,10,Company - Private,Video Games,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,CA,4260,1,data scientist,1,0,0,1,1,0,0,0,0
1224,224,Lead Data Scientist,$82k-$134k,"Summary
Tranzact is hiring a lead data scientist to assist our team in driving our data science and analytics group forward. You’ll be joining a group of curious, smart, technically minded yet business savvy data scientists looking to make a difference to the company by further designing and building out our data decisioning capabilities. We have been up and running for several years and our team must grow to meet the demands of our business partners—they see the value we have provided and want more.

The Lead Data Scientist is passionate about using data and insights to drive business strategy and develop data products. A successful candidate will manage data science projects including scoping, designing, and executing the vision with the help of more junior data scientists / analysts. They would also identify and prioritize initiatives to deliver value to our internal stakeholders. The ideal candidate would have experience managing data science projects, managing stakeholders, and working cross functionally. This person would have real world experience “in the data trenches” as a data scientist and be an all-star individual contributor. We expect this person to have a passion for driving projects for business outcomes, strong analytical skills, and a strong desire to make an impact in our growing data science practice!

What you’ll do:
Become the domain expert in multiple areas of the Tranzact business (i.e. retention, call center effectiveness, etc.) and contribute to the advancement of those area through thought leadership.
Lead new projects and initiatives through understanding business needs, executing, presenting and influencing stakeholders.
Be a technical leader on the team that can advise, mentor, and delegate tasks to more junior data scientists and analysts.
Facilitate data-driven decision making and prioritize initiatives.
Develop strong cross functional partnerships with business and technology stakeholders.
Act as a subject matter expert within the organization on all things data.
Find new and improved ways for us to use data in our products, operations, and business strategies.

What we do:
We achieve competitive advantage through data-driven marketing and full management of the customer experience. We’re constantly refining our technology and our strategies, that’s why we’re the industry leader in delivering the best results to the top insurance brands in America.

That’s not just lip service either, we’re consistently awarded partner of the year from brands like AFLAC, Humana, and more. Our work has also been featured on The Dr. Oz Show, Forbes, and Vox -- to name a few.

We want people who fit within our Be Real culture. We want a diversity of programmers and writers and designers and data scientists and strategists and more. We’re made up of introverts and extroverts, suits and rebels, corporate types and anti-corporate types. We’re an environment where every person feels their full potential is only limited by their ability to conceive of it and make it happen. Our company grew from entrepreneurial roots but has big company resources to get amazing things done.

What we’re looking for:
BA/BS in a quantitative field (Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, etc.)
5 years of experience in data science at a B2C or direct to consumer company (experience in marketing, business operations, or customer retention is a plus)
Experience implementing predictive and prescriptive models in production systems
Experience managing data science projects and mentoring data scientists / analysts
Proficiency with Python, SQL, Excel, and a data visualization tool (Tableau, Power BI, etc.)
Ability to manage multiple projects and deadlines
Experience communicating strategy and results to different audiences
Ability to work cross functionally and influence others
A lifelong learner that is excited to learn new data science technologies and apply those to technologies to our business
Ability to be objective, follow the facts, cut through noise and create a story with data
Thrives in a fast-paced environment that is constantly changing
What’s in it for you:
Medical, dental, vision, paid time off/holidays, 401(k), and bonus opportunity
Frequent office events and outings
Employee development programs, conference and training reimbursement
Work remote flexibility
Joining a growing and exciting team making a big impact on the business!
EOE, including disability/vets",3.7,TRANZACT,"Raleigh, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,31,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,NC,4454,1,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1226,226,"Data Scientist, Cloud Business Operations",$82k-$134k,"53303

About NetApp

NetApp provides software, systems, and services to manage, store and share data via on-premises, and private and public clouds to customers worldwide. NetApp is emerging as a leader in providing public cloud services on all major cloud platforms, including Amazon Web Services (AWS), Microsoft , and Google Cloud Platform (GCP). These cloud services, such as Cloud Volumes; Cloud Insights, Virtual Desktop Service, Global File Cache, SaaS backup, and Spot, avails customers to consider many more options on how and where to manage their critical workloads and data for optimal business and financial outcomes. The NetApp Public Cloud Services business unit is at the forefront of our effort to transform NetApp into a leader in the cloud market.
Job Summary
About the Position

This Cloud Business Operations Data Scientist will be the primary go to person for all of NetApp Public Cloud Services needs for analyzing tons of cloud services usage and billing data to derive intelligent business insights for enabling NetApp’s highest growth business. This person will be an expert in both understanding the data, as well as architecting and developing business logic and code to deliver automation in business intelligence. This is a highly technical role with deep understanding of Azure programming, R, SQL databases, visualization on Tableau, and scripting, along with years of experience in cloud services business operations. Knowledge of public cloud-based transactions on the top 3 cloud provider marketplaces (AWS, Azure and GCP) is a must, along with experience and understanding of integrations with internal systems for CRM, CPQ, Subscriptions Billing and Finance.

This role will coordinate with product management, IT and operations, and other NetApp functions including sales, marketing, and finance to understand, analyze and improve product pricing, SKU design, and transaction processing of our existing cloud offerings and upcoming innovations. This role will also act as the primary operations liaison between product management teams and business operations. The right person for this role has deep understanding of public cloud marketplace transaction processing, billing, metering, and revenue/usage reporting. This person also has extensive experience in dealing with cross-functional business requirements and engaging with key stakeholders at both the executive/VP level and with delivery teams.
Job Requirements
Key Responsibilities
Analyze usage and billing data from multiple sources to derive business intelligence
Develop business logic and write code to automate BI output
Design and develop visualization dashboards in Tableau
Understand public cloud marketplace transaction processes and provide guidance to business operations teams on implementation best practices
Leverage business insights to provide guidance to product management for pricing and transaction processing design
Skills and Qualifications
10+ years of experience working with various cloud providers, software vendors and/or consulting organizations
5+ years of experience in data analysis and business insights
5+ years of experience in Azure programming, R, SQL databases and Tableau
Understanding of enterprise cloud solutions and related technical offerings
Collaborative personality; comfortable working across many functions and teams, and engaging with senior executives
A creative go-getter who is full of ideas and can execute on those ideas in a fast-paced, demanding environment with excellent interpersonal and social skills
A bachelor’s degree in engineering or science is required. A master’s degree is data science, data analysis or statistics is preferred.
Travel Required

20% (includes domestic and int.)
Education
A bachelor’s degree in engineering or science is required. A master’s degree is data science, data analysis or statistics is preferred.

Nearest Major Market: San Jose
Nearest Secondary Market: Palo Alto
Job Segment:
Operations Manager, Scientific, Database, Cloud, Operations, Engineering, Technology

Apply now »",3.8,NetApp,"Sunnyvale, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,28,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,CA,4069,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
1227,227,Data Science All Star Program - Data Scientist Track,$82k-$134k,"Data Science All Star Program - Data Scientist Track

Job Title

Data Science All Star Program - Data Scientist Track

Job
ID

27241005

Duration

Location

Columbia,

MD

Other Location

Description

Dynamic, Fast-growing, Entrepreneurial Data Science Solutions Company seeking data Scientists! If you’ve got entrepreneurial spirit and passion, are driven by results, and want to be a part of significant growth, we’re looking for you!

BLEND360 is a multi-award winning Marketing Company who is privileged to provide our services to some of the most respected and recognized brands in the world. At BLEND360 it is all about advancing our clients marketing capabilities and performance.

If you are ready to ignite the fire for digital marketing and join our team, please keep reading!

*************************************************************************************

Our Data Science All Stars Program is a 6-month consultant training program for master’s graduates in Analytics, Statistics, and other quantitative programs. Participants will have the opportunity to learn from top Data Scientists, work on real-world analytics projects, and gain experience with Fortune 500 clients across a variety of verticals. They will work alongside our Data Scientists to get data into proper shape, perform statistical analyses and develop predictive models to solve our clients’ business problems.

The primary objective of this program is to develop participants into productive, client engaged BLEND360 employees and set the foundation to build a fast track career in one of 4 areas:

Data Science

Data Engineering

Marketing- Adobe Cloud

Marketing Analytics .

The All-star focused on Data Science will receive internal training on tools, technology platforms (R, SQL, Excel) and modeling processes, learn how to apply theory to actual client project work, and hone business skills and applications of Data Science skills on business problems.

The four main areas of training will be:
Analytical methods
Technology programs and platforms
Data management and analysis
Business applications and approaches
The Details:
Location: Columbia, MD
Travel: Up to 25% (could be as much as 30% - 40% depending on projects)
Duration:Full-time
Benefits:Health, Vision, Dental, 401K plan, Life Insurance, Pretax Commuter Benefits, and an incredibly supportive team cheering you on!
Desired Qualifications:
MS degree in Business Analytics, Statistics, Math, or another quantitative discipline
Previous Data Science or Analytical experience or internships
Knowledge of predictive modeling and statistical analysis, as well as machine learning, text mining, geo-spatial analytics, time series forecasting, or optimization
Experience with one or more Advanced Data Science software languages such as R, Python, MATLAB, SAS, Java, or PHP
Experience with structured or un-structured data analysis tools such as SQL, Hadoop, Spark, NoSQL, MySQL, MariaDB, Hive, Pig, etc.
Experience with Google Analytics, Adobe Analytics, or other digital analytics tools a plus",4.5,Blend360,"Columbia, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,18,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,MD,3046,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
1228,228,"Sr.Manager, Digital Data Science Management",$82k-$134k,"Sr.Manager, Digital Data Science Management
Location


Englewood Cliffs, New Jersey

Department (Org 2)


Analytics & Data Sciences- S20568

Job Requisition

24436

Apply Now


Company:
LG Electronics U.S. (LGEUS)

Job Function:
Marketing

At LG, innovation is the foundation of everything we do. We make products and services that make lives better, easier and happier through increased functionality and fun. Put simply, we make “Life Good” – from home appliances, consumer electronics, vehicle components and mobile communications to business innovations in digital signage, air conditioning, solar and LED lighting.

We are currently seeking our newest innovator to join our dynamic team as a Senior Manager, Digital Data Science Management (Head of Analytics) on the Digital Transformation (DXP) Team!

Job Summary

Responsibilities

The analytics and data Science team at LGE (dXp) is looking for a candidate to lead the Analytics practice. The head of Analytics will be responsible for setting up Key performance metrics, evaluating campaigns and generating insights related to consumer digital behavior. The position will evaluate CRM, Social, Site analytics and campaign performance under the analytics umbrella, using data from all Google marketing platforms (GA360, DV360, SA360, optimizer, CM). A key part of the Head of Analytics' responsibility will be determining data visualizations, reporting procedures and cadences utilizing dynamic and interactive dashboards. The Role will work closely with other DXP teams to define campaign goals and strategy, KPIs, and implementation and ad hoc reporting needs and cadence.

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Math, Economics, Statistics or related field

Minimum of 10 years of experience in Digital Analytics experience is required

Degree preferably in one of the following areas - statistics, data science, physics, computer science or social sciences heavy in quantitative methodologies like economics, psychology, political science, sociology (but not limiting)

Solid knowledge and experience with Google Analytics (preferred but not limiting) or Omniture

Some experience with other Google platforms desired – DV360, SA360, DCM

Understanding of MarTech ecosystem/A sound knowledge of the digital space, social media, emerging tech, voice, podcasts, and related technologies

Advanced excel skills and Data visualization in tableau or google data studio preferred.

Experience with marketing campaigns with measurable outcomes

Strong conceptual, communication (written, verbal, presentation) and collaboration skill

A willingness to invent and learn you and not afraid to put an idea into action, measure its success, and apply learnings to future decisions

Proactive, organized, efficient, detail-oriented, unassailable focus on the basics, accountable, enthusiastic, able to follow detailed instructions and make thoughtful recommendations

Ability to balance multiple, competing directions and manage multiple projects successfully

Natural ability to build interpersonal relationships and manage conflict

LG Electronics, USA Inc., LG Mobile Research USA LLC, LG Electronics, Alabama, inc., LGEVU and Zenith Electronics LLC provides equal employment opportunity to all individuals regardless of their race, color, creed, religion, gender, age, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by state, federal, or local law. Further, the Company takes affirmative action to ensure that applicants are employed and employees are treated during employment without regard to any of these characteristics

#LI-YS1",3.9,LG Electronics U.S. (LGEUS),"Englewood Cliffs, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,68,Subsidiary or Business Segment,other_industries,Retail,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,NJ,3658,1,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1229,229,Associate Data Scientist – Network Analysis and Control,$82k-$134k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE’s Infrastructure and Networking Technical Center is looking for a motivated and passionate early career data scientist to join our Network Analytics department. As part of a collaborative team of scientists and engineers, you will have an opportunity to apply machine learning and data-centric approaches to complex networks. Our multidisciplinary team thrives on the opportunity to tackle new challenges in the public interest, looking for solutions that no one else has considered. We approach problems with an entrepreneurial mindset, a willingness to take risks, and a desire to advance the state of the art for intelligent networks, all while contributing to MITRE’s mission of Solving Problems for a Safer World.

Responsibilities include:
Develop prototypes of intelligent network capabilities in MITRE advanced labs
Work on collaborative research teams to develop innovative solutions using commercial and MITRE developed technologies
Conduct performance assessments of current and emerging technologies
Execute data science research beginning at data wrangling and cleaning all the way through to reporting and visualization
Scale solutions to work across large enterprises and large data sets
Analyze data from network sensor systems and integrate additional data sources for improved outcomes
Communicate technical approach and findings to internal and external stakeholders
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in related fields outlined below, or equivalent knowledge and skills.
Computer Science
Software Engineering
Electrical Engineering
Mathematics
Information Systems, Information Technology, SW Engineering
Operations Research
Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or applicants who are eligible for security clearances.
Required Qualifications:
A passion for technology and a desire to learn
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to apply, modify and formulate algorithms and processes to solve challenging problems
Knowledge of various machine learning paradigms (deep learning, reinforcement learning, neural networks, etc.) with an understanding of mathematical underpinnings of various models
Hands-on software development skills in a modern programming language (e.g. Python, R, Scala, Java)
Working knowledge of data science workflow from data acquisition to reporting findings
Strong understanding of streaming and batch data workflows, including message queues, processing directed acyclic graphs (DAGs) and data stores
Obtain and maintain a Secret level security clearance
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or similar field
Experience working with Big Data tools (e.g. Spark, Hadoop, Kafka)
Experience working with databases (e.g., PostgreSQL, Oracle, MySQL, MongoDB, Neo4j, Elasticsearch)
Familiarity with cloud-based environments like Amazon Web Services, Google Cloud, or Microsoft Azure
Experience conducting original research using data science techniques, including machine learning, statistical modeling, and data visualization
Demonstrated ability to manipulate large datasets and perform calculations leveraging a modern programming language
Familiarity with basic networking and security concepts/capabilities such as TCP/IP stack, routing, and firewalls
Exposure to network programmability concepts such as software define networking and programmable data planes
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,MITRE,"Bedford, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,MA,5347,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1230,230,Data Scientist,$82k-$134k,"The emerging next-generation pharmaceutical supply chain is characterized by the orchestration of collaborating, networked stakeholders working to the common goal of delivering pharmaceutical products to patients on-time and in-full. TraceLink is leading that transformation by leveraging the benefits of big data and cloud technologies realized through advanced algorithms, data science, and analytics. We are extending our core data science team that is responsible for delivering innovative data science solutions to our customers. The ideal candidate is an experienced data science innovator capable of methodically producing performant solutions subject to business constraints. Experience that extends back into data engineering and data collection and forward into product realization within a cloud environment is highly desirable.

Collaboratively identify data science opportunities that support business and product goals
Propose, develop, evaluate, and perfect specific data science solutions
Modify solutions to address application constraints
Integrate modified solutions into cloud-based product offerings
Communicate results and ideas to business leaders

Skills and Qualifications Wish List
Analytical, data-driven, inquisitive mindset with a bias toward precision
Superb written and oral technical communication skills
Learn quickly especially within computer technologies and mathematical concepts
Proficiency in mathematics, statistical analysis, and software development
Proficiency in data science environments, tools, and technologies
Broad knowledge of data science techniques
Ability to distinguish applicability of alternatives
Understanding of the relative performance of competing techniques
Develop, evaluate, perfect, and implement data science solutions
Clean, enhance, profile, and mine structured and unstructured data
Identify and integrate data repositories from internal and external sources
Optimize and test estimators
Perform experimental analysis and validate results
Communicate trustworthy and objective results
Implement analytical models into production by collaborating with software developers and machine learning engineers.
Valuable Additional Skills and Experience
Formal training in data science or related disciplines such as mathematics, engineering, or computer science
Experience with big data cloud technologies especially Amazon offerings
Experience with software engineering tools and processes (agile software development)
Proficiency with MSOffice and Google G Suite tools
Experience with Java, Scala, javascript, SQL, Python, R, XML, yaml, JSON, shell scripting
Proficiency with applied mathematics such as probability and statistics, stochastic systems, queueing theory, optimization, control theory, and adaptive systems.",3.9,"TraceLink, Inc.","North Reading, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,11,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,MA,2783,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1231,231,Data Scientist,$82k-$134k,"Data Scientist Opportunity in Chicago, IL!
W-2 Contract-to-Hire/Temp-to-Perm Position
$55/hour MAX
ACTIVE SECRET CLEARANCE REQUIRED

USPRO has partnered with our client in their search for a Data Scientist with an active secret clearance. This position will be remote to start, but will eventually transition to an office position in Chicago.

Overview:
Leverage your “science first” mentality, curiosity, deep technical expertise, and problem-solving skills to explore, discover, and predict patterns and insights within complex data sets.
This includes enabling government to capitalize on the value proposition of advanced analytics, and the derivation of clear narratives that help our clients understand their data and how those insights address their research questions.
Responsibilities:
Use analytical and statistical tools to evaluate data and aid in decision making.
Manipulate / create social media analytics and data to strengthen marketing campaign effectiveness
Manipulate common data formats, including comma-delimited, text files, and JSON.
Transform data and analysis into informative visualizations and interactive dashboards using open-source and commercially available tools.
Work with clients to prioritize research and modeling initiatives
Derive insights and analytic narratives from data and visualizations for effective storytelling and clear communication in response to client research questions.
Support the development of a mature analytics function informed by industry best practices
Work in a fast-paced, solutions-oriented, and collaborative environment focused on client deliverables, analysis, and reporting

Qualifications:
Degree (Master’s required) in science, technology, engineering, mathematics, computer science, economics, or other related business or technical discipline is required
Extensive experience in social media analytics and marketing campaign effectiveness.
Experience in Salesforce, Sprinklr, and Adobe Analytics - marketing analytics background
Experience working with tools, including object-oriented programming (Python, Java), computational analysis tools (R, MATLAB), and associated data science libraries (scikit-learn)
Significant experience in the AI/ML lifecycle, from ideation and solution concept development, to rapid prototyping and validation in operational environments, and importantly, in the sustainment of AI/ML solutions for CI/CD.
Significant experience and knowledge of best practices in the practical application and execution of AI/ML in operational environments.
Ability to frame and scale data problems to analyze, visualize, and find data solutions, and translate customer qualitative requirements into quantitative and technical approaches
Experience creating meaningful data visualizations and interactive dashboards using platforms such as Tableau, Qlik, Power BI, RShiny, plotly, and d3.js to communicate findings and relate them back to how your insights create business impact
Working knowledge of databases and SQL; preferred qualifications include linking analytic and data visualization products to database connections
At least 5+ years of experience in the field
DoD Secret clearance required
Superior communication skills, both oral and written
Preferred experience in the following areas:
DoD experience is preferred, in particular with human capital data and workforce analytics.
Data science methods related to data architecture, data munging, data and feature engineering, and predictive analytics
Knowledge of AI/ML SaaS platforms (e.g., DataRobot, H2O DriverlessAI)
Unstructured text and natural language processingo Computational tools such as R, Python, SAS, SQL, and MATLABo Anaconda, IBM Blue, and Oracle Big Data to analyze large data sets and develop automated analytics in making sense of data affecting DoD operations
Developing machine learning, data mining, statistical network, natural language processing, text analytics, and graph-based algorithms to analyze massive data setso Supervising algorithm implementation in on-premise and cloud-based computing environments
Developing software to generate reports and visualizations that summarize data sets and provide data-driven insights
Developing and implementing statistical, machine learning, and heuristic techniques to create descriptive, predictive, and prescriptive analytics as well as to develop statistical tests to make data-driven recommendations and decisions",4.1,USPRO,"Chicago, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,11,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,IL,4434,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
1232,232,Claims Data Scientist,$82k-$134k,"About ConcertAI

ConcertAI is the leading provider of precision oncology solutions for biopharma and healthcare, leveraging the largest collection of research-grade Real-world Data and the only broadly deployed oncology-specific AI solutions. Our mission is to improve translational sciences; accelerate therapeutic clinical development; and provide new capabilities for post-approval studies to accelerate needed new medical innovations to patients and to improve patient outcomes.
ConcertAI has emerged as one of the highest growth technology companies in Real-world Data and AI, backed by industry leading private equity companies: SymphonyAI, Declaration Partners, Maverick Ventures, and Alliance|Bernstein.

Role Summary
As a Claims Data Scientist at ConcertAI, you will be responsible for data exploration, and analysis on patient data for various stakeholders in the oncology and healthcare domain, including claims and claims-clinical linked data assets. You will report to the Vice President of Data Products. You should have a good mix of programming/CS, visualization, stats/math, and ML skills (with a particular strength in at least 2 of those areas), and ideally, you have been applying those skills in healthcare. You should have previous experience with healthcare claims. You will design methods and models around client driven needs and you will collaborate with various subject matter experts to inform those methods. You will assist the client delivery team with insights, dashboards, and ad-hoc analytics. You will also work with the engineering team to build prototypes and models for new product development.
Responsibilities
Understand external claims data assets and oversee the ingestion, processing, de-identification, and provisioning for data assets and research projects.
Understand client / product needs and translate them into tactical R&D initiatives with defined goals and timelines.
Reason about healthcare specific problems to analyze visualize, interpret, and contextualize results.
Run a variety of analytics from data QA to complex models.
Become the internal subject matter expert on all things claims.
Implement models using high level software packages (SKlearn, R, TensorFlow, Spark).
Collaborate on software projects with engineers, providing analytical guidance and contributing to codebase.
Requirements
BSc or higher in a STEM field, with formal training in CS, stats, and math.
Strong programming abilities in at least one high level language (python, stata, R).
Knowledge of statistical methods- regression, ANOVA, EDA, PCA, etc.
Basic visualization skills- matplotlib/seaborn/plotly/etc, tableau.
Experience with big data – Cloud data warehouses, cluster computing, Spark, MapReduce/Hadoop.
Experience with healthcare claims data
Intimate familiarity with the python data science stack (pandas, sklearn, numpy/scipy).
Firm understanding of claims data processing and adjudication, including rejections, re-submissions, and identifying final claims.
Ideal candidate would have a competency around linking EMR and claims data via identity management.
Learn More About ConcertAI

ConcertAI is transforming how healthcare is delivered and dedicated to improving patient outcomes in oncology by offering innovative solutions on how data and intelligence is used to solve healthcare problems. We are creating something special in our culture, by building a collaborative, engaged, patient focused, team approach to our mission. Our high-performance teams are looking to add great talent to the mix and we are hiring for the right mix of new skills and diverse mindset. Learn more about ConcertAI at www.concertai.com or on LinkedIn .",3.6,ConcertAI,Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,Remote,3678,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,0
1233,233,Staff Data Scientist,$82k-$134k,"At realtor.com, we process terabytes of data everyday and transform that data into information that powers decisions for millions of home buyers, renters, dreamers, and real estate professionals. We aim to radically simplify home buying/selling and help more people achieve the American dream on our realtor.com website and mobile apps.

What will you do?

We seek a highly seasoned Staff Data Scientist to join our experienced data science team and help take it to the next level. As a key member of the team, you will be responsible for the development of innovative concepts, research, predictive modeling, and machine learning algorithms. You will serve as a mentor for the junior data scientists on the team and provide guidance on their individual projects.

Responsibilities:
Develop predictive, explanatory models and machine learning algorithms.
Create automated learning systems that gracefully scale to increasing complexity and expectation.
Perform exploratory analysis on realtor.com's wealth of data including consumer web and mobile behavior and North America's most comprehensive and up-to-date listings and properties data set.
Effectively partner with product and engineering teams to build new data driven and machine learning based features for enriching the consumer experience of home shoppers, renters and sellers.
Design and build data science solutions to drive revenue growth, customer retention and support strategic decision making.
Generate descriptive visualizations and presentations to communicate insights.
Drive A/B & multivariate tests and design of experiments to facilitate testing of new product and design features, with focus on improving engagement, retention, and conversion.
Help improve the scope of our data sets by identifying new data collection and procurement opportunities on an ongoing basis.
Mentor a team of data scientists on data exploration, machine learning and developing data-oriented products.
Work with a sense of ownership and urgency, advocate for experimentation based, agile culture.
What will you bring?
Requirements:
PhD/MS in computer science, statistics, mathematics, operations research or related fields.
4+ years of relevant experience in data science, machine learning or applied statistics.
Experience with Machine Learning, NLP or Computer Vision and data mining tools and underlying algorithms.
Experienced in Python, R, Spark or other languages and frameworks appropriate for large scale analysis of structured and unstructured data.
Working experience with relational databases (SQL) and large scale distributed systems.
Experience with experiment design and A/B and multivariate tests.
Proven track record of developing online data products.
Strong creative thinking and problem solving skills.
Excellent oral and written communication and presentation skills.
About realtor.com

At realtor.com®, we believe that everyone deserves a home of their own. We're a community of nearly 2,000 employees that work hard to ensure that from the moment someone starts dreaming about a new home, to the moment they walk in the door and beyond, we're there to lend a helping hand. Every month, 70 million people trust us with their journey home by visiting our site and mobile apps, and we'd love to have you join our team to help.

We've got great offices across Canada and the US and lots of sweet jobs to choose from, so we're hoping you'll join us on our journey to make home buying and selling easier, and more rewarding for everyone.

Let's make a difference, together. For Real.

#LI-IH1",2.8,realtor.com,"Santa Clara, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,27,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,CA,3560,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,1,0,0
1234,234,Associate Data Scientist,$82k-$134k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE is seeking an Associate Data Scientist to join our DHS Data Analytics Department. Responsibilities for this role will include the following:
Acquire fundamental understanding of analytical equipment and tools to include open source intelligence (OSINT) platforms
Operate analytical equipment and tools
Perform processing and analysis of collected information
Support the development and application of a technical process approach to a sponsor problem
Present results in an intuitive manner that can be understood by all sponsor audiences, regardless of technical expertise and conduct insightful, actionable analyses
Utilize existing open source social media methodologies to apply specialized tools and capabilities in support of the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) national security mission
Creatively apply visualizations to large datasets using tools like Tableau, Power BI, or Qlik
Ability to understand and map data relationships
Work with sponsors, vendors, and partner contractors to gain understanding of sponsor business challenges and evaluate possible technical solutions
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelors degree in a relevant discipline
Required Qualifications:
Ability to leverage both MITRE and team knowledge effectively
Ability to work with a variety of audiences to include sponsors, vendors, and partner contractors
Experience with databases technologies (e.g., PostgreSQL, Oracle, MySQL, SQL Server, MongoDB, Neo4j)
Experience manipulating datasets with at least one modern programming language or business intelligence platform like Python, SAS, MATLAB, C++, R, Java, SQL, PL/SQL
Strong communications and interpersonal skills
Possess excellent written and verbal communication skills, adapted to a variety of audiences and technical understanding
Strong interpersonal communication skills to interact with senior Government staff, technical peers, and MITRE team members
Ability to work in a dynamic fast-paced environment
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience organizing analytic results for further analysis
Ability to find patterns in data and clearly articulate the entire analysis (e.g., methodology, results, assumptions, constraints) using various suites of tools
Experience with databases technologies (e.g., PostgreSQL, Oracle, MySQL, SQL Server, MongoDB, Neo4j)
Experience manipulating datasets with at least one modern programming language or business intelligence platform like Python, SAS, MATLAB, C++, R, Java, SQL, PL/SQL
Creatively apply visualizations to large datasets using tools like Tableau, Power BI, or Qlik
Ability to assess the quality of data or tool against a set of requirements
Ability to prepare comprehensive written reports, presentations, and charts based on research, collection, and analysis of intelligence data
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,MITRE,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,VA,4608,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1235,235,Senior Data Scientist,$82k-$134k,"The ultimate source for official answers about a business online should be the business itself. However, when consumers ask questions on company websites, too often they are left in the dark with wrong answers. Yext (NYSE: YEXT), the Search Experience Cloud, solves this problem by organizing a business's facts so it can provide official answers to consumer questions — wherever people search. Starting with the company website, then extending across search engines and voice assistants, businesses around the world, like Taco Bell, Marriott, and Jaguar Land Rover—as well as organizations like the U.S. State Department—trust Yext to radically improve the search experience on their websites and across the entire search ecosystem.

As a Senior Data Scientist you will shape how data is collected, transformed, and leveraged to develop essential new capabilities and features for Yext's products. We manage large amounts of structured master data on behalf of some of the world's largest companies and collect transactional data through end-user-facing applications we host directly for these clients. Our mission revolves around deeply understanding user intent so we can deliver relevant and accurate answers to questions, everywhere people search.

Yext clients cover a tremendous breadth of industries. We are seeking data scientists excited to discover opportunities in data across a wide variety of business domains. You will work collaboratively with cross-team partners in software engineering, product management, and strategy. This approach will allow you to participate fully in the product development lifecycle and make pragmatic decisions about the design, training, and deployment of machine learning models driving key product features.

What You'll Do
Partner with product management and engineering teams throughout the product development lifecycle
Solve ""full stack"" Data Science problems – Implement solutions to a data science problem in a production environment, coping with all the challenges (such as data cleanliness, performance, unexpected feedback loops, and concept drift) that arise
Articulate Data Science and machine learning concepts to a variety of audiences (product managers, software engineers, executives, sales partners)
Mentor junior team members, provide technical leadership and execution guidance
Dive deep into the details when called for while demonstrating good judgement about when to simplify and prioritize
What You Have
Advanced degree in a quantitative discipline, e.g., computer science, mathematics, business analytics, statistics, applied mathematics, economics, or operations research, or similar college level education
5+ years of work experience working in a technical role
Autodidactic, Self directed – You are able to dive into a new unfamiliar problem domain and start learning about it – You are comfortable with uncertainty and project evolution
Effective communicator, a good writer, and know effective means of visually displaying quantitative information
Experience leading cross-functional agile work streams and scaling data-driven initiatives
Fluency with data analysis software and tools such as Python and SQL
Exceptional multi-tasking, project management, and leadership skills
Bonus Points
Experience with JVM languages (Java, Scala) a plus. GoLang or C++ also great!
Experience with AWS, Linux and Mac environments
Excellent ability to cope with ""glue"" problems - shell scripting, debugging python environment problems, fixing broken packages
Knowledge of Python or R, and the machine learning, data processing and visualization packages (e.g. Pandas, Numpy, scikit-learn, Matplotlib)
Knowledge of SQL and databases like MySQL, Postgres, Presto and Hive.
Knowledge of neural network packages (TensorFlow, PyTorch) and state-of-the-art transformer/NLP models and techniques (e.g. FastText, BERT, et al.)
Knowledge of statistics and good experimental practices (e.g. how to run a powerful A/B test and test for significance)
Knowledge of techniques in unsupervised machine learning and information retrieval and mining (e.g. DBSCAN, k-Means, indexes)
Yext is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ethnicity, religion, creed, national origin, ancestry, genetics, sex, pregnancy or childbirth, sexual orientation, gender (including gender identity or nonbinary or nonconformity and/or status as a trans individual), age, physical or mental disability, citizenship, marital, parental and/or familial status, past, current or prospective service in the uniformed services, or any characteristic protected under applicable law. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.

#LI-JP1",4.2,Yext,"New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,14,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,NY,4886,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,1
1236,236,Sr Data Science Analyst,$82k-$134k,"Job Summary
The Sr. Data Science Analyst operates as an internal consultant, finding solutions to the most critical organizational challenges in a fast-paced health care environment, leading to improved patient outcomes and performance for our business partners. The challenges that are complex from a methodology or business perspective are frequently the types of projects that this role tackles.
Reponsibilities
Successfully guide Data Science projects from concept to completion as a combination of Data Science subject matter expert, project manager, and business analyst.
Perform Research and Development to generate new products and/or ways to use our data to improve patient outcomes.
Translate identified business challenges or opportunities into actionable project efforts with defined scope and goals.
Create visual concepts/mockups that foster a shared understanding of business challenges or opportunities.
Coalescing stakeholders toward reasonable project objectives that address the most pressing challenges of our business.
Collaborate and coordinate with clinical, business, IT and engineering partners in the design and development of products that address key business challenges using internal and/or external data.
Effectively communicate the practical nature of the results of various analyses to business stakeholders using illustrations and practical language.
Pilot a proposed solution to demonstrate its effectiveness and/or suggest improvements.
Create reports documenting key findings, observations, outcomes, and/or recommendations clearly.
Develop, document and maintain code in a clear and reproducible manner.
Perform other duties and responsibilities as required, assigned, or requested.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Business Information Systems, Mathematics, Economics, Statistics or related technical field required; advanced degree preferred
5+ years of experience in analytics role
3+ years of experience with SQL; fluent in basic operators, joins, date and character functions;
3+ years of experience with R or Python, particularly with ggplot/matplotlib, statistics and analytics packages
3+ years of experience addressing practical business challenges in a Data Science/Analytics role
Professional experience as a project/program manager and/or business analyst preferred
Certifications in Data Science, Health Information Technology, Lean, Six Sigma, project management and/or business analysis a plus
Experience with RegEx, RShiny, R Markdown, Atlassian suite (Jira, Bitbucket, Concurrence), MS Excel (particularly pivot tables) and MS Access (VBA) preferred
Results-oriented mentality, capable of fluidly moving between roles and projects.
Team-first orientation, thriving in a collaborative, team-based work environment.
Self-starter mindset with desire to learn on an ongoing basis.
Problem-solver mentality – one who finds creative solutions instead of accepting obstacles as fixed.
Prioritization skills that allow one to cope well with ambiguity, changing requirements, dynamic scope, competing objectives and changes in direction
Willingness to lead the charge to change assumptions, risks and issues into reasonable project direction
Inquisitive nature and reasonable degree of comfort in asking tough questions when needed
Ability to accept and internalize coaching guidance
Willingness to adapt to approaches that meet stakeholder needs
Solid facilitator skillset – one who can align a room full of stakeholders with competing interests toward a narrow set of key objectives
Ability to tell stories through pictures and whiteboarding, often off-the-cuff
Ability to alter communication styles effectively for stakeholders varying from Specialists to C-Suite
Ability to serve as a liaison between business, clinical and IT professionals
Willingness to unearth, track and resolve the detail-level challenges that frequently derail project efforts
Conceptual understanding of Big Data methods
Ability to identify trends or correlations between factors and responses using methods such as trend analysis, regression modeling, clustering, principal components analysis and various feature engineering methods
Ability to conduct designed experiments to establish cause-effect relationships, as well as optimization experiments
Honesty, integrity, and emotional intelligence
Working knowledge of classical statistical / hypothesis testing techniques.
Experience with geospatial analytics platforms, particularly Esri, a plus
Experience with visualization tools, including Tableau, a plus
Experience with prototype development and/or UI/UX Design a plus
Experience with other programming languages and data exchange formats (Java, C#, XML, JSON) a plus
Experience with deep learning (particularly Tensorflow or other GPU-based) a plus
Experience with Natural Language Processing a plus
Experience with automated machine learning (H20, DataRobot) a plus
Experience with big data environments and methodologies (NoSQL, MongoDB, Spark, Hadoop) a plus",3.7,"naviHealth, Inc.","Brentwood, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,8,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,TN,5028,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,0
1237,237,Lead HR Data Scientist,$82k-$134k,"Description

Job Description:

Leidos is seeking a Lead HR Data Scientist to support our HR and Talent Acquisitions teams. The ideal candidate will have strong analytical skills, knowledge of data science principles, and the ability to explain complex technical concepts to HR professionals with non-technical backgrounds. The Lead HR Data Scientist will also advise other HR Executives and Leaders on business problems and provide them with clear, actionable recommendations to address those challenges.

Primary Responsibilities include:

Deliver meaningful metrics, trends, key insights, and analytic solutions in all areas of HR support and services.
Perform quantitative and qualitative analyses answering key business questions, covering all aspects of the employee lifecycle and ROI/efficiency. Present information and insights to all layers of the organization in a concise, clear, and timely manner.
Create HR focused forecasting and machine learning models, integrating HR data with data from other business functional groups.
Analyze current and historical trends based on large data-sets for building AI algorithms, to predict future success.
Provide analysis of historical data from HR and other business functional groups for model creation and training.
Audit performance data that is being used to train AI model, testing for adverse impacts in modeling prediction.
Support AI/ ML HR focused initiatives across the Leidos enterprise.

Basic Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in a relevant technical field with 8+ years of experience or a Master's degree in a relevant technical field with 5+ years of experience (additional experience, education or training will be considered)
Minimum of three (3) years of experience with HR data and workforce analytics particularly maintaining, understanding, interpreting, and forecasting data OR comparable data analysis experience
Minimum of five (5) years of performing queries, performing ETL or data wrangling actions, developing reports and visualizations, and a variety of analytic products
Experience with machine learning techniques, algorithms and AI
Experience with applied statistics skills, such as distributions, statistical testing, regression, etc.
Ability to understand and analyze datasets required for machine learning and AI algorithms. Experience processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis
Proficiency with program languages, tools, and applications (e.g. Python, SQL, R, ArcGIS, Tableau, ggplot) for analysis and visualization of data
Exceptional ability to visually present and communicate data, analyses, and finding
Experience with Tableau, Alteryx, Power BI, and/or similar data analysis, visualization and business intelligence tools
Ability to identify, analyze, and resolve problems logically and systematically
Attention to detail and a thorough understanding of data and the organization structure, including impacts to data/metrics due to changes in organizational structure
Excellent verbal, communication, project management and analytical skills
Ability to work in a fast paced, complex organization and meet deadlines
Ability to maintain discretion and confidentiality with sensitive employee information
Ability to work independently and be part of a cross-functional team environment
Expertise in Microsoft Office (Excel, Word and PowerPoint)

Preferred Qualifications:

Experience with handling unstructured data
Experience with SQL
Experience with Workday HR & ATS and Power BI
Ability to perform scripting and programming skills such as Java, C/C++ is a plus
Ability to navigate Leidos through data privacy and data governance issues

External Referral Bonus:
Ineligible

Potential for Telework:
Yes, 100%

Clearance Level Required:
None

Travel:
No

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world's toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company's 33,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Virginia, Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $10.19 billion for the fiscal year ended December 28, 2018. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.6,Leidos,"Reston, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,51,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,VA,5664,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
1238,238,Senior Data Engineer,$82k-$134k,"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta has an immediate need for a Senior Data Engineer to join a fast-paced program in support of a government customer with a very critical national security mission. This is a multi-year program, where the successful candidate will work on an interdisciplinary project team of more than 30 highly qualified individuals with a wide array of skills that include client (reactjs), server (spring java), QA Automation Engineers, UI/UX Designers, and DevOps engineers. The team is responsible for building a next generation Mission Information System and is performing greenfield Software Development using modern technologies via an Agile DevOps approach.

This Senior Data Engineer will play a vital role collaborating as part of this cross-functional Agile team to create and enhance data ingestion pipelines and address big data challenges. The Senior Data Engineer will work closely with the Chief Architect, systems engineers, software engineers, and data scientists on the following key tasks:
Provide Extraction, Transformation, and Load (ETL) experience coupled with enterprise search capabilities to solve Big Data challenges
Design and implement high-volume data ingestion and streaming pipelines using Open Source frameworks like Apache Spark, Flink, Nifi, and Kafka on AWS Cloud
Leverage strategic and analytical skills to understand and solve customer and business centric questions
Create prototypes and proofs of concept for iterative development
Learn new technologies and apply the knowledge in production systems
Monitor and troubleshoot performance issues on the enterprise data pipelines and the data lake
Partner with various teams to define and execute data acquisition, transformation, processing and make data actionable for operational and analytics initiatives

Required Qualifications / Experience:

BS in Computer Science, Systems Engineering, or a related technical field or equivalent experience with at least 8+ years in systems engineering or administration (6+ years with a MS/MIS Degree).
Must have an active Top Secret security clearance and able to obtain a TS/SCI with Polygraph.
3 years of experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, NiFi.
3 years of experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python (preferred) and/or Java.
3 years of experience with and managing data across relational SQL and NoSQL databases like MySQL, Postgres, Cassandra, HDFS, Redis, and Elasticsearch.
3 years of experience working in a Linux environment.
2 years of experience working with and designing REST APIs.
Experience in designing/developing platform components like caching, messaging, event processing, automation, transformation and tooling frameworks.
Experience developing data ingest workflows with stream-processing systems: Spark-Streaming, Kafka Streams and/or Flink.
Experience transforming data in various formats, including JSON, XML, CSV, and zipped files.
Experience with performance tuning of ETL jobs.
Experience developing flexible ontologies to fit data from multiple sources and implementing the ontology in the form of database mappings / schemas.
Strong interpersonal and communication skills necessary to work effectively with customers and other team members.

Preferred Qualifications / Experience:

Data engineering experience in the Intelligence Community or other government agencies.
Experience with Microservices architecture components, including Docker and Kubernetes.
Experience developing microservices to fit data cleansing, transformation and enrichment needs.
Experience with AWS cloud services: EC2, S3, EMR, RDS, Redshift, Athena and/or Glue.
Experience with Jira, Confluence and extensive experience with Agile methodologies.
Knowledge about security and best practices.
Experience developing flexible data ingest and enrichment pipelines, to easily accommodate new and existing data sources.
Experience with software configuration management tools such as Git/Gitlab, Salt, Confluence, etc.
Experience with continuous integration and deployment (CI/CD) pipelines and their enabling tools such as Jenkins, Nexus, etc.
Detailed oriented/self-motivated with the ability to learn and deploy new technology quickly.

Clearance Level: TS/SCI with Poly

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,Novetta,"Reston, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,8,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,VA,6011,1,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1241,241,Data Engineer,$82k-$134k,"Maxar is seeking a Data Engineer to join our team. We use quick iteration and regular feedback to prototype for our government customers before ultimately discovering the perfect fit. We embed our Data Engineers with analytic teams to create dynamic and flexible data storage solutions that can be queried in a wide variety of ways.

Life with Us

Project:
Were collecting and aggregating feature data from many different sources in order to model a spatial distribution. We use Apache NiFi and need a skilled developer to create and monitor inputs and implement streaming data enrichments for our analytic workflows.
The team is currently well-sorted with regards to geospatial tools and techniques, but to round out the team properly we need someone to help accelerate our backend development timelines.

Career:
Were very serious about professional development and continuing education. We offer everyone the opportunity to define their own career trajectory. Our group has some amazing resources at its disposal specifically for this purpose. You will work with your direct supervisor and/or a mentor to set appropriate goals and design a plan to help you make consistent progress.
Dedicated professional development time; conference attendance; corporate partner and industry training; peer groups; paid certifications; education reimbursement; student loan forgiveness; hackathons! And much more

Day-to-day with your colleague:
Youll be developing data pipelines and analytic enhancements. These transformations are used to facilitate greater workforce performance by:
Encouraging further analytic exploration.
Structuring data for use by multiple applications.
Enabling potential in the workforce that is otherwise stifled by imperfect technologies.
We work in very Lean Agile environment without the overhead associated with traditional Scrum. Weve eliminated unnecessary development meetings and we love it!

Responsibilities:

Meet with the customer to understand and refine the requirements.
Use Nifi and Python to create data flows and transformations.
Understand the workflow of the project.
Work with the customer to implement any requested updates.
Move data storage to RDS.
Work with security to ensure the entire system is compliant.
Compile security controls and artifacts.
Contribute to the Standard Operating Procedures and other related documents.

Minimum Requirements:
Must be a U.S. Citizen and have a TS/SCI security clearance with Polygraph.
Bachelor's degree in Geography or related field.
5 years of relevant, professional experience.
Experience automating workflows using Python Experience with SQL and/or PostgreSQL/PostGIS.
Knowledge of best practices for data standards, data management, data quality Ability to communicate analysis to experts and laypersons alike.

Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with geospatial software such as ArcGIS, QGIS or willingness to learn.
Experience using Python with spatial data.

#cjpost",3.5,Maxar Technologies,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,VA,2959,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1242,242,Data Engineer,$82k-$134k,"Description

Job Description:

Are you ready to join Leidos all-star team? Through training, teamwork, and exposure to challenging technical work, let Leidos show how to accelerate your career path.

The Leidos Innovations Center has an exciting opening for you, our next Data Engineer to assist with the design, development and implementation of alternative data ingestion pipelines to augment the National Media Exploitation Center (NMEC) data services in Reston, VA. The DOMEX Data Discovery Platform (D3P) program is a next generation machine learning pipeline platform providing cutting edge data enrichment, triage, and analytics capabilities to Defense and Intelligence Community members. This engineer will collaborate as part of a cross-functional Agile team to create and enhance data ingestion pipelines and addressing Big data challenges.

You will work closely with the chief architect, systems engineers, software engineers, and data scientists on the following key tasks:

• Provide Extraction, Transformation, and Load (ETL) experience coupled with enterprise search capabilities to solve Big Data challenges
• Design and implement high-volume data ingestion and streaming pipelines using Open Source frameworks like Apache Spark, Flink, Nifi, and Kafka on AWS Cloud
• Leverage strategic and analytical skills to understand and solve customer and business centric questions
• Create prototypes and proofs of concept for iterative development
• Learn new technologies and apply the knowledge in production systems
• Monitor and troubleshoot performance issues on the enterprise data pipelines and the data lake
• Partner with various teams to define and execute data acquisition, transformation, processing and make data actionable for operational and analytics initiatives

This is you?
• BS in Computer Science, Systems Engineering, or related technical field or equivalent experience with at least 8+ years in systems engineering or administration (4+ years with a MS/MIS Degree).
• Must have an active Top Secret security clearance and able to obtain a TS/SCI with Polygraph.
• 2 years of experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, NiFi
• 2 years of experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python (preferred) and/or Java
• 2 years of experience with and managing data across relational SQL and NoSQL databases like MySQL, Postgres, Cassandra, HDFS, Redis, and Elasticsearch
• 2 years of experience working in a Linux environment
• Experience working with and designing REST APIs
• Experience developing data ingest workflows with stream-processing systems: Spark-Streaming, Kafka Streams and/or Flink
• Experience transforming data in various formats, including JSON, XML, CSV, and zipped files
• Experience developing flexible ontologies to fit data from multiple sources and implementing the ontology in the form of database mappings / schemas
• Good interpersonal and communication skills necessary to work effectively with customers and other team members.

You will wow us if you have these skills:
• Data engineering experience in Intelligence Community or other government agencies
• Experience with Microservices architecture components, including Docker and Kubernetes.
• Experience with AWS cloud services: EC2, S3, EMR, RDS, Redshift, Athena and/or Glue
• Experience with Jira, Confluence and extensive experience with Agile methodologies.
• Knowledge about security and best practices.
• Experience developing flexible data ingest and enrichment pipelines, to easily accommodate new and existing data sources
• Experience with software configuration management tools such as Git/Gitlab, Salt, Confluence, etc.
• Experience with continuous integration and deployment (CI/CD) pipelines and their enabling tools such as Jenkins, Nexus, etc.
• Detailed oriented/self-motivated with the ability to learn and deploy new technology quickly

Additional Program Information
The DOMEX Data Discovery Platform (D3P) program will advance the state of the art in mission-focused big data analytics tools and micro-service development spanning the breadth of Agile sprints to multiyear research and development cycles. We are looking for you to have a demonstrated aptitude for problem solving complex technical issues, identifying, transforming, thinking outside the box, and a strong sense of accountability. Have a mix of technical excellence, intellectual curiosity, communications skills, customer-focus, and operational experience to improve the performance and user adoption of high-end data analytics platforms in partnership with a highly qualified, highly motivated team. Be motivated, self-driven team player who can multi-task and interact well with others and advise/consult with other team members on systems engineering and software development related issues.

LInC
D3P
External Referral Eligible

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret

Travel:
Yes, 10% of the time

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Software Engineering

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world's toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company's 33,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Virginia, Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $10.19 billion for the fiscal year ended December 28, 2018. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.6,Leidos,"Reston, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,51,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,VA,6891,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1243,243,Senior Biological Data Scientist,$82k-$134k,"Axle Informatics is a scientific research and information technology company that offers innovative computer services, informatics, and bioresearch solutions to research centers and healthcare organizations around the globe. With expertise in software engineering, bioinformatics, molecular research, and program management, we focus on developing and applying technological tools and scientific techniques to empower the world of research. We work with some of the top research organizations and facilities in the country including multiple institutes at the National Institutes of Health (NIH).

Job Description

We are looking for a Senior Biological Data Scientist to support projects at the NIH. The position will be based in Rockville, Maryland. We are looking for a skilled and motivated researcher/developer with expertise in image processing, algorithm development, and deep learning. The successful applicant will be involved with developing computational analysis of images and other data acquired in collaboration with scientists, biologists, and/or clinicians across the NIH.

Computational analyses will involve combinatorial assessment of disparate data types (i.e. patient demographics, risk factors, genetic information, 2D and 3D imaging modalities, etc.) into comprehensive classification and regression models. It is desired that the scientist will construct models using a variety of approaches including traditional machine learning (i.e. logistic regression, ridge/lasso regression, random forests, support vector machines, etc.), graph analytics, and deep learning. The scientist should also be familiar with development and optimization for CUDA and/or OpenCL workflows and applications. With an emphasis on developing algorithms that are optimized for hyperthreading and CUDA/OpenCL programming.

The scientist will participate in experimental design, data collection, data analysis and manuscript preparation; assist intramural staff, including students and postdoctoral fellows; stay current with scientific literature; stay informed about new approaches and technologies, including participation in conferences, workshops, and/or formal classroom instruction; independently locate and utilize scientific resources; and co-author peer reviewed publications.

Responsibilities:
Lead scientific-related needs assessment, as well as facilitate the design, building and implementation of IT systems.
Collaborate with biologists, clinicians and core facility members to understand their experimental and technical goals and suggest statistical and IT solutions to better achieve these goals.
Create generalizable code bases for abstracted analysis outside of a single client’s project such that analysis and technical tools developed for one project can be easily adapted for a different but similar problem.
Ability to analyze existing solutions in Python, Matlab, R, and Java (visual basic a plus) and adapt these solutions to a containerized plugin architecture for incorporation into a central tool repository.
Strong interest in contributing to biological and clinical research
Understanding client needs and analyzing, validating and documenting the analysis and system requirements to best address the clients’ need.
Analyze as-is process, develop to-be process, and identify gaps which must be addressed to reach the desired end state.
Act as an expert technical and scientific resource for software development staff in all phases of the development and implementation process
Assess diverse datasets (focused on images but including other data types outlined above) for correlative, clustering, predictive, etc. outcomes.
Qualifications:

The ideal candidate will have:
A PhD degree or equivalent in bioengineering, chemical engineering, computer science, statistics, life sciences, or related fields. Or 6+ years experience in biomedical image analysis.
Published and/or significant publicly available code using one or all the following languages: Python, C++, and/or Java.
Experience in image analysis (registration, segmentation, and/or tracking) in biomedical imaging modalities preferred, though any image set will be considered.
Experience with molecular biology laboratory techniques and informatics methods is preferred though any laboratory experience will be considered.
Experience with large data sets ( >1 TB) and deep learning will be given priority.
Experience implementing systems and supporting non-technical scientific staff
A high level of attention to detail
A strong work ethic, and the ability to design projects within diverse research areas and datasets.
Excellent oral and written communication skills in English, and record keeping skills.
The diversity of Axle’s employees is a tremendous asset. We are firmly committed to providing equal opportunity in all aspects of employment and will not tolerate any illegal discrimination based on age, race, gender, religion, national origin, disability, marital status, covered veteran status, sexual orientation, status with respect to public assistance, and other characteristics protected under state, federal, or local law and to deter those who aid, abet, or induce discrimination or coerce others to discriminate.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $52.00 - $63.00 per hour

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Location:
North Bethesda, MD 20852 (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
Required travel:
25% (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.9,Axle Informatics,"North Bethesda, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,16,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,MD,5470,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1245,245,Principal Data Scientist,$82k-$134k,"The Principal Data Scientist will be a data science subject matter expert and provide team leadership in their area of responsibility. The Technical Team Lead will lead selected projects or activities, as required, and will collaborate with other disciplines and teams.

Qualifications:
• MSc/PhD degree in in a quantitative field (such as Computer Science, Mathematics, Engineering) or BSc in a related discipline and 7 years of industry experience
• 5+ years of professional experience in data science, computer vision or related fields
• 3+ years of professional experience leading data science or related discipline teams
• Subject matter expert in the areas of Machine Learning/Artificial Intelligence
• Advanced quantitative and analytical skills around applied research, mathematical modelling, and statistical modeling
• Practical software development skills in one or more programming languages, such as Python, Scala/Java, C++, etc.
• Fluency with one or more machine learning frameworks (such as TensorFlow, Pytorch, Caffe)
• Experience leading and mentoring senior, mid-level, and junior data scientists
• A passion for AI/ML, overcoming difficult challenges, and accomplishing great things
Bonus:
• Proven experience developing and evolving novel/new DNN architectures
• Strong publication background (Company will support publication work)",4.5,Infinite Resource Solutions,Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,7,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,Remote,1353,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,0
1246,246,Data Scientist,$82k-$134k,"Faegre Drinker has an opportunity for a Data Scientist to work with our Innovation team in our Washington DC office. You will be responsible for using advanced statistical, algorithmic, machine learning, data mining and visualization techniques to help advance and complete high level firm projects and assist with making informed business decisions. This position will work with other talented individuals who share a passion for doing great work in the best interest of our clients.

What you would do in this job:
• Work with firm stakeholders to identify opportunities for leveraging company data to drive business solutions
• Locate and define new process improvement opportunities
• Create operational predictive models using current and emerging methodologies in data science
• Use machine learning and data mining techniques to understand the patterns in large volumes of data, identify relationships, detect data anomalies and classify data sets
• Assess data quality and define data processing business rules for cleansing, aggregation, enhancement, supporting analysis and predictive modelling activities
• Design and build algorithms and predictive models using a variety of techniques
• Deploy predictive models and integrate findings into business processes
• Present complex analysis results tailored to different audiences in a highly consumable and actionable form, including by using data storytelling techniques
• Special projects and duties, as assigned

Position Expectations

• Strong commitment to client service
• Excellent interpersonal, verbal, and written communication skills, including the ability to communicate effectively in a virtual environment
• Cooperation and the ability to collaborate in a team, including across offices, while also being able to work independently
• Ability to problem solve and use sound judgment and discretion in dealing with highly confidential information
• Ability to build and maintain positive relationships, both internally and externally
• Strong sense of urgency and professional dedication
• Ability to prioritize projects in a fast-paced, deadline-driven environment
• Positive and professional demeanor

Company Benefits

• Paid time for firm-sponsored volunteer events
• Business casual attire
• Professional environment and the opportunity to work with experts at the top of their fields
• Variety of health plan options, as well as dental and vision plans
• Generous paid time off
• Opportunity to work remotely

Requirements

• Bachelor’s Degree in a quantitative discipline
• 5+ years of direct analytics experience
• Proficient understanding and usage of relational SQL (e.g. Oracle, SQL Server, PostgreSQL) databases and data structures
• Proficiency with programming languages such as Python
• Experience using visualization tools
• Ability to interact directly with non-technical client stakeholders and act in a business-to-technical translation role

Company Description

Faegre Drinker is a top 50 firm designed for clients. With more than 1,300 experienced attorneys, consultants and professionals in 22 locations across the United States, United Kingdom and China, we partner with clients ranging from emerging startups to multinational corporations, delivering comprehensive and customized advice to advance their most ambitious business objectives. Our culture is firmly rooted in relentless client focus and mutual trust that empowers collaboration. We are committed to our communities and to building a diverse and inclusive firm that reflects those communities and our clients. Bolstered by our collective history, Faegre Drinker moves boldly into the future, investing in the talent, technology and innovation to continually provide clients with exceptional service, collaborative experiences, innovative approaches and value.

Department/Practice Group

Innovation

Exempt / Non-Exempt

Exempt

Full-Time / Part-Time

Full-Time

Number of Openings

1",3.4,Faegre Drinker Biddle & Reath LLP,"Washington, DC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Private Practice / Firm,other_industries,Accounting & Legal,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,DC,3942,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1248,248,Machine Learning Engineer - Recommendations Platform,$82k-$134k,"Company Description

null
Job Description

Who We Are:
Recos Platform team builds recommendations platforms such as candidate generation and feature generation engines for product teams. The unrivaled challenges that we face at Twitter are both the data scale and the real-time nature of the product. How do you find the most meaningful content among hundreds of millions of new tweets for hundreds of millions of users every day at Twitter? We build large scale personalized recommendation engines utilizing different kinds of signals such as social network, user activity, and geolocation. Most of our work is about recommendation systems, machine learning, graph algorithms, distributed systems, and social graph analysis.
What You'll Do:
Apply your engineering skills to either improve existing recommendation systems, unlock new directions or provide entirely new ML solutions in recommendation systems within Twitter. You will work closely with live production systems and product teams, and deliver ML solutions at scale within the Twitter tech stack.

Qualifications

Who you are:
A machine learning software engineer with a passion for working on exciting algorithmic and deep infrastructure issues in ML environments.
Thrive on working in concert with other smart people, including from distributed offices.
Communicate fluidly, at the level of your audience, and seek to understand and be understood.
Have the ability to take on complex problems, learn quickly, iterate, and persist towards a good solution.
Take pride in polishing and supporting our products.
Work hand-in-hand with modeling engineers and data scientists, and your passion is to enable them with better infrastructure.
Requirements:
BS, MS or PhD in Computer Science with 3-5 years experience or equivalent experience.
Fluent in one or more languages like Java, Scala, C++, Python
Experience with Hadoop, Pig or other MapReduce-based architectures
Knowledgeable of core CS concepts such as common data structures and algorithms
Comfortable conducting design and code reviews


Additional Information

We are committed to an inclusive and diverse Twitter. Twitter is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate based on race, ethnicity, color, ancestry, national origin, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, veteran, genetic information, marital status or any other legally protected status.
San Francisco applicants: Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.",4.0,Twitter,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,14,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,CA,2579,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1250,250,Data Engineer,$82k-$134k,"About Us


Interested in working for a human-centered technology company that prides itself on using modern tools and technologies? Want to be surrounded by intensely curious and innovative thinkers?

Seeking to solve complex technical challenges by building products that work for people, meet and exceed the needs of businesses, and work elegantly and efficiently?

Modeling ourselves after the 1904 World's Fair, which brought innovation to the region, 1904labs is seeking top technical talent in St. Louis to bring innovation and creativity to our clients.

Our clients consist of Fortune 500 and Global 2000 companies headquartered here in St. Louis. We partner with them on complex projects that range from reimagining and refactoring their existing applications, to helping to envision and build new applications or data streams to operationalize their existing data. Working in a team-based labs model, using our own flavor of #HCDAgile, we strive to work at the cutting edge of technology's capabilities while solving problems for our clients and their users.

The Role


As a Data Engineer you would be responsible for developing and deploying cutting edge distributed data solutions. Our engineers have a passion for open source technologies, strive to build cloud first applications, and are motivated by our desire to transform businesses into data driven enterprises. This team will focus on working with platforms such as Hadoop, Spark, Hive, Kafka, Elasticsearch, SQL and NoSQL/Graph databases as well as cloud-based data services.

Our teams at 1904labs are Agile, and we work in a highly collaborative environment. You would be a productive member of a fast paced group and have an opportunity to solve some very complex data problems.

Requirements


3+ years of progressive experience as a Data Engineer, BI Developer, Application Developer or related occupation.
Agile: Experience working in an agile team oriented environment
Attitude / Aptitude: A passion for everything data with a desire to be at the cutting edge of technology and consistently deliver working software while always keeping an eye on opportunities for innovation.
Technical Skills (You have experience with 2 or more of these bulletpoints):
Programming in Java (Or similar JVM language such as Scala, Groovy, etc) and/or Python
Architecting and integrating big data pipelines
Working with large data volumes; this includes processing, transforming and transporting large scale data using technologies such as: MR/TEZ, Hive SQL, Spark, etc.
Have a strong background in SQL / Data Warehousing (dimensional modeling)
Have a strong background working with and/or implementing architecture for RDBMS such as: Oracle, MySQL, Postgres and/or SQLServer.
Experience with traditional ETL tools such as SSIS, Informatica, Pentaho, Talend, etc.
Experience with NoSQL/Graph Data Modeling and are actively using Cassandra, HBase, DynamoDB, Neo4J, Titan, or DataStax Graph
Installing/configuring a distributed computing/storage platform, such as Apache Hadoop, Amazon EMR, Apache Spark, Apache Hive, and/or Presto
Working with one or more streaming platforms, such as Apache Kafka, Spark Streaming, Storm, or AWS Kinesis
Working knowledge of the Linux command line and shell scripting
Desired Skills
Analytics: Have working knowledge of analytics/reporting tools such as Tableau, Spotfire, Qlikview, etc.
Open Source: Are working with open source tools now and have a background in contributing to open source projects.
Perks
Standard Benefits Program (medical, dental, life insurance, 401(k), professional development and education assistance, PTO).
Innovation Hours - Ten percent (10%) of our work week is set aside to work on our own product ideas in a highly collaborative and supportive environment. The best part: The IP remains your own. We are a high-growth culture and we know that when we help people focus on personal and professional growth, collectively, we can achieve great things.
Dress Code - we don't have one
This job is located in St. Louis, MO. While we would prefer local candidates your current location is not the most important factor; please help us understand why you would like to call St. Louis home if you would be relocating.

]]>",4.7,1904labs,"Saint Louis, MO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,4,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,MO,4238,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
1252,252,Sr Data Engineer,$82k-$134k,"Group O is seeking a strong candidate in the job of Senior Data Engineer for a Group O partner in San Antonio, TX. In this role, you will be a valuable expert in data coding and ETL and will lead the development of data models, structures, and data wrangling.

Responsibilities
Implementation including loading from disparate data sets, pre-processing using Hive and Pig
Scope and deliver various Big Data solutions
Design solutions based on high-level architecture
Manage technical communications between clients (technical and non-technical) and internal teams
Building a cloud-based platform that allows easy development of new applications
Collaborate with developers, subject matter experts, and business users in gathering and documenting requirements for data extraction and transformation
Perform code reviews, analyze execution plans, improve ETL jobs efficiencies, correct ETL defects and respond quickly to fixes and enhancement requests
Follow design standards for ETL and ELT processes
Analyze, assess and implement changes to existing solutions in response to business changes
Perform data research and analysis to find insights
Analyze data models to identify variances and discrepancies
Design, update, and maintain data sets
Work with geographically distributed team structure in a fast paced and challenging environment; multi-task and work under pressure
Communicate results with internal and external stakeholders

Qualifications:
An ideal candidate will have experience leading data quality assessment, will be a strong problem-solver and will have excellent interpersonal and communications skills.
Over 5 years of demonstrable experience designing technological solutions to complex data problems, developing & testing modular, reusable, efficient and scalable code to implement those solutions.
Strong understanding and experience in distributed computing frameworks, particularly Apache Hadoop 2.0 (YARN; MR & HDFS) and associated technologies -- one or more of Hive, Sqoop, Avro, Flume, Oozie, Zookeeper, etc.
Strong background with ETL Design and coding for Data loading, Data cleansing, Data Validation
Proficiency in SQL, SAS, R and Python – with preference to SQL
Previous experience designing custom deliverables based on user requirements
Excellent written and verbal communication skills – must be able to communicate fluently in English both verbally and in writing
Strong analytical and statistical analysis skills to extract insights and recommendations
Strong problem-solving skills, and the ability & confidence to hack their way out of tight corners
Insurance domain experience is preferred",3.1,Group O,"San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,46,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,TX,2629,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
1253,253,Lead Data Scientist – Healthcare,$82k-$134k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE's Health Systems Analytics and Visualization Group is seeking a motivated, creative Lead Data Scientist to apply cutting edge tools and techniques to challenging problems facing the US government. This position offers the opportunity to interact directly with government leaders in a fast-paced and dynamic atmosphere with the ability to make a difference and impact outcomes with solid analysis. Our team members are expected to work on multiple projects, cross-pollinate good ideas across the government and continuously learn. We are an interdisciplinary department that thrives on having a large toolbox to support data- and model-driven decision making. We value people who can bring diverse perspectives. Our department works to solve problems in the public interest, in partnership with the government. MITRE also actively conducts independent research in areas of interest to our government partners, and once established with a proven track record of quality delivery and consistent performance, members of our department have latitude to select projects.

This is an outstanding opportunity to have substantial impact on national and international health, fostering research, improving care and public health outcomes, and lowering burden and costs.

To be successful you will:
Be passionate about applying data analytics to real world healthcare problems.
Have an innate curiosity and interest in developing research questions and testing hypotheses with open ended tasking.
Responsibilities include:
Work with a spectrum of government sponsors to gain understanding of their challenges, evaluate possible solutions and conduct insightful, actionable analyses.
Support the development and application of a variety of analytical models to sponsor challenges, with a willingness to adapt and learn.
Present results in an intuitive, actionable manner that can be understood by all sponsor audiences, regardless of technical expertise.
Lead projects throughout their life cycle, including conceptualization, requirements definition, data procurement, development, integration, and socialization.
Provide relevant day-to-day tasking for one or more junior staff.
Required Qualifications
Master’s Degree in science, engineering, or a health-related field, with 10+ years of relevant work experience. A Bachelor’s degree coupled with substantial experience would be acceptable
Demonstrated ability to manipulate large datasets and perform calculations with at least one modern programming language or business intelligence platform like Python (scikit-learn, pandas, tensorflow), R, SAS, or MATLAB
Ability to apply, modify and formulate algorithms and processes to solve challenging problems.
Demonstrated experience leading customer facing engagements emphasizing data analytics.
Experience visualizing multi-dimensional data using tools like Tableau, ggplot2, matplotlib, seaborn, or D3.js
Strong written and oral communication skills.
Exceptional organizational skills and meticulous attention to detail
A track record of successfully delivering on deadlines
Preferred Qualifications:
7 or more years applied experience working at a local, state, tribal, territorial, or federal
public health agency
Applied expertise working with public health data sets conducting data analyses and quality
assurance practices, and storing data efficiently
Applied expertise working with public health information systems, open data sources, and
data standards
Experience applying various machine learning approaches (e.g., random forest, neural networks, support vector machines)
Exceptional experience in complex analysis and strategic operational support
Prior experience working with databases (e.g., PostgreSQL, Oracle, MySQL, MongoDB, Neo4j).
Experience using version control (e.g., Git, Mercurial, SVN) to support collaborative development.
Prior experience developing interactive data visualizations using open source web technologies (Angular, Vue, React, D3) or other frameworks (Shiny, Jupyter Notebooks)
Research experience.
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,MITRE,"New Windsor, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,MD,5863,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,1
1254,254,Software Engineer - Data Science,$82k-$134k,"Join ClearEdge and be a part of the team of men and women that solve some of the DoD’s most complex technical challenges. Every day, ClearEdge empowers customers in Government and industry with innovative data driven solutions.
Check out our extremely competitive benefits package at clearedgeit.com/benefits which includes a 10k annual training/education benefit, tech bonuses, and state of the art technology lab. We also offer monthly TechConnect and DeepDive collaboration sessions with our entire technical staff, fully paid.

Your mission: Work with a dynamic team and key stakeholders to generate and execute challenging solutions to mission problems.
We are seeking Software Engineers of all levels with Data Science experience. The position requires a self-starter with excellent problem-solving skills. The right person will work closely with the customer to gather requirements for assisting in solving real world problems using data science techniques. The candidate should be experienced with exploratory data analysis, machine learning, network graph modeling, information insight, data mining, data driven analytics and statistical methods.
You will excel in this role if you are:
Results-oriented developer who can leverage your technical skills and techniques to successfully design, develop and deploy software solutions
Self-motivated and have a desire to build new skills
Are familiar with Agile frameworks and methodologies with a desire to be a certified SCRUM Master
Enjoy learning new technologies, are a forward thinker, and are interested in growing your career with a cutting-edge technology company
A day in the life consists of:
Working directly with clients, managers and technical staff to understand business needs, develop technical plans, and deliver data-driven analytical solutions that solve client problems
Creating and deploying predictive models from a wide variety of data sources and types using the latest mathematical and statistical methods
Performing enterprise level software development, integration, and implementation using advanced data science or big data technologies
Establishing and implementing end-to-end proof of concepts
Performing data mining, statistical analysis, predictive modeling and simulation, and forecasting for the development of solutions
Working across multi-functional teams to formulate, prototype, implement, and fine tune solutions
Educating product development and operations teams using documentation, presentations, and demonstrations
Establishing strong, collaborative working relationships with Government customers, technical staff, and peers
What we are expecting from you:
Experience in the design and development of data science software applications
Bachelor’s or Advanced degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or other technical discipline
Experience with Exploratory Data Analysis including wrangling, grooming, transformation, and analysis
Experience applying statistical methods to solve data problems
Software development programming experience in languages such as Python, R, Java, Scala
Experience using IDE tools such as Jupyter to develop and demonstrate results
Experience with integrating and using Data Science libraries such as scikit-learn, MlLib, Pandas, python (Jupyter, scikit-learn, pandas, etc.), R, Java
Experience with supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques
Experience with Agile development and Agile tools (i.e. Jira, Confluence)
Experience within the SIGINT mission environment and an understanding of customer data formats
Strong analysis and problem-solving experience
Nice to have:
Experience using large-scale distributed frameworks such as Hadoop, Spark, Tensorflow
Experience with GPU-based machine learning techniques


About us: Experienced advanced analytic development company providing new Cyber solutions to current and emerging missions.
Our Core Values of Honesty, Integrity, Loyalty, Fairness, Respect, Responsibility, and Accountability drive our mission and vision and are the heart of what we do each day. We combine our Core Values with the three key elements of people, technology, and integrity to repeatedly deliver stellar results within our primary competencies.
ClearEdge is also pleased to share that we have recently expanded our prime and subcontract presence into new Cyber markets!
If this position does not fit your skillset, please visit our Careers page to explore our current openings, or contact a ClearEdge recruiter at careers@clearedgeit.com. ClearEdge is an equal opportunity employer.",4.1,ClearEdge,"Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,18,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,108.0,MD,4564,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,1
1255,255,Senior Data Scientist,$102k-$169k,"Sr. Data Scientist *
The Sr. Data Scientist will be responsible for the analysis of surface ECG and intracardiac EGM signals to develop new algorithm modules. Additionally, incumbent will develop advanced signal processing algorithms for Bioelectronic Medicine products to classify nerve activity. He/she will work closely with software engineering, scientific, clinical and marketing departments on the integration of modules and support VOC activities. The Sr. Data Scientist will lead the effort in organizing and characterizing large datasets applying machine learning and AI approaches, and work with external groups on the delivery of new product innovation. New algorithm modules are to enhance the efficiency, safety and efficacy of cardiac ablation procedures and improve patient outcomes reducing the need for further procedures.
Responsibilities include: *
Applies knowledge of biomedical signal processing to surface ECG, intracardiac and ENG/EMG signals to develop algorithms for product integration
Conduct applied research on supervised and unsupervised learning algorithms to develop new approaches to analyzing ECG and EGM signals both in real-time and retrospectively
Develop digital filtering routines to enhance cardiac signals and remove noise and artifact generated from various sources of interference
Collaborate with Electrophysiologists, researchers, scientists, cathlab staff to identify workflow problems and solutions
Collaborate with Scientific, Clinical and Marketing departments to define user needs and product requirements
Collaborate with Software Engineers in defining product design specifications
Keep abreast of pertinent machine learning research of intracardiac data by studying published work and attending conferences.
Manage research timelines and work with PMO and Marketing to prioritize key feature development
Stay up to date on the latest research in Cardiac Mapping and Bioelectronic Medicine
Keep abreast of the latest research and techniques to identifying cardiac arrythmias
Conference abstract and scientific manuscript preparation
Foster a culture teamwork in a matrixed environment
Necessary Skills: *
Biomedical signal analysis, e.g. EGM, ECG, EMG, EEG, ENG
Advanced biomedical signal processing skills
Experience with machine learning, AI and big data analysis
Outstanding MATLAB proficiency
Knowledge of physiology
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Good presentation skills
Desired Qualifications: *
Degree in Biomedical, Electrical Engineering Computer engineering, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on biomedical signal processing and machine learning. M.S. or PhD strongly preferred
Postdoctoral experience a plus
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $150,000.00 - $200,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Relocation assistance
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Signing bonus
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,Engtal,"Santa Monica, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,3,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,CA,3365,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1256,256,Claims Data Scientist,$102k-$169k,"About ConcertAI

ConcertAI is the leading provider of precision oncology solutions for biopharma and healthcare, leveraging the largest collection of research-grade Real-world Data and the only broadly deployed oncology-specific AI solutions. Our mission is to improve translational sciences; accelerate therapeutic clinical development; and provide new capabilities for post-approval studies to accelerate needed new medical innovations to patients and to improve patient outcomes.
ConcertAI has emerged as one of the highest growth technology companies in Real-world Data and AI, backed by industry leading private equity companies: SymphonyAI, Declaration Partners, Maverick Ventures, and Alliance|Bernstein.

Role Summary
As a Claims Data Scientist at ConcertAI, you will be responsible for data exploration, and analysis on patient data for various stakeholders in the oncology and healthcare domain, including claims and claims-clinical linked data assets. You will report to the Vice President of Data Products. You should have a good mix of programming/CS, visualization, stats/math, and ML skills (with a particular strength in at least 2 of those areas), and ideally, you have been applying those skills in healthcare. You should have previous experience with healthcare claims. You will design methods and models around client driven needs and you will collaborate with various subject matter experts to inform those methods. You will assist the client delivery team with insights, dashboards, and ad-hoc analytics. You will also work with the engineering team to build prototypes and models for new product development.
Responsibilities
Understand external claims data assets and oversee the ingestion, processing, de-identification, and provisioning for data assets and research projects.
Understand client / product needs and translate them into tactical R&D initiatives with defined goals and timelines.
Reason about healthcare specific problems to analyze visualize, interpret, and contextualize results.
Run a variety of analytics from data QA to complex models.
Become the internal subject matter expert on all things claims.
Implement models using high level software packages (SKlearn, R, TensorFlow, Spark).
Collaborate on software projects with engineers, providing analytical guidance and contributing to codebase.
Requirements
BSc or higher in a STEM field, with formal training in CS, stats, and math.
Strong programming abilities in at least one high level language (python, stata, R).
Knowledge of statistical methods- regression, ANOVA, EDA, PCA, etc.
Basic visualization skills- matplotlib/seaborn/plotly/etc, tableau.
Experience with big data – Cloud data warehouses, cluster computing, Spark, MapReduce/Hadoop.
Experience with healthcare claims data
Intimate familiarity with the python data science stack (pandas, sklearn, numpy/scipy).
Firm understanding of claims data processing and adjudication, including rejections, re-submissions, and identifying final claims.
Ideal candidate would have a competency around linking EMR and claims data via identity management.
Learn More About ConcertAI

ConcertAI is transforming how healthcare is delivered and dedicated to improving patient outcomes in oncology by offering innovative solutions on how data and intelligence is used to solve healthcare problems. We are creating something special in our culture, by building a collaborative, engaged, patient focused, team approach to our mission. Our high-performance teams are looking to add great talent to the mix and we are hiring for the right mix of new skills and diverse mindset. Learn more about ConcertAI at www.concertai.com or on LinkedIn .",3.6,ConcertAI,Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,Remote,3678,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,0
1258,258,Data Scientist,$102k-$169k,"Why Should You Join First Advantage?

First Advantage is in the midst of a technology revolution, and the best time to join us is right now! We are developing incredible solutions, working with amazing customers, and we would love to see how your skills could help get people back to work. Our brand new Data team is recruiting several passionate people in greater metropolitan areas across the Central and Eastern time zones (namely Chicago, Atlanta, Charlotte, Austin, Boston, Houston, Columbus, Tampa, etc) in the US! This opportunity is for remote work, with occasional travel to our Atlanta office.

First Advantage has over 4000 employees across the world and does over 71 million background screens a year, so if you’re looking for opportunities working with advanced technologies to produce awesome user experiences and securely process high-volume transactions leveraging massive amounts of data, then this is the place for you!

We work with Fortune 100 and Global 500 hundred companies, so your work will directly impact some of the largest enterprises in the world!

We need talent that is Informed, Insightful, Transformational, and Progressive

We’re looking for a Data Scientist! You’re our ideal candidate if you have 8+ years of experience and strong expertise with SQL/Oracle PLSQL, and 3+ years of experience working with data modelling tools like Python, RStudio, TensorFlow, etc. The Data Scientist will be working with business and technical teams to develop machine-learning models for FADV’s background screening products. We’re looking for someone who can do the deeply analytical work, while also presenting their work to internal and external customers. If you meet those requirements, and have experience working with Business Intelligence tools, you could be a perfect fit!

Our brand new Data team have the opportunity to build a game-changing solution from the ground up, and that solution will drive the next generation of background screening. Joining our team right now is an incredible opportunity to be on the ground floor of our technology transformation, and will give you a chance to make a real difference!

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor degree in Engineering or equivalent is required
Minimum of 8 years of strong experience and expertise with SQL/Oracle PLSQL
Minimum of 3+ years of experience working with Data Modelling tools using Pyton, RStudio, TensorFlow etc
Strong data analytics and data science skills
Experience with Analytical programming languages using R/Python libraries
Strong experience in Relational Databases and Big Data analytics in the cloud is preferred
Knowledge of other BI tools like Qlik, Oracle Business Intelligence, SQL Server Reporting, Cognos would be a plus
Candidate must have Strong communication skills and creative skills
Education:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering or related technical field or equivalent relevant work experience
Experience:
Minimum of 8 years of strong experience and expertise with SQL/Oracle PLSQL , Perl, Shell scripting
Minimum of 5+ years of experience working with data modelling & database designs
Other Knowledge, Skills, Abilities or Certifications:
Strong data analytics and data science skills
Strong experience with end to end automation
Experience with bulk data loading & data cleansing
Experience working with Oracle, MySQL databases and Linux environments
Experience with Analytical programming languages using R/Python libraries would be a plus
Strong experience in Relations Database and Big Data analytics preferred
Candidate must have Strong communication skills and creative skills",3.5,First Advantage Corporation,Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,17,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,Remote,3618,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
1259,259,Senior Data Scientist,$102k-$169k,"Job Description

ENERGY FOR WHATS AHEAD

Are you looking to make a difference in your career? Were working on smarter grids, cleaner energy and tools to help people manage energy more efficiently.

About Transmission and Distribution

Southern California Edisons (SCE's) Transmission and Distribution Organizational Unit (T & D) is responsible for planning, engineering, constructing, operating, and maintaining transmission and distribution facilities throughout the 50,000-square-mile territory. T&D is the steward of roughly $19 billion in assets that safely and reliably deliver electricity to 14 million residents via SCEs 5 million customer accounts.

Position Overview

The Senior Data Scientist Advisor is responsible for leading the modeling of complex analytical problems, discovering insights, and identifying opportunities using statistical, algorithmic, mining, and visualization techniques. In addition to advanced analytical skills, the senior advisor will be responsible for developing business requirements and coordinating with groups in and outside of the Transmission and Distribution group. You will be responsible for developing, presenting, and communicating results. You will also be responsible for leading and mentoring other Data Scientists.

Typical Responsibilities:
Lead data scientists on developing models that meet or exceed business requirements.
Generate advanced analytical approaches using predictive modeling, optimization and simulation abilities.
Apply statistical and pattern recognition techniques to perform description, prediction, and optimization.
Develop and implement tools for data acquisition, extraction, transformation, management, and manipulation of large and complex data sets. Explore, model, mine, and experiment with data to answer critical business issues. And, generate and communicate business insights.
Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications
Bachelors in a quantitative discipline such as Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Computer Science, or information sciences such as business analytics or informatics.
Five or more years of experience in Predictive Modeling or Machine Learning or Statistical Modeling or Data Mining.
Proficient with R and Python.
Desired Qualifications
MS or PhD in a quantitative discipline such as Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Computer Science, or information sciences such as business analytics or informatics.
Experience in leading and mentoring junior team members and guiding them on data science and advanced analytics (machine learning, predictive analytics) development.
In-depth industry/business knowledge in Electric Utility industry.
Proficiency with SQL and/or SAS.
Strong Leadership skills and experience.
Comments
Candidates for this position must be legally authorized to work directly as employees for any employer in the United States without visa sponsorship.
Relocation may apply to this position.
Southern California Edison, an Edison International (NYSE:EIX) company, serves a population of approximately 15 million via 5 million customer accounts in a 50,000-square-mile service area within Central, Coastal and Southern California. Join the utility leader that is safely delivering reliable, affordable electricity to our customers for over 125 years.

SCE is a proud Equal Opportunity Employer and will not discriminate based on race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, protected veteran status or any other protected status.

#L1-EA1",4.0,Southern California Edison,"Pomona, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,141,Subsidiary or Business Segment,other_industries,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,CA,3517,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1260,260,Sr. Data Scientist,$102k-$169k,"Search by Keyword
More Options

Search by Location

Clear

Loading...

Department

All

State

All

×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days
Create Alert

form.emailsubscribe-form {
display: none;
}
×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days

Share this Job

AddThis
Email
Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
Pinterest

Apply now »



Sr. Data Scientist

Date:

Sep 18, 2020

Location:

Danvers, MA, US

#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}

Abiomed is a pioneer and global leader in healthcare technology and innovation, with a mission of Recovering Hearts & Saving Lives. With corporate headquarters in Danvers, Massachusetts, offices in Aachen & Berlin, Germany and Tokyo, Japan, Abiomed’s 1,400 employees form one of the fastest growing medical device companies in the world. We attract and retain exceptional talent with our collaborative culture, passion for our work, and a strong commitment to employee professional development.

Patients First | Innovation | Winning Culture | Heart Recovery
The Abiomed Applied Research group is a team of scientists and engineers building a new generation of Impella “Smart Pump” devices. We are currently hiring a Data Scientist to lead the design and implementation of new machine learning algorithms that guide treatment decisions and improve patient outcomes. These algorithms will play a central role in the pursuit of Abiomed’s mission of recovering heart and saving lives. We are looking for a creative self-starter who thrives in a continuously growing data environment and enjoys a fast-paced, dynamic research group.
Responsibilities
Responsible for end-to-end development of machine learning algorithms
Design new statistical and physiological features for time series data
Evaluate algorithm performance in offline (in silico) and live (in vitro, in vivo) environments
Collaborate with software teams to implement algorithms on embedded hardware
Maintain concise descriptions of algorithm design specifications and performance evaluations
Perform variability analyses for model optimization
Quantitatively and qualitatively evaluate new ML/AI techniques and integrate into algorithm design
Communicate algorithm designs and performance results to cross-functional stakeholders
Attend scientific conferences and act as a data science ambassador for the organization

Job Requirements
MS in computer science, data science, or equivalent technical field; or BS + 2 years of experience.
Demonstrated capability in machine learning techniques (e.g. classification, regression, clustering, sequence generation, forecasting, reinforcement learning, Markov modeling, or Bayesian statistics)
Proficient in Python. Experience in one or more development packages such as Sklearn, Keras/Tensorflow, PyTorch, or Theano
Experience in one or more distributed computing tools, such as Hadoop or Spark
Willing to travel 5-10% of the time to meet with customers to gather user needs and assess product performance, and attend scientific conferences
Experience with the following is strongly preferred:
APIs & cloud computing platforms (Microsoft Azure or AWS)
Embedded software (C/C++ or equivalent)
Medical devices and electronic health record data
General Requirements
Superb communication and collaboration skills – comfortable operating within and outside a core team and presenting progress to company leadership
Demonstrated excellence of analytical thinking in one or more technical fields
Self-motivated and good team player
Willing to learn and explore new technologies
Independent, efficient, and able to manage several concurrent projects

Abiomed is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Abiomed will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

Nearest Major Market: Boston

Apply now »

Find similar jobs:
Engineering & R&D

Apply now »



Sr. Data Scientist

Date:

Sep 18, 2020

Location:

Danvers, MA, US

#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}

Abiomed is a pioneer and global leader in healthcare technology and innovation, with a mission of Recovering Hearts & Saving Lives. With corporate headquarters in Danvers, Massachusetts, offices in Aachen & Berlin, Germany and Tokyo, Japan, Abiomed’s 1,400 employees form one of the fastest growing medical device companies in the world. We attract and retain exceptional talent with our collaborative culture, passion for our work, and a strong commitment to employee professional development.

Patients First | Innovation | Winning Culture | Heart Recovery
The Abiomed Applied Research group is a team of scientists and engineers building a new generation of Impella “Smart Pump” devices. We are currently hiring a Data Scientist to lead the design and implementation of new machine learning algorithms that guide treatment decisions and improve patient outcomes. These algorithms will play a central role in the pursuit of Abiomed’s mission of recovering heart and saving lives. We are looking for a creative self-starter who thrives in a continuously growing data environment and enjoys a fast-paced, dynamic research group.
Responsibilities
Responsible for end-to-end development of machine learning algorithms
Design new statistical and physiological features for time series data
Evaluate algorithm performance in offline (in silico) and live (in vitro, in vivo) environments
Collaborate with software teams to implement algorithms on embedded hardware
Maintain concise descriptions of algorithm design specifications and performance evaluations
Perform variability analyses for model optimization
Quantitatively and qualitatively evaluate new ML/AI techniques and integrate into algorithm design
Communicate algorithm designs and performance results to cross-functional stakeholders
Attend scientific conferences and act as a data science ambassador for the organization

Job Requirements
MS in computer science, data science, or equivalent technical field; or BS + 2 years of experience.
Demonstrated capability in machine learning techniques (e.g. classification, regression, clustering, sequence generation, forecasting, reinforcement learning, Markov modeling, or Bayesian statistics)
Proficient in Python. Experience in one or more development packages such as Sklearn, Keras/Tensorflow, PyTorch, or Theano
Experience in one or more distributed computing tools, such as Hadoop or Spark
Willing to travel 5-10% of the time to meet with customers to gather user needs and assess product performance, and attend scientific conferences
Experience with the following is strongly preferred:
APIs & cloud computing platforms (Microsoft Azure or AWS)
Embedded software (C/C++ or equivalent)
Medical devices and electronic health record data
General Requirements
Superb communication and collaboration skills – comfortable operating within and outside a core team and presenting progress to company leadership
Demonstrated excellence of analytical thinking in one or more technical fields
Self-motivated and good team player
Willing to learn and explore new technologies
Independent, efficient, and able to manage several concurrent projects

Abiomed is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Abiomed will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

Nearest Major Market: Boston

Apply now »",3.9,ABIOMED,"Danvers, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,39,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,MA,8130,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,0
1261,261,Sr. DATA SCIENTIST,$102k-$169k,"Title: Sr. Data Scientist

Company: Samsung Research America (SRA)

Lab: Visual Display Intelligence Lab

Location: Mountain View, CA

Lab Summary:

At Visual Display Intelligence lab, Samsung Research America, we operate as a start-up while leveraging the broader assets of a larger global enterprise. We do advance research and development to immensely benefit our core business verticals in the space of Ads and Marketing. Our team primarily focuses on processing huge data sets, build robust and scalable big data pipelines, conduct advanced research in implementing state-of-the-art ML and AI techniques, build data services that are both real-time and batch based. All those combined provide the best-in-class experience to our customers across consumer electronics and internet of things. Many of our engineers take pride in publications, filing A-grade patents and build robust products and services.

Position Summary:

As a Staff Software Engineer you will primarily focus on building unified Audience platform by working directly with Product Managers, Lab leaders, researchers, Big data/AI/ML engineers, brainstorm different ideas and also build POCs and propose projects that cater to the broader business needs. If there is evinced interest to invest on those projects, you could lead them to fruition. You will help design data pipelines, maintain large scale distributed systems, help manage the modern data warehousing infrastructure, analyze key metrics for decision makers to provide visual insights that will change the company direction and benefit consumers. The ideal candidate will be someone who comes from a strong analytical background that has demonstrated experience in the following areas:

Responsibilities:
Build and maintain large scale distributed systems to support the whole pipeline from data collection and training to deployment and real-time serving
Write efficient implementations of ML algorithms over CPUs & GPUs
Integrate our in-house systems with open source technologies like Kubernetes and Tensorflow
Build abstractions to automate various steps in different ML workflows
Build tools to debug, visualize and inspect various features and models
Work with the engineers who use the platform, and help them be more impactful by improving the platform
Minimum Qualifications:
Strong knowledge of Computer Science fundamentals including object-oriented design, data structures, operating system, computer networks.
(5+ years) Software development experience, ideally in Python, Scala or Java
(5+ years) Experience with MySQL, Postgres, Cassandra, Redis, Redshift, OracleDB or MongoDB
(3+ years) Microservice-oriented architectures and related OSS technologies (e.g. Kubernetes, Kafka, Celery/RabbitMQ, nginx, Redis, Airflow, etc)
(3+ years) Experience working in distributed and streaming environment, preferably using Spark, Kafka, Flink etc
(3+ years) Experience with AWS in an enterprise environment
(3+ years) CI/CD and test automation frameworks (Cypress.io, Jenkins, Appium, UIAutomation, Bazel, etc)
Preferred Qualifications:
BS, MS or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering or a related technical field
Strong communication and inter-personal skills
Experience with leading large-scale multi-engineer projects
Samsung is an EEO/Veterans/Disabled/LGBT employer. We welcome and encourage diversity as we strive to create an inclusive workplace.",3.7,Samsung Research America,"Mountain View, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,32,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,CA,3390,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,1,0,0
1262,262,Data Scientist Principal,$102k-$169k,"Schneider is seeking an innovative Principal Data Scientist to join our Engineering team. Our Principal Data Scientists, foster thought leadership in analytics and decision sciences to elevate the performance of the enterprise. You will proactively evaluate new technologies and identify industry best practices, while leveraging our existing processes and technical capabilities to deliver exceptional results.

Our Principal Data Scientists:
Foresee future challenges and provide perspective and insight on how to best position the department and enterprise for success.
Represent Schneider as a thought leader within the industry and academia through symposiums, annual meetings and partnerships.
Design, collaborate and implement solutions and new proof of concepts using new and existing technologies.
Mentor junior associates and collaborate with diverse departments to frame and solve business opportunities.
Oversee external relationships with software vendors to influence product functionality and our academic partners to influence curriculum design.
As an associate you will enjoy a strong work/life balance that includes paid vacation and holidays along with paid personal time off. You will also have access to medical, dental, and vision insurance and enjoy our company-paid life insurance and 401k savings with a company funded retirement plan. Schneider is dedicated to continuous individual development and offers a wide variety of opportunities through company-paid training and more than 170 personal development courses. What are you waiting for? You will love it here!

Ideal candidates will have:
Earned a PhD degree in Data or Computer Science, Engineering, Physics, Economics, Mathematics, or related field, plus eight years of relevant work experience. Or a master’s degree plus ten years of relevant work experience.
Proficient understanding in designing and implementing data science models using open source as well as commercial programming languages.
A demonstrated ability to understand the uses and limitations of statistical and programming methodologies to select the appropriate methodology to complete projects.
Experience working with Java and/or Python.
Company overview:

Schneider is a premier provider of transportation and logistics services. Our legacy started in 1935 with one man, one truck and one dream. Since then, we’ve grown and evolved to become a nearly $5 billion company (2019 revenue) with one of the broadest portfolios of services in the industry delivering superior customer experiences.

The Schneider Way:
We treat our customers, associates, shareholders and suppliers with integrity, dignity and respect.
We are a desirable employer due to our dedication to achieving mutually beneficial, lasting relationships.
We are a responsible member of the community.
Core Values:
Safety- first and always
Integrity in every action
Respect for all
Excellence in all that we do
Rise to the challenge and become a part of the Schneider family. Be the difference with a leader in an industry that impacts the world.
Apply today at http://www.schneiderjobs.com.

Schneider is an equal opportunity employer.",3.2,Schneider,"Green Bay, WI",-1,10000+ Employees,85,Company - Public,other_industries,Transportation & Logistics,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,WI,3154,1,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
1263,263,"Senior Data Scientist, Zoro",$102k-$169k,"Company Summary:
Zoro.com is an eCommerce company that sells business supplies, equipment, and tools—but we’re much more than just a website. We’re a team of people who win and lose together (we prefer winning!). Since 2011, Zoro has been working hard to make it easy for our customers to purchase everything they need to make their businesses go. Zoro currently offers 3 million products, fast and free shipping, no-hassle returns, and exceptional customer service. We’ve grown quickly in a short time, recently surpassing 400 team members and reaching annual revenue of over $500 million. Add to that our award-winning culture—we were named a Great Place to Work for 2019-20, among other accolades—and we think Zoro is a pretty amazing place to work and grow.

Primary Function:
Our Sr. Data Scientists are key contributors to the development of Zoro’s customer, product, eCommerce, and pricing plans. The Data Science team covers a broad scope of projects including customer segmentation, A/B testing, marketing investment optimization, predictive modeling, promotion forecasting, and pricing analysis. We are closely integrated with our business leaders and support their ability to make critical decisions. At Zoro, you will be challenged by new questions every day.

Duties and Responsibilities:

Lead data science projects from beginning to end: develop and refine the idea, create a project plan and methodology, collaborate with business partners, execute, and provide recommendations for the company
Collaborate with other data scientists to develop and implement algorithms, write code, evaluate relevant academic research, and deliver outputs
Advise the company about tools, data sources, and best practices to facilitate digital marketing, pricing, and web analytics
Build predictive and inference models using Python and R to support business initiatives in the areas of customer acquisition, activation, engagement, retention, or channel investment optimization
Document code and data science processes that are critical to the company, and develop strategies to ensure those processes are robust and fault-tolerant
Communicate findings to business leaders and colleagues using data visualizations, presentations, and written means

Qualifications:

Experience leading data science projects that have a direct impact on company objectives
Demonstrated ability to assist business decision-making through data mining and machine learning
Strong communication skills to collaborate effectively with business stakeholders. Must be able to interact cross-functionally and drive both business and technical discussions
5+ years’ progressive business experience in areas including marketing analytics, database marketing, data mining, or statistical modeling. Experience using data science or advanced analytics in an Internet retailer or a top-tier consumer-focused company is required
Ability to translate complex business problems into project plans and solve them by analyzing large amounts of data
Familiarity with Python or R for statistical modeling, clustering, classification, machine learning, and data mining
Demonstrated proficiency in SQL and cloud-hosted data platforms (Google Cloud Platform, AWS, etc)
Familiarity with BI tools such as Tableau or Looker, and ability to communicate results to business partners
Master’s degree preferred in quantitative fields such as Statistics, Engineering, Operational Research, or Economics
Knowledge of web tracking technology and web analytics tools (Google Analytics, Adobe Analytics, etc.) a definite plus

Final note: We share a commitment to our Zoro values – Win & Lose Together (We prefer winning!), Take Ownership, We Are Transparent, and Aspire to be Customer-Obsessed. Everything we do at Zoro is centered around delighting our customers. It's a natural extension of our company culture and how we care for each other. We believe when we act in ways that are consistent with these values, we can solve any technical challenge that lies ahead of us. As a Zoro employee, you can expect to work with smart, energetic people, learn something every day, and be valued for your perspective.

Zoro is an Equal Opportunity Workplace and an Affirmative Action Employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.",2.0,Zoro Tools,"Chicago, IL",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,IL,4440,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
1264,264,"Translational Data Scientist, Oncology Data Science",$102k-$169k,"1 purpose...to reimagine medicine!

The Oncology Data Science (OncDS) group in NIBR brings together projects spanning the entire clinical development pipeline, across a wide and unique range of novel therapeutics (e.g.: targeted and immunotherapies, radioligands, cell and gene therapies). OncDS:
•Oversees NGS data generation and performs analysis for thousands of oncology clinical samples, informing drug discovery and development
•Integrates internal and external data across distinct clinical trials to produce recognized translational impact
•Applies cutting-edge technologies and analytic approaches to discover and characterize the molecular mechanisms of therapeutic response in individual cancer patients

Description:
We are seeking a data scientist who will advance the translation of multi-dimensional molecular data (e.g. NGS) to biomarker discovery in clinical trials. The successful candidate will nurture close collaborations with oncology clinical trial teams, interpret candidate biomarkers and contribute to large-scale meta-analyses across trials and indications. Specific job responsibilities include:
•Collaboration on the design and execution of molecular biomarker profiling studies in oncology clinical trials
•Exploration of molecular data in the context of clinical variables to discover biomarkers of response/resistance to therapy
•Communication of key findings to trial teams and diverse group of scientists
•Application of biostatistics and machine learning methods across datasets from multiple clinical trials to gain actionable biological insights
•Application and development of computational methods for analyses of longitudinal biomarker and clinical data to characterize patients’ response to treatment
•Development of innovative analytic approaches to integrate and visualize complex clinical datasets
•Interaction with clinicians, project managers, data engineers, and other scientists to facilitate progression of projects across milestones

Desirable Requirements:
•PhD, or M.S with 3-4 years of experience, in bioinformatics, biostatistics, genomics, computer science, or related field
•Track record of peer-reviewed publications demonstrating statistical and analytic rigor when tackling multidimensional omics datasets
•Expertise in machine learning and longitudinal data analysis preferred
•Knowledge of cancer genomics, immunology / immune-oncology, clinical and translational science preferred. Knowledge of RWE is a plus
•Programming expertise with fluency in one or more programming languages for bioinformatics and data science analyses such as R or Python
•Effective communication of complex concepts to diverse audiences
•Curiosity, creativity and drive towards solutions when facing scientific challenges

Why consider Novartis?
799 million. That’s how many lives our products touched in 2019. And while we’re proud of that fact, in this world of digital and technological transformation, we must also ask ourselves this: how can we continue to improve and extend even more people’s lives?

We believe the answers are found when curious, courageous and collaborative people like you are brought together in an inspiring environment. Where you’re given opportunities to explore the power of digital and data. Where you’re empowered to risk failure by taking smart risks, and where you’re surrounded by people who share your determination to tackle the world’s toughest medical challenges.

Imagine what you could do at Novartis!

Commitment to Diversity & Inclusion:
Novartis embraces diversity, equal opportunity and inclusion. We are committed to building diverse teams, representative of the patients and communities we serve, and we strive to create an inclusive workplace that cultivates bold innovation through collaboration, and empowers our people to unleash their full potential.

The Novartis Group of Companies are Equal Opportunity Employers and take pride in maintaining a diverse environment. We do not discriminate in recruitment, hiring, training, promotion or any other employment practices for reasons of race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, marital or veteran status, disability, or any other legally protected status.",4.0,Novartis,"Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,24,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,MA,4227,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1267,267,Sr Data Scientist,$102k-$169k,"We Are Hiring

Remote Opportunity!

Our Ascension Data Science Institute is looking to add an experienced Sr. Data Scientist to their dynamic and growing team!

Why Join Ascension?
Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, especially to those most in need. In FY2018, Ascension provided nearly $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.

Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, with special attention to persons living in poverty and those most vulnerable. In FY2019, Ascension provided $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.

Ascension includes more than 150,000 associates and 40,000 aligned providers. The national health system operates more than 2,600 sites of care – including 150 hospitals and more than 50 senior living facilities – in 20 states and the District of Columbia, while providing a variety of services including clinical and network services, venture capital investing, investment management, biomedical engineering, facilities management, risk management, and contracting through Ascension’s own group purchasing organization.

What You Will Do

As an Associate with Ascension, you will have the opportunity to develop predictive and prescriptive analytics models, creates efficient algorithms and innovating use of data.

Responsibilities:
Analyzes complex business and competitive issues and discerns the implications for systems support. Identifies, defines, directs and preforms project issue analysis to resolve issues, including analysis of technical and economic feasibility of proposed data solution.
Creates and manages a machine learning pipeline, from raw data acquisitions to merging and normalizing to sophisticated feature engineering development to model execution.
Designs, leads and actively engages in projects with broad implication for the business and/or the future architecture, successfully addressing cross-technology and cross-platform issues. Selects tools and methodologies for projects and negotiates terms and conditions with vendors.
Communicates highly technical information to numerous audiences, including senior management, the user community, and less-experiences staff.
Leads the organizations planning for the future of the data model and data architecture.
What You Will Need

Education:
High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required.
PhD preferred.
Work Experience:
1 year of experience required.
Available GitHub page showing data science capabilitites.
High level of technical skills in mathematics, statistics and or programming.
Experience with intrerpretting data science output for non-data science stakeholders, study/ methods design.
Equal Employment Opportunity
Ascension is an EEO/AA employer: M/F/Disabled/Vet. For further information regarding your EEO rights, click on the following link to the “EEO is the Law” poster:
http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/eeoc_self_print_poster.pdf”
Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

Ascension participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify link below for more information.

E-Verify (link to E-verify site)",3.3,Ascension,"Saint Louis, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,21,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,MO,3948,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1268,268,Data Engineer - ETL and Integrations,$102k-$169k,"Job Description

Shipt works with a wide variety of data partners to better understand our partners, customers, and brands we work with. We're looking to grow the Data Engineering team with a Data Engineer to help expand our capabilities and integrate new partners.

The Data Engineering team at Shipt focuses on all data that moves in and out of our system. A growing part of our responsibilities includes getting more value out of the large amounts of data we import and collect. The team works to build different pipelines and integrations to help clean, understand, or enrich our content & information.

As catalog data is fundamental to the grocery delivery experience, our team plays a large part in the Shipt marketplace and helps drive the company's growth plans.

Your Responsibilities

• Develop and maintain pipelines responsible for sending or ingesting large amounts of

data from various sources

• Partner with external vendors on building, enhancing and maintaining business solutions.

• Help evolve our data model & infrastructure for new retailers and verticals

• Collaborate with other teams across the organization (e.g., Retail Partner Success,

Business Development) to enable new opportunities

• Keep the big picture in mind so that our architectural patterns can better

consume and validate source data

• Build and experiment with different tools and tech, and share your learnings

with the broader organization

Requirements

• 2+ years of experience as a Data Engineer/Architect

• Strong spoken and written communication.

• Thrives on engaging directly with business partners to build an in-depth understanding of business needs and deliver innovative solutions.

• Proficiency in Python is required (this is our primary language)

• Proficiency in SQL is required (we use PostgreSQL and Redshift)

• Proficiency with REST APIs

• A keen attention to detail

• A Bachelor's Degree in a technical field or equivalent work experience

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",3.5,Shipt,"Birmingham, AL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,6,Subsidiary or Business Segment,other_industries,Consumer Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,AL,2205,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1269,269,Machine Learning Engineer,$102k-$169k,"CircleUp harnesses the power of machine learning and predictive analytics to discover some of the fastest-growing companies in the consumer & retail sector. We are building a predictive data system called ""Helio"" to bring the data-driven revolution that has occurred in the public markets to the private markets, starting with consumer & retail.

We are working on challenging problems in information retrieval, entity resolution, and developing an in-depth knowledge graph of all private companies. We are mining vast amounts of data to successfully rewrite the rules on how private companies are evaluated.

With a background in both software development and machine learning, you will collaborate with software engineers, data scientists, PMs, and domain experts in consumer investing to develop & ship predictive data products in support of CircleUp's mission - helping entrepreneurs thrive by connecting them with the capital & resources they need.

You are a passionate software engineer who is comfortable working across the full stack & lifecycle of predictive data products - prototyping, feature engineering, validation, and productionalization.

CircleUp was recently honored as one of Fast Company's Top 10 Most Innovative Companies in Data Science and has been named a CB Insights FinTech 250, a Top 5 Most Disruptive Company in Finance by CNBC, and to the Forbes FinTech 50. Founded in 2012, CircleUp is headquartered in San Francisco and backed by Union Square Ventures, GV, Canaan Partners, QED Advisors, and others.

Responsibilities:
Collect and refine structured and unstructured data on private companies
Build out our entity resolution platform that can identify references to companies, brands and products in highly unstructured digital documents and link them back to real world entities
Build scalable production systems for data collection, data transformation, feature extraction, model training, and scoring, using distributed software tools
Build end to end algorithms for objectively measuring the quality of private consumer companies
Contribute to all phases of algorithm development including ideation, prototyping, design and production
We're looking for teammates who have:
Bachelor's degree or higher in Computer Science, Information retrieval, Natural Language processing, Math, Statistics or related technical field
2+ years of experience in machine learning, NLP and/or information retrieval
Broad knowledge of machine learning APIs, tools, and open source libraries
Excellent coding skills and strong fundamentals in algorithms, data structures, predictive modeling and big data concepts
Experience putting models into production systems is a huge plus
An interest in disrupting and democratizing the entire industry within the private markets.
If you got to this point, we hope you’re feeling excited about the job description you just read! Even if you feel that you don't meet all of the requirements and qualifications, we still encourage you to apply. We’re eager to speak with those who share our passion to help entrepreneurs thrive - not just those who match every bullet point in our job descriptions.

CircleUp is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religious creed, color, national origin, ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, marital status (including registered domestic partnership status), sex and gender (including pregnancy, childbirth, lactation and related medical conditions), gender identity and gender expression (including transgender individuals who are transitioning, have transitioned, or are perceived to be transitioning to the gender with which they identify), age, sexual orientation, Civil Air Patrol status, military and veteran status and any other consideration protected by federal, state or local law. We encourage those who really want to make an impact to apply for our open positions.",4.5,CircleUp,"San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,8,Company - Private,other_industries,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,CA,3942,0,machine learning engineerr,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1270,270,Senior Data Scientist,$102k-$169k,"About Us

At GutCheck, we pioneered agile market research to provide our clients with actionable insights at the speed of their business. As the marketplace rapidly evolves, we're evolving with it. By combining qualitative, quantitative, and behavioral methodologies, our team of full-service research experts synthesizes insights to help clients make more confident business decisions -- connecting them with their target consumers earlier and more often in the development process.

What Makes Our Approach Different

We create heroes out of our clients by providing them with contextualized insights to more efficiently and effectively connect with their target audiences. Enabled by technology and automation, we are dedicated partners who take a human-first approach to delivering powerful insights. Today, we are bringing agile to strategy: enabling brands to gather robust foundational insights in an agile, iterative way to inform key business within the demands of today's innovation timelines.

Here's where you come in:

As our Senior Data Scientist, you will be the primary contributor that will operationalize predictive models built with machine learning and advanced analytic technologies. GutCheck owns years of structured and unstructured data. We've started to identify patterns in our world-class market research using machine learning technologies such as TensorFlow. You will help us by providing expertise on mathematical concepts for the broader cross-functional analytics team and inspire the adoption of advanced analytics and data science across the entire breadth of our organization.

You will work closely with our talented and agile Product and Engineering teams to craft scalable, well-designed solutions that address the technical and architectural challenges inherent to making sense of our data. We have a focus on quality, automation, and innovation. We encourage our Engineers to think creatively and flexibly when choosing solutions, tools, and techniques. Our team offers an environment where trust and innovation are encouraged, egos aren't accepted, and collaboration is core to our DNA.

You will advocate, evangelize and build data-fueled products that help our internal and external customers gain deeper insights into direct, targeted consumer feedback. This data can and will be coupled with third-party data sources to help our clients be heroes by making well informed business decisions. You'll help research and choose which data sources will provide unique and compelling insights, and then you'll dig in and become an expert on that data. You will provide insight into leading analytic practices, design and lead iterative learning and development cycles, and ultimately produce new and creative analytic solutions that will become part of our core deliverables.

For more information on the company and the GutCheck team, please go to www.gutcheckit.com

This job description is not a complete list of your qualifications or position roles. GutCheck is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to equal opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, gender, gender identity, genetic information, parental or pregnancy status, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, or Veteran status.",3.9,GutCheck,"Denver, CO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,11,Company - Private,other_industries,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,CO,3310,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
1271,271,Senior Outreach Data Scientist,$102k-$169k,"Job Description:

Are you looking for a new and exciting career opportunity?

Join our award-winning organization and work with some of the most talented minds within our Enterprise Technology and Innovation teams. As a Salient CRGT employee, you get to be part of a best performing team supporting our nation’s most critical missions.

Why Salient CRGT?

We’re passionate about the inspirational missions of our customers and we entrust our employees and teams to deliver exceptional performance to enable the safety, security, health and well-being of our nation. We provide the tools and resources to help you be successful, and our culture fosters an environment in which idea sharing and collaboration is essential. Are you ready to make a difference?

We are seeking a senior level Outreach Data Scientist.

This role fullfills the following responsibilites:

implements a continuous review process to evaluate the effectiveness of processes and standards for identifying process improvements to drive improved efficiency and quality
evaluates quality issues, inefficient processes, product quality, customer feedback, and analyst recommendations to identify process and product improvements
identifies opportunities to eliminate duplication of effort, improve analyst effectiveness and efficiency, eliminate backlog, reduce accuracy issues, and improve general operations
conducts briefings on improvement recommendations, gaining approval for implementation, and coordinating implementation improvements
implementation of tools, scripts, algorithms, and techniques assesses the effectiveness of the improvements
assesses and reports on metrics

#cjpost

Required Qualifications:

The following are minimum requirements for the role:

10+ years of experience
MA/MS degree
Experience continuous process improvement (CPI) researcher and facilitator
Experience working in NCTC screening and vetting using NCTC IC databases
Analytical and critical thinking skills
Knowledge of SOPs and Government watchlisting and screening and vetting guidelines
Advanced communication skills including documentation and briefings
Knowledge of ODNI, NCTC, and IC mission, roles, and responsibilities
TS/SCI with Polygraph security clearance

#cjpost #super6

#muncyreqs

#crgt456 #jpreqs

Desired Qualifications:
Recognized expert in specific field

Salient CRGT is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran status, disability, genetic information, or any other factor prohibited by applicable anti-discrimination laws.",3.4,"Salient CRGT, Inc","McLean, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,VA,2689,1,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
1275,275,"Computational Biologist / Data Scientist, Oncology",$102k-$169k,"1 purpose...to reimagine medicine! Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research, Inc. (NIBR) is seeking a computational biologist / bioinformatics analyst to join the Novartis Oncology Data Science Team. Oncology Data Science provides computational biology expertise to NIBR Oncology, from target ID through clinical development, for both targeted and immune therapies. We apply cutting edge technologies and analytical approaches to elucidate the molecular basis for therapeutic response in individual cancer patients. Using sequencing data generated from thousands of Novartis oncology clinical trial samples, we bring hypotheses from biomarker discovery to bear on drug discovery and development.

We are seeking a highly motivated bioinformatics scientist to perform analysis of next-generation sequencing data (e.g bulk and single cell RNA-sequencing, tumor and cell-free DNA-sequencing) from clinical trial samples. The successful candidate will work collaboratively with computational biologists and clinical trial teams and will contribute to the interpretation of candidate biomarkers. Specific job responsibilities include:

•Supporting genomic biomarker profiling studies in oncology clinical trials
•Designing and performing analyses of genomic data (gene expression and genetic variation) and clinical variables to test and discover biomarkers for response and resistance to therapy
•Implementing and developing innovative analytical approaches with translational impact for clinical genomic data
•Providing biological interpretation of biomarkers
•Performing assessment of quality control metrics
•Communicating key findings and biological context to clinical trial teams

Desirable requirements:
•M.S. in computational biology, bioinformatics, biology, computer science, or a related field
•2+ years of industry experience preferred
•Familiarity with fundamental concepts in cancer genomics, statistics, and bioinformatics
•Knowledge of immunology, immune-oncology, clinical and translational science preferred
•Demonstrated statistical and analytical ability with programming expertise in R
•Proficiency with Linux tools and Python preferred
•Experience with current analysis methods for processing and mining NGS data
•Excellent interpersonal and communication skills; proven ability to work effectively within a team and to take ownership of challenging problems.

Why consider Novartis?
799 million. That’s how many lives our products touched in 2019. And while we’re proud of that fact, in this world of digital and technological transformation, we must also ask ourselves this: how can we continue to improve and extend even more people’s lives?

We believe the answers are found when curious, courageous and collaborative people like you are brought together in an inspiring environment. Where you’re given opportunities to explore the power of digital and data. Where you’re empowered to risk failure by taking smart risks, and where you’re surrounded by people who share your determination to tackle the world’s toughest medical challenges.

Imagine what you could do at Novartis!

Commitment to Diversity & Inclusion:
Novartis embraces diversity, equal opportunity and inclusion. We are committed to building diverse teams, representative of the patients and communities we serve, and we strive to create an inclusive workplace that cultivates bold innovation through collaboration, and empowers our people to unleash their full potential.

The Novartis Group of Companies are Equal Opportunity Employers and take pride in maintaining a diverse environment. We do not discriminate in recruitment, hiring, training, promotion or any other employment practices for reasons of race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, marital or veteran status, disability, or any other legally protected status.",4.0,Novartis,"Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,24,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,MA,3848,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1277,277,Data Scientist - Intermediate,$102k-$169k,"KellyMitchell matches the best IT and business talent with premier organizations nationwide. Our clients, ranging from Fortune 500 corporations to rapidly growing high-tech companies, are exceptionally served by our 1500+ IT and business consultants. Our industry is growing rapidly, and now is a great time to launch your career with the KellyMitchell team.

Data Scientist Intermediate

Required Skills / Experience:
• MS in computer science, machine learning, statistics, genetics, life sciences or closely-related with at least 1 years of industry or research experience
• Strong code development experience with these languages: R and Python
• Knowledge in SQL and experience with big data ecosystem
• Experience with coding best practices, version control and documentation
• Problem solving and analytical thinking
• Strong business aptitude, the ability to rapidly learn new problem domains, and become conversant in the domain with subject matter experts
• Strong organizational, interpersonal skills with proven ability to communicate complex qualitative analysis in clear, concise, and precise manner

Desired Skills / Experience:
• PhD in a quantitative field
• Experience with AWS or other cloud platform
• Experience with Docker and other DevOps tool and airflow or other workflow tool
• Knowledge of plant breeding and genomic prediction
• Experience with web development and object-oriented programming (OOP) and design experience
• Peer reviewed publication and a sense of urgency, identifies and overcomes obstacles",3.5,KellyMitchell,"Saint Louis, MO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,22,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,MO,1533,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,1,0,0
1280,280,Machine Learning Engineer,$102k-$169k,"With the continued impact of COVID-19 and social distancing measures, Kensho is conducting all interviews and on-boarding activities remotely. At the present time, all employees are working remotely, until further notice. When the time comes to open our offices, Kensho will fully support those employees who would like to continue working remotely and not ask anyone to return to the office until they are comfortable.

At Kensho, we hire talented people and give them the freedom, support, and resources needed to build cutting edge technology and products for our parent company, S&P Global. As a result, we produce technology that is scalable, robust, and solves the challenges of one of the world’s largest, most successful financial institutions.

As a Machine Learning Engineer, you will be responsible for tackling a wide range of problems from natural language processing to timeseries prediction. You will move beyond the theoretical confines of academia and apply your tradecraft to build machine learning systems on real world data. In this role, you will constantly collaborate and work with groups of engineers. Our Machine Learning team is responsible for delivering ML-based solutions from problem framing, to prototyping, and production application.
Are you looking to make impactful, scalable contributions that transform the way we think about data? If so, we would love to help you excel here at Kensho. We take pride in our tightly-knit, team-based community that provides our Kenshins with a collaborative, supportive environment to bring transparency to the biggest challenges in data.
What You’ll Do
You will conduct original research on large proprietary and open source data sets
Identify, research, prototype, and build predictive products
You will build cutting-edge models for understanding vast amounts of textual data
Write production code
You will write tests to ensure the robustness and reliability of your productionized models
You will work closely with software engineers to build incredible systems
Technologies You’ll Use
Python and specifically NumPy, SciPy, Pandas, SciKit-learn
Neural network packages like TensorFlow/Keras and pytorch
ML packages like LightGBM and XGBoost
OpenFST
Elasticsearch
Required Skills, Knowledge & Experience
You have 3+ years of experience being a major machine learning contributor at a top company, hedge fund, or university
You have at least one core programming expertise, such as Python (NumPy, SciPy, Pandas), MATLAB, or R
You have experience with advanced machine learning methods
You possess strong statistical knowledge, intuition, and experience modeling real data
You demonstrate effective coding, documentation, and communication habits
You have a strong research acumen and experiment design skills
You have the ability and credibility to lead a team
You have a stellar ability to communicate even the most complicated methods and results to a broad, often non-technical audience
Several of the following terms should hold deep meaning for you: LSTM, lookahead bias, bagging, boosting, stacking, information retrieval, batch norm, entity recognition, bootstrapping, Glorot initialization, Kullback-Leibler divergence, GLOVE, SMAPE, HMM, MAP, exponential family, VC dimension, EM, L1, TD(Lambda)
How to Really Get Our Attention
Your GitHub/Kaggle profile shows a project or problems you’ve tackled
You have relevant research or publications
You are a specialist in deep learning in an academic setting or production-grade machine learning


At Kensho, we pride ourselves on providing top-of-market benefits, including:
- Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance
- 100% company paid premiums
- Unlimited Paid Time Off
- 18 weeks of 100% paid Parental Leave (paternity and maternity)
- 401(k) plan with 6% employer matching
- Generous company matching on donations to non-profit charities
- Up to $20,000 tuition assistance toward degree programs, plus up to $4,000/year for ongoing professional education such as industry conferences
- Plentiful snacks, drinks, and regularly catered lunches
- Dog-friendly office (CAM office)
- In-office gyms and showers (CAM, DC) or Equinox membership (LA, NYC)
- Stipend towards commuter or gym reimbursement
- Bike sharing program memberships
- Compassion leave and elder care leave
- Mentoring and additional learning opportunities
- Opportunity to expand professional network and participate in conferences and events
About Kensho
Kensho uses machine learning, artificial intelligence, natural language processing and data visualization techniques to solve some of the hardest analytical problems and create breakthrough financial intelligence solutions for our parent company, S&P Global.
Kensho was founded in 2013 by Harvard & MIT alums and was acquired by S&P Global in 2018. Kensho continues to operate as a startup in order to maintain our distinct, independent brand and to promote our breakthrough, innovative culture. Our team of Kenshins enjoy a dynamic and collaborative work environment that runs autonomously from S&P, while leveraging the unparalleled breadth and depth of data and resources available as part of S&P Global. As Kenshins, we pride ourselves on maintaining an innovative culture that depends on diversity and inclusion.
We are an equal opportunity employer that welcomes future Kenshins with all experiences and perspectives. Kensho is headquartered in Cambridge, MA, with offices in New York City, Washington D.C. and Los Angeles. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",4.1,Kensho,"Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,7,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,MA,5648,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
1281,281,Data Engineer,$102k-$169k,"Grow your career at AppLovin.

AppLovin is a global leader in mobile entertainment. Its studios create popular, immersive mobile games and its technology brings games to more players around the world. Since 2012, the company's platform has been instrumental in driving the explosive growth of mobile games, resulting in a richer ecosystem and more games played by millions of people every day. AppLovin is headquartered in Palo Alto, California with several offices globally. Learn more at applovin.com.

AppLovin is one of Inc.'s Best Workplaces and a recipient of the 2019 Glassdoor Top CEO employee's choice award. The San Francisco Business Times awarded AppLovin one of the Bay Area's Best Places to Work in 2019 and 2020, and the Workplace Wellness Award in 2019 which recognizes businesses that are leaders in improving worker well-being.

About You:
Have 1-3 years of experience and a minimum of a BS and/or MS in Computer Science
Have excellent knowledge of computer science fundamentals including data structures, algorithms, and coding
Experience independently creating and maintaining projects
Product focused mindset
Have experience working with big data systems (Spark, Hadoop, Pig, Impala, Kafka)
Experience designing, building, and maintaining data processing systems
Experience with a backend language such as Java or Scala
About the Role:
Collaborate with various engineering teams to meet a wide range of technological challenges
Work closely with product and business teams to improve data models that feed business intelligence tools
Define company data models using Spark
Perks:
Free medical, dental, and vision insurance
Daily lunches and fully stocked kitchen
Free public transit
Free laundry service (wash/dry clean)
Free gym membership
401k matching
Fun company parties and events
Autonomy to make decisions in a rapidly growing company
Flexible Time Off - work hard and take time when you need it
Interested? Send us your resume and let's talk!

AppLovin is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will be considered for employment without attention to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran or disability status.

#LI-JZ1",4.7,AppLovin,"Palo Alto, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,8,Company - Private,Video Games,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,CA,2218,0,data engineer,0,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
1284,284,Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations,$102k-$169k,"Guild is hiring a Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations. As the Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations you will partner with our leaders across the business and lead a team of data scientists to improve our students' Guild experience.

As Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations, you will:
Partner with stakeholders across the organization to identify opportunities to use data science solutions to drive improved outcomes.
Manage large-scale projects and prioritize the team's workload to ensure effective delivery and implementation of solutions which drive our strategies forward.
Work closely with Operations leadership to translate business needs and problems into analyses. This could include uncovering a problem, identifying data sources to quantify the problem, synthesizing findings and solutions, analyzing the business case and tradeoffs, and managing the implementation of recommendations.
Develop frameworks, approaches, solutions and recommendations that effectively and efficiently address the most impactful opportunities and challenges for Guild's Operations teams.
Lead a world-class team of analysts who are responsive to our business partners' needs, and are capable of working with data, performing complex analyses, and developing recommendations and strategies which drive our business forward.
Use data to tell a story, effectively explaining analytical findings and technical solutions to business partners.
Act as a thought partner to data scientists, helping to formulate analytical plans, prioritize initiatives, and operationalize the results of learnings from complex analyses, including A/B testing, NLP, segmentation, and other predictive models.
In this role you will report to Beth Hegland and collaborate with other Guild leaders including: Kevin Chan-A-Shing, Mae Podesta, Josh Hadden-Leggett, and Terrence Cummings.

You are a strong fit for this role if you have:
8+ years of experience in an analytics/data science environment
5+ years managing high-performing technical and analytical teams
Strong technical and analytical skills, with high attention to detail and accuracy.
Strong experience with SQL, as well as Excel/Google Sheets, BI Tools (Looker a plus)
Ability to work cross-functionally to advocate for data science solutions, develop roadmaps, and ensure effective prioritization of analytical resources.
Extreme comfort presenting to and interacting with senior leaders, with the ability to win over strong personalities and reconcile competing points of view through data-driven storytelling
Preferred Competencies:
Familiarity with Operations teams in a sales or CRM environment
Proven business experience with a scripting language like Python or R
About Guild

Guild is increasing economic mobility for working adults by partnering with the largest employers in the country to offer education as a benefit to their employees via our marketplace of nonprofit universities and education institutions. Guild's proprietary technology platform facilitates the administration of this innovative benefit and our team of coaches helps each employee navigate the path back to school, providing individualized support from day one through program completion.

We also just became the latest female-led company to hit a $1billion valuation and the only B-corp with those qualifications. Our Series D round was led by Ken Chenault, General Catalyst Partners chairman and former CEO of AMEX, and joined by Emerson Collective, LeadEdge Capital, and Iconiq.

Guild Education is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.",3.4,Guild Education,"Denver, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,5,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,CO,3659,1,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1286,286,"Machine Learning Engineer, 1+ Years Experience",$102k-$169k,"Snap Inc. is a camera company. We believe that reinventing the camera represents our greatest opportunity to improve the way people live and communicate. Our products empower people to express themselves, live in the moment, learn about the world, and have fun together.

We’re looking for a Machine Learning Engineer to join Snap Inc! Working from our Mountain View, CA office, you will be tasked with solving interesting technical challenges such as architecting and deploying infrastructure to handle our scale, designing a slick and secure mobile client, and maintaining software used by millions every day.

What you’ll do:
Create models which help drive value for users, advertisers, and our company
Evaluate the technical tradeoffs of every decision
Perform code reviews and ensure exceptional code quality
Build robust, lasting, and scalable products
Iterate quickly without compromising quality
Knowledge, Skills & Abilities:
Strong understanding of machine learning approaches and algorithms
Ability to prioritize tasks and work independently
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, with high attention to detail
Experience collaborating with internal and external stakeholders at all levels of a company
Experience in solving open ambiguous problems from end to end
Possesses a desire to learn and help others
Minimum Qualifications:
BS/BA degree in technical field such as Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics or equivalent years of experience
1+ years ML industry experience or PhD in related field
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience working with machine learning frameworks such as TensorFlow, Caffe2, PyTorch, Spark ML, scikit-learn, or related frameworks
Experience with mobile apps and/or databases
Experience working with distributed systems
M.S. degree and/or PhD in computer science or related field
Experience working with machine learning, ranking infrastructures, and system designs
Ability to proactively learn new concepts and apply them at work
At Snap, we believe that having a team of diverse backgrounds and voices working together will enable us to create innovative products that improve the way people live and communicate. Snap is proud to be an equal opportunity employer, and committed to providing employment opportunities regardless of race, religious creed, color, national origin, ancestry, physical disability, mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, marital status, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, pregnancy, childbirth and breastfeeding, age, sexual orientation, military or veteran status, or any other protected classification, in accordance with applicable federal, state, and local laws. EOE, including disability/vets. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please don’t be shy and contact us at accommodations-ext@snap.com.",3.9,Snap,"Mountain View, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,9,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,135.5,CA,2856,0,machine learning engineerr,0,0,1,1,1,1,1,0,0
1287,287,Senior Data Scientist,$78k-$129k,"The Challenge:

Are you excited at the prospect of unlocking the secrets held by a data set? Are you fascinated by the possibilities presented by the IoT, machine learning, and artificial intelligence advances? In an increasingly connected world, massive amounts of structured and unstructured data open up new opportunities. As a data scientist, you can turn these complex data sets into useful information to solve global challenges. Across private and public sectors — from fraud detection, to cancer research, to national intelligence — you know the answers are in the data.

We have an opportunity for you to use your leadership and analytical skills to improve a department of defense client. You’ll work closely with your customer to understand their questions and needs, and then dig into their data-rich environment to find the pieces of their information puzzle. You’ll mentor teammates, develop algorithms, write scripts to develop workflows, build predictive analytics, use automation, apply machine learning, and use the right combination of tools and frameworks to turn that set of disparate data points into objective answers to help senior leadership make informed decisions. You’ll provide your customer with a deep understanding of their data, what it all means, and how they can use it. Join us as we use data science for good in national security.

Empower change with us.

You Have:

Experience with multi-disciplinary mathematical and statistical models via programming language to large datasets to extract patterns, relationships, and anticipated behavioral likelihoods
Experience with developing tradecraft technology and training solutions for discovery, preparation, and manipulation of big data
Experience with mathematical concepts and techniques to solve complex GEOINT analysis problem sets, understand concepts associated with structured data and relational databases
Ability to identify, retrieve, manipulate, relate and exploit multiple structured and unstructured data sets from various sources, including building or generating new data sets as appropriate
Ability to interpret and evaluate the results of data science community’s methods models and algorithms, understanding the meaning, limitations and scope of the results, and translate them into insightful output for data science and mission and identifying other applications for use
Ability to initiate the efficient implementation of methods, tools, and algorithms using a comprehensive range of technologies
Ability to lead work unit proactively addressing and responding to the most difficult data science-related challenges in a timely manner while effectively balancing competing priorities
Ability to write and brief to educate managers, senior internal officers and the IC
Active TS/SCI clearance
BA or BS degree

Nice If You Have:

Experience with building and maintaining databases of GEOINT, SIGINT, and OSINT that address key intelligence questions
Experience with working on specific intelligence issues
Knowledge of GEOINT tools
Active TS/SCI with polygraph
MA or MS degree

Clearance:

Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information; TS/SCI clearance is required.

Build Your Career:

At Booz Allen, we know the power of analytics and we’re dedicated to helping you grow as a data analysis professional. When you join Booz Allen, you’ll have the chance to:

access online and onsite training in data analysis and presentation methodologies, and tools like Hortonworks, Docker, Tableau, and Splunk
change the world with the Data Science Bowl—the world’s premier data science for social good competition
participate in partnerships with data science leaders, like our partnership with NVIDIA to deliver Deep Learning Institute (DLI) training to the federal government

You’ll have access to a wealth of training resources through our Analytics University, an online learning portal specifically geared towards data science and analytics skills, where you can access more than 5000 functional and technical courses, certifications, and books. Build your technical skills through hands-on training on the latest tools and state-of-the-art tech from our in-house experts. Pursuing certifications that directly impact your role? You may be able to take advantage of our tuition assistance, on-site bootcamps, certification training, academic programs, vendor relationships, and a network of professionals who can give you helpful tips. We’ll help you develop the career you want as you chart your own course for success.

We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.

#LI-AH1, ID13, NSG1",3.9,Booz Allen Hamilton,"Macdill AFB, FL",-1,10000+ Employees,106,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.5,FL,4870,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1288,288,Data Scientist (Personal Valuation Team),$78k-$129k,"Company Description

Positioned at Publicis Groupe's core, Conversant is a marketing tech platform that helps brands transform ordinary customer experiences into meaningful, human experiences. The Conversant platform powers a connected suite of products and services called Epsilon PeopleCloud, combining leading-edge identity management, industrial-strength data and technology expertise with big brand acumen gained over five decades of working with the industry’s top brands. Our human-powered, data-led marketing delivers unmatched depth, breadth and scale to help brands create exceptional business outcomes. For more information, visit www.epsilon.com. Follow us on Twitter at @EpsilonMktg.

Job Description

External Title: Data Scientist
Internal Title: Decision Science, Scientist

As a Data Scientist in our Decision Sciences R&D organization, yyou will be responsible for researching and building machine learning, natural language processing, and recommender system applications to extend Epsilon CORE Personalization Platform. Epsilon CORE Personalization Platform analyzes anonymized data at Internet scale and evaluates more than one trillion advertising opportunities per month in real-time. You will work on real-world problems as part of our highly collaborative R&D team, and your solutions will directly and rapidly impact our business. This includes analyzing raw source data and derived data, researching and developing models, algorithms, and applications, building tools and analyses for new and existing products and presenting findings.

RESPONSIBILITIES

Develop an understanding of Epsilon CORE Personalization Platform and proprietary datasets
Use your machine learning expertise to research and recommend the best approaches to solving our technology and business problems
Design, implement, and validate your solutions in Apache Spark and Apache Hive using Scala or Python on large state-of-the-art computing clusters.
Work with our Engineering teams to integrate your solutions into Epsilon’s CORE Personalization Platform
Participate fully in our collaborative approach to research and applications projects

Qualifications

A Ph.D. in Computer Science, Operations Research, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, Mathematics, Physics, Economics, or related scientific discipline
Research experience and coursework in Optimization, Control Theory, Machine Learning, or Simulation
Experience with distributed computing, such as Hadoop, Spark, or related technologies
Familiarity with Scala, Python, SQL, or Java
Strong understanding of modeling and statistical techniques
Desire to work in a highly collaborative environment

ADDITIONAL USEFUL BUT NOT REQUIRED SKILLS

Experience with Recommender Systems, Natural Language Processing, Information Retrieval, Mathematical Optimization, Control Theory, Time-Series Analysis

Additional Information

Great People, Deserve Great Benefits
We know that we have some of the brightest and most talented associates in the world, and we believe in rewarding them accordingly. If you work here, expect competitive pay, comprehensive health coverage, and endless opportunities to advance your career.

Epsilon is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Epsilon’s policy is not to discriminate against any applicant or employee based on actual or perceived race, age, sex or gender (including pregnancy), marital status, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, mental or physical disability, religion, creed, color, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression (including transgender status), veteran status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law. Epsilon also prohibits harassment of applicants and employees based on any of these protected categories.

Epsilon will provide accommodations to applicants needing accommodations to complete the application process.

#LI-AL1

REF17386U",3.3,Epsilon,"Chicago, IL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,51,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.5,IL,3916,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1289,289,Data Scientist,$78k-$129k,"When you’re the best, we’re the best. We instill an environment where employees feel engaged, satisfied and able to contribute their unique skills and talents. We provide extensive opportunities for personal and professional development, building both employee competence and organizational capability to fuel exceptional performance now and in the future.

Summary:

In this role, you will conduct sophisticated data analysis to help address critical business and member questions, the outputs of which enable members to drive improvements in clinical, operational, and economic outcomes.

Responsibilities:

Provide analysis to identify critical issues/questions around member performance.

Conduct exploratory data analysis from complex, disparate data sources to recognize patterns, and identify member performance improvement opportunities.

Generate hypotheses and analyze data to test and interpret results.

Design and develop data models to predict member outcomes or future impact of key member decisions.

Communicate findings from exploratory and predictive data analysis broadly to team and leaders.

Identify improvement opportunities in reporting and BI tools and collaborate with Products Technology to implement enhancements.

Serve as the resident data expert and share best practices/approaches for statistics, machine learning techniques, data modeling, simulation and advanced mathematics.

Collaborate with key leaders and clinicians to build analytical acumen across all analytic roles in the organization.

Qualifications:

Relevant degree preferred. Advanced degree a plus.

5 or more years of relevant work experience.

Proficient programming experience using SAS/Python/R.

Demonstrated ability to manage large disparate data sets and using quantitative and qualitative analysis.

Experience effectively communicating and presenting data to a variety of audiences required.

Experience working with health care administrative claims data (ICD-10, MS-DRG, CPT/HCPCS) or electronic medical record data tools (Epic Clarity/Caboodle, Cerner CCL-Discern/PowerInsight) strongly preferred.

#LI-DM

#IDS

Equal Opportunity Employer: Females/Minorities/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The Company is committed to equal employment opportunity to all employees and applicants without regard to race, religion, color, gender identity, ethnicity, age, national origin, sexual orientation, disability status, veteran status or any other category protected by applicable law.",3.8,"Vizient, Inc.","Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,43,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.5,IL,2496,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1301,301,Data Scientist,$78k-$129k,"Phreesia is looking for an experienced and hands-on Data Scientist to join our growing Data Science Team; someone with extraordinary analytical and technical skills who is familiar with the entire lifecycle of a data science project, from data exploration, modeling and analysis, to model selection, validation, evaluation, and deployment.

You will be joining a team of especially smart, humorous, quick-witted, and dedicated coworkers, all passionate about data and improving patient access to healthcare. You will be responsible for building data products for internal consumption, near real-time business intelligence tools, and predictive models. We are looking for someone experienced in partnering with business stakeholders, translating their needs into technical solutions and answers, and then building and delivering those solutions. This role will report directly to the Associate Director of Data Science.

What You'll Do:
Leverage Phreesia's massive and ever-growing dataset to build data products that provide actionable business insights
Optimize targeted engagement strategies through modeling, forecasting, and evaluation
Develop methods to efficiently classify and characterize patient populations
Navigate and use diverse machine learning stacks in Python and R
Use NLP techniques to parse, process, and structure textual data
Quickly prototype ideas and solve complex problems by adapting creative approaches
Build customized dashboards for internal and external clients
Take ownership of data products and ensure they are properly tracked throughout their lifecycle
Write clean, well-tested, code that will stand the test of time
Be an expert communicator: you could summarize your daily progress in a tweet
What You'll Bring:
2+ years of experience in an operational Data Science role.
Professional command of Data Science and Machine Learning toolsets such as Python (Numpy, Scipy, Pandas, Scikit-learn), R (dplyr, tidyverse, ggplot).
MS/MA in a quantitative field such as data science, computer science, engineering, mathematics, statistics, computational linguistics, physics, or relevant equivalent professional experience
Experience in using statistical principles to inform decision making (experimental design, significance tests, a/b testing)
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills, both written and verbal
Ability to organize, visualize, and present complex data in a way that tells a compelling story and drives decision making
Strong SQL skills
Experience contributing professional-level code using version control
Nice to Have:
Experience using web frameworks such as Python flask or R shiny
Experience in collaborating with Data Scientists and Data Engineers to propose, test, validate, evaluate, and deploy Machine Learning models
Experience using Apache Spark
Experience using Graph and/or search Databases (e.g. neo4j, elasticsearch)
Healthcare experience and a basic understanding of clinical terms
Who We Are:

At Phreesia, we're committed to helping healthcare organizations succeed in a fast-changing landscape—and we need smart, passionate people to help us do it. Our innovative SaaS platform offers our clients a suite of applications to manage the intake process, giving them the tools to engage patients, improve efficiency, optimize staffing and enhance clinical care.

Basically, what you do here matters, and hard work does not go unnoticed. Not only does Phreesia care about our clients, we also care about our employees. In fact, we're a three-time winner of Modern Healthcare magazine's Best Places to Work in Healthcare award. If you're interested in consistent feedback and recognition, defined career paths, and the opportunity to work with driven and engaged colleagues in a dynamic industry, this may be the right opportunity for you.

Benefits and Perks:
Variety of health plan options, dental/ vision coverage, and short/long-term and life insurance plans
401(k) savings plan
Flexible working hours
Unlimited vacation
Home office set up
Mobile phone stipends and internet reimbursement
Fitness reimbursement
100% paid maternity leave to our U.S. employees, as well as a generous maternity benefit to our employees in Canada.
Tuition and certification reimbursement, as well as other professional development opportunities
We strive to provide a diverse and inclusive environment and are an equal opportunity employer.",3.9,Phreesia,Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,15,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.5,Remote,4388,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
1302,302,Data Scientist,$78k-$129k,"We have an opportunity for a Data Scientist to join our talented Data Analytics team. The successful candidate will work with customers and the engagement team to support the project management, project data analysis, process improvement, data conversion, and integration needs of our federal customer.

Typical responsibilities include
Collecting large sets of structured and unstructured data from disparate sources.
Cleaning and validating data to ensure accuracy, completeness, and uniformity.
Analyzing data to identify patterns and trends.
Developing solutions and integrating, extending, and contributing to Open Source software
Devising and applying models and algorithms to mine the stores of big data.
Interpreting data to discover solutions and opportunities.
Requirements
Active Secret Clearance
Strong client engagement skills
Experience with languages such as Python, R, SAS, and SQL
Experience with version control systems, including Github or Gitlab
Experience with designing, developing, and deploying analytic software and algorithms
BS degree in Physics, Computer Science, Mathematics, or another quantitative discipline
Desired skills
Experience with open source Big Data tools including Apache Spark or Apache NiFi
Experience with entity resolution
Experience with Natural Language Processing using modern deep learning techniques
Benefits

Perks of working at NetImpact Strategies:
Your health comes first – we offer comprehensive medical, dental, & vision insurance that starts the first of the month after you join the team
Invest in your future – 401(k) Plan – Immediately vested employer contributions; no matching required
Work hard, play hard – we offer a generous Paid Time Off (PTO) policy and observe ALL ten (10) federal holidays
Pawsitively pawesome – Pet Insurance (because our little critters are part of our families, too!)
Invest in your education – Tuition reimbursement, internal training programs, & company-sponsored industry certifications
Be part of a dynamic and collaborative work environment recently ranked by The Washington Post as a Top Work Place in 2019!
Have fun and celebrate and give back – Team building activities, community volunteering, quarterly HQ days, & an offsite annual awards banquet
ABOUT US

NetImpact Strategies specializes in Strategy and Business Transformation, IT Modernization, Data-Driven Intelligence, Cloud Services, and Cybersecurity. We are a team of skilled Consultants who listen to our clients’ needs. We design and implement comprehensive, tailored solutions that are both mindful of the client's culture and organizational dynamics. As mission needs change, new priorities emerge, technologies advance, and methodologies evolve; NetImpact stands out as a trusted advisor that can solve the challenges of today while looking for the opportunities of tomorrow. Our professionals stay abreast of these changes to provide agile, outcome-focused results for federal agency strategic and tactical needs. Approaching engagements as a partner, we provide solutions that empower our clients to achieve results that align with their mission and strategic vision.

ACCESSIBILITY NOTE

NetImpact Strategies is committed to complying with all applicable provisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act, as amended (“ADA”), and applicable state and local laws. It is NetImpact’s policy not to discriminate against any qualified person or applicant with regard to any terms or conditions of employment on the basis of such individual’s disability. Consistent with this policy of non-discrimination, NetImpact will provide reasonable accommodations to an individual with a disability, as defined in the ADA or applicable law, who has made NetImpact aware of his/her disability, unless doing so would cause undue hardship to NetImpact. If you are an applicant and need a reasonable accommodation when applying for job opportunities within NetImpact, or request a reasonable accommodation to utilize NetImpact’s online employment application, please contact careers@netimpactstrategies.com.

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER

NetImpact is committed to the development of a creative, diverse, and inclusive work environment. In order to provide equal employment and advancement opportunities to all individuals, employment decisions at NetImpact will be based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. NetImpact does not discriminate against any person because of race, color, creed, religion, sex (including gender identity, sexual orientation, and pregnancy), marital status, national origin, disability, age, veteran status, genetic information or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, and local laws (referred to as ""protected status"").",4.1,NetImpact Strategies,"Vienna, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,11,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.5,VA,4715,0,data scientist,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
1303,303,Remote Sensing Data Scientist,$78k-$129k,"Job Posting Title:

Remote Sensing Data Scientist

----

Hiring Department:

Applied Research Laboratories

----

Position Open To:

All Applicants

----

Weekly Scheduled Hours:

40

----

FLSA Status:

Exempt

----

Earliest Start Date:

Immediately

----

Position Duration:

Expected to Continue

----

Location:

PICKLE RESEARCH CAMPUS

----

Job Description:

Exploitation and analysis of remotely sensed (airborne and space-based), geospatial data for a variety of applications. Contribute to the Geospatial Laser Applications and Measurements group research tasks and objectives associated with existing projects. Explore and develop new research technologies.

----

Job Details:

Responsibilities
Develop software and algorithm solutions for remote sensing applications.
Provide guidance and technical leadership in the area of remote sensing.
Provide support in business development through proposals and sponsor engagement.
Publish and present research results.
Other related functions as assigned.
Required Qualifications


Ph.D in engineering, geoscience or other applied sciences. Demonstrated experience and proficiency in working with remotely sensed data, and data products. Applicant should have proficiency in programming for development and conceptual derivation. Applicant must be willing to work with new technologies, be highly organized, and capable of planning and coordinating multiple tasks and managing their time. The applicant should have experience with software packages for research projects. The position will require attention to detail, effective problem solving skills, and innovation. Ability to work independently with sensitive and confidential information, maintain a professional demeanor, work as a team member without day-to-day supervision and effectively communicate with diverse groups of clients. Regular and punctual attendance is required.

US Citizen: Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information at the level appropriate to the project requirements of the position.

Preferred Qualifications


Significant experience related to remote sensing applications (orbital mechanics, geodesy, geospatial statistics, climatology, meteorology, geology, ecology, and hydrology). Demonstrated experience and familiarity in working with 3-D geospatial data, data registration and big data analysis. Knowledge of 2D (imagery) and 3D geospatial data exploitation methods is also desired. Applicant should have prior experience in geospatial application solutions using novel algorithm techniques and working knowledge of processing, exploitation and dissemination workflows for airborne and space-based remote sensing. Demonstrated interpersonal communication skills and technical leadership. History of publication in relevant peer reviewed journals and/or industry conferences. Cumulative GPA of 3.0 with a 3.5 in major coursework or higher.

General Notes


An agency designated by the federal government handles the investigation as to the requirement for eligibility for access to classified information. Factors considered during this investigation include but are not limited to allegiance to the United States, foreign influence, foreign preference, criminal conduct, security violations, drug involvement, the likelihood of continuation of such conduct, etc.

Please mark ""yes"" on the application question that asks if additional materials are required. Failure to attach all additional materials listed below may result in a delay in application processing.

Salary Range


$90,000-$115,000+/negotiable depending on qualifications

Working Conditions
Working Conditions
Standard office conditions
Repetitive use of a keyboard at a workstation
Use of manual dexterity
Some weekend, evening and holiday work
Possible interstate/intrastate travel
Required Materials
Resume/CV
3 work references with their contact information; at least one reference should be from a supervisor
Letter of interest
Unoffiical college transcripts
Important for applicants who are NOT current university employees or contingent workers: You will be prompted to submit your resume the first time you apply, then you will be provided an option to upload a new Resume for subsequent applications. Any additional Required Materials (letter of interest, references, etc.) will be uploaded in the Application Questions section; you will be able to multi-select additional files. Before submitting your online job application, ensure that ALL Required Materials have been uploaded. Once your job application has been submitted, you cannot make changes.

Important for Current university employees and contingent workers: As a current university employee or contingent worker, you MUST apply within Workday by searching for Find UT Jobs. If you are a current University employee, log-in to Workday, navigate to your Worker Profile, click the Career link in the left hand navigation menu and then update the sections in your Professional Profile before you apply. This information will be pulled in to your application. The application is one page and you will be prompted to upload your resume. In addition, you must respond to the application questions presented to upload any additional Required Materials (letter of interest, references, etc.) that were noted above.

----

Employment Eligibility:

Regular staff who have been employed in their current position for the last six continuous months are eligible for openings being recruited for through University-Wide or Open Recruiting, to include both promotional opportunities and lateral transfers. Staff who are promotion/transfer eligible may apply for positions without supervisor approval.

----

Retirement Plan Eligibility:

The retirement plan for this position is Teacher Retirement System of Texas (TRS), subject to the position being at least 20 hours per week and at least 135 days in length. This position has the option to elect the Optional Retirement Program (ORP) instead of TRS, subject to the position being 40 hours per week and at least 135 days in length.

----

Background Checks:

A criminal history background check will be required for finalist(s) under consideration for this position.

----

Equal Opportunity Employer:

The University of Texas at Austin, as an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer, complies with all applicable federal and state laws regarding nondiscrimination and affirmative action. The University is committed to a policy of equal opportunity for all persons and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, national origin, age, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, disability, religion, or veteran status in employment, educational programs and activities, and admissions.

----

Pay Transparency:

The University of Texas at Austin will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information.

----

Employment Eligibility Verification:

If hired, you will be required to complete the federal Employment Eligibility Verification I-9 form. You will be required to present acceptable and original documents to prove your identity and authorization to work in the United States. Documents need to be presented no later than the third day of employment. Failure to do so will result in loss of employment at the university.

----

E-Verify:

The University of Texas at Austin use E-Verify to check the work authorization of all new hires effective May 2015. The university’s company ID number for purposes of E-Verify is 854197. For more information about E-Verify, please see the following:
E-Verify Poster (English) [PDF]
E-Verify Poster (Spanish) [PDF]
Right To Work Poster (English) [PDF]
Right To Work Poster (Spanish) [PDF]
----

Compliance:

Employees may be required to report violations of law under Title IX and the Jeanne Clery Disclosure of Campus Security Policy and Crime Statistics Act (Clery Act). If this position is identified a Campus Security Authority (Clery Act), you will be notified and provided resources for reporting. Responsible employees under Title IX are defined and outlined in HOP-3031.

The Clery Act requires all prospective employees be notified of the availability of the Annual Security and Fire Safety report. You may access the 2019 report here or obtain a copy at University Compliance Services, 1616 Guadalupe, Suite UTA 2.206, Austin, TX 78701.",3.9,Applied Research Laboratories,"Austin, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,College / University,other_industries,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.5,TX,9162,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
1304,304,Sr. Data Scientist,$78k-$129k,"Be proud of where you work, be proud of your Career. Join Navient.

We're proud of our people. Navient team members bring passion, commitment, and integrity to our business. We drive results and foster the innovation that makes us an industry leader. It's time to make that move, choose Navient as the next stepping stone in your career.

Navient (Nasdaq: NAVI) provides asset management and business processing solutions to education, healthcare and government clients at the federal, state, and local levels. We help our clients and millions of Americans achieve financial success through our services and support. Headquartered in Wilmington, Delaware, Navient employs team members in Western New York, Northeastern Pennsylvania, Indiana, Tennessee, Texas, Virginia, and other locations. Learn more at navient.com.

During this time of recommended social distancing, Navient will conduct telephone interviews only until it is safe and permissible to invite candidates to our offices for personal interviews. We look forward to receiving your application and appreciate your flexibility and understanding.

The Senior Data Scientist will utilize analytical, statistical, and programming skills to collect, analyze, and interpret large data sets.

Responsibilities include:

Data Science & Analysis
Analyze enormous amounts of data (structured and unstructured datasets)
Extract data from sources such as enterprise data warehouse, production databases, and other providers
Write machine learning models to produce desired results (shallow ML & ANNs)
Develop techniques for machine learning and predictive analytics
Create charts and other data visuals of analyzed data
Utilize NLP engines to process and correlate unstructured data
Engage with domain experts as well as senior leaders and engineers to effectively deliver interpretable results.
Python Development
Utilize Python to retrieve and prepare data for algorithm processing
Program APIs to access data on existing systems and databases
Program machine learning solutions to process large datasets
Program output to be organized and ready for presentation
MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS

This position will support a federal government contract. Applicants must be able to obtain Public Trust security clearance as required of federal government contractors to include a background check conducted by the U.S. Government to determine eligibility and suitability for federal contract employment for public trust or sensitive positions. For this level of clearance, applicants must possess U.S citizenship.

Master's degree in Data Science, Math, Computer Science or other related area (additional experience may substitute)

2+ years experience in the following (additional education may substitute:
Programming Language(s) Python and Spark
Data Munging: SQL / Python
Data Storage / Data handling: Hadoop / Spark
Statistical Analysis & Machine Learning models
Deep Learning libraries (ex. TensorFlow / Sikit-learn / PyTorch)
Data Visualization (ex. Tableau / d3.js / Python data visualization libraries)
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Experience building chatbot solutions
Knowledge of PySpark API and RStudio programming
Programming user interfaces (ex. Python, Java, .net, C++, C)
Excellent technical, communication, and analytical capabilities
Demonstrated ability to complete tasks/project quickly and effectively
Able to work in an ever-changing environment and positively adapt to organizational, process, and technology changes
Software design principles
Databases and SQL
Strong knowledge of normalization methods
Strong knowledge with DL modern architectures
Numpy/Pandas experience
Software testing principles
MS TFS/Github
ETL workflows
All offers of employment are contingent on standard background checks. Navient and certain of its affiliated companies are federal, state and/or local government contractors. Should this position support a Federal Government contract, now or in the future, the successful candidate will be subject to a background check conducted by the U.S. Government to determine eligibility and suitability for federal contract employment for public trust or sensitive positions. Positions that support state and/or local contracts also may require additional background checks to determine eligibility and suitability.

EOE Race/Ethnicity/Sex/Disability/Protected Vet/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity. Navient Corporation and its subsidiaries are not sponsored by or agencies of the United States of America.

Navient is a drug free workplace.",3.3,Navient,"Fishers, IN",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,6,Company - Public,financial_related,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.5,IN,4524,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,1
1306,306,Data Engineer,$78k-$129k,"At Phantom AI, experience the fast paced environment and help the development of the next generation of autonomous vehicles. We are seeking a Data Engineer to help our visionary team through building a robust pipeline and handling terabytes of data.
You will be designing and implementing full-stack solutions for computing, storing, and presenting evaluation metrics using data gathered from vehicles. This will be a unique opportunity to both improve and implement a scalable pipeline that will be the backbone of the company.

Responsibilities
· Design, improve, and manage datasets
· Support technical design and implementation of demand planning automation projects that use these datasets
· Monitor and enforce data quality standards
· Hands-on coding, able to implement what was designed
· Familiar with architecting and designing tools, and self-motivated for documentation
· Optimize pipeline performance to reduce data lag and refresh time

Requirements
· 3+ years of experience working in data architecture or a related field
· 3+ years of Python Experience
· Web framework experience
· Experience building and optimizing data sets
· Deep understanding of data architecture best practices such as normalizing data structures, minimizing logic complexity, defining intuitive and consistent semantic layers, and eliminating redundancy
· Self-motivated and strong work ethic for continuous development with a strong sense of ownership

Preferred Skills
· Master’s degree in Computer Science or Data Science or work equivalent experience
· Experience with ROS
· Web development experience
· Hands-on experience in dev-ops best practices and implementations
· Demonstrated industry efficiency in the fields of database, data warehousing or data sciences",5.0,Phantom AI,"Burlingame, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,4,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.5,CA,1759,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
1307,307,Data Scientist,$78k-$129k,"Tinder brings people together. With tens of millions of users and a presence in every country on earth, our reach is expansive and rapidly growing. Tinder’s Analytics Team is looking for a Data Scientist with expertise in Analytics.

Our analytics team takes ownership of the decisions being made from our data – we develop a deep understanding of both the business and its data and establish close working relationships with all teams - including Product, Marketing, Engineering, and Finance – so that we can provide recommendations and make proposals regarding prioritization of initiatives, product launches, A/B tests, and company performance.

As a data scientist in this role, you will be a partner to the Analytics team, providing support for A/B test design and analysis as well as data-driven insights through ad-hoc analyses, presentations, and automated reports and dashboards. This role will require extensive experience with SQL, data wrangling, statistics, and A/B testing as well as the ability to work in cross-functional teams to drive actionable insights. Experience with user growth and acquisition across consumer products is a plus.

Responsibilities:

Master and own the analytical understanding of customer behavior and business performance
Build models to better understand the value and churn behavior of our users
Find the “story” in the data and communicate insights and opportunities with executive and other internal teams
Perform ongoing ad-hoc analyses to evaluate the efficiency of our marketing spend, building reporting infrastructure, and assisting in making budgeting recommendations to optimize growth
Integrate captured event data with other sources of customer data, such as surveys, ad publishers and app store data
Support reporting and business intelligence needs of the entire Marketing team

Skills Required:

3+ years of relevant experience
Ability to think objectively and interpret meaningful themes from quantitative and qualitative data
Ability to build constructive and effective relationships with a broad and diverse group of business partners
Ability to execute on complex analytics projects where you have to determine salient questions in a complex ecosystem and present action-oriented conclusions
Proficiency with SQL required
Scripting skills, preferably in Python. Strong Python/NumPy/PANDAS skills a plus
Knowledge of statistics, specifically experimental design and analysis
Proficiency in Microsoft Excel and Microsoft PowerPoint
Familiarity with common KPIs, metrics, and growth experiments
As part of our team, you’ll enjoy:

· The hustle of a startup with the impact of a global business
· Tremendous opportunity to seek some of the industry’s most exciting problems
· Working with an outstanding team of creative, fun and highly motivated people
· Comprehensive health coverage, competitive salary, and 401(k) match

At Tinder, we don’t just accept difference — we celebrate it, we support it, and we thrive on it for the benefit of our employees, our products, and our community. Tinder is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",3.9,Tinder,"Los Angeles, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,8,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.5,CA,3100,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
1308,308,Big Data Engineer - Chicago - Future Opportunity,$78k-$129k,"ABOUT US

Are you ready to transform an industry? At Centro we are building a comprehensive tech platform that radically increases efficiencies and impact across businesses, teams, and campaigns. Our clients can run all their digital business through Basis, with robust business intelligence, workflow automation, search and social integrations, and the number one rated DSP.
We’re taking the digital advertising world by storm and are proud to be headquartered in the rapidly growing tech hub of Chicago, with offices that span across the United States, Canada, Mexico, and London. Join us in our mission to improve the lives of everyone working in the industry!
WHY WORK WITH US?
At Centro, we believe that lasting success is achieved through continual dedication to the growth and well-being of the individual. Our people are the core of what makes Centro unique. Driven by the Centro Manifesto and our guiding principles, we look to hire the best and brightest minds—curious, passionate learners who are driven to create impact.
We are committed to building a culture of highly motivated individuals who create a positive and supportive environment together. When we work hard, stay focused, and act in service to others, we believe that anything is possible. Come grow with us!

ABOUT THE TEAM

Technology is at the core of what we do. Centro’s innovative Engineering team designs and develops new features and integrations for Basis, our industry-leading, comprehensive software solution. Our platform processes over 300 billion events per day and uses AI and machine learning to automate and simplify the entire digital campaign process.

This team is all about data—and in order to create value from the massive amount of data we collect, engineering leverages their dynamic Data Engineering, Data Science, and Business Intelligence teams to create insights that benefit the industry as a whole.

Our Tech Stack:
• Ruby, Java, Python, and React.js
• Kubernetes, Docker, Kafka
• PostgreSQL, NoSQL
• AWS

ABOUT THE ROLE

We are looking for engineers who are excited about building distributed data pipelines. We want you to help us shape our internal and external brand-new data warehouses, leveraging the latest advances of big data processing: a combination of Kafka Streams, Hadoop, and traditional RDBMS.
YOU WILL
Be a part of our Big Data team and of an overall Data Organization spanning multiple offices.
Participate in architecture discussions and bring your experience in scalable data pipelines using Kafka Streams and/or other Big Data tools.
Take ownership of design and implementation of scalable and fault tolerant projects.
Maintain and incrementally improve existing solutions.
Get to build brand new pipelines with the technology stack including Spark, Spark Structured Streaming, Kafka, Hadoop, MySql, Python.
WHAT WE ARE LOOKING FOR
Solid understanding of distributed system fundamentals.
Experience in developing, troubleshooting, diagnosing, and performance tuning of distributed data pipelines at scale.
Demonstrated professional experience working with various components of Big Data ecosystem: Spark/Spark Streaming, Hive, Kafka/KSQL, Hadoop (or similar NoSQL ecosystem), et. al, in a production system.
Strong software engineering skills with Python.
Knowledge of some flavor of SQL (MySQL, Oracle, Hive, Impala), including the fundamentals of data modeling and performance.
EVEN BETTER IF YOU HAVE
Skills in real-time streaming applications.
Knowledge of Scala.
A development workflow using Docker containers.
Compulsion for automating your day-to-day processes.
WHAT WE OFFER
Ability to see your direct impact on a high visibility project.
An opportunity to both create new projects and help improve the existing big data pipelines.
Work in a mature, private, nationally-known company with a CEO approval of 90% on Glassdoor and a positive atmosphere in our San Francisco tech team.
401K plan with employer matching.
Commuter pre-tax contributions.
Flexible working hours and work-from-home days.
Health plan.
In-office snacks.
Organized team events.
LIFE WITH CENTRO

We take care of our people. Our team has put together a thoughtful benefits package and provides a wide range of perks, including competitive 401k matching, a tax-free health savings account, tuition reimbursement, generous maternity/paternity leave, and more.

Aside from benefits, we’re always finding new ways to invest in the personal and professional growth our employees. We’re proud to support a variety of employee-led communities that enrich our culture of uniqueness, inclusivity, and empowerment. Centro is more than a workplace.

Centro is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and support an inclusive workplace diverse in thought, perspective and culture. We celebrate all team members regardless of gender/identity, sexual orientation, race or cultural background, religion, physical disability and age. We are better together.",3.9,Centro,"Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,19,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.5,IL,4948,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1309,309,Data Engineer,$78k-$129k,"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 200 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.
If you have proven experience in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you:
Git / SVN / TFS / VSTS
Jenkins / Travis / Bamboo / Go
Vagrant / Packer / Terraform
GitHub / Bamboo / GitLabs
Chef / Puppet / Ansible / SaltStack
Docker / Docker Swarm
Kubernetes / OpenShift
Power-Shell / Bash
AWS / Azure / GCP / OpenStack
Cloud Formation / Code Deploy
Spring Boot / Tomcat / WebLogic / JBoss
ELK Stack / Splunk
AMQP / RabbitMQ / Active MQ
New Relic / Dynatrace / AppDynamics / Sensu
JIRA / Rally / VersionOne
VMware / VirtualBox
F5 / Citrix / NGINX /Amazon ELB
Pipeline Design & Management
Application Lifecycle Management
Leading Cultural Change
Bonus experience:
Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes
What's in it for you?
Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success. sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology & social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,Solution Design Group,"Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,31,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.5,MN,1937,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
1311,311,Principal Data Scientist,$78k-$129k,"Position Title: Principal Data Scientist

Responsibilities:
Build a data/stats-driven ad machine learning models, working closely with the product team
Constantly experiment and improve machine learning models for the recommendation/ad optimization system
Invent and analyze big data for given business cases and help implement them in production
Work with the product/engineering team to implement, test and deploy the solution on Google Cloud Platform
Core Competencies:
Passionate about machine learning and big data
Great communication about complex algorithmic works as easy-to-understand story telling
Motivated to test at billions scaled data and follow up machine learning models in product
Requirements:
Ph. D in Computer Science or Statistics, or 5 years or more of similar working experience in the technical field.
Must have hands-on Machine-learning related industry project experience.
Solid Python programming skills
Ability to work in a fast paced, test-driven collaborative and iterative programming environment
Understanding of major recommendation algorithms (Collaborative Filtering, Matrix factorization, Gradient Boosting, etc.)
Senior level understanding of Algorithms, Data Structures, and Machine Learning/Data Mining
Understanding of RDBMS, SQL and NoSQL alternatives
Bonus:
Domain and/or marketplace knowledge
Understanding of various ad optimization algorithms (CTR prediction, eCPM optimization, user targeting and segmentation, RTB and real-time optimization) is a plus
Experience with Hadoop/Hbase/Pig or PySpark is a plus
Tapjoy is an equal opportunity employer. We believe that diversity and inclusion lead to stronger, more innovative teams and better business results; we want to draw from the broadest talent pool possible and encourage qualified applicants. Tapjoy does not discriminate on the basis of sex, race, ethnicity, color, age, sexual orientation, gender (including identity and expression), disability (mental or physical), religion, national origin, citizenship, marital status, military or veteran status, or any other protected classification protected by applicable law; we will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities, and pursuant to applicable fair chance ordinances, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

For more information, please visit www.tapjoy.com.

]]>",3.6,Tapjoy,"San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,13,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.5,CA,2405,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1312,312,Senior Data Scientist,$78k-$129k,"Company Overview:
Age of Learning is a leading education technology innovator based in Glendale, California, with a talented team of more than 600 individuals comprised of nationally-renowned educators, curriculum experts, developers, artists, writers, designers, engineers, producers, product managers, analysts and marketing experts! Together we develop engaging, effective digital learning technology and content to help children build a strong academic foundation for lifelong success.
Our flagship product ABCmouse.com Early Learning Academy® is a comprehensive online curriculum and the #1 digital learning product for young children. To-date, more than 30 million children worldwide have completed over 7 billion Learning Activities on ABCmouse. We recently launched Adventure Academy, the first massively multiplayer online (MMO) game designed specifically to help elementary- and middle-school-aged children learn. It features thousands of engaging Learning Activities—including minigames, books, original animated and live action series, and more—in a fun and safe virtual world. Other Age of Learning programs include immersive English language learning products for children in China and Japan; ReadingIQ, a digital library and literacy platform; and a groundbreaking personalized, adaptive digital learning system that individualizes math instruction for every child through AI-driven technology.

We are committed to helping all children succeed. We provide our educational programs at no cost to teachers, Head Start programs, public libraries, and other community organizations, and have served millions of children through these initiatives. We recently established the Age of Learning Foundation to expand this work globally.
As we expand our global reach and increase the educational impact of our programs, we’re looking for passionate, ambitious, and collaborative leaders to become a part of our growing team.


Summary:
We are seeking a strong, highly-motivated, results-oriented Senior Data Scientist to help conduct in-depth analyses and derive relevant insights. You will be an integral part of a newly-formed central analytics team and your work will influence business operations and strategy throughout the company.
In this senior role, you will be the go-to person for advanced analytics and data science projects as well as mentoring and assisting junior analysts on our centralized data and analytics team as need be.
Responsibilities:
Partner closely with stakeholders from a variety of teams, including the executive team, curriculum, brand marketing, partnerships, strategy and customer success, to surface insights and learnings that solve key business challenges
Develop statistical analyses and build and deploy machine learning models to understand and predict customer behavior and product performance
Create, report and interpret key metrics to assess performance, measure the impact of strategic initiatives, and identify ways to grow revenue and reduce costs
Drive A/B and multivariate testing strategy and implementation of user behavior to inform media tactics, audience acquisition and targeting, churn, lifetime value, product and content recommendations and personalized experiences
Create beautiful visualizations
Communicate results to technical and non-technical stakeholders and mentor/lead more junior analysts as needed
Drive data capture and data integrity requirements while partnering with other teams so that the right data is captured
Maintain vigilant eye on data quality
Develop frameworks, models, tools, and processes to ensure data-driven decisions across org
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative field and 5+ years of experience in professional data-intensive role excluding any independent data-related projects or internships that may or may not have been part of an undergraduate program
OR Master’s and/or Ph.D. in a quantitative field and 3+ years of experience in professional data-intensive role excluding any independent data-related projects or internships that may or may not have been part of an graduate program
Advanced knowledge of analytical, statistical and machine learning methods
Proficiency in SQL and complex SQL querying
Experience modeling in R and/or Python
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Proven ability to explain technical concepts to non-technical stakeholders
Must be intellectually curious, self-motivated, collaborative, and a team player
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience productionalizing models a plus
Experience with testing and optimization a plus, ideally in a digital environment
Experience in games or education a plus
We Provide:
Medical, Dental, Vision + 401k
Highly competitive PTO policy
Casual Dress Code
Snacks + Drinks (Coca Cola Freestyle Machine)
Gaming room including an Arcade (2,000+ games)
Frequent team and company outings
Limitless opportunities for professional growth!",3.2,Age of Learning,"Glendale, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,13,Company - Private,other_industries,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.5,CA,4934,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,1,1
1313,313,Aviation Data Scientist,$78k-$129k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE performs leading-edge research and development toward transformational solutions to our world’s most challenging problems. Our Center for Advanced Aviation Systems Development is a Federally-Funded Research and Development Center (FFRDC) established to serve as strategic partners to the federal government and various aviation groups around the world. Our engineers, analysts, technical and operational experts team to solve problems in the public interest that improve the safety and efficiency of the airspace system in the U.S. and abroad. The Aviation Operations, Procedures & Safety division is seeking a highly qualified engineer to work in one of the following areas: Airspace and Procedure Design and Analysis; Airport and Airspace Analysis, Modeling and Design; Performance-Based Navigation Standards and Tools; and Aviation Safety Analysis. The candidate will work with the FAA and international customers, leveraging the largest repository of aviation data to improve the capabilities, safety, and efficiency of the aviation system. Come join a globally recognized partner and resource for data driven solutions that impact public good. The candidate will be responsible for: - Contributing to various projects applying innovative analysis techniques across multiple challenging problems in the field of aviation. - Working closely with other engineers and scientists in the design of exploratory analyses or simulations pertaining to aviation issues. - Drawing conclusions from a wide range of aviation system data and articulating key findings in both written and verbal form. Developing data visualization products that simplify presentation of big data calculations. Qualifications: - Knowledge of programming/scripting languages (eg. Python, MATLAB, R, Perl) - Familiarity with statistical analysis packages (eg. SAS, JMP) - Familiarity with machine learning techniques and algorithm development. - Excellent written and verbal communication skills. In-person presentation and writing sample may be requested. - Experience with data visualization software (eg. Tableau, D3) - Knowledge of data processing capabilities (eg. Hadoop, Pig, Spark, SQL). Skill is desired, but not required - Experience working in the aviation domain: airport operation, air traffic control, airlines. Skill is desired, but not required BS or MS in Operations Research, Applied Mathematics/Statistics Computer Science, Systems Engineering, or other physical science/engineering

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,MITRE,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.5,VA,4307,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
1314,314,Senior Data Scientist,$78k-$129k,"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking a Senior Data Scientist to develop innovative solutions for customers and internal product teams. We look to rapidly prototype solutions and deploy the most promising of them. We identify and leverage the latest techniques (fast.ai is a team favorite) so that our customers can stay one step ahead. On every project you'll learn something new (and likely teach us something as well).

Responsibilities include:
Develop solutions spanning multiple subject areas, from NLP to image and video.
Maintain awareness of state-of-the-art machine learning and techniques, methods and platforms, including commercial and open source.
Implement, configure and test machine learning and deep learning libraries and platforms (e.g. fast.ai, TensorFlow, Keras, XGBoost, LightGBM).
Test solutions on AWS using services such as SageMaker, EC2, and Snowball Edge.
Write blog posts and presentations that clearly communicate complex machine learning concepts to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Contribute to visually-appealing, web-enabled prototype applications that illustrate relevant machine learning capabilities.
Basic Qualifications:
Experience with Python (2+ years).
Experience with machine learning or statistics (2+ years).
Ability to work both independently and collaboratively.
High levels of curiosity, creativity, and problem-solving capabilities.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Comfortable navigating the command line.
Desired Skills:
Research experience in machine learning specific to natural language processing, computer vision, or deep learning.
Experience with managing data and creating algorithms using AWS.
Experience with R, Java, or other programming languages.
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SCI with polygraph required.
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.


Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,Novetta,"Herndon, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,8,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.5,VA,3544,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
1315,315,"Director, Cloud Data Engineer Virtual Hiring Event",$78k-$129k,"Epsilon Hiring Event!

Event Details
Date: Tuesday, September 29, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Director of CRM Strategy

Associate Director, Decision Sciences

Senior Strategic Consultant

Director of Strategic Consulting

Senior Systems Engineer

Lead Citrix Engineer

Product Security Manager

Director, Cloud Data Engineer

Intake Details:

Requirements

Associate’s or Bachelor’s degree preferred

Technical requirements

The interview will take place on Indeed's virtual interviewing platform. After you RSVP, you will find a link in your email that will lead you directly to the video interview lobby during the event. Try to find a quiet place with good lighting and a stable internet connection.

What to bring to this event

An electronic copy of your resume

Completing our online application prior to the event is strongly encouraged and will speed up the process.

What to wear

Dress code is Business casual (dress pants/skirt, button down/blouse, optional tie).

About Epsilon

Positioned at the core of Publicis Groupe, Epsilon drives measurable results and outcomes for some of the world's top brands by personalizing the consumer journey with truth, proof and performance transparency. For more than 50 years, and fueled by an integrated suite of products and solutions, Epsilon combines powerful AI-led technology with the industry's most robust data to restore the balance between brands, their marketing and their customers.

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

Role Summary:

The Epsilon PeopleCloud Solutions team is responsible for developing Epsilon’s proprietary technology platform (Epsilon PeopleCloud) that brings technically robust, innovative and differentiable data solutions leveraging internal investments in data and technology. The team owns the development and maintenance of data science development environments, proprietary libraries and packages, and the development of machine intelligent services for product applications.

As a Director of Cloud Data Engineering, you will apply your technical knowledge and expertise as a lead member of the team, collaborating with our data science, data partnerships and product team leads to define then deliver cloud native data integrated solutions and services across the Epsilon PeopleCloud ecosystem. You will design and build highly dynamic, data-driven solutions while keeping current on the latest developments and trends in data technologies. You will have hands-on experience with cloud platforms and big data, combined with a working knowledge of data science and ML/AI trends.

Day-to-Day Responsibilities include:

Lead the design and development of technical solutions utilizing cloud data services that bridge data engineering best practices with data science ML/AI services
Provide thought leadership partnering with product and engineering teams to innovate future solutions
Contribute to the product development and platform engineering roadmaps
Design for then enforce data security and data privacy mandates in a global environment
Maintain expertise and develop team awareness and adoption of relevant emerging technologies
Mentor and lead a distributed data engineering team and leading peer-level design reviews
Manage and communicate project risks and challenges

Minimum Qualifications:

B.S. in Mathematics, Computer Science/Engineering or Statistics
5-10 years of data engineering, software development or cloud-based services experience
Minimum 3 years leading and mentoring distributed engineering teams
Applied experience with deploying cloud-based data solutions and utilizing cloud services
Applied experience working with a range of database and data integration technologies (e.g. MySQL, Hadoop distros, BigQuery, DataFlow, Redshift)
Applied experience architecting and developing micro services designs and API services
Applied experience working with DevOps frameworks and CI (e.g. Jenkins, Ansible, Docker, etc.)
Applied experience programming developing packages in Python, Java, Scala or R
Applied experience in designing ETL solutions leveraging open source, product or custom solutions
Experience working with cloud functions, micro-services and serverless designs
Experience in designing and deploying automated data validations solutions
Experience in designing data solutions leveraging enterprise identity and access management services
Applied knowledge of developing compliant solutions with global data security and privacy regulations
Proficiency in building Machine Learning data pipelines and automation
Demonstrated ability to communicate solutions in terms of technical and functional design documents.",3.3,Epsilon,"Irving, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,51,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.5,TX,4903,0,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1317,317,Senior Big Data Engineer,$78k-$129k,"Do you want to be part of the transformation that's pushing forward a truly data-driven company? Are you ready to collaborate and innovate with a team responsible for changing the customer experience using the latest technologies? As a Senior Big Data Engineer on the GEICO IT squad, you’ll thrive in a fast-paced innovative culture that turns data into information and uses that information to drive action. One focus is our Single View of the Customer (SVOC) initiative. As part of this team you will be designing, creating, and populating customer centric data stores necessary for deriving valuable insights in real time to provide tailored customer experiences. As a senior engineer you will have the opportunity to mentor more junior associates and help grow our team.
When you first join our SVOC team, you will have opportunity to come up to speed on the innovative technologies we use to develop SVOC!

Basic Qualifications:

o At least 2 years as a Big Data Engineer/Developer on the Hadoop Ecosystem, with experience in data profiling and transformations
o At least 2 years of experience using Spark core, or Spark SQL,
o Experience with core Java (and/or Scala, Python)
o Experience with NoSQL databases such as HBase, Cassandra, or MongoDB
o Proficient in designing efficient and robust ETL/ELT workflows, schedulers, and event-based triggers
o Strong critical thinking, decision making, and problem-solving skills
o Excellent verbal/written communication skills, including communicating technical issues to non-technical audiences
o A Bachelor's degree in a computer related field or equivalent professional experience is required

Preferred Skills:

o Exposure to Spark Streaming and Machine Learning
o Exposure to Data Mining, Data Engineering, and Data Modeling
o Exposure to Graph Databases
Note: The safety of our associates, both current and future, is GEICO’s highest priority. At this time, most of our associates are working remotely due to the current COVID-19 pandemic. Candidates who are selected for this position will be trained remotely and must be able to work from home in a designated work area. Once GEICO determines it is safe for associates to return to the office, candidates may be required to work in our Chevy Chase, MD office.

About GEICO
For more than 75 years, GEICO has stood out from the rest of the insurance industry! We are one of the nation's largest and fastest-growing auto insurers thanks to our low rates, outstanding service and clever marketing. We're an industry leader employing thousands of dedicated and hard-working associates. As a wholly owned subsidiary of Berkshire Hathaway, we offer associates training and career advancement in a financially stable and rewarding workplace.

As a full-time Senior Big Data Engineer, you’ll enjoy our Total Rewards Program* to help secure your financial future and preserve your health and well-being, including:
• Premier Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance with no waiting period**
• Paid Vacation, Sick and Parental Leave
• 401(k) Plan with Profit Sharing
• Tuition Reimbursement
• Paid Training and Licensures
Benefits may be different by location. Benefit eligibility requirements vary and may include length of service.
*Coverage begins with the pay period after hire date. Must enroll in New Hire Benefits within 30 days of the date of hire for coverage to take effect.
GEICO is an equal opportunity employer. GEICO conducts drug screens and background checks on applicants who accept employment offers.

How to Apply
Click ""Apply for Job"" to complete your application. You will need an active email address and phone number. Please upload your resume, preferably as Word .doc files or PDF. Once you begin your application you can save it and access it later. Your application should include any work and/or internship experience from at least the past five years.

#DI-AT

#GDOORIT
#LI-AT1",3.4,GEICO,"Chevy Chase, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,84,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.5,MD,3897,1,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
1319,319,Associate Director RWE Data Scientist,$128k-$206k,"Do you have expertise in, and passion for Medical Affairs in Oncology? Would you like to apply your expertise to impact the Associate Director RWE Data Scientist role in a company that

follows the science and turns ideas into life changing medicines? Then AstraZeneca might be the one for you!

At AstraZeneca, we put patients first and strive to meet their unmet needs worldwide. Working here means being entrepreneurial, thinking big and working together to make the impossible a reality. If you are swift to action, confident to lead, willing to collaborate, and curious about what science can do, then youre our kind of person.

AstraZenecas vision in Oncology is to help patients by redefining the cancer-treatment paradigm, with the aim of bringing six new cancer medicines to patients between 2013 and 2020. A broad pipeline of next generation medicines is focused principally on four disease areas - breast, ovarian, lung and hematological cancers. As well as other tumor types, these are being targeted through five key platforms -immunotherapy, the genetic drivers of cancer and resistance, DNA damage repair, HER2 and antibody drug conjugates, underpinned by personalized healthcare and biomarker technologies.

The Role

The ideal candidate for this role will bring a proven track record of delivering value through the leverage of routinely collected data from healthcare settings to provide health analytics and insights in a range of contexts including Public Health, Pharmaceutical Research and Development and Commercial/ Payer.

They will collaborate with colleagues in Epidemiology, Statistics and Payer, giving scientific and technical guidance on study design, RW data selection and best practice in RW data utilization.

In addition, they will assist in advancing and shaping AZs Real World Science data strategy through the due diligence on new data providers/vendors, informatics support for data acquisitions in a range of Therapeutic Areas.

The role will promote best practice in Real World Data Science across multiple domains, and/or stakeholder groups.

Typical Accountabilities
Collaborate with Payer and Epidemiology teams to maximise the value derived from large observational research data
Deliver analyses of data from EMR, claims and primary observational data required by TA RWE strategies
Support the development of IVS strategies and selection of optimised contact models for prioritised markets through analysis of RWD
Provide scientific guidance on the application of Real World Evidence and observational research data to address issues across the Oncology and Biopharmaceuticals business units
Provide technical input, options and directions to strategic decisions made by AZ observational study teams on study design, data partner selection and best practices in RWE data utilization
Support technical teams to provide access to analytical tools and develop visual analytics to enable self-serving applications for end customers
Provide clear technical input, options, and direction to strategic decisions on RWE platform and capability build
Provide support for strategic decisions on AZ Medical Evidence and Observational Research external collaborations in the US and other markets
Assist in building a capability that becomes a source of sustained competitive advantage for AZ in identifying, acquiring, integrating and mining diverse RW data from multiple geographic and healthcare system sources to support evidence generation and real-world studies
Evaluate and assess strengths and weaknesses of external RW data sources, and potential partners for advancing the data strategy for specific therapeutic areas
Maintain a strong insight into the capabilities of potential external partners in RWE, especially for US and emerging markets.
Education, Qualifications, Skills and Experience

Essential
PhD or MS in data science or other advanced degree in life sciences with post doctoral or other training/work in Medical/Health Informatics or related field
Experience in real-world evidence and familiarity with health economics/epidemiology, and quantitative science such as health outcome modelling
Expertise in EMR/Health IT, disease registries, and insurance claims databases
Experience in Statistical Analysis Plan (SAP) generation and execution for observational studies
Expertise in methods development and application using statistical languages such as R/Matlab/SAS/SQL/Hadoop/Python
Experience in advanced visualisation and visual analytics of routinely collected healthcare data
Desirable
Expertise in clinical data standards, medical terminologies and controlled vocabularies used in healthcare data and ontologies (ICD9/10/ReadCode)
Experience in supporting pharmacoepidemiology studies with proven track record of advancing approaches with data science
Expertise in data mining approaches within healthcare settings generating insight from routinely collected healthcare data
A history of patient care or equivalent background of working at a patient care setting that allows the candidate to bring medical perspective into real-world evidence generation and observational studies
Demonstrated ability to build long-term relationships with stakeholders at senior levels, understand relevant scientific/business challenges at a deep level and translate into a programme of informatics activities to deliver defined value
Ability to lead & manage multi-disciplinary data science projects
Strong track record of delivering large, cross functional projects
Experience working in a global organization and delivering global solutions
Use of Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence in the generation of hypotheses within Real World Data
Why AstraZeneca?

At AstraZeneca when we see an opportunity for change, we seize it and make it happen, because any opportunity no matter how small, can be the start of something big. Delivering life-changing medicines is about being entrepreneurial - finding those moments and recognizing their potential. Join us on our journey of building a new kind of organization to reset expectations of what a bio-pharmaceutical company can be. This means were opening new ways to work, pioneering cutting edge methods and bringing unexpected teams together. Interested? Come and join our journey.

Are you already imagining yourself joining our team? Good, because we cant wait to hear from you.

Where can I find out more?

Our Social Media, Follow AstraZeneca on LinkedIn https://www.linkedin.com/company/1603/

Follow AstraZeneca on Facebook https://www.facebook.com/astrazenecacareers/

Follow AstraZeneca on Instagram https://www.instagram.com/astrazeneca_careers/?hl=en",4.0,AstraZeneca,"Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,107,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,167.0,MD,6665,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1320,320,Journeyman Data Scientist/Analyst,$128k-$206k,"Description

Job Description:

JOB SUMMARY:

The Intelligence and Homeland Security Group of Leidos is seeking a Journeyman Data Scientist for an Intelligence Community (IC) program in Northern Virginia. An Active TS/SCI with polygraph security clearance is required in order to be considered for this position. The candidate will support Government staff in developing a broad range of written products in support of senior leadership and USG policymakers.

PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES:

Provide expert and professional data scientists to implement effective and innovative solutions meshing disparate data types to discover insight and trends in Human Capital information. Perform work on a data science team to advance Human Capital Analysis across the IC. Centralize Intelligence Community Chief Human Capital Office (IC CHCO) data collection and synthesis, including survey data enabling strategic and predictive analytics to guide business decisions. Develop or utilize complex programmatic and quantitative methods to find patterns and relationships in data sets; lead statistical modeling, or other data driven problem solving analysis to address novel or abstract business operations questions; and incorporate insight and findings into a range of products

BASIC QUALIFICATIONS:

Active TS/SCI with polygraph.
8+ years demonstrated core experience in the Labor Category area.
Demonstrated knowledge of the Intelligence Community.
Demonstrated experience performing data analysis and modeling on an independent (i.e., without significant guidance or direction) basis.
Demonstrated experience in developing and applying quantitative methods to find patterns and relationships in large human capital data sets (such as the Human Capital Data Call, Foreign Language Data Call, FAIR act data, etc.) using statistical and graphical packages.
Applied knowledge in the mathematical sciences such as probability, statistics, predictive modeling, computational social sciences; computer programming such as but not limited to Python, R, SAS, SPSS; and COTS data visualization packages such as but not limited to Tableau. Experience with Oracle Database and Procedural language/Structured Query Language (PUSQL).
Preferred experiences include but not limited to C#.NET, ASP.NET Model View Controller (MVC), jQuery, and Cascading Style Sheets (CSS), etc.
Demonstrated experience with structuring data, natural language processing, database technologies, and machine learning algorithms.
Ability to translate complex, technical, or analytic findings into an easily understood narrative - tell a story with the data in graphical, verbal, or written form.
Demonstrated five (5) years expertise in supporting quantitative and analytic efforts and knowledge of workforce planning. Experience should include engagement with the Intelligence Community and expertise with using analytical software.
Demonstrated professional experience in developing quantitative financial analysis related to budget formulation and execution. Experience in development of financial procedural guidance data formats related to CBJB workforce displays and analytic support, resource management and planning.
Demonstrated experience in human resource management supporting the federal government.
Demonstrated experience in the use of programming, design, development, and implementation of on*line and automated survey instruments.
Bachelor's or advanced degree in social sciences or related fields and requisite experience. Related fields may include statistics, mathematics, computer science, physical science, economics, or engineering.

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph

Travel:
No

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world's toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company's 33,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Virginia, Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $10.19 billion for the fiscal year ended December 28, 2018. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.6,Leidos,"Bethesda, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,51,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,167.0,MD,5625,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1323,323,Data Scientist,$128k-$206k,"Data Scientist

As Data Scientist at HP Inc. in San Diego, you will join an industry-leading organization and work on developing frameworks for systematic data science modeling to identify optimal marketing, pricing and sales decisions for our Printing & PC business. Working within a dynamic, highly skilled and diverse Pricing Strategy and Analytics team (economists, engineers, scientists or even musicians – majority of them with a PhD) you will build models and develop tools and analytical processes to develop pricing and marketing strategies for HP printers, cartridges and PCs around the world.

Responsibilities:

Develop and apply statistical methods to analyze the effect of pricing and sales decisions on business performance
Develop and implement frameworks and processes for systematic and automated data analysis
Develop tools to ingest, merge, and clean data sets
Immerse yourself in very large data sets and complex problems
Visualize and interpret the results of analyses, and create strategy recommendations
Present the results and the corresponding recommendations to the relevant stakeholders, including senior leadership

Qualifications:

Interest in data science, pricing, economics, and/or consumer behavior
Scientific thinking and ability to design and critically analyze quantitative research
Ability to think creatively about research problems and invent original solutions to modeling challenges
Ability to build and interpret complex linear regression models, with machine learning experience a plus
Knowledge of and experience in deploying numerical optimization routines
Proficiency with Python and R is required
Strong analytical skills, with a high level of attention to detail
Proficiency in Microsoft Excel and Microsoft PowerPoint
Excellent written and verbal communication skills

Nice-To-Haves:

Knowledge of price optimization approaches, price discrimination models and a general knowledge of main concepts from the industrial organization literature
Experience working with large data sets
Experience in data engineering
Exposure to digital marketing
Experience working in or collaborating with industry
Experience creating data visualizations
Ability to build dashboards and other tools using front-end development skills
Experience in software development

Education & Experience

Bachelor’s, Master's or PhD degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Economics, Quantitative Marketing, Mathematics, Physics or equivalent
1-3 years’ experience including graduate or postgraduate research",4.1,HP,"San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,81,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,167.0,CA,2529,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
1324,324,AWS Data Engineer,$128k-$206k,"AWS Data Engineer Northern, VA

AWS Data Engineer


Minimum Requirements
Active SECRET clearance preferred; Clearable US Citizen with NAIC (National background check) may also apply
5 years Data Engineering experience AND a BA Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Math, Sciences, or equivalent; 4 years of additional relevant experience may be substituted for education.
Working knowledge of agile software development, DevSecOps, and AWS native solutions including API Gateway, S3, and Lambda is required.
Preferred Experience
Knowledge of several of the following areas is desirable: DevSecOps, Active Server Pages, JavaScript, Python, HTML, and AWS native applications including S3, WAF, API Gateway, Lambda, CloudFront, DynamoDB, Transcribe, Athena, Simple Queue Service, QuikSight, CloudWatch, CloudTrail, KMS, and Cognito.
Job Duties
Provide development support to the Scrum Master in an agile software development environment in AWS.
Works as a key member of an AWS native solution software development team and works to identify risks and bottlenecks associated with big data environments.
About NuWave Solutions

NuWave Solutions is a recognized leader in providing anticipatory intelligence and advanced data analytics to the defense, intelligence, and private sectors for over 20 years. Leveraging artificial intelligence and machine learning methodologies, NuWave Solutions streamlines the Data-to-Decision lifecycle faster than traditional practices allowing clients to take action with confidence.

For more information on how NuWave Solutions supports its clients and builds upon success, please visit https://www.nuwavesolutions.com

Position Details
Location – Arlington, Virginia
Travel Required – N/A
If travel is required, how much? 0%
Work Schedule (Shift etc.): Day Shift
Authorization to work in US required
8570 Requirements: N/A
NuWave Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled
Tagged as: AWS Data Engineer",4.4,NuWave Solutions,Virginia,-1,51 to 200 Employees,21,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,167.0,VA,1954,0,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
1325,325,Senior Data Engineer,$128k-$206k,"AutoPets, the inventor, manufacturer, and retailer of the Litter-Robot, Feeder-Robot, and Litterbox.com, is an international leader in developing highly functional pet products that make pet care easier and more enjoyable. Launched in 2000 by founder and CEO Brad Baxter, the Litter-Robot is the highest-rated automatic, self-cleaning litter box on the market. AutoPets is a 2017-2020 Inc. 5000 company based in Auburn Hills, Michigan and Juneau, Wisconsin, with 125+ passionate employees who are dedicated to improving the future of pet care. If we sound like a team you’re interested in joining, keep reading!

AutoPets is seeking an experienced *Senior* *Data Engineer* to partner with the CFO and Information Technology team to lead AutoPets’ efforts in building its first business intelligence platform. We are looking for a passionate data junkie who loves digging into data sources, extracting key information from these systems, engineering solutions, analyzing results and wants to blaze the trail building a business intelligence platform from the ground up. AutoPets is a group of passionate engineers, product developers and marketers, who are data hungry and ready for a company-wide solution to inform the business decisions of its key stakeholders.
Responsibilities*
Partner with multiple stakeholders to deliver end-to-end analytics solutions
Develop both short and long-term solutions to ensure our key stakeholders have the data they need for today and tomorrow
Architect an Enterprise Data Warehouse (EDW) using best-in-class tools and technology
Design and implement efficient data pipelines in order to integrate data from a variety of sources into a EDW.
Determine reporting needs and integrate with business intelligence visualization tools
Assess and understand underlying architecture of our eCommerce, Fulfillment, and Robot-operational databases and implement changes to support better reporting
Design and implement backfill or other warehouse data management processes
Develop and execute testing strategies to ensure high quality warehouse data that reconciled with financial statements
Provide documentation, training, and consulting for data warehouse users
Provide input and feedback to support continuous improvement in the evolution of the data warehouse
High-Level 2-Year Scope of Projects*
Build a best-in-class data warehouse using current technology (Snowflake, Redshift, Big Query)
Assessment and mapping of all key data sources including Magento, SAP, Salesforce and in-house systems
Extract, transform and load key data sources to the Data Warehouse using a Saas tool (Fivetran, Segment, Strict)
Implementation of a visualization tool (Looker, Tableau, etc)
Build-out and automation of dashboards containing KPIs across all departments
Requirements*
Degree in math, statistics, computer science, or equivalent technical field
5+ years in a Data Engineering or Data Warehousing role
5+ years experience in an e-Commerce, direct-to-consumer company, including familiarity working with customer data (lifetime value, customer acquisition cost, churn rate, etc.)
3-5 years experience as an Analyst using data to interpret business trends and make recommendations to leaders
Experience with big data technologies (Snowflake, Redshift, Hive, etc.)
Experience with ETL fundamentals and building efficient data pipelines
Experience with relational SQL and NoSQL databases, including Postgres and MySQL
Highly knowledgeable in data warehouse methodologies and models (Inmon / Kimball)
Experience with cloud services: Google and/or AWS
Experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages (Python, PHP, Java, C++, Scala, etc)
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Retirement Plan
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
COVID-19 considerations:
We are following all State mandated guidelines.

Experience:
big data technologies (Snowflake, Redshift, Hive, etc.): 1 year (Preferred)
ETL fundamentals and building efficient data pipelines: 1 year (Preferred)
Data Engineering or Data Warehousing: 5 years (Required)
relational SQL and NoSQL databases: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Auburn Hills, MI 48326 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available:
No: Not providing sponsorship for this job
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Aggressive -- competitive and growth-oriented
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://www.litter-robot.com/about-us.html
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",5.0,AutoPets,"Auburn Hills, MI",-1,1 to 50 Employees,21,Company - Private,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,167.0,MI,4908,1,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1326,326,Senior Data Scientist 4 Artificial Intelligence,$128k-$206k,"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311095

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing & Analytics

Group: Data Sciences & Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and artificial intelligence research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to AI assurance, remote sensing and geo-spatial analytics, human language technologies, computer vision, and other related fields.

+ The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as natural language processing, remote-sensing and geo-spatial intelligence, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery (e.g., publication in conferences such as NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred)

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 7 years of experience, Masters with 5 years of experience or PHD with 3 years of experience
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",3.8,Pacific Northwest National Laboratory,"Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,55,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,167.0,WA,5242,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,1
1327,327,Machine Learning Engineer,$128k-$206k,"The Video & Image Understanding Group develops and applies cutting-edge computer vision and deep learning techniques to solve problems in object detection, recognition, localization & tracking; biometrics; 3D scene reconstruction; threat detection; vision-aided navigation; and situational awareness. Our projects integrate algorithmic research, software engineering, and application system development to produce innovative capabilities that address challenging national security problems. We actively collaborate with research engineers across STR, as well as with academic researchers and industry partners to develop practical and powerful computer vision solutions.

The Role:
Develop, implement and evaluate machine learning algorithms to detect, segment, classify and track objects in diverse imaging modalities.
Apply machine learning techniques to integrate information from multiple looks and multiple modalities to improve scene understanding capabilities.
Develop and apply transfer learning and domain adaptation techniques to solve scene understanding problems where limited measured training data is available.
Perform data analysis on experimental data and identify performance improvement strategies.
Transition machine learning algorithms to prototype and/or real-time systems demonstrations.
Who You Are:
BS, MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Applied Mathematics or related technical discipline
Strong scientific software development skills
Independent analytical problem-solving skills
Experience in machine learning techniques, particularly deep learning
Motivated collaborator and excellent communicator to both technical and non-technical audiences
Some Other Relevant Skills You May Have:
Experience with Python and C/C++
Experience in developing and applying machine learning techniques to solving computer vision problems",4.5,Systems & Technology Research,"Beavercreek, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,10,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,167.0,OH,1875,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1329,329,Sr. Machine Learning Engineer,$128k-$206k,"Overview:

UFG offers you an award-winning workplace and a trustworthy, financially stable company. While we’ve always known our commitment to employees and financial stewardship, it is good to have others recognize our dedicated efforts. We've been named an Iowa Top Workplace by the Des Moines Register for four consecutive years, and included on Forbes’ “America’s Most Trustworthy Financial Companies” every year since 2014. Additionally, UFG is a super-regional property and casualty insurer rated “A” (Excellent) by A.M. Best Company.

We are seeking a Senior Machine Learning Engineer who is capable of solving hard data science problems and building the Analytics as a Service ecosystem necessary to deliver those solutions to our customers. We are seeking candidates who enjoy having autonomy in their work, take pride in seeing their work directly impact the lives of others, and are as ambitious as we are in capturing significant market opportunities. The ideal candidate will possess strong technical and communication skills, as well as proven experience in developing and deploying machine learning in a real-time operational environment.

This position can be located at any of our regional UFG Offices or remotely from anywhere in the US.

INDHP

Responsibilities:
Collaborate with our data scientists to design, train, and deploy machine learning model
Integrate modelling solutions into our overall technical platform
Architect, develop, and automate data pipelines and systems that reliably support production ML models and model-driven services
Build & maintain a production-ready experimentation platform to run models in parallel
Work with our engineers to deploy scalable infrastructure that support product features, DS/ML R&D projects, and big data analytics services
Prepare and preprocess data in collaboration with the data engineering team
Fine tune performance to optimize user response times and model execution
Strong knowledge of converting the trained model into REST or SOAP APIs to expose as web services
Socialize and mentor other engineers in best practices
Research opportunities for data acquisition and new uses for existing data
Collaborate with data scientists, architects, data analysts and engineers to support technical and product roadmap planning
Qualifications:

Education:

Competencies typically acquired through a Masters or Ph.D. (in Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics, or other STEM field of study)

Experience:

Proven track record of successfully architecting and building highly available, low latency systems for high traffic applications
Experience developing and delivering ML-based services and product features into commercial software applications

Knowledge, skills & abilities:

Intuition on how to architect scalable distributed computing systems for machine learning
Familiarity with machine learning and parallel processing pipelines, experience with implementation in low-latency real-time platforms and/or scalable offline batch processes
Highly proficient in Python and experience using common DS/ML frameworks such as scipy, scikit-learn, TensorFlow/Keras, etc.
Solid foundation of computer science, software engineering, and system architecture design principles
Understanding of data structures, data modeling and software architecture
Knowledge of Hadoop or other distributing computing systems
Ability to write robust code in SQL, Python, and Java
Comfortable configuring, deploying, and managing cloud resources (GCP, AWS, etc) for your projects
Job scheduling technologies and containerization for isolated development shouldn’t be foreign concepts to you
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced environment with significant uncertainty
Pragmatic approach to problem-solving
Desire to always be learning, and a collaborative team-player attitude",4.2,United Fire Group,"Cedar Rapids, IA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,74,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,167.0,IA,3825,1,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,1
1331,331,Data Scientist,$128k-$206k,"A Career with Point72’s MI Data team
At Point72 MI Data, our Data Scientists sift through petabytes of unstructured data from diverse sources to discover trends and insights that help Point72’s Portfolio Managers create new investment theses. We combine an experiment-based approach with the strongest possible management support and the freedom to innovate unencumbered by bureaucracy. We encourage our Data Scientists to imagine the impossible, and provide the structure to bring those ideas to market in months, not years.
What you’ll do
Our Data Scientists conduct research through data mining and statistical modeling to discover insights from Big Data that are used by our investment professionals to make investment decisions. You will have the opportunity to work in a highly collegial environment that emphasizes teaching and learning as a team. In this role, you will:
Tackle the challenges of featurizing and modeling large and unstructured data using machine learning and statistical techniques
Manage all aspects of the research and execution process including methodology selection, data collection and quality, modeling and analysis, and performance monitoring
Deliver research findings to investment teams, portfolio managers, and other internal clients
Work within a team to help drive technical innovation through a collaborative R&D process

What’s required
We look for candidates with extensive knowledge in machine learning, statistical models, and data mining tools, and a proven track record of working with large structured and unstructured data sets to extract timely, actionable insights. Other requirements include:
MS or PhD degree in a quantitative discipline
3+ years of industry working experience in a role that requires advanced statistical analysis
3+ years of hands-on working experience with varied and complex data sets
Strong programming skills in the following languages: SQL, Python (preferred), R, Scala, Spark
Ability to think creatively and see the big picture as well as finer details

We take care of our people
We invest in our people, their careers, their health, and their well-being. We want you to concentrate on success and leave the rest to us. When you work here, we provide:
Fully-paid health care benefits
Generous parental and family leave policies
Mental and physical wellness programs
Tuition assistance
A 401(k) savings program with an employer match and more

About Point72
Point72 Asset Management is a global firm led by Steven Cohen that invests in multiple asset classes and strategies worldwide. Resting on more than a quarter-century of investing experience, we seek to be the industry’s premier asset manager through delivering superior risk-adjusted returns, adhering to the highest ethical standards, and offering the greatest opportunities to the industry’s brightest talent. We’re inventing the future of finance by revolutionizing how we develop our people and how we use data to shape our thinking.",3.8,Point72,"New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,6,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,167.0,NY,2971,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,1,0,0
1335,335,"Data Scientist II, Product Analytics",$128k-$206k,"The Opportunity


At Livongo, data is at the heart of our culture of innovation. We're looking for a Data Science analytics team member to collaborate with Product Management and Marketing as we work toward optimizing our UX and messaging.

As a Data Scientist, Product Analytics your main focus will be to measure member experience and guide product decisions, ultimately making Livongo's products more valuable, delightful and intuitive to our Members. We're looking for someone with at least 2 years of experience in Data Analytics. In addition to technical data science skills, core competencies such as collaboration, decision-making, communication and flexibility will be key to your success.

This role offers the challenge and excitement of converting data analysis into real-life benefits. Come help us break new ground, while measurably improving lives and saving millions in healthcare costs.

Responsibilities
Provide insights about our products and member experience to inform Product teams for roadmap and feature decisions
Conduct exploratory analysis and develop statistical models to answer key product usage and engagement questions
Help Product and Marketing teams use experimentation (A/B testing) and cohorting to test assumptions and launch new marketing campaigns, features and product releases
Partner with Product teams to define and benchmark metrics for new features launches and initiatives and help create a culture of measurement
Candidate Profile
2+ years of work experience in product/data analytics or a related discipline
Data science experience (SQL, Python, R) and familiarity with managing large data sets
A general knowledge of machine learning approaches is a plus.
The ability to collaborate and communicate with Product Managers and help them craft hypotheses, and define and measure KPIs
Confidence working with ambiguity, unknown variables, and missing context (and the ability to find ways to bridge those gaps when necessary)
A self-starter approach, with strong motivation and drive for excellence
BS degree in Engineering, Computer Science or a related filed in lieu of degree, relevant work experience and/or trade school
Why Join Livongo?


The Transformative Name in Healthcare: The transformative industry forces in Community, Content and Commerce are now household names. As Amazon is to Commerce, Livongo is to Healthcare. With our Applied Health Signals engine, AI+AI, we've transformed how care is delivered.

Our Work Truly Matters: Livongo's proprietary, consumer-first technology is revolutionizing the experience of living with a chronic health condition. Our data-driven digital health engine enables our Members to seamlessly manage multiple health conditions on one empowering platform. We use smart, connected devices, personalized digital guidance, and 24x7x365 access to health professionals to make it easier for people to stay healthier.

Make an Impact: Do you want to accomplish something meaningful? To create results that matter? Livongo's innovative solution produces industry-leading member satisfaction, measurable clinical outcomes and proven healthcare costs savings. Here you can truly improve lives.

The Largest Digital Health IPO in History: We are at a milestone period in our history. On July 25, 2019 we took our company public, in order to elevate and expand the way the industry views us, thus ushering us into a whole new set of mission-critical conversations that will help us accomplish the work still to be done. As we reach new levels of achievement, we accelerate our ability to deliver life-changing services.

Focus on PEOPLE: Livongo has been voted one of the Best Places to Work in healthcare, by Fortune Magazine and Best Place to Work! Talented, passionate individuals make the difference, in this fast-moving, collaborative and inspiring environment.

Diversity and Inclusion: At Livongo we believe that personal and professional diversity is the key to innovation. We hire based solely on your strengths and qualifications, and the way in which those strengths can directly contribute to your success in your new position.

Growth and Innovation: We've already made healthcare history, yet we remain on the threshold of very big things. Leading the industry with our Applied Health Signals category, we have cracked the code to transforming healthcare. Come grow with us and support our mission to make a tangible difference in the lives of our Members.

See photos, watch videos and learn more about Livongo: follow us on Glassdoor.

#LivongoIPO #appliedhealthsignals

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we never have and never will discriminate against any job candidate or employee due to age, race, religion, color, ethnicity, national origin, gender, gender identity/expression, sexual orientation, membership in an employee organization, medical condition, family history, genetic information, veteran status, marital status, parental status or pregnancy (including breastfeeding we have a mother's room in both our offices). In our innovative and inclusive workplace, we prohibit discrimination and harassment of any kind.",4.7,Livongo,"Mountain View, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,6,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,167.0,CA,5127,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1338,338,Machine Learning Engineer,$128k-$206k,"Opportunity overview

Cohere Health is simplifying healthcare for patients, their doctors, and all those who are important in a patient's healthcare experience. Our focus is to enable an efficient, transparent patient journey where patient goals are central to decision-making.

We are a mission-driven and fast-growing company obsessed with eliminating the wasteful friction patients and doctors experience, particularly for diagnoses that require expensive procedures or medications. To that end, we build products and services that ensure the appropriate plan of care is understood and expeditiously approved, so that patients and doctors can focus on health, rather than payment or administrative hassles.

In this role, you'll join our growing team of world-class engineers, statisticians, and clinical experts to deploy machine learning algorithms that help automate burdensome administrative clinical practices. You will be tasked with finding the most promising opportunities for impact and then delivering on them.

What you will do:
Find the signal in incoherent clinical data
Build reliable and scalable production machine learning systems
Work on feature engineering, statistical analysis, developing novel ML techniques, understanding classifier performance, and ensuring fit-for-purpose.
Work cross-functionally across diverse stakeholders, including product managers, statisticians, EHR data specialists and physicians.
What you will have:
You have at 3 years experience in applied ML in the industry with a degree or higher (MS/PhD) in computer science, machine learning, mathematics or similar field
Clear understanding of model building, model maintenance and the measures that optimize models for product use
Understand experimental design and can independently perform collection, measurement, and interpretation of results
Expert in R, SQL,Python or other common analytical data tools
Expert in linear regression and classification approaches
Bonus points if:


Have experience with healthcare data such as claims and EMR data
Have hands on experience building NLP models using Spacy from clinical narratives
Experience with TensorFlow is also a plus.
We can't wait to learn more about you and meet you at Cohere Health!",5.0,Cohere Health,"Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,167.0,MA,2241,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,0
1341,341,Machine Learning Engineer,$128k-$206k,"About Alpha Health
We’re on a mission to remedy the financial complexity crippling healthcare in America.

Our aim is to organize and use all healthcare information to reduce the cost of care and improve the patient experience.

As the first Unified Automation company for healthcare, we use the same machine learning approaches that made driverless cars possible to provide health systems with a single solution for revenue cycle management. Alpha Health’s Unified Automation brings together the best of people, data and technology to efficiently, accurately and autonomously navigate the complex state of medical reimbursement in the United States.

We are growing rapidly:
- The contracting process in healthcare typically averages nine months. Yet, in less than 12 months time, the team has landed multiple provider clients of all sizes across the US.
- The team has also deployed at several of these customers, providing meaningful and measurable value within 90 days.

We’ve built a cross-functional skill set deep into the DNA of the company. We have technology experts from the top Silicon Valley technology companies (Google, Facebook, etc) and machine learning PhD programs (Stanford, etc). We also have senior leaders from the frontlines of healthcare with decades of experience leading teams of medical billers at some of the most prominent healthcare institutions in the US. And we have a deep bench of talent from healthcare services firms like the Advisory Board, Optum and Triage Consulting.

Our founding team includes Silicon Valley leaders who have founded or been founding team members of multiple companies with successful exits, including in excess of $350 million.

We are expanding our team to support our work with existing customers as well as new customers. If you love to execute, we’d love to hear from you.

Alpha Health is based in South San Francisco. As a company we embraced remote work opportunities before COVID-19. We consider ourselves experts in working collaboratively wherever our team members happen to reside.

As part of the ML team you will work alongside machine learning PhDs from top schools (e.g., Stanford), as well as experienced machine learning engineers from top companies(e.g., Google). You will be putting machine learning into practice, so your code directly affects our customers immediately. You will be working with large proprietary medical and clinical datasets containing both structured documents, natural language and images.
What You'll Do
· Participate in developing state-of-art machine learning solutions to address large scale healthcare problems
· Design and build pipelines that collect, preprocess, and deliver data with a measurable quality
· Write production-ready software with fast and efficient algorithms
Skills & Qualifications
· 2+ years of work experience in machine learning or data engineering
· Strong proficiency in one or more programming languages such as Python and C++
· Hands-on development experience with big data technologies such as SQL and AWS/Cloud Platform
· Knowledge of machine learning frameworks such as Scikit-Learn, Keras, Tensorflow
· Full-stack development experience for an end to end machine learning solution preferred
· Experience with Natural Language Processing or Computer Vision a plus
· Strong communication and interpersonal skills with meticulous attention to detail
What We Offer
· Work with an experienced and complementary founding team consisting of serial entrepreneurs, AI experts and healthcare industry experts
· Competitive salary and equity grants
· Full employer coverage for health, dental and vision insurance
· Full employer coverage for life insurance
· 401k Plan
· Free membership to One Medical (Concierge Clinic) for you and your family (if you are in a region covered by One Medical)
· Flexible Vacation Policy",5.0,Alpha Health,"South San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,167.0,CA,3846,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,1,1,1,0,0
1342,342,Data Scientist (Decision Science Identity Team),$128k-$206k,"Company Description

Positioned at Publicis Groupe's core, Conversant is a marketing tech platform that helps brands transform ordinary customer experiences into meaningful, human experiences. The Conversant platform powers a connected suite of products and services called Epsilon PeopleCloud, combining leading-edge identity management, industrial-strength data and technology expertise with big brand acumen gained over five decades of working with the industry’s top brands. Our human-powered, data-led marketing delivers unmatched depth, breadth and scale to help brands create exceptional business outcomes. For more information, visit www.epsilon.com. Follow us on Twitter at @EpsilonMktg.

Job Description

External Title: Data Scientist
Internal Title: Decision Sciences, Scientist

In this role, you will research and develop enhancements to Epsilon’s CORE Personalization Platform to continually increase the capabilities of Epsilon’s digital marketing businesses.

The Decision Sciences group is a collaborative, multi-disciplinary R&D team combining data science, machine learning, AI, computer science, and more. Our colleagues love the fast-paced, dynamic work environment, the speed with which we translate research to business impact, the opportunity to continually learn new knowledge and skills, the internal research seminars, the external training opportunities, and the excellent work-life balance our culture promotes.

We prioritize talent and potential over having closely similar prior experience. If using internet scale data to drive business impact excites you, we want to talk to you.

RESPONSIBILITIES

Conduct projects from early stage research through development, in consultation with stakeholders
Use your expertise in data science, machine learning, and/or computer science to research and recommend solutions to our technology and business problems
Provide technology leadership to yield innovative differentiating solutions
Implement and optimize state of the art algorithms in distributed environments
Participate fully in our collaborative approach to research and applications projects
Develop an understanding of Conversant’s personalization platform and proprietary datasets

Qualifications

Ph.D in a computational, mathematical, engineering, or scientific field
Research experience in a computational area such as data science, computer science, machine learning, artificial intelligence, statistics, or graph algorithms.
Fluency in programming
Analytic and modeling skills; proficient at conceptualizing, implementing, and evaluating accurate and scalable solutions to business problems
Verbal and written communication skills, including the ability to summarize technically complex information for a non-technical audience

ADDITIONAL DESIRABLE BUT NOT REQUIRED SKILLS

Experience with distributed computing
Demonstrated proficiency working with business and technical teams to integrate algorithms into product platforms on large data sets

Additional Information

Great People, Deserve Great Benefits
We know that we have some of the brightest and most talented associates in the world, and we believe in rewarding them accordingly. If you work here, expect competitive pay, comprehensive health coverage, and endless opportunities to advance your career.

Epsilon is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Epsilon’s policy is not to discriminate against any applicant or employee based on actual or perceived race, age, sex or gender (including pregnancy), marital status, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, mental or physical disability, religion, creed, color, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression (including transgender status), veteran status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law. Epsilon also prohibits harassment of applicants and employees based on any of these protected categories.

Epsilon will provide accommodations to applicants needing accommodations to complete the application process.

#LI-AL1

REF17386U",3.3,Epsilon,"Chicago, IL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,51,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,167.0,IL,4053,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1345,345,AI Ops Data Scientist,$128k-$206k,"Company

AstraZeneca is a global, innovation-driven biopharmaceutical business that focuses on the discovery, development and commercialization of prescription medicines for some of the world's most serious diseases. But we're more than one of the world's leading pharmaceutical companies. At AstraZeneca, we're proud to have a unique workplace culture that inspires innovation and collaboration. Here, employees are empowered to express diverse perspectives and are made to feel valued, energized and rewarded for their ideas and creativity.

Role

We are looking for a data scientist to join our new AI Ops platform team in Science IT. The ideal candidate will have industry experience working in a range of different cloud environments where they devised and deployed large-scale production infrastructure and platforms for data science. The position will involve taking these skills and applying them to some of the most exciting data & prediction problems in drug discovery.

The successful candidate will be part of a new, close-knit team of deeply technical experts and together have the chance to create tools that will advance the standard of healthcare, improving the lives of millions of patients across the globe. Our data science environments will support major AI initiatives such as clinical trial data analysis, knowledge graphs, imaging & omics for our therapy areas. You will also have responsibility to help provide the frameworks for data scientists to develop scalable machine learning and predictive models with our growing data science community, in a safe and robust manner.

As a strong software leader and an expert in building complex systems, you will be responsible for inventing how we use technology, machine learning, and data to enable the productivity of AstraZeneca. You will help envision, build, deploy and develop our next generation of data engines and tools at scale. You will be bridging the gap between science and engineering and functioning with deep expertise in both worlds.

Key Accountabilities
Liaise with R&D data scientists to understand their challenges and work with them to help productionise models and algorithms.
Be part of the development roadmap to build and operationalise our data science environment, platforms and tooling.
Support any external opportunities, through close partnership and engagement such as Benevolent.AI collaboration.
Deployment of systems, applications and tooling for data science on cloud environments.
Understanding of the necessary guardrails required for different use cases and data sensitivities.
Adapt standard machine learning methods to best exploit modern parallel environments (e.g. distributed clusters, multicore SMP, and GPU).
Provide the necessary infrastructure and platform to support the deployment and monitoring of ML solutions in production Optimizing solutions for performance and scalability.
Liaise with the Data Engineering team to ensure that the platform and the solutions deployment therein benefit from an optimised and scalable data flow between source systems and analytical models
Implementing custom machine learning code and developing benchmarking capabilities to monitor drift of any analyses over time.
Understanding of the latest AI webservices and data science tools, from DataBricks to citizen data science tools like Dataiku, C3.AI and Domino. Experience working on regulatory data would be helpful but not essential.
Liaise with other teams to enhance our technological stack, to enable the adoption of the latest advances in Data Processing and AI
Being an active member of the Data Science team, you will benefit from, and contribute to, our expanding bank of Data Science algorithms and work efficiently with our data science infrastructure.
Testing and assessing the quality of new tools.
Team recruitment, training provision and coaching
Candidate Knowledge, Skills and Experience
BSc in Computer Science or related quantitative field or MSc/Ph.D degree in Computer Science or related quantitative field.
More than 2 years of experience and demonstrable deep technical skills in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, recommendation systems, pattern recognition, natural language processing or computer vision.
Experience managing an enterprise platform and service, handling new customer demand and feature requests.
Strong software coding skills, with proficiency in Python and Scala preferred.
Significant experience with AWS cloud environments, working knowledge of Google and Azure platforms. Knowledge of Kubernetes, S3, EC2, Sagemaker, Athena, RDS and Glue is essential. Certification in appropriate areas will be viewed favourably.
Experience with best practice of data transport and storage within cloud system.
Experience building large scale data processing pipelines. e. g. Hadoop/Spark and SQL.
Experience provisioning computational resources in a variety of environments.
Experience with containers and microservice architectures e.g. Kubernetes, Docker and serverless approaches.
Experience with automation strategies e.g. CI/CD, gitops.
Use of Data Science modelling tools e.g. R, Python, SAS and Data Science notebooks (e.g. Jupyter).
Creative, collaborative, & product focused.
Ability to just get things done.",4.0,AstraZeneca,"Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,107,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,167.0,MD,5274,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1346,346,Senior Data Scientist,$128k-$206k,"Description

The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions. The Senior Data Scientist work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.

Responsibilities

This is a unique opportunity for a motivated individual to influence Humana’s vision to provide coordinated, integrated care via home care solutions and ECOM (Enterprise Clinical Operating Model). The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions. The work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.

Responsibilities

Recommend, design, and develop actionable analytic solutions for key business problems through in-depth investigations of healthcare utilization trends and outcomes
Use advanced analytic techniques like machine learning, predictive modeling to develop sophisticated models to solve the business problem
Use industry leading database systems, clinical decision engines and algorithms to extract meaningful insights from structured and unstructured data by leveraging NLP/ML
Ensure the developed models or statistical tests are reusable and modular for effective transition to cloud in the future
Work directly with aligned business partners and assist in requirements definition, project scoping, timeline management, and results documentation to ensure professional relationship management
Build ‘smart’ systems that learn from health intervention outcomes, clinical programs over time
Collaborate with multiple cross-functional teams to understand the business needs, identify any operational barriers and issues, and facilitate their resolution

In the first year this role will focus on the following

Develop effective partnerships with internal business partners and coworkers
Work in an agile way to produce, interpret and recommend real time optimization opportunities for the business to implement using advanced analytics techniques
Enhance the ability to work in a fast-paced environment, multitask and quickly pivot based on business needs
Develop subject matter expertise in the business needs and serve as a consulting resource for the clinical analytic needs of the stakeholders
Implement real time business feedback of analytics based on the direct needs of internal customers

Required Qualifications

Master’s Degree + 3 years’ experience OR Bachelor’s Degree + 5 years’ experience.
Data Analytics, Computer Science or related quantitative program
Experience in using mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
Experience in working with assignments that involve moderately complex to complex issues using statistical modeling, time-series analysis, and advanced analytics to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
Experience in working with both structured and unstructured data to create reports, projections, models, and presentations to support business strategy and tactics
Ability to make decisions on moderately complex to complex issues regarding technical approach for project components
Demonstrated problem solving, strategic and analytic thinking capabilities
Experience in working with cross-functional teams, organizing and managing multiple priorities and/or projects
Must be passionate about contributing to an organization focused on continuously improving consumer experiences

Preferred Qualifications

Master's Degree or PhD
Knowledge of healthcare claims, clinical programs and interventions, health outcomes, population health

Additional Information

This position can be located in Boston, Louisville or Work from home (remote)

Scheduled Weekly Hours

40",3.8,Humana,"Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,59,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,167.0,MA,4072,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,1,1,0,1
1349,349,Data Engineer II,$128k-$206k,"to start of metadata
Blue Nile is looking for a highly motivated, results-oriented Data Engineer to join our Data Engineering team. If you have strong technical skills, love to work in a fast-paced team and want to help businesses make better decisions through collection & organization of data, you'll have a great time working on this small team. You will focus on the development of the data warehouse including our transition to a hybrid environment utilizing both on-premises and cloud-based data stores and tools. The data warehouse is a strategic asset for the company and powers data, insights, and actions across all business functions. You will collaborate with the team to expand and optimize our data and data pipeline architecture. The ideal candidate is an experienced data pipeline builder and data wrangler who enjoys optimizing data systems and building them from the ground up. The Data Engineer will support our software developers, database architects, data analysts and data scientists on data initiatives and will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects. They must be self-directed and comfortable supporting the data needs of multiple teams, systems and products. The right candidate will be excited by the prospect of optimizing or even re-designing our company’s data architecture to support our next generation of products and data initiatives.
Blue Nile is the largest online retailer of certified diamonds, engagement rings and fine jewelry. Our standards are among the highest of all jewelers. We provide a superior customer experience, extraordinary value and industry leading product quality and style. We obsess about our customers and are passionate about providing each customer with an amazing experience.

Our corporate offices are located in Seattle’s vibrant Pioneer Square district, home to the latest wave of internet startups and packed with restaurants and entertainment including Century Link and Safeco fields. We are close to transportation, the waterfront, and parks. Our dress code favors jeans and our facilities include bike racks and showers.

Responsibilities:
Experienced with working in a hybrid environment utilizing both on-premises and cloud-based data stores and tools
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture.
Assemble large, complex data sets that meet functional / non-functional business requirements.
Design efficient data structures and database schemas
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Build the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL and GCP ‘big data’ technologies.
Work with stakeholders including the Executive, Product, Data and Design teams to assist with data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs.
Keep our data separated and secure across national boundaries through multiple data centers and GCP regions.
Create data tools for analytics and data scientist team members that assist them in building/providing actionable insights into customer acquisition, operational efficiency and other key business performance metrics.
Qualifications for Data Engineer
Bachelor’s Degree in Information Technology or Computer Science or equivalent
5-8 years experience working in a data engineer role
Advanced working SQL knowledge and experience working with relational databases and data warehouses, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases.
Experience with Python scripting
Experience building and optimizing ‘big data’ data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
Understanding of data warehouse concepts, best practices and tools
Experience performing root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement.
Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management.
A successful history of manipulating, processing and extracting value from large disconnected datasets.
Working knowledge of message queuing, stream processing, and highly scalable ‘big data’ data stores.
Experience supporting and working with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment.

What we offer:
Medical, Dental, and Vision Healthcare Coverage
401(k) with Company Match
Paid Vacation
Competitive Salaries
Transportation Allowance
Employee Discount
Employee Referral Bonus
Fitness Center Discount",2.7,Blue Nile,"Seattle, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,21,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,167.0,WA,4644,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
1351,351,Data Scientist-Senior,$107k-$171k,"Business Group Highlights

Defense

The Defense group supports the Department of Defense (DoD) mission to keep our homeland and its citizens safe. We provide solutions to improve the Nation's defense by providing software, systems engineering, IT, training and logistics and fleet management solutions.

Responsibilities

This position is for a large contract for the Army, providing leadership and support existing systems, processes, and policies as well as working to implement new technologies and processes in support of the client’s mission to provide Intelligence training and technologies to military personnel.

Provides data science and data engineering support to targeting activities that bring in large datasets. Data science and data engineering support is needed to help manage and execute the ingest (extract, transform and load (ETL) operations), parsing, data normalizations, database design, as well as performing data analysis at scale and implementing algorithms to find impactful operational and finished intelligence in large data streams. Involved in the analysis of unstructured and semi-structured data. Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases. Handles processing against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams. Has the ability to make discoveries in the world of big data. Requires strong technical and computational skills coupled with the ability to code, design, develop, and deploy sophisticated applications using advanced unstructured and semi-structured data analysis techniques. Has the ability to utilize advance tools and computational skills to interpret, connect, predict and make discoveries in complex data and deliver recommendations. Develops documentation to support objectives of operationally-focused team members.

Qualifications

Over 10 years of experience and a MA/MS degree.

Typically works on high-visibility or mission critical aspects of a given program and performs all functional duties independently.

Oversee the efforts of less senior staff and/or be responsible for the efforts of all staff assigned to a specific job.

Current TS/SCI clearance

Bachelor of Science Degree or higher computer science, statistics, or other related STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math)

Desired qualifications:

Strong understanding of data engineering, structure, formatting, conditioning and analysis.
Knowledge of database tools and current data science processes.
Full-stack development experience.

Desired Skills:

Thorough/Working knowledge of Python and some of the following software/tools: SQL, R, Hadoop, Spark, Java, C/C++, Git Bash, Tableau, ArcGIS, Unix commands.
Thorough/Working knowledge of research designs.
Thorough/Working knowledge of collection methods, capabilities and tasking process.
Familiarity with project management concepts and principles.
Intellectual curiosity; creativity and innovation to go beyond current tools to deliver the best solution to complex problems.
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.2,Perspecta,"Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,2,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,139.0,DC,4816,1,data scientist,1,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
1352,352,Senior Data Scientist - HR,$107k-$171k,"Summary:

The HR Workforce Analytics team provides exciting opportunities to shape the future of the Hershey workforce. As a Data Scientist on the team, you'll partner with Information Services and HR business partners to build value-driven, data-fueled, machine-intelligent capabilities that enable informed decision making. You will work with large volumes of data, innovative technologies, and advanced methodologies to solve complex business problems impacting the happiness of all Hershey Company employees, customers, and consumers.

Applicants should have a strong background in machine learning (supervised and unsupervised), statistical modeling, feature discovery/selection, exploratory data analysis, data mining and pattern recognition.
Applicants should have a strong interest in advancing an enterprise culture of diversity and inclusion, belonging, and trust.

Primary responsibilities:

Provides diversity and inclusion insights through the development, reporting, and analysis of inclusion programs, projects, and data management
Interact with HR business partners, technologists, and engineers to understand, define, frame, scope, and prioritize analytical opportunities for shaping the Hershey workforce
As part of a team, design and develop the simplest and most applicable analytical solutions to fuel critical HR business partner needs
Design, develop and evaluate innovative predictive and prescriptive models to align workforce design with company strategy
Analyze and extract relevant information from historical data to help automate and optimize key processes
Work closely with technology, business and engineering teams to drive model implementations and adoption of new solutions
Work closely with Survey Research Analysts to design surveys, execute appropriate sampling methodologies, and deliver statistically sound survey analysis
Work closely with HR Centers of Excellence and business leaders to prepare external surveys and KPIs

Minimum Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree with STEM focus required
2+ years’ related experience in technologies and practice related to analytics/insights.
Experience working with cross-functional teams and communicating across organizations at all levels
2+ years of experience using R and/ or Python to implement decision problem solutions
1+ years of experience building and maintaining predictive and prescriptive models, to include training, scoring, and tuning when applicable
Experience developing interactive graphics/dashboards for end-users (Shiny, Power BI, Tableau)
Understanding of large-scale data storage processing architectures (SQL, HIVE, Spark/ SparkR, etc.)

Preferred Experience:

Master’s degree with STEM focus
Bachelor’s degree in organizational psychology or equivalent experience
Experience building descriptive and inferential survey analytics solutions
1+ years of experience utilizing an analytics platform (e.g. Alteryx, Azure Databricks, etc.)
Fluency in additional programming/ scripting languages (e.g. CSS, Java, Scala)
Excellent quantitative modeling, statistical analysis skills and problem-solving skills
Proven ability to translate advanced analytical output to business partners and decision makers
Strong communication skills (written & oral)

#LI-NB1

The Hershey Company is an Equal Opportunity Employer. The policy of The Hershey Company is to extend opportunities to qualified applicants and employees on an equal basis regardless of an individual's race, color, gender, age, national origin, religion, citizenship status, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, transgender status, physical or mental disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, pregnancy, or any other categories protected by applicable federal, state or local laws.

The Hershey Company is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Minority/Female/Disabled/Protected Veterans",3.8,HersheyCareers,"Hershey, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,126,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,139.0,PA,3872,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
1353,353,Sr. Data Engineer,$107k-$171k,"Join our team of Data Consultants and work on dynamic long-term projects. The majority of our team members are long-term employees who enjoy consistent work and a collaborative team approach!
Background in computer science and comfortable in programming in a variety of languages, including Java, Python, Scala;
Determining the appropriate software packages or modules to run, and how easily they can be modified;
Handling large scale structured and unstructured data from internal and third-party sources;
Architecting highly scalable distributed data pipelines using open source tools and big data technologies such as Hadoop, Pig, Hive, Presto, Spark, Drill, Sqoop and ETL frameworks;
Utilizing Linux shell scripting and containerization technologies (Docker, Kubernetes); and,
Leading teams in a dynamic work environment while managing stakeholder expectations and scope.
Requirements
Bachelor's degree, preferably in technology related disciplines.
Cloud computing platforms such as Azure, AWS, and GCP;
Relational databases and writing SQL queries, evaluating their performance
Strong experience with data processing software in Azure, AWS and GCP
Or Big data machine learning toolkits such as SparkML, messaging systems (Kafka) and NoSQL databases (Cassandra, HBase, MongoDB) desirable
Building data lakes and data pipelines that adhere to our engineering philosophy
Benefits

For more than 20 years, Moser Consulting has been the go-to source for exceptional IT talent with the ability to self-manage. At Moser Consulting, our people are our #1 asset. We hire the best people, welcome them like family, connect them with opportunities, and let them do what they do best: produce innovative solutions to technology problems.

Our culture gives us a competitive advantage by keeping our employees happy, healthy, and by lowering stress levels in a very demanding industry. It is no accident that we are recognized as one of the Best Places to Work in Indiana. We focus on giving employees: an incredible work space; a fun, collaborative, and creative atmosphere; an extremely generous compensation package; and dozens of outstanding and unique perks usually not found at one company.

Equal Opportunity Employer–minorities/females/veterans/individuals with disabilities/sexual orientation/gender identity.",4.8,Moser Consulting,"Indianapolis, IN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,24,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,139.0,IN,2311,1,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1355,355,Computer Data Scientist,$107k-$171k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.
As an early to mid-career Data Scientist, you might be wondering what makes MITRE different than other government contractors and consulting firms. Many of our recent hires answered YES to at least one of the questions below:
Are you interested in contributing to technical projects that you can feel passionate about?
Are you tired of having your performance tied to billable hours?
Do you want to feel like your ideas are valued and you are more than just an FTE?
Are you interested in working for a company where a 40-hour week is the norm and not the exception?
Do you want exceptional benefits, including tuition reimbursement for coursework towards an advance degree in a technical discipline?
The Model-Based Analytics Department is seeking a motivated, creative Data Scientist to apply cutting edge tools and techniques to challenging problems facing the US government. This position offers the opportunity to interact directly with government leaders in a fast-paced and dynamic atmosphere with the ability to make a difference and impact outcomes with solid analysis.
Our employees are expected to work on multiple projects, cross-pollinate good ideas across the government and continuously learn. We are truly an interdisciplinary department that thrives on having a large toolbox to support data- and model-driven decision making. We value people who can bring diverse perspectives.
Our department works to solve problems in the public interest, in partnership with the government. We also actively conduct independent research in areas of interest to our government partners. Once established with a proven track record of quality delivery and consistent performance, members of our department have latitude to select projects

To be successful you will:
Be passionate about applying data analytics to real world problems.
Have an innate curiosity and interest in developing research questions and testing hypotheses with open ended tasking.
Work with a spectrum of government sponsors to gain understanding of their challenges, evaluate possible solutions and conduct insightful, actionable analyses.
Support the development and application of a variety of analytical models to sponsor challenges, with a willingness to adapt and learn.
Present results in an intuitive, actionable manner that can be understood by all sponsor audiences, regardless of technical expertise.
Provide relevant day-to-day tasking for one or more junior staff.
Lead projects throughout their life cycle, including conceptualization, requirements definition, data procurement, development, integration, and socialization.
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor of Science degree or equivalent knowledge and skills
Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or applicants who are eligible for security clearances.

Required Qualifications:
Significant academic concentration in a quantitative field such as Statistics, Mathematics, Operations Research or Computer Science.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Demonstrated ability to manipulate large datasets with at least one modern programming language or business intelligence platform like Python, SAS, MATLAB, C++, R or Java.
Experience visualizing multi-dimensional data using tools like Tableau, ggplot2, matplotlib, seaborn, or D3.js.
Ability to apply, modify and formulate algorithms and processes to solve challenging problems.
Demonstrated experience leading customer facing engagements emphasizing data analytics.
Ability to obtain and maintain a Secret level security clearance
Position will be located in Bedford, MA or Mclean, VA
Preferred Qualifications:
Research experience
Experience applying various machine learning approaches (e.g., random forest, neural networks, support vector machines).
Prior experience working with databases (e.g., PostgreSQL, Oracle, MySQL, MongoDB, Neo4j).
Experience using version control (e.g., Git, Mercurial, SVN) to support collaborative development.
Advanced degree in Operations Research, Statistics or Data Science.
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,MITRE,"Bedford, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,139.0,MA,5971,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1358,358,Senior Data Scientist,$107k-$171k,"About Earnin:

Earnin is a community-supported financial platform with a suite of tools that let people take control of their financial future. Earnin started out by solving one of the greatest – and least discussed – inequities in the American financial system: the practice of employers paying workers bi-weekly. Earnin's core product, Cash Out, allows people to access the pay they've already earned. There are no loans or hidden costs. People pay what they choose. Other products include: Balance Shield, which helps prevent overdrafts, a financial calendar that helps people budget and schedule payments, and Tip Yourself - a revolutionary free social savings app.

Funding: Series C, current funding partners include Andreessen Horowitz, DST, Matrix Partners, Ribbit Capital, Felicis Ventures and March Capital.

Join us and help build a new financial system focused on fairness and people's needs.

You can help make a difference.

About the Team:

We're looking for a talented and motivated data scientist to build sophisticated models with data collected across our business to aid Earnin's mission in giving the world access to their pay as soon as they've earned it.

Data Scientists are the central node to every team within Earnin. As a data scientist, you'll be interfacing with analysts to gain insights, our product managers to evaluate areas where we can protect and improve our business model, and our engineering team to advance our product utilizing artificial intelligence.

Every decision made at Earnin is backed by data; our company trajectory is defined by the systems, tools, and analytics powered by our exceptional team. We integrate multifaceted data streams such as rapidly changing market data, customer data based on app activity and feedback, and financial banking operations data to perfect our processes and workflows. Improving these systems and maintaining scalability across a growing user base (X million and counting) is thrilling.

What Sets Us Apart:
We care more about the thought process, perseverance, tenacity in solving really difficult problems (rather than checking off all the technology boxes)
Solving unique problems in the financial payments industry
Helping people on a human level
As a Data Scientist you will:
Build machine learning models with large-scale datasets across personal finance and user employment information
Research and explore with various machine learning algorithms to best help on products
Work very closely with cross-functional teams to come up with machine learning approaches to improve the user experience or business metrics.
Collaborate with product teams on ad-hoc product analytics
Optimize models by adding more features, improving algorithms, tuning parameters
Create monitoring systems to track the quality of models
Apply statistical concepts such as hypothesis testing, statistical significance etc to model explanation, reporting and decision making.
Come up with and implement decision strategies based on model predictions
Requirements:
Deep understanding of machine learning and statistics
Strong product sense and analytical thinking
Experience building predictive models from scratch data to production
Strong SQL abilities and experience.
Proficient in Python
Experience with Spark, R and Scala is a plus
3+ years industry experience in data mining, machine learning, statistical analysis, and modeling
Excellent communication skills
A MS or PhD in Computer Science, Physics, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, or any quantitative disciplines
At Earnin, we believe that the best way to build a financial system that works for everyday people is by hiring a team that represents our diverse community. Our team is diverse not only in background and experience, but also in perspective. We celebrate our diversity and strive to create a culture of belonging. Earnin does not unlawfully discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding or related medical conditions), gender identity, gender expression, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, physical or mental disability, legally protected medical condition, family care status, military or veteran status, marital status, registered domestic partner status, sexual orientation, genetic information, or any other basis protected by local, state, or federal laws. Earnin is an E-Verify participant.

Earnin does not accept unsolicited resumes from individual recruiters or third party recruiting agencies in response to job postings. No fee will be paid to third parties who submit unsolicited candidates directly to our hiring managers or HR team.",3.6,Earnin,"Palo Alto, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,8,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,139.0,CA,4651,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,1,0,0
1359,359,Data Scientist II,$107k-$171k,"Nolij Consulting LLC is a certified Women-Owned Small Business (WOSB) that provides information technology services in test and evaluation (T&E), enterprise architecture (EA), electronic health record (EHR) modernization, infrastructure operations and maintenance (O&M), data analytics and visualization, and agile transformation. Our mission is to understand the challenges and goals of our clients, address them with innovative solutions, and work together to achieve project success. Were eager to hear from candidates like you that can join and contribute to our team.

Nolij Consulting has an opening for a Data Scientist II to join our team based in Vienna, VA.

Responsibilities:
Must be able to design, modify, develop, write and implement software programming applications.
Must be able to support and/or install software applications/operating systems.
Must be able to participate in the testing process through test reviews and analysis, test witnessing and certification of software.
Must be able to design, plan, and coordinate work teams.
Must be able to provides technical support to project team members.
Must be familiar with a variety of the field concepts, practices, and procedures.
Must be able to rely on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
Must be able to perform a variety of tasks.
Must be able to lead and direct the work of others.
Must exhibit a wide degree of creativity and latitude.
Must typically be able to report to a head of a unit/department
Requirements:
Required a bachelor's degree in science or a related area.
Required 6-8 years of experience in the field.
Note: Since this position is for a Federal Project, a candidate must possess US Citizenship to obtain Clearance.
Do you like the idea of being a driver on a team of distinction? If so, we want to hear from you. To apply, go to https://www.nolijconsulting.com/careers/

Nolij is an EEO/Affirmative Action employer and encourages all qualified applicants to apply.",4.1,Nolij Consulting,"Vienna, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,8,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,139.0,VA,1978,1,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1360,360,Supply Chain Solution - Data Scientist,$107k-$171k,"*CURRENT EMPLOYEES :
Please click here to be redirected to the internal career site.
Job Description


The Supply Chain Solution – Data Scientist will be based in Austin, TX. In this role you will be responsible for creating reports using a variety of tools and methods.

We are looking for someone who demonstrates:
Intense collaboration
Passionate customer focus
Thoughtful, fast, disciplined execution
Tenacious commitment to continuous improvement
Relentless drive to win
Here is a glimpse of what you’ll do…
Use various analytical techniques including visualization, statistical methods, machine learning/AI to create scalable solutions for business problems
Translate Supply Chain business problems and questions into specific quantitative questions to be answered w/ available data using robust methodologies. In many cases, the data collection at scale will be part of the task and may involve co-work with software development team
Coordinate and perform testing on data quality and solutions
Analyze and extract relevant information from big data to help automate and optimize key processes
Establish scalable, efficient, automated processes for large scale data analyses, model development, model validation and model implementation
Research and implement novel machine learning and statistical approaches
Make business recommendations (e.g. cost-benefit, forecasting, experiment analysis) with effective presentations of findings to stakeholders through visual displays of quantitative information
Build scalable prototype analytics solutions
Work closely with software development/engineering teams to build model implementations and integrate successful models and algorithms in production systems at scale
Here is some of what you’ll need (required)…
Minimum 4 years’ experience with R
Demonstrated skill and experience of data analysis within open source scripting languages (e.g. R, Python)
Strong experience with SQL and working with relational databases (SQL Server, Teradata, MySQL etc.)
Strong demonstrated knowledge of applied statistical and machine learning methods
Experience with XML, JSON data formats, working with REST API’s, SVN/Git or other version control tools and techniques
Experience with Tableau in dashboard development, deployment and administration
Demonstrated ability to manage projects and implementation of solutions/applications
Effective written and oral communication skills, team player
Here are some nice to have’s…
Master’s degree in STEM field/Operations Research/Data Science/Supply Chain
Work experience in Supply Chain/Manufacturing
Be able to present quantitative results in the right context to various target audiences
Experience within the RStudio ecosystem (Shiny dashboards and applications, Plumber API’s, RStudio Connect)
Experience working with non-relational databases like MongoDB
Experience of deploying ML applications on platforms like Microsoft Azure, AWS, Google Cloud preferred
Demonstrated experience in business applications of distributed computing (e.g. MapReduce, HIVE, HADOOP)
Demonstrated capability in building scalable analytical solutions
Experience in ownership of solutions – life-cycle, roadmap, implementation, business value generation
Portfolio of data science projects on Github.com, RPubs.com etc.
Knowledge of data structures and algorithms
Demonstrated ability to communicate and influence executives and upper management
Here are a few examples of what you’ll get for the great work you provide…
Full range of medical benefits, dental, vision
Life Insurance
Matching 401K
PTO
Tuition Reimbursement
Employee discounts at local retailers
Job Category
Global Procurement & Supply Chain

Flex does not accept unsolicited resumes from headhunters, recruitment agencies or fee based recruitment services. Flex is an Equal Opportunity Employer and employment selection decisions are based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. Flex does not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices based on: age, race, religion, color, sex, national origin, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, disability, pregnancy status or any other status protected by law. Flex provides reasonable accommodation so that qualified applicants with a disability may participate in the selection process. Please advise us of any accommodations you request to express interest in a position by e-mailing: accesibility@flextronics.com. Please state your request for assistance in your message. Only reasonable accommodation requests related to applying for a specific position within Flex will be reviewed at the e-mail address. Flex will contact you if it is determined that your background is a match to the required skills required for this position. Thank you for considering a career with Flex.

The information we collect:

We may collect personal information that you choose to submit to us through the Website or otherwise provide to us. This may include your contact details; information provided in online questionnaires, feedback forms, or applications for employment; and information you provide such as CV/Resume. Your details will be provided to the entity you are applying for a job with. We will use your information for legitimate business purposes such as responding to comments or queries or answering questions; progressing applications for employment; allowing you to choose to share web content with others or; where you represent one of our customers or suppliers, administering the business relationship with that customer or supplier. We will process your data in accordance with our Recruitment Privacy Notice.

If you have any queries about the processing of your data, please contact:

Global Data Privacy Officer:

Email Address: chiefprivacyofficer@flex.com",3.8,Flex,"Austin, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,51,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,139.0,TX,5787,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
1362,362,Data Engineer,$107k-$171k,"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking multiple Data Engineers to support a new requirement in/around Springfield, VA. The selected candidates may be required to deploy forward up to 10% of the time into operational areas or other remote sites.

Responsibilities include:
Responsible for extracting, loading, and transforming a variety of data types, formats, and sources in order to cultivate accessible relational, document store, and graph databases.
Develops logical and physical data models, database creation, data optimization, and implementation.
Work side-by-side data scientist to make use of the collected data.
Deploy sophisticated analytics programs, machine learning, and statistical models.
Document all work in a code base, and other Install, Operations, and Maintenance artifacts per government direction
Basic Qualifications:
Requires in-depth knowledge of distributed systems, computer science, programming, and mathematics. Works with warehouses across multiple databases; responsible for developing table schemas.
Ability to manage and organize data while identifying trends and inconsistencies that will impact government missions.
Experience preparing data for predictive and prescriptive modeling; uses data to discover tasks that can be automated; delivers updates to stakeholders based on analytics.
Experience/certifications in Mongo DB, Python, Cypher Query Language, R, Apache Spark / Hadoop, Linux, ETL, data warehouse, data modeling, and MS Azure, and Amazon Web Services.
Experience adhering to Information Technology processes, polices, and procedures for entering changes and new products into the production environment.
Experience in cloud, containerization, indexing, scaling databases, and graph analysis to build in automation, efficiency, and implementation of security controls.
Desired Skills:
Prior experience supporting US Special Forces
Prior deployment to OCONUS locations
AWS and/or Azure certifications
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SCI security clearance required.
Willing to undergo polygraph examination
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.

For more details, or to submit a referral: bit.ly/NovettaReferrals

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,Novetta,"Springfield, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,8,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,139.0,VA,3796,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1365,365,2021 Data Science Fellowship,$107k-$171k,"2021 Data Science Fellowship
Department


Human Resources

Location


Alexandria, VA

Closing Date

1/29/21

Apply Now

Overview

The Institute for Defense Analyses (IDA) is a not-for-profit corporation that operates three Federally Funded Research Centers (FFRDCs). IDA’s Systems and Analyses Center is located in Alexandria, Virginia and is comprised of eight research divisions providing objective analyses of national security issues, particularly those requiring scientific and technical expertise, and conducts related research on other national challenges.

The IDA Data Science Fellowship provides recent graduates a unique opportunity to develop and apply data science skills to important issues in national security. Data Science Fellows will investigate the ways machine learning, artificial intelligence, statistics, and big data methodologies contribute to national security and gain experience developing advanced data science tools They will use their critical thinking and analytic skills to work on challenging real-world national security issues. In a collaborative team environment, Fellows perform data manipulation and statistical, econometric, predictive, descriptive, and other quantitative analyses to answer national security-related research questions. Fellows should expect to learn while creatively contributing to interdisciplinary project teams.

Fellows will have an opportunity to work research questions in areas such as:
Appraisal of current DoD investments in a broad range of areas: from human factors to autonomous systems, from materials science to nuclear weapons effects, from social behaviors to quantum computing;
Analyze and research questions on DoD personnel, military readiness and efficacy, and organizational efficiency topics.
Assessment of federal agency information and computing architectures that support data science applications (i.e., large, distributed data sets and computational assets);
Application of data exploration, text analytics, forecasting, statistical inference, simulation to areas of military personnel, manpower, and acquisition of DOD weapon systems.
Over the course of the three-year program, fellowship experiences will include:
Involvement in workshops and discussions on relevant topics
Mentorship from members of the IDA research staff
Training on specific analytical methods and tools
Attendance and presentation at select professional society meetings
Qualifications
This is a full time position and is only open to recent recipients of a bachelor’s or master’s degree. Candidates with degrees higher than a master’s degree will not be considered.
Candidate with recent Bachelor’s degree or Masters’ degree in economics, statistics, operations research, mathematics, physics, computer science, data science, or related disciplines with a strong foundation in statistics and/or applied mathematics are encouraged to apply.
Candidates must demonstrate experience with one or more programming language or statistical software used in research (e.g., Python, R, Julia, Stata, MATLAB, C, Java, etc.)
Candidates must demonstrate strong written and oral communication skills. Ideal candidates are able to contribute to and support team efforts.
Additional preferred skills include:
Training and/or experience in quantitative or qualitative information collection, data normalization, and text analytics
Experience as a research assistant in an academic or policy research setting
Experience or coursework in Bayesian statistics, machine learning, predictive analytics, and/or geospatial analyses
Experience with GPU, high-throughput, and/or distributed computing
U.S. citizenship is required.
In addition to the application, applicants at later stages in the process will be required to submit the following documents:
Personal Statement— explain in 1,000 words or less why you want to work in the area of data science and analytics in defense and national security and how your background/experience will contribute to IDA’s work
Writing Sample—5,000 word maximum
Transcripts - unofficial transcript is acceptable for consideration, but an official transcript is needed before any offer of employment will be made
Two Letters of Academic Recommendation—letters must be signed by the individual rendering the reference and delivered as PDF files.
U.S. Citizenship is required
Ability to obtain and maintain a security clearance is required
Equal Opportunity Employer",4.1,Institute for Defense Analyses,"Alexandria, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,64,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,139.0,VA,4439,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
1366,366,Machine Learning Engineer - Discovery,$107k-$171k,"Company Description

Twitter is what’s happening and what people are talking about right now. For us, life's not about a job, it's about purpose. We believe real change starts with conversation. Here, your voice matters. Come as you are and together we'll do what's right (not what's easy) to serve the public conversation.

Job Description

Twitter's Discovery teams are dedicated to getting the majority of the world to converse in public using Twitter. We are composed of many teams across the company, including Product, Engineering, Design, and Research. These teams are responsible for understanding the needs of new users and users who are not very active and help them discover the value of Twitter by building personalized products.

This mission is to instantly connect people with conversations and audiences most meaningful to them. Realizing this goal involves work in areas such as machine learning, applied data science, recommendation systems, and information retrieval systems. Do you want to make a huge impact while working with large data sets at scale? If so, a Discovery team is a good fit for you!

Qualifications

What You’ll Do You'll work with an awesome team of engineers, product managers, data scientists, researchers, and designers to build experiences powered by large-scale recommender systems. This includes:
Collaborating with cross-functional partners to come up with roadmaps for Machine Learning driven products for the team.
Working with product engineers to identify product metrics that causally impact business metrics.
Applying data mining, machine learning and/or graph analysis techniques to a variety of modeling, relevance, and recommendation problems to build production-quality solutions that balance complexity and performance.
Participating in the engineering life-cycle at Twitter, including designing high-quality ML infrastructure and data pipelines, writing production code, conducting code reviews, and working alongside our infrastructure and reliability teams.
Mentoring other engineers on the team and up-level them on applied product ML skills.
Although you will work on groundbreaking problems, this position is not a research position.

Who You Are
You have strong product understanding and an intuition for how to use modeling to address product needs.
You are not only comfortable with ambiguity but view it as an opening to quickly explore a multitude of options.
You can apply advanced statistical and machine learning techniques to model user behavior, build benchmark metrics, and drive causal impact using A/B testing.
You have the ability to take on complex problems, learn quickly, iterate, and persist towards a good solution.
You have experience collaborating across cross-functional teams including analytics, product management, and operations.
Requirements
M.S. or PhD in Computer Science (or related field) with 5+ years of relevant industry experience
Experience with one or more of the following: deep learning, reinforcement learning, classification, pattern recognition, recommendation systems, targeting systems, ranking systems or similar.
Experience with data pipelines and large scale data stores.
Firm grasp of CS fundamentals, Data structures, and algorithms
Experience handling large scale quantitative customer data to solve problems and answer questions
Additional Information

We are committed to an inclusive and diverse Twitter. Twitter is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate based on race, ethnicity, color, ancestry, national origin, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, veteran status, genetic information, marital status or any other legally protected status.

San Francisco applicants: Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.",4.0,Twitter,"New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,14,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,139.0,NY,3874,0,machine learning engineerr,0,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1368,368,Data Scientist,$107k-$171k,"Position Description


CGI Federal is seeking a Data Scientist to assist with the client's Anti-Fraud work activities, which include a variety of specialized services to enable the Anti-Fraud initiative to operate in an Agile-based manner and deliver high quality, high-business-valued results (software, data or infrastructure) rapidly. The agency needs ample support for production-level ""big data"" use and architecture support that makes the creation and use of anti-fraud enterprise systems possible.
Your future duties and responsibilities


• Provide full system agile lifecycle support services in the areas of analysis, design, development, testing, implementation, project management, data management, data analysis, and maintenance activities.
• Experience translating high-level project requirements into technical tasks.
• Data manipulation and data engineering experience involving structured and unstructured data.
• Data manipulation expertise involving data extractions, data matching between multiple systems, transformations, cleansing, and loading.
• Experience with big data and cloud platforms (AWS) and toolset.
• Ability to engineer and create complex research datasets by manipulating typically large volume transactional data for use by operations research analysts, economists and statisticians in advanced analytical research and studies.
• Experience in developing predictive, prescriptive, optimization, and forecasting models, including the use of contemporary techniques such as support vector machines, neural networks, and gradient boosting.
• Experience in interpreting results from statistical and mathematical models.
• Experience in advance data visualizations and interpretation.

Required qualifications to be successful in this role


• Master's degree and 8+ years of experience OR Bachelor's degree and 14+ years of experience
• Experience with Python, SAS or R
• Experience with data mining and data engineering using Python and SQL Queries to extract and transform large volumes of data into a format suitable for analysis
• Supervise Machine Learning, using analytic algorithms such as regression, decision tree, linear SVM, RBF, k-NN or Random Forest
• Apply Unsupervised Learning methods and algorithms such as principal component and cluster analysis
• Building data visualizations using Python, Tableau, SAS, or R
• Experience with Linux and Windows
• Working in a team-based agile work environment

Preferred experience in the following:
• Working in an analytical research environment
• Using Master Files and related data
• Pandas and scikit-learn
• The Hadoop ecosystem
• Parallel computing using GPUs
• CUDA
• Mathematica
• MATLAB
• LaTex
• Natural Language Processing for anomaly detection

#CGIFederalJob

Skills

SAS
SQL
Python
Data Modeling
Data Analysis
Data Cleansing

What you can expect from us


Build your career with us.

It is an extraordinary time to be in business. As digital transformation continues to accelerate, CGI is at the center of this changesupporting our clients' digital journeys and offering our professionals exciting career opportunities.

At CGI, our success comes from the talent and commitment of our professionals. As one team, we share the challenges and rewards that come from growing our company, which reinforces our culture of ownership. All of our professionals benefit from the value we collectively create.

Be part of building one of the largest independent technology and business services firms in the world.

Learn more about CGI atwww.cgi.com.

No unsolicited agency referrals please.

CGI is an equal opportunity employer.

Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, ethnicity, ancestry, color, sex, religion, creed, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability, medical condition, military and veteran status, marital status, sexual orientation or perceived sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, and gender expression, familial status, political affiliation, genetic information, or any other legally protected status or characteristics.

CGI provides reasonable accommodations to qualified individuals with disabilities. If you need an accommodation to apply for a job in the U.S., please email the CGI U.S. Employment Compliance mailbox atUS_Employment_Compliance@cgi.com. You will need to reference the requisition number of the position in which you are interested. Your message will be routed to the appropriate recruiter who will assist you.Please note, this email address is only to be used for those individuals who need an accommodation to apply for a job. Emails for any other reason or those that do not include a requisition number will not be returned.

We make it easy to translate military experience and skills! Clickhere to be directed to our site that is dedicated to veterans and transitioning service members.

All CGI offers of employment in the U.S. are contingent upon the ability to successfully complete a background investigation. Background investigation components can vary dependent upon specific assignment and/or level of US government security clearance held.

CGI will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with CGI's legal duty to furnish information.",3.6,CGI,"Baltimore, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,44,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,139.0,MD,5909,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
1370,370,Data Scientist (Federal),$107k-$171k,"C3.ai is a leading enterprise AI software provider for accelerating digital transformation. The comprehensive and proven C3 AI Suite uses a model-driven abstraction layer to enable organizations to develop, deploy, and operate enterprise scale AI applications 40x to 100x faster than alternative approaches. www.c3.ai

C3.ai is looking for a Data Scientist (Federal) to solve challenging, novel, and large-scale enterprise problems for Federal clients. In this capacity you will represent C3.ai as a technical expert and help our team to frame problems, choose appropriate machine learning algorithms, and identify opportunities to leverage the C3.ai Suite.

Recent examples of successful engagements include predictive maintenance on oil and gas equipment and aircraft subsystems, supply chain optimization, manufacturing yield optimization, chronic disease prevention, customer spend prediction, and equipment lifetime optimization.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve results at large-scale.

This role requires US Citizenship or US Permanent Residence.

Your Responsibilities:
Become an expert in the C3.ai Suite and associated tools to teach, enable, and assist C3.ai customers to build their own applications.
Design and deploy machine learning pipelines for C3.ai's federal customers.
Collaborate with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
US Citizenship or US Permanent Resident
Bachelor's degree
Strong understanding of machine learning algorithms & principles (regression analysis, time series, probabilistic models, supervised classification and unsupervised learning), and their application
Strong background in mathematics, statistics, and computer science
Excellent programming skills in Python
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference
Excellent verbal and written communication
Preferred
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields. Specialization in machine learning preferred.
Active Department of Defense (DoD) security clearance (Secret or higher)
Excellent programming skills in JavaScript. Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
Experience with deep learning, natural language processing, computer vision, or reinforcement learning
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.)
C3.ai provides a competitive compensation package and excellent benefits.

C3.ai is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status.",4.5,C3.ai,"Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,11,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,139.0,DC,2926,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1371,371,Senior Data Engineer,$107k-$171k,"Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in computer science, information technology, or a related field or equivalent experience
Preferred Qualifications
3 years of experience working with database tools
3 years of programming experience using Python and C#
3 years of experience working with SQL server integration services or ETL tools
3 years of experience working with data integration tools
Proficiency in the Microsoft Office suite
Experience working with ETL tools
Knowledge of data integration tools
Knowledge of software programming languages, such as Python and C#
Job Summary

The Senior Data Engineer works with database engineers to design, develop and maintain the infrastructure of data within the data warehouse, including setting the ETL (extract, transform, load) processes, bringing in new data sources, modifying existing data sources, making sure data is clean, complete and consumable, as well as designing data models within the data warehouse.

The Senior Data Engineer works as part of one or more project teams and is responsible for designing and building mechanisms to move, integrate, cleanse and publish large volume datasets. This is a developer role with a specialty in data and requires deep knowledge of a variety of programming languages and design patterns.

Responsibilities
Design and support the new and evolving sources of data being brought into the data warehouse
Work closely with data architects and follow best practices for data management consumption
Work closely with business analysts to work through business requirements and develop processes to provide the needed data visibility via the data warehouse and reporting platform
Assist with application layer and metadata design
Assist with the design and create automated applications and reporting solutions
Work closely with front-end developers to ensure data is being brought in and data integrity is being maintained
Monitor and troubleshoot performance issues on the data warehouse servers
Research and promote new tools and techniques to shape the future of the data environment
Mentor and train other data engineers
Who We Are

We're America's largest mortgage lender, closing loans in all 50 states. J.D. Power ranked Quicken Loans ""Highest in Customer Satisfaction in Primary Mortgage Origination"" for the past 10 consecutive years, 2010 - 2019. The company was also ranked highest in the nation for client satisfaction among mortgage servicers by J.D. Power for 6 consecutive years, 2014 through 2019, each year the company was eligible. There's a simple reason we've been so successful: We care about the people we work with.

If you're tired of stuffy, bureaucratic workplaces, then you'll be delighted to find something different here. We strive to make a creative, fun and collaborative environment you simply won't find anywhere else. Quicken Loans was named #1 in ESSENCE Magazine's first ever list of ""Best Places to Work for African Americans"" in 2015. We've been on Computerworld's ""Best Places to Work in IT"" list for 13 years running, hitting #1 the last 5 years. We were also ranked #14 in FORTUNE Magazine's list of ""100 Best Companies to Work For"" in 2018, remaining in the top 30 for the past 15 years.

Disclaimer

This is an outline of the primary responsibilities of this position. As with everything in life, things change. The tasks and responsibilities can be changed, added to, removed, amended, deleted and modified at any time by the leadership group.",3.8,Quicken Loans,"Detroit, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,35,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,139.0,MI,3487,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1374,374,"Data Scientist, Product Development",$107k-$171k,"Spokeo is a people search engine that both enlightens and empowers our customers. With over 12 billion records and 18 million visitors per month, we reconnect friends, reunite families, prevent fraud, and more.

We are looking for a Data Scientist, Product Development to join us in Pasadena, CA, and help us turn our vast repository of data into usable information leveraging solutions that include matching techniques, machine learning, and graph theory to resolve entities across disparate data sets. Ultimately, these entity relationships will be used to build models that will be incorporated into the Spokeo product suite. This is part of Spokeo's Data Operations Team and is not an analytics-based role.

Responsibilities:
Profiling, processing, and evaluating large structured and unstructured data sets.
Developing data-driven models.
Data mining using state-of-the-art methods.
Collaborating with product and engineering to understand the needs of the company and assisting with the development of innovative solutions to meet those needs.
Productionalizing and maintaining algorithms primarily focused on entity resolution, linking, and scoring.
Creating automated anomaly detection systems and quality assurance metrics to constantly track performance.
Keeping up to date with the latest technology trends.
Performing Ad-hoc analysis and presenting results.
Requirements:
Degree in Machine Learning, Computer Science, Engineering, Physics, Statistics, Applied Math, Operations Research, or other quantitative fields.
Minimum of 3 years of working experience in analytics, data mining, data visualization, and/or predictive modeling.
Proficiency in working with statistical tools (such as R, SAS), database query languages (SQL), and scripting languages (Python required).
Experience with Hadoop and NoSQL related technologies such as MapReduce, Spark, Hive, ElasticSearch, and DynamoDB.
Comfortable training and communicating complex ideas to non-technical audiences.
Demonstrated ability to lead and execute projects from start to finish.
Privacy Notice for Candidates: https://www.spokeo.com/recruiting-policy

Spokeo is an equal opportunity employer. Applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status. Spokeo fosters a business culture where ideas and decisions from all people help us grow, innovate, create the best products and be relevant in a rapidly changing world.

Recruiters or staffing agencies: Spokeo is not obligated to compensate any external recruiter or search firm who presents a candidate or their resume or profile to a Spokeo employee without 1) a current, fully-executed agreement on file and 2) being assigned to the open position (as a search) via our applicant tracking solution.

]]>",3.5,Spokeo,"Pasadena, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,14,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,139.0,CA,2865,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
1380,380,Machine Learning Engineer - Home Timeline,$107k-$171k,"Company Description

Twitter is what’s happening and what people are talking about right now. For us, life's not about a job, it's about purpose. We believe real change starts with conversation. Here, your voice matters. Come as you are and together we'll do what's right (not what's easy) to serve the public conversation.

Job Description

Twitter's Consumer Product Teams are responsible for core features of twitter.com, which includes Timelines, Tweets, Search, Trends, Recommendations, Notifications, Tweet details/permalink, and more! Our code operates at massive scale and speed, serving billions of requests per day, connecting hundreds of millions of active Twitter users to real-time information about their lives and the world we live in.

Who We Are:
At Twitter, our mission is to instantly connect users to the information most meaningful to them. Realizing this involves work in areas such as machine learning, applied data science, recommendation systems, information retrieval systems, natural language processing, large graph analysis, spam, etc.

The team’s mission is to show users the content they care about. We build relevance and machine learning models and systems to power the core of the Twitter product. Every time users see new tweets we evaluate candidates from the nearly half a billion daily tweets to select, organize and deliver the best timeline. The recent products and technologies built by our team have shown consistent results in driving retention and are some of largest contributors of engagements on the platform.

What You'll Do:
Although you will work on cutting-edge problems, this position is not a research position. You will participate in the engineering life-cycle at Twitter, including designing distributed systems, writing production code, conducting code reviews and working alongside our infrastructure and reliability teams. You’ll apply data science, machine learning and/or graph analysis techniques to a variety of modeling and relevance problems involving users, their relationships, their tweets and their interests.

Qualifications

Who You Are:
You’re a relevance engineer, applied data scientist or machine-learning engineer who wants to work on exciting algorithmic and deep infrastructure issues. You’re experienced solving large scale relevance problems and comfortable doing incremental quality work while building brand new systems to enable future quality improvements.
Knowledgeable in one or more of the following: machine learning, information retrieval, recommendation systems, social network analysis
Designed and evaluated approaches for handling high-volume real-time data streams.
A strong technical advocate with a background in Java, C++, or Scala, and Python.
Comfortable conducting design and code reviews.
Experienced in operating Linux-based systems.
Knowledgeable of core CS concepts such as: common data structures and algorithms, profiling/optimization.
Passionate about working with large unstructured and structured data sets ( for example multi-terabyte+, 100MM+ daily transaction volumes).
Experienced in collaborating across multiple teams including analytics, product management, and operations.
Requirements:
B.S., M.S. or Ph.D. in Computer Science or equivalent degree with 2+ years of industry experience.
Additional Information

We are committed to an inclusive and diverse Twitter. Twitter is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate based on race, ethnicity, color, ancestry, national origin, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, veteran status, genetic information, marital status or any other legally protected status.

San Francisco applicants: Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.",4.0,Twitter,"Seattle, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,14,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,139.0,WA,3834,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1384,384,"Risk Specialist, Data Science - Suptech",$44k-$73k,"Overview

Financial Institution Supervision and Credit (FISC) at the Federal Reserve
Bank of San Francisco supervises financial institutions, and service providers
to financial institutions, in the 12th Federal Reserve District. Our mission is
to ensure a safe, sound, and accessible financial system. The Suptech (ST) Team
within the Risk, Policy, and Analysis Group directly supports FISC’s strategic
objective of deepening our knowledge of, and thought leadership in, the
utilization of new and evolving technologies in our supervisory programs and
examination processes. This cross-disciplinary team of developers and/or data
scientists collaborates with colleagues throughout FISC to identify product
development opportunities, design solutions, and facilitate their implementation.
ST additionally has education, outreach
and advocacy responsibilities on the use of technology in supervision.

Job Summary

The Risk Specialist, Data Science for Suptech plays an essential role in
supporting FISC’s supervision objectives and functions. We are looking for a
subject matter expert with data science expertise to support assessment and
monitoring of risk at supervised institutions.
You will lead or provide critical input to the identification,
prioritization, and development of applied data science opportunities across
FISC, with a focus on the Regional, Community and Foreign Examinations Group.
Additionally, you will work closely with multiple stakeholders throughout the
Bank to support the overall Mission, and to deliver on FISC’s vision for
developing and implementing innovative solutions, powered by data and machine
learning and integral to the risk assessment, supervisory program, and
examination processes.

Key
responsibilities include:
Develop or build
upon already existing expertise around machine learning applications, as well
as supervisory examination, risk assessment, and risk monitoring processes, to
help lead developing methods for applying data mining, NLP, and machine
learning to improve the Division’s analytical and supervisory capabilities.
Collect and
direct, perform, or support analysis of data to generate and test working hypotheses,
conduct thorough assessments, and draw actionable recommendations to be used by
examination team(s) and a broader Reserve Bank audience.
Direct and/or build
data ingestion processes to prepare, extract, and enrich a variety of both
structured and unstructured data sources such as news, internal/external
documents, external financial information, and confidential supervisory
information.
Develop, document
& maintain statistical, financial and/or econometric models to analyze
capital, asset quality, earnings, liquidity risk exposure, or other
sophisticated concepts, including non-financial risk, at banking institutions.
Direct, or provide
analytical support to, the development of innovative solutions leveraging
emerging technologies to address evolving needs of supervision and examination
management and staff, with a particular focus on identifying, measuring,
monitoring, and mitigating existing risk and emerging risk concerns, or improving
efficiencies in supervisory program or examination processes.
Collaborate with
business partners across FRBSF and FISC to prioritize requirements in the risk,
supervision and data science domains.
Position Requirements
Bachelor's
and Master's Degree preferably in Business/Finance or an analytical field such
as Economics, Mathematics, Engineering, Computer Science with a minimum of 3+
years of related experience to include:
3+ years of
experience in a data science/modeler role specifically focused on risk, banking
supervision, and/or financial regulation.
2+ years of
experience in working at financial regulatory institutions with large datasets
to build models and algorithms with open source technologies as part
supervisory and/or risk assessment processes.
Established
ability to work with large structured and unstructured financial data sets and
have the required statistical skills to analyze and prepare them for modeling
and algorithm development.
Knowledge of
the banking industry and related supervision and regulation framework
Proficiency
and applied experience in quantitative risk modeling, including the use of
modeling software.
Ability to
analyze and interpret quantitative financial information, including but not
limited to balance sheet data and market data.
Strong
statistical modelling and programming skills in R or Python
Proficiency
in SQL – able to write structured and efficient queries on large data sets.
Comfortable
working in a loosely structured organization on a tight schedule.
Strong
written and verbal communication and presentation skills including ability to
effectively share results with both technical and non-technical audiences
Experience
with data visualization packages (e.g. ggplot2, plotly); experience building
interactive dashboards and apps (e.g. Shiny) is a plus but not required.
Familiarity
with model development lifecycle, and in particular model validation processes
(e.g. SR 11-7).
We are looking for candidates
that exhibit these behavioral competencies: analytical thinking, innovation,
communication for results, flexibility, initiative, collaboration, and risk
management.

The Federal Reserve Bank of
San Francisco believes in the diversity of our people, ideas, and experiences
and are committed to building an inclusive culture that is representative of
the communities we serve.

We will ensure that
individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to
participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential
job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment.

The Federal Reserve Bank of
San Francisco is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",3.6,Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,107,Government,financial_related,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,58.5,CA,5803,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
1387,387,Data Engineer,$44k-$73k,"Summary of Responsibilities

Codes and develops software applications. Works as part of a development team on the design and implementation of analytical applications, including current Business Intelligence technologies, modern programming languages (Python, Scala, R) and current SQL database skills. Conducts requirement analysis, produces design documents on proposed solutions, and delivers consistent, test-covered, high quality code in a timely fashion. Recommends and completes product revisions or enhancements based on feedback. Develops and maintains documentation as required.

Performs work under minimal supervision. Handles moderate to complex issues and problems, and engages higher-level staff on only the most complex issues as necessary. Possesses comprehensive knowledge of subject matter. Provides coaching, and/or mentoring to a subordinate group.

Preferred Experience and Skills

Four to Eight year of related experience
Technical expertise and detail orientated
Complex problem-solving and critical thinking skills
Analytical thinking skills
Ability to build collaborative skills
Agile/SCRUM methodology experience
Azure DevOps experience
Property and Casualty insurance experience
4+ years of Hands-on experience with SQL databases, SSIS/Informatica ETL, Power BI, Cloud based integration tools.
Knowledge of Data warehousing concepts, and data modeling using Kimball methodology.

Preferred Education and Training

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field

INDSP",3.5,West Bend Mutual Insurance Company,"West Bend, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,126,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,58.5,WI,1503,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
1388,388,Data Science Manager,$44k-$73k,"The Data Science Manager will manage a team of statisticians in research and development of new predictive models and new analytical techniques related to insurance pure premiums, customer life time value, customer buying behaviors and related topics using internal and external data. You will start your Data Science Manager role at home and then transition to working in our Woodbridge, NJ office when it reopens.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities
Provide analytics for setting price, underwriting and products strategies.Implement analysis and modeling tests.
Develop and enhance models used in a variety of contexts within the product management structure.
Advance modeling capabilities.
Work with colleagues in various departments to facilitate the application of models developed considering the regulatory and competitive contexts.
Ensure models are understood, implications are appropriately assessed, implementation plans are defined,validation of results are undertaken and adjustments are made.
Qualifications and Education
Master's degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering or related field (willing to accept foreign education equivalent) and a minimum of seven (7) years’ experience in managerial role supervising predictive/advanced analytics.
Alternatively, will accept Ph.D. and five years’ experience in managerial role supervising predictive/advanced analytics.
Demonstrated expertise in SAS.
Demonstrated expertise in Bayesian statistics.
Demonstrated experience in developing multivariate predictive models in an insurance environment.
About the Company
The Plymouth Rock Company and its affiliated group of companies write and manage over $1.4 billion in personal and commercial auto and homeowner’s insurance throughout the Northeast and mid-Atlantic, where we have built an unparalleled reputation for service. We continuously invest in technology, our employees thrive in our empowering environment, and our customers are among the most loyal in the industry. The Plymouth Rock group of companies employs more than 1,800 people and is headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts. Plymouth Rock Assurance Corporation holds an A.M. Best rating of “A-/Excellent”.",3.6,Plymouth Rock Assurance,"Woodbridge, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,38,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,58.5,NJ,2192,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
1390,390,Senior Data Engineer,$44k-$73k,"About the role: *
We’re looking for a curious, analytical, and detail-oriented individual who enjoys writing complex SQL, is comfortable with Tableau, and has knowledge or interest in Python, Scala, or R. This individual will help us better understand all quantitative aspects of our business by delivering key insights through data visualization and analysis, covering topics such as customer acquisition, funnel optimization, and processing efficiency -- amongst many others. This will be a highly cross-functional role supporting multiple business functions.
What you’ll do: *
Write complex SQL queries against a variety of data sources and data lakes
Build ETL pipeline in AWS infrastructure using Python/Scala, AWS DMS, AWS Glue, and Redshift
Build data visualizations using Tableau to enable business to more easily explore data
Work cross-functionally with multiple departments to provide required analytics and insights needed to support the business needs
Become an expert on our data, and work closely with engineering to improve the data model to serve the needs of data analytics and data science
Develop models that explore our data using Python or R that yield additional insights into the business
What we’re looking for: *
Must love data!
Undergraduate degree in computer science, mathematics, economics, or other quantitative discipline
3+ years of experience in a data engineering role
Expert-level SQL proficiencyExpert-level Tableau proficiency
Prior ETL experienceWorking knowledge of Python or Scala or R or similar and willingness to learn
Strong written and verbal communication skills
A team player who works well with others
Not required, but nice to have: *
Prior experience with Salesforce
Prior experience with Redshift
Experience at a fintech or technology-enabled lender
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
This position will be working remotely for the foreseeable future (at least 3 to 9 months) due to COVID-19.

Experience:
data engineering: 3 years (Required)
Company's website:
www.lendeavor.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.7,Lendeavor,"Columbus, OH",-1,51 to 200 Employees,6,Unknown,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,58.5,OH,2238,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,1,0
1392,392,Data Scientist,$44k-$73k,"Job Title: Data Scientist

Location: Field - US East

WHY YOU'LL LOVE SALESLOFT:

Put Customers First. Team Over Self. Focus on Results. Bias Towards Action. Glass Half Full.

These are the values that define who we are, that have empowered our staggering growth, and could be instrumental to your career development

Headquartered in Atlanta, Georgia, with offices in San Francisco, New York, London, Indianapolis, and Guadalajara, SalesLoft is growing rapidly and is looking for future Lofters to join our team. As a testament to our Organizational Health, SalesLoft has been named by Forbes as one of America's Best Startup Employers in 2020, twice by Deloitte as a 'Fastest-Growing Technology Company in North America,' featured by The New York Times as a start-up on a path to a $1B valuation, and has been recognized as a '#1 Best Place to Work in Atlanta' three separate years. SalesLoft is ranked #1 in the emerging category of Sales Engagement software and is on a mission to equip companies to maximize revenue by creating a fantastic buying experience.

We're redefining an age old industry! This is challenging work – but our team of brilliant creatives makes the journey thrilling. We're fast-paced, innovative, and collaborative. We pursue excellence in everything and have a lot of fun along the way. Come join us!

THE OPPORTUNITY:

Although we're proud of our history, we're just as excited about the future. We want to create a world-class culture and company that attracts, develops, engages and retains elite talent.

At SalesLoft, our data scientists are pivotal to our company's success. You will be a key member of our fast-growing and high-performing data science team and will conduct innovative machine learning research and build product feature prototypes that will deliver value to our customers.

On a day-to-day basis, you will be responsible for solving business problems using our in-house data and your technical prowess. Specifically, you will:
Apply advanced statistical techniques and concepts to analyze data from the company databases and other unstructured data sources to build innovative product features, marketing content, and internal services.
Invest in the sales engagement domain; collaborate with product, engineering, sales, customer success, and other teams to understand business and customer needs, and translate them to tangible data science problems.
Own and manage complex projects and communicate effectively with stakeholders.
Contribute to the rapid growth of the research organization, being flexible in data engineering, algorithmist, and analyst responsibilities as they arise.
In addition to working with amazing colleagues who exemplify our 'team over self' core value, you will also have the opportunity to leverage your mathematical skills and technical expertise to transform the sales engagement space. You will have an opportunity to make a difference.

WHAT WE'RE LOOKING FOR:

We are seeking a hungry and passionate person who will be instrumental in growing the data science organization at the most successful early stage SaaS company in Atlanta. We are looking for someone who enjoys, and is unafraid of, getting their hands dirty with unstructured, unlabeled data and can think out of the box to solve business problems.

If you're looking for an opportunity to learn more, do more, and become more than previously possible… If you're passionate about innovation, growth and serving customers and thrive in a fast-paced, developmental environment, then becoming a Data Scientist at SalesLoft is the career path for you!

THE TEAM:

Our SalesLoft's Data Science team is comprised of seasoned and up-and-coming data scientists, machine learning engineers and a product manager who are all aligned on one vision and mission:
Vision: Every seller is loved by the buyers they serve (#saleslove)
Mission: Equip companies to maximize revenue by creating a fantastic buying experience
The Data Science team consists of results-oriented technology professionals who are hungry, humble and smart. They are passionate about making SalesLoft the leader in AI technologies in the sales engagement space and believe in leveraging data science and machine learning to guide and help our users. They are also the epitome of our core values - Customers First. Team Over Self. Focus on Results. Bias Towards Action. Glass Half Full.

THE SKILL SET:
2+ years experience as a data scientist or machine learning engineer
Proficient in a variety of ML techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and has a fundamental understanding of their real-world advantages/drawbacks
Experience with deploying data science products in production or collaborating with engineers to deploy in production
Prior experience of working with unlabeled and unstructured data. Experience with NLP and/or predictive forecasting preferred
Excellent verbal and communication skills and visualization abilities to communicate with stakeholders
Strong knowledge/experience with a variety of analysis tools, including Python, R, and SQL. Experience with Spark or Dask preferred.
WITHIN ONE MONTH, YOU'LL:
Attend SalesLoft's New Hire Orientation, where you will learn our SalesLoft story and understand what makes our ""Lofters"" unique
Begin 1:1's with your manager, understand your 30-60-90 plan, meet & shadow current members of the SalesLoft team, and delve into your territory
Set your OKRs (Objectives and Key Results) with your manager and develop an action plan to achieve them
Meet key partners in Product, Engineering, Customer Success etc.
Understand our various data sources and get your hands dirty with them
Explore our technical stack and infrastructure and get comfortable with them
WITHIN THREE MONTHS, YOU'LL:
Create a shadowing plan and begin executing it to understand the SalesLoft platform.
Apply various machine learning and data science techniques to solve sales business problems.
Create custom ETL capabilities to support your research efforts.
Lead and deliver your first research project.
Communicate research results to product and engineering leadership in verbal, visual, and written mediums.
WITHIN SIX MONTHS, YOU'LL:
Significantly contribute to team planning and estimation.
Continue to focus on your OKRs.
Create prototypes using product knowledge, customer insights and technical expertise.
Implement and compare models to improve key metrics.
Advise product leadership on data science data capture and collection requirements.
Collaborate with our machine learning engineers and software engineers to put your models in front of our customers.
WITHIN TWELVE MONTHS, YOU'LL:
Mentor other team members and assist them to tackle new problems.
Be a key advisor on team direction and SalesLoft's long-term data science strategy.
Collaborate with subject matter experts to develop success criteria to deliver new products, features and models.
Push the state of the art and apply the latest advances in deep learning and mathematical modeling to improve buyer and seller experiences.
IS THIS ROLE NOT AN EXACT FIT? Keep an eye on our Careers Page for other positions!

WHY SHOULD YOU WORK AT SALESLOFT:
You will become part of an amazing culture with a supportive CEO and smart teammates who actually care
You will work with an amazing team you can learn from and teach
You will experience joining a high-growth/high-traction organization
You will hear ""Yes, let's do that!"" and then have the opportunity to successfully execute on your ideas
We have a vibrant, open office that utilizes modern technology
You will grow more here than you would anywhere else, that is a promise
SalesLoft is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, disability, veteran status, pregnancy, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.6,SalesLoft,Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,9,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,58.5,Remote,7974,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
1393,393,Data Scientist II,$44k-$73k,"Grubhub is dedicated to connecting hungry diners with our wide network of restaurants across the country. Our innovative technology, easy-to-use platforms and streamlined delivery capabilities make us an industry leader today, and in the future of online food ordering.
We strive to create a workplace that reflects the diversity of our customers and the communities we serve. When you join our team, you become part of a community that works together to innovate, solve problems, take risks, grow, work hard and have a ton of fun in the process!
Why Work For Us
We have a fast-paced environment and that is what our teams thrive on. Grubhub believes in empowering people and offering opportunities for development, as well as professional growth. We value strong, positive relationships in all areas: with each other, our customers and our greater community. Want to be a part of a team of diverse collaborators in an authentically fun culture? If so, we want to talk to you - and hear what’s your favorite restaurant for food delivery!
More About the Role:
Grubhub is looking for an innately curious, business-minded, results-oriented Data Scientist with a focus on predictive modelling, specifically time-series forecasting. In this role, you will build and deploy models predicting various aspects of the business’ logistics. You will also perform analysis to inform the business.
Specific responsibilities include, but are not limited to, data analysis, problem solving, development of cutting-edge time-series forecasting models, deployment and maintenance of those models.

Understand the business! Work directly with stakeholders to address their needs.
Build models, from selecting features to optimizing.
Be a stakeholder for our models! Help guide and prioritize development of predictive models to enhance our capabilities.
Question our assumptions! Find new and better ways to do what we’re doing.
Produce novel analysis giving insights into the business
Relentlessly analyze and improve the performance of our business.

2-5 years of experience applying descriptive statistics, machine learning, building time-series forecasting models and visualization to solve real-world problems
Education in statistics, mathematics, computer science or another quantitative field
Comfort communicating analytical findings to people of diverse backgrounds using statistical libraries and visualization tools in a language like Python or R
Data querying capabilities using SQL
Ability to explain technical concepts in simple terms to business stakeholders
Master's degree in a technical or quantitative field preferred

Flexible PTO. Grubhub employees are provided a generous amount of time to recharge their batteries.
Health and Wellness. We provide programs that support your overall well-being such as generous medical benefits, employee network groups, company-wide fitness challenges, and a comfortable and casual workplace! We also support our parents by offering 8 weeks of paid parent bonding time, a 4-week returnship program, and 6-8 weeks paid medical leave.
Learning and Career Growth. Your personal and professional development is a priority at Grubhub. From day one, we empower you to lead and be an active participant in your career growth. We provide continuous learning opportunities, training, and coaching and mentorship programs.
MealPerks. Who’s ready for some lunch? We provide our employees with a weekly Grubhub credit to enjoy and support local restaurants. We also offer company-wide meals several times a year to bring our Grubhub family together.
Fun. Every Grubhub office has an employee-led Culture Crew that connects people through fun, meaningful events and initiatives. Some of our popular past events include: Wing-eating contests, Grubtoberfest, 5k Runs, Bring Your Child to Work Day, regular happy hours, and more!
Social Impact. We believe in the importance of serving the communities that support our business. In addition, employees are given paid time off each year to support the causes that are important to them.

Grubhub is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics. The EEO is the Law poster is available here: DOL Poster. If you are applying for a job in the U.S. and need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to TalentAcquisition@grubhub.com and let us know the nature of your request and contact information. Please note that only those inquiries concerning a request for reasonable accommodation will be responded to from this email address.
CA Privacy Notice: If you are a resident of the State of California and would like a copy of our CA privacy notice, please email privacy@grubhub.com.",3.9,Grubhub,"New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,16,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,58.5,NY,4887,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
1395,395,Data Scientist -,$44k-$73k,"Our Mission
We’re here to create a safer, happier and more mindful future for all with the help of data science, engineering, design, and mobile technology. We're starting by reinventing insurance, by rethinking the technologies that enable it, but our true goal is to build a platform that rewards people for driving well — creating safer roads with fewer accidents in the process.

Backed by impressive funding, we're poised to re-engineer a trillion-dollar category. We’re using rich customer insights, advanced technology and data science to build our cloud-native InsurTech solution. We're out to change behavior and promote mindful living.

Job Requirements
You must have all the skills and experiences associated with one of the options below. These options change over time and reflect the current needs of the team.
Option one - Telematics ML
Machine learning: Kaggle grandmaster-level skills with history of deploying models to production
Telematics experience: You have led telematics modeling at a major company known for telematics
Software development in Python: Strong scientific Python skills using pandas, scikit-learn, and statsmodels, as well as strong understanding of model deployment patterns
Option two - Telematics DL
Deep learning: Experience contributing new deep learning research to solve previously unsolved problems
Telematics experience: You have led telematics modeling at a major company known for telematics
Software development in Python: Strong scientific Python skills using pandas, scikit-learn, and statsmodels, as well as strong understanding of model deployment patterns
Option Three - Contact Center Optimization
Contact center knowledge: You are an expert at using data science methods to optimize contact centers
Machine learning: Strong understanding of ML theory with significant applied experience
Software development in Python: Strong scientific Python skills using pandas, scikit-learn, and statsmodels, as well as strong understanding of model deployment patterns
More details
Salary: We invest in first-rate people and pay top-of-market salaries for most positions, factoring in experience, talent and location. We do not offer equity.
Benefits: Medical, dental, vision, 401(k), wellness reimbursement, four weeks of vacation + six weeks of parental leave, and great work-life balance. Our office building offers on-site shower and bike stalls, and panoramic views of San Francisco.
Location: Due to COVID-19 our teams are all working remotely through 2020. We provide an in-home office set-up including laptop, monitor, ergonomic desk, chair and other items as needed
Location: Post COVID-19: San Francisco, CA near Montgomery Bart Station
All are welcome at Blue Owl. We are an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer who values diversity and inclusion and looks for applicants who understand, embrace and thrive in a multicultural world. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

If you are a San Francisco resident, please read the City and County of San Francisco's Fair Chance Ordinance notice.
https://sfgov.org/olse/sites/default/files/FCO%20poster2020.pdf",4.5,Blue Owl,"San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,4,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,58.5,CA,3422,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
1396,396,Cleared Data Scientist,$44k-$73k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

As an experienced Data Scientist, you might be wondering what makes MITRE different than other government contractors and consulting firms. Many of our recent hires answered YES to at least one of the questions below:
Do you want to partner with Defense Intelligence professionals to solve problems?
Are you interested in developing, automating and improving capabilities to address technical issues of national importance and making a direct mission impact?
Are you interested in contributing to technical projects that you can feel passionate about?
Are you interested in working for a company where a 40-hour week is the norm and not the exception?
Do you want exceptional benefits, including tuition reimbursement for coursework towards an advance degree in a technical discipline?
In the Defense Intelligence Department, you can apply and expand software development and data skills to recommend solutions to large-scale data challenges. Join our team to develop automated methods to ingest and analyze large datasets; conduct data analysis and data modeling; and develop prototype capabilities. The candidate will be expected to work independently, with Analysts, and with Data Scientists to develop new workflows and approaches to answer questions of national significance. Our department works to identify and bring solutions to the Defense Intelligence Community and work in the public interest. We also actively conduct independent research in areas that further the knowledge of our government partners.

To be successful you will:
Be passionate about applying data analytics to real world problems.
Have an innate curiosity and interest in developing research questions and testing hypotheses with open ended tasking.
Work with Defense Intelligence government sponsors to gain understanding of their challenges, evaluate possible solutions and conduct insightful, actionable analyses.
Support the development and application of a variety of analytical models to sponsor challenges, with a willingness to adapt and learn.
Present results in an intuitive, actionable manner that can be understood by all sponsor audiences, regardless of technical expertise.
Provide relevant day-to-day tasking for one or more junior staff.
Lead projects throughout their life cycle, including conceptualization, requirements definition, data procurement, development, integration, and socialization
Minimum Qualifications :
BS and 8 years related experience
Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or applicants who are eligible for security clearances.
Required Qualifications:
Prior experience working with the Department of Defense and/or Intelligence Community.
Significant academic background in a quantitative field such as Computer Science, Engineering, Operations Research, Mathematics, or Statistics.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Demonstrated ability to manipulate large datasets and perform calculations with at least two modern programming language like Python (scikit-learn, pandas, tensorflow), C++, R, or Java or a business intelligence platform like Tableau.
Ability to apply, modify and formulate algorithms and processes to solve challenging problems.
Familiarity with AWS tools.
Demonstrated experience leading customer facing engagements emphasizing data analytics.
Possess and maintain an Active TS/SCI level security clearance with the ability to successfully obtain a CI Poly level clearance.


Preferred Qualifications:
Prior experience working with databases (e.g., PostgreSQL, Oracle, MySQL, MongoDB, Neo4j).Experience visualizing multi-dimensional data using tools like Tableau, ggplot2, Plotly, matplotlib, seaborn, or D3.js.
Experience leading or conducting research.
Experience designing data science tasking and/or leading a team of data scientists.
Experience applying various machine learning approaches (e.g., random forest, neural networks, support vector machines).
Experience using version control (e.g., Git, Mercurial, SVN) to support collaborative development.
Prior experience developing interactive data visualizations using open source web technologies (Angular, Vue, React, D3.js) or other frameworks (Shiny, Jupyter Notebooks).
Prior experience developing data-intensive full stack web applications using Node.js, Flask, Django, or other technologies.
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,MITRE,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,58.5,VA,6269,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
1402,402,Senior Data Scientist,$44k-$73k,"Senior Data Scientist
Location/City: Any US location (offices in Atlanta, GA and Playa Vista, CA)

Responsibilities
We are looking for a sharp, highly-motivated Senior Data Scientist to join our team. This is a high-impact role that will leverage data & analytics to derive insights from our Members’ data and make recommendations to help improve their financial wellbeing. You will collaborate with product, and engineering as well as executive stakeholders to create analytical solutions to help achieve business goals. An ideal candidate is an individual who has a deep background in statistics, analysis, experiment design, and can bring those skills to bear in a start-up environment. A strong understanding and hands-on ability with data science technology and infrastructure is important as well.
As the Senior Data Scientist, you will:
Work with large volumes of bank transactions to create proprietary intelligence about the nature of employment and earnings for our Members
Help build out our job recommendation engine to aid our Members in finding new or additional work to increase their income
Help drive a data-first culture where data is understood and leveraged in decision making
Collaborate with the data science team and CDO to define the technical strategy for Steady’s data science ecosystem
Develop and codify processes and best practices for modeling, testing, and analytics
Effectively balance short term delivery with long term direction and value
Advocate for data science innovation and increased contribution to Steady’s mission

Skills & Requirements
Advanced degree and relevant experience (MS + 5 years, PhD + 3 years) in statistics, mathematics, computer science, or similar field
Demonstrated experience creating production ML pipelines (training, scoring, leveraging in real-time systems)
Expert knowledge of modern machine learning algorithms (regression, classification, random forests, clustering, optimization, etc.) and statistical inference
Experience with bank or credit card transaction data preferred
Experience with NLP and textual data analysis is a plus
Demonstrated experience of efficient manipulation and storage of large datasets
Hands on experience and expertise with SQL, Spark, Python (preferred) or R
Experience with machine learning platforms Sagemaker/Databricks a plus
Strong data visualization skills (experience with Tableau preferred)
Familiarity and experience with the AWS data ecosystem (S3, AWS Glue, EMR, etc.)
Excellent verbal and written communication skills with the ability to interact at all levels of the organization
Comfortable working with distributed teams across multiple offices and timezones
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial, high-energy environment


Benefits
We value our Steady Team Members and are committed to their success. We are located in downtown Atlanta near MARTA, as well as in Playa Vista CA. We offer competitive compensation packages and a 100% company-paid benefits package including medical, dental, and vision. Steady is a relaxed, casual work environment with flexible hours and lunch provided once weekly in addition to a weekly meal stipend. We also offer a generous PTO plan, 401K, and future growth opportunities within the company. We strive to maintain a positive and fun environment for our employees where people can learn and grow with the company.
About Steady
Steady is a mission-driven business that helps people earn more. Through the free Steady app users can build & track income, networks, and buying power – allowing them to augment retirement savings, work around childcare responsibilities, pay down debt, save for purchases, and supplement their income from primary employers, while limiting their income volatility and better positioning themselves for access to a sustainable financial services ecosystem.
Every Steady member will build something different. We celebrate those who take the initiative to create a path that works for them. Whatever that looks like, Steady is there to support it, providing a stable foundation that allows people to build financial success over a lifetime.

Mission: Steady turns the tables by putting workers back in charge of their financial future with an income-building platform that creates financial stability and helps its users to take charge of their future.

For more information, visit us at www.steadyapp.com or on Twitter @TheSteadyApp.

Steady, Platform Inc. (Steady) is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer – All qualified applicants/employees will receive consideration for employment without regard to that individual’s age, race, color, religion or creed, national origin or ancestry, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, physical or mental disability, veteran status, genetic information, ethnicity, citizenship, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Statement to ALL Third-Party Agencies and Similar Organizations: Steady accepts resumes only from agencies with which we formally engage their services. Please do not forward resumes to our applicant tracking system, Steady employees, Steady hiring manager, or send to any Steady facility. Steady is not responsible for any fees or charges associated with unsolicited resumes.",4.0,Steady,"Atlanta, GA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,3,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,58.5,GA,5264,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,1,0,0
1404,404,Machine Learning Engineer,$44k-$73k,"Machine Learning Engineer*
Are you obsessed with software and machine learning? Looking to work with an awesome team in a modern, successful software company? Geisel Software, based in Worcester, Massachusetts, is a premier software developer that is working with and creating today's hottest software technologies. We are looking for a motivated individual to join our team, learn new technology, and help us build some great software!

Geisel Software develops web, mobile and embedded software, with a focus on robotics, medical devices, and machine learning. We seek a talented individual who is not afraid to work hard, learn something new and get lots of stuff done. We have a helpful staff, but it is also important that you can work independently and solve problems with little outside direction. Your problem-solving skills will be put to the test, whether that means tracking down the answer on Google, or building your own new solution.
Here's what we work with regularly*
TensorFlow and OpenCV
Robotic Simulation with ROS, RVIZ, and Unreal Engine
LAMP - Linux, Apache, MySQL and PHP
iPhone/Android application development
Embedded Development in C/C++ (Arm or x86)
Web Frontend (AngularJS, JavaScript, jQuery, Bootstrap, etc.)
Scripting Languages (Python, BASH, or other)
Web Technologies - HTML5, CSS3, XML, JSON
Linux - As a user at least, but also administration and kernel development
Web Frameworks - Django, Codeigniter
Agile and Waterfall design methodologies
Embedded platforms (Raspberry Pi, BeagleBone, OMAP, etc.)
Here’s what we require*
You're passionate about software development -- it's what you do even in your free time.
1 - ∞ years of experience with C, C++ and/or Python.
Master’s degree in Computer Science or related field (PHD highly preferred).
Willingness and ability to write software as part of a team as well as work on ground-breaking machine learning IP. This role will be a mix of both!
Good software foundational skills: CS theory; clean, well-documented code; collaborative style; solid algorithms understanding; mastery of more than one language.
An aptitude for learning new platforms and technologies on the fly. We’re constantly working on new projects that will push you and keep you always learning new technologies.
Able to take ownership of a project and independently architect, execute and troubleshoot it through completion and customer delivery.
Actively pursuing new knowledge and technologies. If you’re a web frontend guru, are you building your backend skills? If you’re an embedded developer, are you developing apps for Android or iOS?
Already comfortable on Linux. You can be a Windows/Mac pro, but you'll be doing at least 50% of your development on Linux. You should be comfortable with that.
Willing to commute to Worcester, MA (Note: Ability to temporarily work remotely during this trying time of COVID-19).
Looking for full-time employment.
Must be a US Person.
Here’s what we would prefer*
ROS or other robot operating system experience.
An educational focus in Machine Learning and Data Science.
Published work in the field of machine learning.
Robotic simulation and 3D game engine knowledge (Godot, Unreal, Unity, RVIZ, Drake).
Any experience with physical modeling would be a plus.
What you’ll get*
An opportunity to work with the latest technologies across a variety of platforms.
A fun, exciting work environment focused on the results, not the politics.
An experienced team and mentor who can help you grow in your craft and career.
A position with a growing company, offering competitive benefits and salary.
Apply now*
E-mail us at *jobs*@*geisel.software* and *include your resume and a brief cover letter* explaining why you think you'd be a great fit at Geisel Software. We'd love to hear about what you've done with technologies we're using, or other projects you've worked on. What do you think you’re really good at and why? What have you done outside your current job to improve your craft? Why do you think you’d be a great fit?

Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.geisel-software.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,Geisel Software,"Worcester, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,58.5,MA,4195,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,1
1405,405,Data Scientist,$44k-$73k,"Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, or related field,

Advanced knowledge of advanced analytics software technologies, technical design, programming, monitoring, and troubleshooting enabling software related technologies. Knowledgeable of advanced analytics strategies, architectural standards and best practices.

Two or more years of experience with two or more programming languages from the following list required: Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, Ruby, C#, Objective-C or R.

Advanced experience with Python or Java specifically.

Experience with any data science tools such as R, SAS, or SPSS a plus. Experience with the HDFS/YARN/Spark and related tools a plus.

Experience with mathematical modeling languages (DOcplex/CPLEX, Matlab, GAMS) a plus.

Experience developing applications in a Linux server environment preferred.

Job Type: Full-time",4.0,"Aptude, Inc","Appleton, WI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,20,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,58.5,WI,875,0,data scientist,1,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
1407,407,Data Engineer,$44k-$73k,"Job Description

Why consider OPI, and why do people dig working here?
Variety of consulting; new technologies, projects, and people on a regular basis.
Stability; we’ve been around since 1996 and have a diverse mix of clients and technologies to keep us busy, very busy. And we keep a bench. If you’re not on a project, you’re writing software for our internal business functions or you’re learning new technologies. It’s in our benefit to make our consultants as marketable as possible. That’s good for your career.
No politics or management; we don’t get in the way. Why sit in meetings all day when you can code and be productive?
Awesome benefits; free healthcare for your entire family (yes, free), 24 days of PTO + 10 days of sick time, quarterly profit sharing bonuses, you get paid OT, company trips (to Mexico), 3 company lake cabins/homes, various quarterly company events, new Macbook Pro’s, free beer/soda, chips, candy, and so much more.
You work with the best. Do an Object Partners search on LinkedIn and see the types of talent we hire. You truly get to work with intelligent, passionate engineers that share the same goal of building great software the right way.
Low company overhead. It all means more money back into our consultants pockets (profit sharing) or company trips and events to share in the financial success.

Qualifications

Architecture and design of highly available/scalable distributed systems.
Design and development of streaming data platforms using Kafka Streams, Spark, Flink, Storm, Beam or Cloud Dataflow.
Experience with functional/event-driven programming.
NoSQL technologies such as ElasticSearch or Cassandra.
Messaging technologies such as RabbitMQ, Kafka or Kinesis.
SQL on Hadoop technologies such as Hive, Impala or Presto.
Cloud services such as AWS, Azure, GCP or OpenStack.
JVM languages such as Java, Groovy, Kotlin or Scala.
Service frameworks such as Spring Boot, Ratpack, Vert.x, or Play.
Knowledge of data analytics, visualization and governance.
Knowledge of operating big data production solutions at scale.
Knowledge of CI/CD pipelines and DevOps culture.
Passion for software development. Someone that loves what they do, that aren’t just in it for a paycheck. Do you have dev projects going on at home at all times?
New projects, new teams, new technologies means having to adjust and learn all the time. You might get thrown on a DevOps project as well, so having the ability to jump in and get your feet wet without hesitation is important. If you don’t want to grow and learn, we’re not a fit.
Positive, can-do attitude. We can teach the technology, but we can’t teach how to approach client challenges with a positive, helpful demeanor. The best consultants aren’t the most technical (although that sure helps), it’s the consultant that will do whatever it takes to see a client be successful, no matter what they throw at you.",4.8,Object Partners,"Des Moines, IA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,24,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,58.5,IA,2896,0,data engineer,0,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
1409,409,Lead Data Scientist,$44k-$73k,"Summary
Tranzact is hiring a lead data scientist to assist our team in driving our data science and analytics group forward. You’ll be joining a group of curious, smart, technically minded yet business savvy data scientists looking to make a difference to the company by further designing and building out our data decisioning capabilities. We have been up and running for several years and our team must grow to meet the demands of our business partners—they see the value we have provided and want more.

The Lead Data Scientist is passionate about using data and insights to drive business strategy and develop data products. A successful candidate will manage data science projects including scoping, designing, and executing the vision with the help of more junior data scientists / analysts. They would also identify and prioritize initiatives to deliver value to our internal stakeholders. The ideal candidate would have experience managing data science projects, managing stakeholders, and working cross functionally. This person would have real world experience “in the data trenches” as a data scientist and be an all-star individual contributor. We expect this person to have a passion for driving projects for business outcomes, strong analytical skills, and a strong desire to make an impact in our growing data science practice!

What you’ll do:
Become the domain expert in multiple areas of the Tranzact business (i.e. retention, call center effectiveness, etc.) and contribute to the advancement of those area through thought leadership.
Lead new projects and initiatives through understanding business needs, executing, presenting and influencing stakeholders.
Be a technical leader on the team that can advise, mentor, and delegate tasks to more junior data scientists and analysts.
Facilitate data-driven decision making and prioritize initiatives.
Develop strong cross functional partnerships with business and technology stakeholders.
Act as a subject matter expert within the organization on all things data.
Find new and improved ways for us to use data in our products, operations, and business strategies.

What we do:
We achieve competitive advantage through data-driven marketing and full management of the customer experience. We’re constantly refining our technology and our strategies, that’s why we’re the industry leader in delivering the best results to the top insurance brands in America.

That’s not just lip service either, we’re consistently awarded partner of the year from brands like AFLAC, Humana, and more. Our work has also been featured on The Dr. Oz Show, Forbes, and Vox -- to name a few.

We want people who fit within our Be Real culture. We want a diversity of programmers and writers and designers and data scientists and strategists and more. We’re made up of introverts and extroverts, suits and rebels, corporate types and anti-corporate types. We’re an environment where every person feels their full potential is only limited by their ability to conceive of it and make it happen. Our company grew from entrepreneurial roots but has big company resources to get amazing things done.

What we’re looking for:
BA/BS in a quantitative field (Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, etc.)
5 years of experience in data science at a B2C or direct to consumer company (experience in marketing, business operations, or customer retention is a plus)
Experience implementing predictive and prescriptive models in production systems
Experience managing data science projects and mentoring data scientists / analysts
Proficiency with Python, SQL, Excel, and a data visualization tool (Tableau, Power BI, etc.)
Ability to manage multiple projects and deadlines
Experience communicating strategy and results to different audiences
Ability to work cross functionally and influence others
A lifelong learner that is excited to learn new data science technologies and apply those to technologies to our business
Ability to be objective, follow the facts, cut through noise and create a story with data
Thrives in a fast-paced environment that is constantly changing
What’s in it for you:
Medical, dental, vision, paid time off/holidays, 401(k), and bonus opportunity
Frequent office events and outings
Employee development programs, conference and training reimbursement
Work remote flexibility
Joining a growing and exciting team making a big impact on the business!
EOE, including disability/vets",3.7,TRANZACT,"Raleigh, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,31,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,58.5,NC,4454,1,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1412,412,Data Engineer,$44k-$73k,"Data Engineer


Philadelphia

Apply now

Refer someone

As a Data Engineer based in our Philadelphia office you will be working alongside a diverse multi-talented team in a fast-paced agile environment. In this role, you will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimizing data flow and collection from cross functional teams.

You will support our Global Salesforce capability and work closely with software developers, database architects, data analysts on data initiatives and will ensure that data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects.

Bringing your technology expertise, you will uplift a new global Salesforce platform by supplying efficient data requirements, ensuring compliance to internal and external policies and standards, supporting feature team development, and providing innovative solutions to business needs.

Your subject matter expertise will add value as you provide a strong understanding and practical application of the most appropriate AWS tooling to utilise and support data movement.

Using your hands-on programming experience in python, you will be able to contribute to on-going development by collaborating with stakeholders of all levels.

Your attention to detail will be utilized as you design clean, efficient, robust and reliable solutions that deliver on requirements as well as advising on data centric designs, that are secure, stable and scalable.

We’ll need you to bring a strong understanding of data modelling and data architecture principles along with hands-on experience authoring and configuring AWS data pipes. You’ll also have prior experience building microservices and components for efficient data delivery across systems.

If you have development experience in a large organisation within a complex technology landscape, that includes AWS experience, then we want to hear from you.

About the Corporate Operations Group

The Corporate Operations Group brings together specialist support services in Digital Transformation & Data, Technology, Market Operations, Human Resources, Business Services, Business Improvement & Strategy, and the Macquarie Group Foundation. The Corporate Operations Group’s purpose is to power the entrepreneurial enterprise.

Our commitment to Diversity and Inclusion

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, colour, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, marital status, gender identity or any other impermissible criterion or circumstance. Macquarie also takes affirmative action in support of its policy to hire and advance in employment of individuals who are minorities, women, protected veterans, and individuals with disabilities.

We recognise that flexibility comes in a variety of forms. Talk to us about what flexibility you need.",3.5,Macquarie Group,"Philadelphia, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,51,Company - Public,financial_related,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,58.5,PA,2973,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
1414,414,Principal Data Scientist,$54k-$98k,"About Figure

At Figure, we're on a mission to transform financial services through blockchain, bringing speed, efficiency and savings to both consumers and institutions.

Accomplishing this kind of transformation requires building really big things. And we understand that building big requires a creative, team oriented and supportive environment where everyone can do their absolute best work. The Figure team is comprised of incredibly driven, innovative, collaborative and curious people who love architecting and building from scratch. Everyone at the company is encouraged to be an individual contributor but also a team collaborator.

We value team members who bring an entrepreneurial mindset to every task and will embrace our culture of innovation. Every day at Figure is a journey in continuous learning yet a daily focus on getting work done that makes a difference.

This is an opportunity to work with a team of proven leaders who have already created billions of dollars in value in the Fintech space. Join us!

About the Role

Each member of the Data team plays an integral part of what we are building at Figure. We rely on advanced techniques in machine learning, cloud platforms and big data to drive decisions across the organization. If you are interested in working with an impressive team of Data pros who collaborate and challenge each other, and want to solve interesting problems to propel the company's growth, apply now!

What You'll Do
Develop custom models and algorithms to apply to large datasets, as well as, processes for monitoring and analyzing their performance.
Mine and analyze data from different resources, and use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, customer acquisition, underwriting and other business outcomes.
Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
Work with stakeholders throughout the organization to identify opportunities for leveraging data to drive business decisions.
Understand and apply proper risk framework to your analysis and modeling.
Collaborate cross functionally to implement models and monitor outcomes.
What We Look For
8+ years of hands on Data Science experience building Models and partnering with stakeholders to make business decisions
Credit and Risk modeling experience in consumer finance
Strong problem solving skills with an emphasis on translating real-life problems into a concrete model development strategy. Blend academic rigor with a sense of pragmatism for rapidly prototyping and delivering solutions.
Experienced in using Python for analysis and modeling (TensorFlow is a big plus)
Experience applying a wide range of statistical techniques to large data sets, and understanding their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Experience using web services (AWS, GCP), and distributed data/computing tools (Spark, Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Hive, etc.)
Excellent cross-functional communication skills.
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced environment.
Benefits To You
Competitive salary based on experience and skills
Firm-wide performance based bonus
Competitive stock options package as an early member of the team
A flexible paid time off and vacation policy
Comprehensive health, vision, dental insurance
Company FSA, 401k, work from home benefits
And much more to come!
Figure will not sponsor work visas for this position. In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification form upon hire.",4.4,Figure,Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.0,Remote,3587,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,0
1415,415,Principal Data Scientist,$54k-$98k,"Job Description:


Fidelity is asking the question: How much AI can be applied to practically improve investors decision support process? Fidelity is looking for an experienced data scientist to advance the research and development of AI/ML methods as components in the delivery of innovative investment management technology solutions. This role will design and implement portfolio risk and optimization techniques to deliver industry differentiated capabilities.

The ideal candidate will have experience combining multi-variate statistical modeling, machine learning and open-source approaches to Cloud computing and Big Data into practical investment capabilities. We desire candidates with proven track records in the design and implementation of deep learning and/or portfolio optimization methods. Experience/interest in high performance computing, including quantum computing will be a plus.

This position will be based in Boston, MA.


The Team

The Advanced Technology for Investment Management (ATIM) is an innovation team within Fidelity. ATIM makes pivotal investments in building break-through technologies as practical and innovative investment capabilities. The goal is to continually strengthen investment decision support, build portfolio construction insights and support personalized investment goals. The team works within an innovation ecosystem that includes partners from investment, client relations, technology and centralized R&D units. Fidelitys ATIM seeks cross-domain authorities with backgrounds that connect investment management, machine learning and technology implementation. We cultivate success through a rigorous, collaborative approach that builds, tests, and iterates as we learn and seek challenging processes and problems in investment management.

The Expertise You Have
PhD in Computer Science, Applied Math, Statistics, Physics, Data Science or related field
Interest in financial markets, products, and investment processes.
Prior experience in building simulation models, predictive models or optimization solutions which delivered business value.
Expertise in model evaluation and computation performance tuning on production environment
Strong verbal and written communication skills, effective in interacting with both technical and non-technical professionals.
Embrace agile methodology and pay meticulous attention to detail
Unquestioned integrity
The Skills You Bring


Required:
Proven and deep expertise in applying deep learning, generative modeling and advanced AI techniques to tackle business problems
Proven passion for the financial markets, products, and investment process (including: Fixed Income Analytics, Asset Pricing Models and Multi-Factor Risk Models)
Good applied knowledge with statistical models, predictive models and time series analysis (such as regression, classification, simulation, dimension reduction techniques)
Good applied knowledge of mathematical algorithms of solving common optimization problems (including: linear/nonlinear/integer programming)
Proven success building computing algorithms with Java, Scala, Python or R with GPUs and/or map-reduce framework
Strong data exploration and analysis skills using advanced SQL
Desire to work with interactive web tools and quick prototyping with visualization
Preferred:

Experience with crafting proprietary machine learning processes to model dynamic dependencies and causalities
Knowledge with quantum computing, applying existing quantum computing libraries and quantum circuit design
The Value You Deliver
Advancing the research and development of AI/ML methods as components in the delivery of innovative investment management technology solutions
Designing and implementing portfolio risk and optimization techniques to deliver industry differentiated capabilities
Effective partnering across Fidelitys technology, AI Center of Excellence and investment teams
Certifications:
Category:
Business Analytics and Insights

Company Overview


At Fidelity, we are focused on making our financial expertise broadly accessible and effective in helping people live the lives they want. We are a privately held company that places a high degree of value in creating and nurturing a work environment that attracts the best talent and reflects our commitment to our associates. We are proud of our diverse and inclusive workplace where we respect and value our associates for their unique perspectives and experiences. For information about working at Fidelity, visit FidelityCareers.com.

Fidelity Investments is an equal opportunity employer.",4.0,Fidelity Investments,"Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,74,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.0,MA,4574,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,1,0,0
1417,417,Senior Data Scientist,$54k-$98k,"About Fracta

Fracta.ai uses machine learning and big data to optimize infrastructure investments – starting with water pipe network replacement solutions for water utilities worldwide. Our mission is to help utilities manage and conserve resources through the creation of intelligent infrastructure. Fracta gives utility companies the most comprehensive view of conditions, allowing them to optimize replacement decisions and reduce costs by as much as 40 percent.

About the Role

We are looking for a results-driven, motivated Senior Data Scientist who is passionate about creating world-class machine learning models and predictions. This is a very senior role which will allow you to test innovative techniques and models to improve the accuracy of our core algorithm and create a huge impact at the company. It is a role which requires creativity and a keen ability to solve difficult data problems. We take personal development seriously, so all members of the data science team receive mentoring and opportunities to grow in their careers.

Required Qualifications
Strong knowledge and experience in implementing machine learning in real-world applications – minimum 3 years of experience. Experience with structured data.
Knowledge and ability to deal with challenging data problems such as data mining, feature definition and ML-based data cleaning.
Demonstrated ability to work with highly imbalanced data sets
Experience working with data in a cloud-based application (AWS, GCP, Azure)
Knowledge of Python required, PyTorch and SQL (BigQuery) preferred
Team player: able to solve problems as part of a team and coach junior engineers
Desire and ability to work in a fast-paced, results-oriented start-up
Position is based downtown Redwood City, CA, right by the Caltrain station. We will consider exceptional candidates in other locations for remote work.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Location:
Redwood City, CA 94063 (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Company's website:
Fracta
Company's Facebook page:
Fracta
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.3,Fracta,"Redwood City, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.0,CA,2343,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
1421,421,Data Engineer,$54k-$98k,"Click ""Apply for this Job"" below to submit your application. After doing so, please take our 4-minute web analytics assessment followed by a 15-minute aptitude test by clicking the following link:

Start Assessment

Who We Are:

2-time winner of Crain's 100 Best Places to Work, Direct Agents is a data-driven digital marketing agency with offices in NY and LA.

Established in 2003, we are an independent company, and our business has been built on adapting and driving change since the very beginning. Fueled by the grit and hustle of our diverse team, we’re inspired by experimentation and seek to push the boundaries on innovative approaches to advertising. Our teams are committed to growing and innovating alongside clients like Colgate, Walker & Co., Belkin, The CW, Wacoal, and more.

Together, we think differently and we continue to shape the digital space into the future…

We are the Shapers of the Digital World. Join us and become a shaper of change!

As a Data Engineer, you will create tangible value by helping to develop innovative data and tech systems for current and future clients. The work you do directly contributes to our ability to improve holistic business and marketing strategies aimed to meet and exceed client expectations.

You will have the opportunity to work on leading-edge AI/ML, data automation, and predictive analytics projects including: bidding algorithms, image recognition, attribution modeling, performance forecasting, propensity scoring, and much more. The position requires fostering close working relationships with internal marketing teams as well as clients.

What You’ll Do:
Create automated data systems using APIs, Selenium, web scrapers, etc.
Set up and maintain database ecosystems
Build advanced data models to provide granular and predictive insights
Develop AI systems to perform advanced operations based upon data inputs
Visualize data in an easily digestible format
Supplying internal teams with datasets to be used for strategic optimizations
Maintain data integrity and work with teams to troubleshoot discrepancies
Stay abreast of latest industry topics, trends, news, methodologies, and tools
What You’ll Need:
Bachelor's or Master’s Degree in Mathematics/Computer Science/Engineering/Finance or related field
Advanced Python skillset
Strong Statistical and/or Machine Learning background
Strong knowledge of database structures and SQL
Excellent quantitative skills and attention to detail
Experience using Power BI data visualization software is a plus
Highly motivated to identify and develop solutions to complex problems
Strong time management skills – ability to prioritize and meet deadlines
Diligent work ethic. Must be self-motivated and able to take the initiative to get the job done
Digital Marketing experience is preferred but definitely not required
What You’ll Get:
Competitive pay & health benefits.
Weekly social, wellness, and team building events
Access to health benefits and many other perks like One Medical
An amazing values based company culture ripe with collaboration, encouragement and camaraderie
Monthly education and training in digital advertising
Access to the best in class marketing technology and methodology
Ability to innovate and make an impact with your ideas in real-time
A fast tracked path to growth based on what you put into the role and your passion for learning in the company
Check out our Culture Videos:

Welcome to Direct Agents: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=EC-LBxTw0To

DA 2019 Culture in Review: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rP12YTMF4Dg",4.4,Direct Agents,"Culver City, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,17,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.0,CA,3563,0,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
1424,424,Data Scientist (Personal Valuation Team),$54k-$98k,"Company Description

Positioned at Publicis Groupe's core, Conversant is a marketing tech platform that helps brands transform ordinary customer experiences into meaningful, human experiences. The Conversant platform powers a connected suite of products and services called Epsilon PeopleCloud, combining leading-edge identity management, industrial-strength data and technology expertise with big brand acumen gained over five decades of working with the industry’s top brands. Our human-powered, data-led marketing delivers unmatched depth, breadth and scale to help brands create exceptional business outcomes. For more information, visit www.epsilon.com. Follow us on Twitter at @EpsilonMktg.

Job Description

External Title: Data Scientist
Internal Title: Decision Science, Scientist

As a Data Scientist in our Decision Sciences R&D organization, yyou will be responsible for researching and building machine learning, natural language processing, and recommender system applications to extend Epsilon CORE Personalization Platform. Epsilon CORE Personalization Platform analyzes anonymized data at Internet scale and evaluates more than one trillion advertising opportunities per month in real-time. You will work on real-world problems as part of our highly collaborative R&D team, and your solutions will directly and rapidly impact our business. This includes analyzing raw source data and derived data, researching and developing models, algorithms, and applications, building tools and analyses for new and existing products and presenting findings.

RESPONSIBILITIES

Develop an understanding of Epsilon CORE Personalization Platform and proprietary datasets
Use your machine learning expertise to research and recommend the best approaches to solving our technology and business problems
Design, implement, and validate your solutions in Apache Spark and Apache Hive using Scala or Python on large state-of-the-art computing clusters.
Work with our Engineering teams to integrate your solutions into Epsilon’s CORE Personalization Platform
Participate fully in our collaborative approach to research and applications projects

Qualifications

A Ph.D. in Computer Science, Operations Research, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, Mathematics, Physics, Economics, or related scientific discipline
Research experience and coursework in Optimization, Control Theory, Machine Learning, or Simulation
Experience with distributed computing, such as Hadoop, Spark, or related technologies
Familiarity with Scala, Python, SQL, or Java
Strong understanding of modeling and statistical techniques
Desire to work in a highly collaborative environment

ADDITIONAL USEFUL BUT NOT REQUIRED SKILLS

Experience with Recommender Systems, Natural Language Processing, Information Retrieval, Mathematical Optimization, Control Theory, Time-Series Analysis

Additional Information

Great People, Deserve Great Benefits
We know that we have some of the brightest and most talented associates in the world, and we believe in rewarding them accordingly. If you work here, expect competitive pay, comprehensive health coverage, and endless opportunities to advance your career.

Epsilon is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Epsilon’s policy is not to discriminate against any applicant or employee based on actual or perceived race, age, sex or gender (including pregnancy), marital status, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, mental or physical disability, religion, creed, color, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression (including transgender status), veteran status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law. Epsilon also prohibits harassment of applicants and employees based on any of these protected categories.

Epsilon will provide accommodations to applicants needing accommodations to complete the application process.

#LI-AL1

REF17386U",3.3,Epsilon,"Chicago, IL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,51,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.0,IL,3916,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1425,425,Data Science All Star Program - Marketing Analytics Track,$54k-$98k,"Data Science All Star Program - Marketing Analytics Track

Job Title

Data Science All Star Program - Marketing Analytics Track

Job
ID

27345478

Duration

Location

Columbia,

MD

Other Location

Description

BLEND360 is a multi-award winning Marketing Company who is privileged to provide our services to some of the most respected and recognized brands in the world. At BLEND360 it is all about advancing our clients marketing capabilities and performance.

Our All Stars Program is a 6-month consultant training program for master’s graduates in Analytics, Statistics, and other quantitative programs. Participants will have the opportunity to learn from top Data Scientists, work on real-world analytics projects, and gain experience with Fortune 500 clients across a variety of verticals.

The primary objective of this program is to develop participants into productive, client engaged BLEND360 employees and set the foundation to build a fast track career in one of 4 areas:

Data Science

Data Engineering

Marketing- Adobe Cloud

Marketing Analytics .

The All-Star focused on Marketing Analytics will:

* Work with client to translate Marketing strategy to specific analyses and resulting recommendations

* Work within a fast-paced, action-oriented environment

* Conduct analyses to support the business, across one or more areas of insight

* Present analysis findings and insights to the client Marketing organization

* Develop dashboard reports in Tableau to support the broader set of Marketing stakeholders

* Work with Decisioning platform and enterprise data in an EDW / Analytics Sandbox environment

* Collaborate with data team to configure fact tables that support the broader analytics team

* Collaborate and support other team members with data preparation, vestigation, methodology and development

* Work directly with the client to understand business goals, methodology considerations and timing for analysis and reporting work

Skills:
MS in Markeing Analytics, Business Analytics, or other quantitative field with some experience in Marketing

* Independent thinker, prepared to provide situational analysis and recommendations for moving things forward

* Ability to evaluate customer requirements and modify analyses and deliverables accordingly

* Ability to work closely with colleagues and client teams towards building a collective body of decisioning insights

* Strong knowledge of accessing and analyzing data in a data warehouse environment

* Ability to investigate data (vetting, anomaly detection and resolution, etc.)

* Experience in marketing analytics (CRM/Digital experience a plus)

* Ability to craft data stories through visualizations and derive insights from data

* Strong skills in Excel and data visualization e.g., Tableau, Power BI",4.5,Blend360,"Columbia, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,18,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.0,MD,2794,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
1429,429,Data Scientist/Machine Learning Expert,$54k-$98k,"26-Aug-2020

Job ID
301660BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""ONE Global Discovery Chemistry Community working across 7 disease areas at the Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research (NIBR) is seeking a hardworking and motivated Data Scientist to join our Computer-Aided Drug Discovery (CADD) Department in Cambridge, MA. The successful candidate will join an energizing and collaborative research organization, working alongside colleagues who are dedicated to improving human health through the discovery of transformative medicines.

We are seeking an outstanding data scientist with the skills, experience and passion to extract new knowledge and ground-breaking insights from the expanded body of data collected by one of the world’s leading pharmaceutical companies. You will be a member of our global CADD group, an interdisciplinary team of expert molecular modelers, cheminformaticians, and data scientists. Teamed up with domain specialists from biology, chemistry and translational medicine, this is a unique opportunity to develop and apply cutting-edge machine learning technologies to uncover insights to real-world drug discovery problems and innovate paths to transformative medicines.

What you'll do:
Develop and implement approaches for extracting patterns and correlations from both internal and external data sources using machine learning toolkits
Develop workflows for conducting comparative analysis among Novartis’ diverse data sources as well as generalizing approaches crafted in-house or externally.
Enable open-source solutions for internal use and implement cutting-edge published scientific methods.
Develop customized machine learning solutions including data querying and knowledge extraction.
Interact and be part of matrixed project teams to drive effective decision-making by mining and developing predictive models
Develop skills in the area of cheminformatics and drug discovery and improve those to accelerate development of novel machine learning algorithms
Know the latest breakthroughs in scientific literature and interact with scientists to integrate data science technologies
Posting Title
Data Scientist/Machine Learning Expert",4.0,Novartis,"Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,24,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.0,MA,2191,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1430,430,Senior Data Scientist,$54k-$98k,"Design, implement and optimize algorithms for unsupervised and supervised learning based on structured and unstructured data. Develop powerful business insights from social, marketing, industrial data and public policy using advanced machine learning techniques. Work closely with the software engineering team to productize analytic software. Collaborate with system integration and data warehouse engineers on data extraction and data cleaning. Work in a highly interactive, team-oriented environment. Requires a bachelor's degree in a STEM or related field and 5 years of experience, or a Master's degree in same with 3 years, or a PhD.",4.5,Envision LLC,"Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,26,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.0,MO,639,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
1431,431,"Sr Principal Data Engineer - Secureworks - Austin, TX; Atlanta, GA; or US Remote",$54k-$98k,"About Secureworks

Secureworks® (NASDAQ: SCWX) a global cybersecurity leader, enables our customers and partners to outpace and outmaneuver adversaries with more precision, so they can rapidly adapt and respond to market forces to meet their business needs. With a unique combination of cloud-native, SaaS security platform and intelligence-driven security solutions, informed by 20+ years of threat intelligence and research, no other security platform is grounded and informed with this much real-world experience. www.secureworks.com

We enjoy competitive compensation and benefits packages, and reward and recognize our employees for exceptional results. A constant focus on continued learning and growth keeps our team members engaged and excited about “what’s next.” We offer flexible work options when available, and emphasize the importance of work-life balance. We know that when our people are rewarded, recognized, and rejuvenated, we win as a team.

Role Overview


We are looking for a detail-oriented, talented, and enthusiastic data engineer to work in a fast-paced, startup-like environment with a seasoned cross-functional team of Security Experts, Data Scientists, and Machine Learning Engineers to advance the state-of-the-art in network defense. If you love the challenges that come with big data then this role is for you. Duties include large-scale data routing, modeling, extraction, transformation, loading, warehousing, and composing such systems together with support for monitoring and mediation logic. You will use the latest big data platforms and technologies (e.g. NiFi, Spark, Kafka, NoSQL, Docker, Kubernetes, AWS/GCP) to help federate algorithms and applications across many clouds as part of the next generation Secureworks platform.

The ideal candidate will have a software development background with an emphasis on distributed systems and some familiarity with data science or machine learning, though personal expertise is not required. This role requires a data engineer that can take architectures from concept to reality and work well within a collaborative environment. If you’re an engineer with experience solving big data problems, you might have what it takes to become an elite member of our team and help us innovate faster than the bad guys.

Key Responsibilities
Design, build, launch, and maintain infrastructure to support large-scale data routing, streaming and historical processing, data warehousing, and container orchestration.
Employ a variety of languages and tools to marry big data systems together and hunt down opportunities to acquire new data from other systems.
Recommend and implement ways to improve data reliability, efficiency, and quality.
Collaborate with data scientists and security researchers to productize new methods of extracting information from structured and unstructured data.
Work effectively on a geographically distributed team to deliver high quality software against aggressive schedules.
Minimum Requirements
Minimum of 6 years of experience in data engineering, data modeling, ETL development, or data warehousing.
Minimum of 2 years of experience of software engineering in Scala.
Minimum of 2 years of experience with scripting languages like Python, Ruby, Perl, Bash, etc.
Minimum of 3 years of experience with big data platforms (e.g. Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, HBase, etc)
Preferred Experience
Experience with Amazon AWS, Google GCP, or similar cloud provider.
Experience working with containers and container orchestration solutions such as Docker, Kubernetes, Mesos, etc.
Experience with stream-processing systems, such as NiFi/StreamSets, Kafka, Storm/Heron, Spark, or Flink.
Experience with distributed NoSQL databases, such as HBase, Cassandra, or Accumulo.
Secureworks (A Dell Technologies Company) is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Secureworks are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, physical, mental or sensory disability, HIV status, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, family medical history or genetic information, family or parental status, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Secureworks will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. Learn more about Diversity and Inclusion at Secureworks here.",3.8,Secureworks,"Atlanta, GA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,21,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.0,GA,4721,1,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1432,432,Data Engineer,$54k-$98k,"StarsHR has the following contract opportunity available with our client in St. Louis.

Data Engineer

Required
5 years or more experience in Java, Scala or Python.
Ability to perform complex data analysis with large volumes of data.
Experience with stream processing, e.g. Kafka, Spark Streaming, Akka, Flink, etc..
Expert level proficiency in SQL.
Experience data modeling for large scale databases, either relational or NoSQL (graph, key:value, document, etc.) • 5+ years experience with developing ETL/Data Pipeline solutions.
Proven experience (2 years) with distributed systems, e.g. Mesos, Kubernetes, Spark, Hadoop, distributed databases, grid computing
Desired:
Experience developing and utilizing Data Lakes.
Experience with data privacy concerns
Ability to build and maintain modern cloud architecture, e.g. AWS, Google Cloud, etc.
Experience contributing to open source projects
• Knowledge of data science practices, to better steer our efforts to support them through the infrastructure we create",4.6,StarsHR,"Saint Louis, MO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,13,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.0,MO,1010,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
1434,434,Data Scientist 3 (844),$54k-$98k,"Amyris has developed a high-throughput genetic engineering platform for designing and building custom microbes to serve as living factories. Using an industrial scale fermentation process, our microbes convert cheap sugars into a wide variety of high-value target molecules. Our end products directly impact millions of lives. We are pragmatic idealists seeking a profitable way to make the world a better place. We are convinced synthetic biology is here to stay and will have a major positive impact on our planet and everyday life.
Within Amyris R&D, we are searching for a highly energetic, curious, and self-motivated data scientist with a strong background in statistics, computing and biology to join our Data Science and Computing team. Research at Amyris is a highly multidisciplinary effort that needs brilliant contributions from life sciences and engineering disciplines in order to take projects from concept to market. From hacking directly on DNA in the lab to full scale factory production, every aspect of our work is facilitated and accelerated by quantitative science and software & hardware automation. The Data Science and Computing team works hand-in-hand with bench scientists and builds tools that enable genome engineering, protein engineering, metabolic modeling, omics experiment analysis, statistical design of experiments and machine learning models in pursuit of making better microbial strains or fermentation processes. In short, we help accelerate the design-build-test-analyze cycle in synthetic biology.
Key Responsibilities:
Iteratively develop computational algorithms, analyses, visualization tools and machine learning models to meet evolving scientific needs and to aid rapid data-driven decision making while working with a variety of data types including: genotype (NGS), phenotype (metabolomics, proteomics, GC/MS, spectroscopy, fermentation), material flow
Build version-controlled, computational workflows to analyze and model rich, high-throughput phenotype data
Interact closely with a cross-disciplinary teams of biology, analytical chemistry, and fermentation scientists to build data science products

Required Qualifications:
Degree in quantitative discipline such as computer science, mathematics, computational biology, electrical engineering, bioengineering or equivalent.
Ph.D. plus 1-3 years experience, or M.S. plus 3-6 years experience.
Experience in analyzing & visualizing large scientific datasets representing biological & chemical phenotypes
Intermediate (undergraduate level) understanding of biology topics including: genetics, cell physiology, biochemistry, evolution
Experience with programming best practices (unit testing, CI/CD, etc) and version control while contributing to or maintaining large codebases
Expertise with scripting programming languages (Python is preferred)
Hands-on experience with machine learning frameworks and concepts
Outstanding communication and interpersonal skills
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced and intellectually rigorous environment
Creativity, independent thinking, and passion
Preferred Qualifications:
Background in mass spectrometry informatics, high throughput sequencing, spectrophotometry, or industrial fermentation
Experience in a microbiology or synthetic biology setting
#LI-DJ1

Amyris, a leader in industrial synthetic biology, uses its innovative bioscience solutions to achieve renewable products by converting plant sugars into hydrocarbon molecules. Amyris’ molecules are used in wide range of specialty & performance chemicals, flavors & fragrances and in applications ranging from cosmetics to biofuels. Learn more at www.amyris.com.

Under the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”), Amyris is required to inform California residents who are our job applicants (“Applicants”) about the personal information we collect about you when you apply to a job on this site.

As an Applicant, you have the right to know and understand the categories of personal information we collect about you, and the purposes for which the categories of personal information shall be used, pursuant to the CCPA.

By clicking the “APPLY FOR THIS JOB” button below and submitting your job application, you agree you have reviewed the complete Privacy Notice for Employees, Independent Contractors and Job Applicants.

If you have any questions regarding this information, please contact Amyris at privacy@amyris.com

As a VEVRAA Federal Contractor, Amyris is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Amyris complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment.

If you are a recruiter or placement agency, please do not submit resumes to any person or email address at Amyris, Inc. prior to having a signed agreement. Amyris is not liable for and will not pay placement fees for candidates submitted by any agency other than its approved recruitment partners. Furthermore, any resumes sent to us without an agreement in place will be considered your company’s gift to Amyris and may be forwarded to our recruiters for their attention.",3.6,Amyris,"Emeryville, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,17,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.0,CA,5330,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,1,0
1435,435,Data Scientist active TS/SCI,$54k-$98k,"We are currently seeking an innovative, experienced, and highly-skilled Data Scientist to join our growing Advanced Analytics team in Ft. Belvoir, VA. In this role, you will create and develop custom solutions for our users in a collaborative, fast-paced, state-of-the art environment. To be successful in this role, you will be thorough, creative, and exceptionally well-skilled in all phases of the development lifecycle, with a passion for continued learning and collaboration.
*This position is located in Ft. Belvoir, VA and requires an active TS/SCI clearance*

The Data Scientist will:
Demonstrate the ability to frame and scale data problems to analyze, visualize, and find data solutions.
Manipulate common data formats, including comma-delimited, text files, and JSON.
Transform data and analysis into informative visualizations and interactive dashboards using open-source and commercially available tools.
Derive insights and analytic narratives from data and visualizations for effective storytelling and clear communication in response to client research questions.
Establish data science pipelines.
Develop, train, test, deploy, and sustain AI and machine learning models.
Leverage data patterns and other development methods to optimize code and reduce computational cost.
Develop front-end interfaces to facilitate usage of developed AI/ML solutions
Work in a fast-paced, solutions-oriented environment focused on client deliverables, analysis, and reporting.

Active TS/SCI clearance
Bachelor’s degree in data science, mathematics, statistics, economics, computer science, engineering, or a related business or quantitative discipline strongly preferred. Master's degree in these disciplines preferred.
Experience working with Scala, Python, Java
5-10+ years of related experience required
Advanced data science experience required
Significant experience with databases
Experience and familiarity with Agile-Scrum software development
Experience gathering and decomposing requirements
Proven record of solution development and deployment
Familiarity with web based application development
Experience with testing, use case, and user stories
Outstanding communication skills, written and verbal
Highly-organized and able to manage multiple projects simultaneously
Team-player mentality with a positive attitude
Keen attention to detail and solid analytical skills
Able to articulate complex, abstract concepts concisely and effectively
#LI-SH1

LMI is an Equal Opportunity Employer-all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",4.2,LMI,"Fort Belvoir, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,59,Nonprofit Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.0,VA,2668,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
1438,438,Data Science & Analytics Manager,$54k-$98k,"If you ever wanted to be on the ground floor of a well-funded, rapidly growing Series C start-up that is disrupting a 5.7Tn market, now is the time to join Takeoff Technologies! We are a 250 person global company transforming online grocery for consumers & retailers. Takeoff's solution offers automated fullfillment coupled with an end-to-end e-Grocery technology stack, enabling retailers to offer their shoppers the assortment and low prices of stores, with convenient mobile ordering and same day pickup or delivery.

Our eGrocery solution was created with the grocer and the shopper in mind. Grocery is an incredibly complex industry, and our products are unlike any other: they are low value, perishable, heavy, and low-margin. Our automated solution is flexible enough to manage these complexities allowing us to ensure the correct picking method for the correct product!

Excited about potentially joining this rocketship to help us bridge the gap between retail and technology? Looking to make an impact daily and help us disrupt a hundred year old industry? If so, continue reading!

Data Science and Analytics Manager (Takeoff Technologies, Inc.; Waltham, Massachusetts): Takeoff provides automated fulfillment coupled with an end-to-end eGrocery solution. The Data Science and Analytics Manager is responsible for leading a team of data scientists, data engineers and data analysts to:
(a) Produce models that can be scaled by the software development teams which enable self-serve analytical capabilities. Will also unlock value from data using Data Science techniques including Machine Learning, Deep Learning and Natural Language Processing to help guide the business – everything from tactical optimizations to broad level strategic direction that is grounded in data evidence and heavy analytical rigor.
(b) Design, build and own the big data infrastructure, data pipeline and analytics platform including Data Lake, Data Warehouse and Business Intelligence (BI) tools. Will also build stable, automated and scalable solutions to make data available, accessible and usable by all teams in the company in order to help drive the direction of products.

Specific responsibilities will include:
· Responsible for defining the team’s roadmap and executing against it in close collaboration with Engineering, Operation, and Product Managers. Own the full Data Science life-cycle from initial conception to prototyping, testing, deploying, scaling and measuring its overall business value.
· Define, build and develop high-performing teams of experienced data scientists and data analysts to deliver world-class products. Coach and continuously drive them to achieve higher level of excellence.
· Work and deliver end-to-end projects independently including ability to lead teams to quickly adapt to changing priorities and generate innovative solutions in an extremely fast-paced environment.
· Build and evolve models in a test and learn fashion within an Agile environment.
· Proactively drive the vision for Data Warehousing and BI across a product vertical and define and execute on a plan to achieve that vision. Responsible for Strategic Data Warehouse Initiative. Work closely with all business units to develop long term data platform architecture including plan, budget, and execution.
· Manage the teams that own the complete data pipeline, from data warehouse import all the way through to end-user BI tools. Work with the Integration team to ensure required data is staged via ETL (extract, transform, load) jobs in a way that makes it usable to influence business decisions.
· Be a thought leader on data systems, data mining and analysis to scale our capabilities, uncover trends, and develop insights.
· Ensure and continuously improve data integrity, data accuracy, and data quality.
· Get hands-on with large disparate datasets, hack through complex and messy data, and analyze it leveraging the latest algorithms and state-of-the-art techniques and tools. Translate vast amounts of data in raw formats (both structured and unstructured data) into digestible information for stakeholders to use for actionable strategies.
· Oversee the building and maintaining of reports, dashboards, and metrics to monitor the performance of our products.
· Work with executives and stakeholders throughout the organization to identify opportunities for leveraging company data to drive business solutions and help determine the strategic direction of the company. Size opportunities to ensure product teams are prioritizing the most impactful work.
· Partner with Product and Engineering teams to solve problems. Increase adoption of data products across business partners, to drive real business value.
· Responsible for prototype solutions, mathematical models, algorithms, machine learning techniques, and robust analytics to provide insights and development of data products.
· Lead a team that applies state of the art Machine Learning, Deep Learning and Natural Language Processing techniques to understand and transform how users interact with our core products.
· Oversee the algorithm development process, focusing on fast model iteration and testing to measure and evaluate success. Implement Machine Learning and Deep Learning models into production by collaborating with Product and Engineering teams.
· Develop standardized code and processes that can be easily used by the larger team.
· Inform, influence, support, and execute our product decisions.
· Research new technologies and methods across data science, data engineering, and data visualization to improve the technical capabilities of the team.
· Communicate research, findings and model results clearly and effectively to a wide audience of relevant partners, and build meaningful presentations and analyses that tell a story.
· Prepare client facing material including PowerPoint slides and charts, distilling analytical insights effectively into stories for clients.
Minimum Requirements: Master’s degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics, Physics, Operations Research, or another highly quantitative or STEM field and 5 years of hands-on technical experience in a data science role with extensive experience in creating long-term data science strategy and executing through roadmap implementation.
Must also have: (I) 5 years of experience must include: a. 2 years of experience in building, leading, and managing a team of data scientists, data engineers and data analysts, b. 3 years of experience with Natural Language Processing techniques (including text wrangling, pre-processing, parsing, embedding, n-grams), and Machine Learning (including classifiers, clustering, time series, ANN, CNN, RNN, LSTM); (II) Demonstrated in depth experience: a. with Python and R and demonstrated comfort developing code in a team environment (including git, notebooks, and testing), b. with data modeling and data warehousing in SQL-based languages in a fast-paced business environment with large-scale and complex datasets, and c. with data visualization tools including Tableau, Spotfire, and Looker for full-stack data analysis, insight synthesis and presentation; (III) Demonstrated familiarity with the ipython notebook, Numpy, Pandas, Sklearn and NLTK; (IV) Strong proficiency with at least one common Deep Learning framework including TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch, or MXNet; (V) Excellent communication, social and presentation skills with meticulous attention to detail; (VI) Track record of initiating and managing cross-functional and cross-organizational projects, building relationships with stakeholders, and influencing decision makers; (VII) Track record applying an analytical, creative and innovative approach to solving difficult problems; (VIII) Demonstrated ability to thrive in a dynamic environment where there can be degrees of ambiguity; (IX) Strong track record of communicating and partnering with senior stakeholders to deliver scalable global solutions; (X) Demonstrated expertise in: a. demand forecast using Time Series models such as SARIMAX, ETS, TBATS, GRU, or LSTM, b. classification models using Machine Learning/Deep Learning on highly imbalanced datasets, c. Natural Language Processing and Deep Learning models for language understanding tasks such as Named Entity Recognition, Text Matching, or Topic Modeling; and d. Extract, transform, load (ETL), Data Assessment, Data Mapping and Transformation, Master Data Management; and (XI) Track record of recruiting talent in analytics, data science and data engineer.
Apply online at https://jobs.lever.co/takeoff. An EOE.
Some of the ways we are addressing Covid-19:

While Covid-19 has posed it’s fair share of challenges, we have tackled these head on, while continuing to ensure that the health and safety of our employees and clients remain top priorities. We certainly believe that building a successful company starts with the people, and while the chance to meet and collaborate face to face in an office setting is vital to our growth and company culture, the health and safety of the Takeoff team is the most important right now. To that end, we are embracing a “work remote first” company policy, however the expectation is that you are based in the Greater Boston / MA area to ensure time zones are aligned with the rest of the Takeoff team based on the east coast.

Whether it be a Cultural Brunch & Learn, a Rocketberry Mini-Series showcasing some of our teams dynamic and hidden talents, or a weekly “coffee chat” to catch up with your fellow colleagues, we are finding creative ways to stay connected and engaged with each other during these challenging times.

Lastly along with our robust and competitive benefits package that we offer(above), we are excited to roll out two new benefits; a “remote work allowance” as well as a “remote office setup reimbursement”. These benefits will be effective immediately upon hire date geared towards ensuring that our employees are continuously set up for success while working remotely!

Equal Opportunity Employer

Our culture revolves around our core values of respect, initiative, collaboration, adaptability and diversity. As people, we value hard work, but we balance it with socializing as a team, respecting our time outside of work, and appreciating our coworkers’ unique walks of life.

Takeoff is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. Learn more at www.takeoff.com. We believe that diversity is critical to the growth of our company; we foster an environment where everyone has a voice and views the Takeoff team as their second family.",4.2,Takeoff Technologies,"Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,4,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.0,MA,10739,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,1
1439,439,Big Data Engineer,$54k-$98k,"NO AGENCIES*
Big Data Lead Developer*
Our growing organization is seeking a skilled professional to serve as an internal resource for our specialized focus in the field of Big Data/Hadoop Development. We provide Fortune 500 clients throughout the United States with IT consultants in a wide-ranging technical sphere.

In order to fully maintain our incoming nationwide and international hires, we will be hiring a *Big Data Lead Developer* for our Atlanta, GA (US) headquarters to coach/mentor our incoming classes of consultants. If you have a strong passion for the various Big Data platforms and are looking to join a seasoned team of IT professionals, this could be an advantageous next step.

This is a full-time internal position that *requires relocation* to Atlanta. No travel required after relocation. The Big Data/Hadoop SME will take on the following responsibilities:
Interviewing potential consultants to ensure all onboarding employees will be successful in Big Data domains prior to each onboarding
The design, development and maintenance of our best-in-class Big Data/Hadoop development training materials
Training, guiding and mentoring junior to mid-level developers
Preparing mock interview situations to enhance the esteemed learning process provided by the company
Acting as a primary resource for individuals working on a variety of projects throughout the US
Interacting with our Executive and Sales team to ensure that projects and employees are appropriately matched
Prepping consultants for interviews for specific assignments involving development and implementation of Hadoop and other environments
The ideal candidate will not only possess a solid knowledge of Big Data infrastructures, but must also have a fluency in the following areas (allowing for fluid interactions with other team members scattered across the entry to senior level spectrum):
Hadoop development and implementation
Strong in Object Oriented Development in Scala/Java platform
Hands on experience in big data technologies including Scala or Spark, Hadoop, Hive, HDFS.
Strong SQL skills and experience
Designing, building, installing, configuring and supporting Big Data Clusters Spark/Kafka
Translate complex functional and technical requirements into detail design Implementing ETL process for integration of data from disparate sources
Cloud Experience is a plus
Skills Include:
5+ Years of professional experience in the IT Industry
Bachelor’s Degree in the Computer Science field
Good knowledge in back-end programming, specifically Java/Scala
Good knowledge of database structures, theories, principles and practices
Analytical and problem-solving skills
Proven understanding with Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, Hive, and HBase
Good aptitude in multi-threading and concurrency concepts
Able to work in Atlanta, Georgia
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $90,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Big Data: 7 years (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",3.8,Enhance IT,"Charlotte, NC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.0,NC,3056,0,data engineer,0,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
1440,440,Staff BI and Data Engineer,$54k-$98k,"Job Description: Staff BI and Data Engineer
Location: San Jose, CA (or) New York, NY
Department: Data Engineering
Hours/Shift: Full Time
Reports To: VP, Data Engineering
Job Description:
Affinity Solutions is looking for a hands-on and self-driven Staff BI and Data Engineer, preferably with experience in the bank card loyalty/fin-tech/advertising/marketing space, to enhance and automate its data and analytics infrastructure to support its growing customer base and expanding partner ecosystem. The position is based in San Jose, CA., and reports into the Data Engineering division. The demand for advanced analytical solutions continues to grow exponentially, and this is your opportunity to grow with us in a fast-paced, collaborative environment.
The ideal candidate is a passionate and highly skilled individual, who can utilize programming and analytics tools such as SQL, Python, and Tableau to query and process large data sets to produce high quality customer facing data deliverables and insights. If you have experience designing and building business intelligence/analytics applications, especially around credit/debit card transactions, unified consumer behavioral and profile data, and excited about leveraging your experience to catapult a venture-backed company into hyper-growth, this job is for you.
Responsibilities:
Develop high quality analytical data assets with an eye towards process efficiency and automation through scripting. Experience in building data marts is a plus.
Build automated QA process to validate the quality of the data and report on data quality
Communicate and present data to both internal and external customers by developing reports/dashboards/charts using BI tools such as Tableau
Work closely with a dynamic and growing team of account managers, data engineers and data scientists to perform quantitative analysis of customer data, including gathering data requirements and validate data, applying judgement and statistical analysis to assist with planning and decision making.
Other responsibilities include but not limited to - data validation, troubleshooting issues, and process documentation.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science or related field such as Mathematics and Statistics, preferably with focus on Data Analytics.
At least 3 years of hands-on experience in designing and building data pipelines, analytical data applications and BI Reporting.
Proficient in SQL and Tableau, familiar with at least one coding language in Python/Shell scripting.
Experience in using Cloud based managed services and Big Data Environments for data warehousing/analytics is a big plus – e.g. Amazon RedShift, Google BigQuery, Spark, MapR etc.,
Very strong written and verbal communication skills; Ability to tell a story with the data
Analytical thinker, with an ability to evaluate multiple products/technologies to address various aspects of a big data platform.
Experience working on UNIX / Linux development and production environments
Experience working in Agile software development environments
Strong organization skills with attention to detail is a must.
Ability to manage multiple conflicting priorities, take proactive ownership of problems and outcomes, think outside the box
Knowledge of Retail and Financial verticals is useful but not required.",3.0,Affinity Solutions,"San Jose, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,22,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.0,CA,3333,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,1
1441,441,Machine Learning Engineer - Infrastructure,$54k-$98k,"#TeamNextdoor


Nextdoor is the neighborhood hub for trusted connections and the exchange of helpful information, goods, and services.

Building connections in the real world is a universal human need. That truth, and the reality that neighborhoods are one of the most important and useful communities in our lives have been guiding principles for Nextdoor. Today, neighbors rely on Nextdoor in neighborhoods around the world in the United States, the United Kingdom, Germany, France, the Netherlands, Italy, Spain, Sweden, Denmark, Australia and Canada, with many more to come.

Meet your Future Neighbors


At Nextdoor, machine learning is starting to transform our product through personalization, driving major impact across different parts of our platform including our newsfeed, our notifications, our advertising, and our local ecosystem. Our machine learning team is lean but hungry to drive even more impact and make Nextdoor the neighborhood hub for local exchange. We are scrappy and believe that ML will be an integral part of making Nextdoor valuable to our members. We also believe that ML should be ethical and encourage healthy habits and interaction. We are looking for great engineers who believe in the power of local community to empower our members to make their communities great places to live.

The Impact You'll Make


You will be part of a scrappy and impactful team building a scalable ML platform in a rapidly changing company. In this role, you will focus on developing the underlying data processing infrastructure to support the ML platform in collecting data, labeling data, and using data to monitor model performance. You will also build infrastructure to train, serve, and monitor ML models. Finally, you will be responsible for building platform-wide model features that the entire company can utilize in building ML models. As a result, you will be laying the foundation for a critical part of Nextdoor's mission.

What You'll Bring to The House
B.S. in Computer Science, Math, Statistics, or a related field.
5+ years of industry/academic experience building ML infrastructure at scale.
Proven engineering skills. Experience writing and maintaining high-quality production code.
Proficient in Python
Bonus Points
Experience using AWS to build data-intensive infrastructure: ECS, Kinesis, S3, Kafka, Spark, Druid, Flink
Experience building platforms around publically available ML platforms like Sagemaker, Kubeflow, MLflow, etc.
Experience serving models using a variety of ML model frameworks like Tensorflow, PyTorch, Sci-kit Learn, etc.
At Nextdoor, we empower our employees to build stronger local communities. To create a platform where all feel welcome, we want our workforce to reflect the diversity of the customers we seek to serve. We encourage everyone interested in our purpose to apply. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, gender, religion, sexual orientation, age, or any other trait that unfairly targets a group of people. In accordance with the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we always consider qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.",4.7,Nextdoor,"San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,10,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.0,CA,3121,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,0
1442,442,Sr. Data Science Manager (Advanced Analytics),$54k-$98k,"Role Information

Job Title: Sr. Manager - Management Accounting (Data Scientist) (Advanced Analytics)
Department: Management Accounting
Business Unit: Administration
Reports To: Director - Business Intelligence & Advanced Analytics
Supervisory Role: Yes
FLSA Status: Exempt

Job Summary

The Sr. Manager - Management Accounting (Data Scientist) (Advanced Analytics) provides support to executive management and operational departments by developing complex data products that are integrated into business processes and generate added business value. The role will include partnering with internal stakeholders across the business locally and internationally. The individual optimizes business processes through modern machine learning techniques and supervises integrating the developed models into productive software.

Essential Functions
Develop and supervise complex data products that are integrated into business processes and generate added business value.
Ownership of full lifecycle development from analyzing current processes, providing functional specification, designing and developing solution, testing and providing on-going support once live
Through modern machine learning techniques, optimization of business processes using predictive and prescriptive methods.
Lead the transfer from current Excel-based analysis tools to advanced analytics products
Cross-analyze data from different sources in order to create new insights to the business to solve real-world business problem
Support the departments concerning questions of advanced analytics and development of own proposals to move the company forward
Responsible to research other potential software solutions
Integrate the developed models into productive software.
Upskill colleagues by creating a culture of experience exchange with the aim of improving understanding and efficiency of the department’s processes and products
Train and guide the work of other team members, quality checks on work and ensuring deadlines are met
Cultivate a culture of learning and knowledge extension in the department to better understand the “why” behind tasks and therefore increase efficiency
Perform all other duties as assigned
Required

Required Knowledge, Skills, Abilities

Strong knowledge in big-data technologies
Strong knowledge of machine learning, optimization, and data mining methods (e.g. with Python, R)
Statistical knowledge, predictive modelling
Knowledge of applying time-series / regression analysis, clustering-methods, effectiveness testing (A-/B-hypotheses testing) to solve diverse business problems
Strong Ability to understand complex problems and scenarios, and analyzing them in detail
Ability to work to tight deadlines and to deliver accurate results
Excellent communication skills and ability to work well in a team
Self-motivated and proactive individual with a can-do attitude and the ability to work on projects and solve problems independently

Preferred Knowledge, Skills, Abilities

German language skills

Required Education, Certifications/ Licenses, Related Experience

Bachelor’s Degree in data science, mathematics/statistics, computer science, physics, or a related subject
5+ years of experience in related field in corresponding subjects or related fields

Physical Job Requirements

Ability to work a variety of shifts including nights, weekends, and holidays as needed
Ability to work in a fast-paced working environment, including the store(s), distribution center(s), warehouse(s), and/or corporate office(s) with the capability to switch job functions/roles quickly
Ability to remain in a stationary position (standing and/or seated) more than half the time
Ability to maneuver cases of product (lift, move, carry, slide, etc.) up to 30 lbs.
Ability to operate machinery and/or equipment that requires the constant use of hands/fingers/wrists
Ability to spend more than half the time viewing computer monitors
Ability to identify and distinguish between colors more than half the time

Travel Requirements

This position commutes between stores, regional offices and/or distribution centers less than 25% of the time
This position requires overnight domestic travel less than 25% of the time
This position requires overnight international travel less than 25% of the time
Anticipated travel will be by car, air, and/or train
Preferred

Lidl US, LLC & Affiliates provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants without regard to, including but not limited to, race, sex, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation or preference, gender identity or expression, national origin or ethnicity, age, marital status, pregnancy, genetic information, disability, or veteran status, in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.",3.4,Lidl US,"Arlington, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,26,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,76.0,VA,4777,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1443,443,Big Data Engineer,$105k-$124k,"NO AGENCIES*
Big Data Lead Developer*
Our growing organization is seeking a skilled professional to serve as an internal resource for our specialized focus in the field of Big Data/Hadoop Development. We provide Fortune 500 clients throughout the United States with IT consultants in a wide-ranging technical sphere.

In order to fully maintain our incoming nationwide and international hires, we will be hiring a *Big Data Lead Developer* for our Atlanta, GA (US) headquarters to coach/mentor our incoming classes of consultants. If you have a strong passion for the various Big Data platforms and are looking to join a seasoned team of IT professionals, this could be an advantageous next step.

This is a full-time internal position that *requires relocation* to Atlanta. No travel required after relocation. The Big Data/Hadoop SME will take on the following responsibilities:
Interviewing potential consultants to ensure all onboarding employees will be successful in Big Data domains prior to each onboarding
The design, development and maintenance of our best-in-class Big Data/Hadoop development training materials
Training, guiding and mentoring junior to mid-level developers
Preparing mock interview situations to enhance the esteemed learning process provided by the company
Acting as a primary resource for individuals working on a variety of projects throughout the US
Interacting with our Executive and Sales team to ensure that projects and employees are appropriately matched
Prepping consultants for interviews for specific assignments involving development and implementation of Hadoop and other environments
The ideal candidate will not only possess a solid knowledge of Big Data infrastructures, but must also have a fluency in the following areas (allowing for fluid interactions with other team members scattered across the entry to senior level spectrum):
Hadoop development and implementation
Strong in Object Oriented Development in Scala/Java platform
Hands on experience in big data technologies including Scala or Spark, Hadoop, Hive, HDFS.
Strong SQL skills and experience
Designing, building, installing, configuring and supporting Big Data Clusters Spark/Kafka
Translate complex functional and technical requirements into detail design Implementing ETL process for integration of data from disparate sources
Cloud Experience is a plus
Skills Include:
5+ Years of professional experience in the IT Industry
Bachelor’s Degree in the Computer Science field
Good knowledge in back-end programming, specifically Java/Scala
Good knowledge of database structures, theories, principles and practices
Analytical and problem-solving skills
Proven understanding with Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, Hive, and HBase
Good aptitude in multi-threading and concurrency concepts
Able to work in Atlanta, Georgia
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $90,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Big Data: 7 years (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",3.8,Enhance IT,"Charlotte, NC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,NC,3056,0,data engineer,0,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
1444,444,Staff BI and Data Engineer,$105k-$124k,"Job Description: Staff BI and Data Engineer
Location: San Jose, CA (or) New York, NY
Department: Data Engineering
Hours/Shift: Full Time
Reports To: VP, Data Engineering
Job Description:
Affinity Solutions is looking for a hands-on and self-driven Staff BI and Data Engineer, preferably with experience in the bank card loyalty/fin-tech/advertising/marketing space, to enhance and automate its data and analytics infrastructure to support its growing customer base and expanding partner ecosystem. The position is based in San Jose, CA., and reports into the Data Engineering division. The demand for advanced analytical solutions continues to grow exponentially, and this is your opportunity to grow with us in a fast-paced, collaborative environment.
The ideal candidate is a passionate and highly skilled individual, who can utilize programming and analytics tools such as SQL, Python, and Tableau to query and process large data sets to produce high quality customer facing data deliverables and insights. If you have experience designing and building business intelligence/analytics applications, especially around credit/debit card transactions, unified consumer behavioral and profile data, and excited about leveraging your experience to catapult a venture-backed company into hyper-growth, this job is for you.
Responsibilities:
Develop high quality analytical data assets with an eye towards process efficiency and automation through scripting. Experience in building data marts is a plus.
Build automated QA process to validate the quality of the data and report on data quality
Communicate and present data to both internal and external customers by developing reports/dashboards/charts using BI tools such as Tableau
Work closely with a dynamic and growing team of account managers, data engineers and data scientists to perform quantitative analysis of customer data, including gathering data requirements and validate data, applying judgement and statistical analysis to assist with planning and decision making.
Other responsibilities include but not limited to - data validation, troubleshooting issues, and process documentation.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science or related field such as Mathematics and Statistics, preferably with focus on Data Analytics.
At least 3 years of hands-on experience in designing and building data pipelines, analytical data applications and BI Reporting.
Proficient in SQL and Tableau, familiar with at least one coding language in Python/Shell scripting.
Experience in using Cloud based managed services and Big Data Environments for data warehousing/analytics is a big plus – e.g. Amazon RedShift, Google BigQuery, Spark, MapR etc.,
Very strong written and verbal communication skills; Ability to tell a story with the data
Analytical thinker, with an ability to evaluate multiple products/technologies to address various aspects of a big data platform.
Experience working on UNIX / Linux development and production environments
Experience working in Agile software development environments
Strong organization skills with attention to detail is a must.
Ability to manage multiple conflicting priorities, take proactive ownership of problems and outcomes, think outside the box
Knowledge of Retail and Financial verticals is useful but not required.",3.0,Affinity Solutions,"San Jose, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,22,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,3333,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,1
1445,445,Sr. Data Science Manager (Advanced Analytics),$105k-$124k,"Role Information

Job Title: Sr. Manager - Management Accounting (Data Scientist) (Advanced Analytics)
Department: Management Accounting
Business Unit: Administration
Reports To: Director - Business Intelligence & Advanced Analytics
Supervisory Role: Yes
FLSA Status: Exempt

Job Summary

The Sr. Manager - Management Accounting (Data Scientist) (Advanced Analytics) provides support to executive management and operational departments by developing complex data products that are integrated into business processes and generate added business value. The role will include partnering with internal stakeholders across the business locally and internationally. The individual optimizes business processes through modern machine learning techniques and supervises integrating the developed models into productive software.

Essential Functions
Develop and supervise complex data products that are integrated into business processes and generate added business value.
Ownership of full lifecycle development from analyzing current processes, providing functional specification, designing and developing solution, testing and providing on-going support once live
Through modern machine learning techniques, optimization of business processes using predictive and prescriptive methods.
Lead the transfer from current Excel-based analysis tools to advanced analytics products
Cross-analyze data from different sources in order to create new insights to the business to solve real-world business problem
Support the departments concerning questions of advanced analytics and development of own proposals to move the company forward
Responsible to research other potential software solutions
Integrate the developed models into productive software.
Upskill colleagues by creating a culture of experience exchange with the aim of improving understanding and efficiency of the department’s processes and products
Train and guide the work of other team members, quality checks on work and ensuring deadlines are met
Cultivate a culture of learning and knowledge extension in the department to better understand the “why” behind tasks and therefore increase efficiency
Perform all other duties as assigned
Required

Required Knowledge, Skills, Abilities

Strong knowledge in big-data technologies
Strong knowledge of machine learning, optimization, and data mining methods (e.g. with Python, R)
Statistical knowledge, predictive modelling
Knowledge of applying time-series / regression analysis, clustering-methods, effectiveness testing (A-/B-hypotheses testing) to solve diverse business problems
Strong Ability to understand complex problems and scenarios, and analyzing them in detail
Ability to work to tight deadlines and to deliver accurate results
Excellent communication skills and ability to work well in a team
Self-motivated and proactive individual with a can-do attitude and the ability to work on projects and solve problems independently

Preferred Knowledge, Skills, Abilities

German language skills

Required Education, Certifications/ Licenses, Related Experience

Bachelor’s Degree in data science, mathematics/statistics, computer science, physics, or a related subject
5+ years of experience in related field in corresponding subjects or related fields

Physical Job Requirements

Ability to work a variety of shifts including nights, weekends, and holidays as needed
Ability to work in a fast-paced working environment, including the store(s), distribution center(s), warehouse(s), and/or corporate office(s) with the capability to switch job functions/roles quickly
Ability to remain in a stationary position (standing and/or seated) more than half the time
Ability to maneuver cases of product (lift, move, carry, slide, etc.) up to 30 lbs.
Ability to operate machinery and/or equipment that requires the constant use of hands/fingers/wrists
Ability to spend more than half the time viewing computer monitors
Ability to identify and distinguish between colors more than half the time

Travel Requirements

This position commutes between stores, regional offices and/or distribution centers less than 25% of the time
This position requires overnight domestic travel less than 25% of the time
This position requires overnight international travel less than 25% of the time
Anticipated travel will be by car, air, and/or train
Preferred

Lidl US, LLC & Affiliates provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants without regard to, including but not limited to, race, sex, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation or preference, gender identity or expression, national origin or ethnicity, age, marital status, pregnancy, genetic information, disability, or veteran status, in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.",3.4,Lidl US,"Arlington, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,26,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,VA,4777,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1446,446,Machine Learning Engineer - Infrastructure,$105k-$124k,"#TeamNextdoor


Nextdoor is the neighborhood hub for trusted connections and the exchange of helpful information, goods, and services.

Building connections in the real world is a universal human need. That truth, and the reality that neighborhoods are one of the most important and useful communities in our lives have been guiding principles for Nextdoor. Today, neighbors rely on Nextdoor in neighborhoods around the world in the United States, the United Kingdom, Germany, France, the Netherlands, Italy, Spain, Sweden, Denmark, Australia and Canada, with many more to come.

Meet your Future Neighbors


At Nextdoor, machine learning is starting to transform our product through personalization, driving major impact across different parts of our platform including our newsfeed, our notifications, our advertising, and our local ecosystem. Our machine learning team is lean but hungry to drive even more impact and make Nextdoor the neighborhood hub for local exchange. We are scrappy and believe that ML will be an integral part of making Nextdoor valuable to our members. We also believe that ML should be ethical and encourage healthy habits and interaction. We are looking for great engineers who believe in the power of local community to empower our members to make their communities great places to live.

The Impact You'll Make


You will be part of a scrappy and impactful team building a scalable ML platform in a rapidly changing company. In this role, you will focus on developing the underlying data processing infrastructure to support the ML platform in collecting data, labeling data, and using data to monitor model performance. You will also build infrastructure to train, serve, and monitor ML models. Finally, you will be responsible for building platform-wide model features that the entire company can utilize in building ML models. As a result, you will be laying the foundation for a critical part of Nextdoor's mission.

What You'll Bring to The House
B.S. in Computer Science, Math, Statistics, or a related field.
5+ years of industry/academic experience building ML infrastructure at scale.
Proven engineering skills. Experience writing and maintaining high-quality production code.
Proficient in Python
Bonus Points
Experience using AWS to build data-intensive infrastructure: ECS, Kinesis, S3, Kafka, Spark, Druid, Flink
Experience building platforms around publically available ML platforms like Sagemaker, Kubeflow, MLflow, etc.
Experience serving models using a variety of ML model frameworks like Tensorflow, PyTorch, Sci-kit Learn, etc.
At Nextdoor, we empower our employees to build stronger local communities. To create a platform where all feel welcome, we want our workforce to reflect the diversity of the customers we seek to serve. We encourage everyone interested in our purpose to apply. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, gender, religion, sexual orientation, age, or any other trait that unfairly targets a group of people. In accordance with the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we always consider qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.",4.7,Nextdoor,"San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,10,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,3121,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,0
1450,450,Machine Learning Engineer,$105k-$124k,"At Sisu, we're building a software platform that empowers people to make better decisions using data. Based on years of cutting-edge research at Stanford, Sisu enables users to quickly and comprehensively understand what’s driving their key metrics, so they never miss a window of opportunity to act.

Sisu leverages the massive amounts of data available within private, first-party data warehouses, which capture a real-time, structured view of organizational behavior. By monitoring the performance of key metrics like revenue, retention, and churn, and their relationships to interactions between key factors like user demographics, campaigns, and acquisition channels, we can help users make better decisions. The key problem Sisu solves is to help identify what’s driving change among this enormous feature and hypothesis space. To do so, we combine statistical analysis and machine learning at scale to provide users personalized, real-time diagnoses of changes in their metrics via an explainable, interpretable user interface.

As a machine learning engineer, you’ll have the opportunity to shape the future of machine learning on massive, structured data. Much like public search engines rely on sophisticated models for ranking and relevance over unstructured text, machine learning is integral to Sisu’s value proposition of ranking and highlighting key drivers behind metrics derived from structured data. These results inform our users on how to take action as their businesses are changing.

You will be responsible for investigating and developing state-of-the-art algorithms in Sisu’s large-scale streaming structured data context. ML engineers at Sisu deliver their features end-to-end, from Jupyter notebook prototypes to production in Rust.
Responsibilities
Deliver state-of-the-art, scalable algorithms to production for forecasting time series, personalized ranking, robust statistical analysis of key customer business metrics
Build and maintain the infrastructure for data and model management
Work closely with the Sisu design and engineering teams for ML-adjacent components, such as viz and data processing
Give talks, write blog posts, and produce peer-reviewed publications
Preferred Qualifications
Either 4+ years of professional experience with ML or quantitative analysis, or Ph.D. in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, Mathematics, or Physics
Proficiency with Python and experience with data processing tools (e.g., scipy, numpy, pandas, Pytorch, and Spark)
Competency with forecasting deadlines, modular design, testing, code review, and working with new codebases
Strong technical communication skills
Please note that this is a full-time, non-remote role based in San Francisco.

Sisu is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.",4.0,Sisu Data,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,3065,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,0
1451,451,"Data Scientist, Senior",$105k-$124k,"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking a Data Scientist (Senior)) in the role of the Maritime Safety Office.This position is to provide both digital and hardcopy maritime products, services, and data to support worldwide Safety of Navigation. Without accurate and up-to-date nautical products, military platforms are at increased risk when they conduct operations, transport personnel and deliver material. The U.S. Navy has made it clear to NGA that it will continue to require both digital and hard copy maritime products for the foreseeable future. Services procured under this contract will primarily support the production and maintenance of Maritime GEOINT at NCE facilities.

Responsibilities include:
Strong data management skills, including SQL, NoSQL (MongoDB), and triplestore/graph
databases
Experience createing and managing ETL processes using Ni-Fi or similar software using both
structured and unstructured data
AWS experience, particularly with EC2, S3, Cloudwatch, RDS
Experience with data visualization tools
Experience with or working knowledge of ElasticSearch or similar
Perform ad-hoc analysis and present results in a clear manner
Conduct undirected research and frame open-ended industry / customer questions
Recommend cost-effective changes to existing procedures and strategies
Create / maintain tools to extract features from a variety of sources including raster to vector,
vector to vector, text to vector, and text to database.
Write / maintain Python Scripts in ARCGIS to improve efficiency of the production process.
Support Business Processing Re-Engineering
Perform Data Conversion/migration
Perform Business Analytics
Work with the Government on new production capabilities / services
Strong data management skills, including SQL, NoSQL (MongoDB), and RDF
(triplestore/graph) databases
Linux experience
Basic Qualifications:
Strong data management skills, including SQL, NoSQL (MongoDB), and triplestore/graph databases
Experience createing and managing ETL processes using Ni-Fi or similar software using both structured and
unstructured data
AWS experience, particularly with EC2, S3, Cloudwatch, RDS
Experience with data visualization tools
Experience with or working knowledge of ElasticSearch or similar
Perform ad-hoc analysis and present results in a clear manner
Desired Skills:
Experience with combining digital cartography, computer technology, GIS, cartographic and geospatial
production techniques, remote sensing, photogrammetry, and digital data formats.
Ability to clean / prune data to discard irrelevant information
Ability to examine data from a variety of angles to determine hidden value, weaknesses, trends, and / or
opportunities
Advanced knowledge of ESRI ArcGIS and ArcServer.

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.


Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality, and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.


Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,Novetta,"Fort Belvoir, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,8,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,VA,4486,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1454,454,Data Science All Star Program - Data Engineer Track,$105k-$124k,"Data Science All Star Program - Data Engineer Track

Job Title

Data Science All Star Program - Data Engineer Track

Job
ID

27260177

Duration

Location

Columbia,

MD

Other Location

Description

Dynamic, Fast-growing, Entrepreneurial Data Science Solutions Company seeking data Engineers! If you’ve got entrepreneurial spirit and passion, are driven by results, and want to be a part of significant growth, we’re looking for you!

BLEND360 is a multi-award winning Marketing Company who is privileged to provide our services to some of the most respected and recognized brands in the world. At BLEND360 it is all about advancing our clients marketing capabilities and performance.

If you are ready to ignite the fire for digital marketing and join our team, please keep reading!

*************************************************************************************

Our Data Science All Stars Program is a 6-month consultant training program for master’s graduates in Analytics, Statistics, Computer Science and other quantitative programs. Participants will have the opportunity to learn from top Data Scientists, work on real-world analytics projects, and gain experience with Fortune 500 clients across a variety of verticals. They will work alongside our Data Scientists to get data into proper shape, perform statistical analyses and develop predictive models to solve our clients’ business problems.

The primary objective of this program is to develop participants into productive, client engaged BLEND360 employees and set the foundation to build a fast track career in one of 4 areas:

Data Science

Data Engineering

Marketing- Adobe Cloud

Marketing Analytics .

The All-Star focused on Data Engineering will:
Work with business leaders to solve clients’ business challenges and improve clients’ business results using advanced analytics techniques. We contribute our Advanced Data Science subject matter expertise to the recommendations and solutions delivered to our clients.
Spend most of their time on getting data into proper shape, performing statistical analyses, developing predictive models and machine learning algorithms to solve clients’ business problems. We evaluate different sources of data, discover patterns hidden within raw data, create insightful variables, and develop competing models with different machine learning algorithms. We validate and cross validate our recommendations to make sure our recommendations will perform well over time.
Partner with client technical resources as well as BLEND360 team members, providing guidance and solutions for data architectures, data conversions, ETL and implementation of models in a production environment. The ideal candidate has retail experience and can provide technical expertise working with cloud based platforms as well as traditional data warehouse environments.
Main Responsibilities
Work with practice leaders and clients to understand how to make data accessible and usable throughout the organization.
Defines data environment design for the reporting and modeling/machine learning use cases that is consistent, maintainable and flexible.
Works with client and BLEND360 teams to identify use cases and functional requirements that drive the reporting and modeling data solutions.
Designs the database structure including tables, views, synonyms, sequences, triggers, procedures, functions, indexes and materialized views as relevant.
Provides the framework for integrating source systems with the reporting and modeling data environments – develops the ERD and data dictionaries
Implements business rules via stored procedures, middleware, or other technologies.
Develops strategies for flexibility and scalability, and defines the future technical architecture direction for the business intelligence reporting and analytical environments.
Problem solve with practice leaders to understand how to build the data pipelines that can support the business, formulate different approaches, outline pros and cons for each approach.
Work with practice leaders to get client feedback, get alignment on approaches, deliverables, and overall timeline
Document data flow, infrastructure and processes.
Turn models and machine learning algorithms into implementable production code
The Details:
Location: Columbia, MD
Duration:Full-time
Travel Requirements:Up to 25% (could be as much as (30% - 40% depending on projects)
Benefits:Health, Vision, Dental, 401K plan, Life Insurance, Pretax Commuter Benefits, and an incredibly supportive team cheering you on!
Qualifications:

o MS or PhD degree in Operation Research, Advanced Analytics, Computer Sciences, Engineering

o 1+ years’ professional experience in Data Engineering practices, such as:
data warehousing, optimization, and productionalization with examples of increased responsibility and evolving technologies.
developing code and/or applications using software such as Pyspark, Python, SQL, Scala, Java, etc.
deploying machine learning and data science pipelines into production using model management solutions and leveraging CICD solutions (e.g., Jenkins) for automation
configuring cloud platforms and configuring elastic compute environments in a cloud platform
Familiarity with and understanding of modern machine learning approaches, algorithms, libraries, and processes for feature selection / engineering
Experience building containerized applications and deploying those applications using solutions like Kubernetes
Experience with structured or un-structured data processing tools (SQL, Hadoop, Spark, NoSQL, MySQL, MariaDB, Hive, Pig, etc)
Comfortable with cloud-based platforms (AWS, Azure, Databricks, Google)",4.5,Blend360,"Columbia, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,18,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,MD,5671,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,1,0,1
1456,456,Data Engineer,$105k-$124k,"Why VillageMD?

VillageMD is changing the trajectory of healthcare by empowering primary care physicians to make informed decisions and engage patients in meaningful ways. We work with thousands of clinicians and healthcare disruptors across the country to build and contribute to our platform to improve patient health while driving down the cost to deliver it.

We are a mission-oriented organization and are thrilled about the work that we do every day. We're transparent, collaborative, and relentless in pursuit of our mission, all while doing so with humility and a low ego. We believe that diverse backgrounds and experiences create the best opportunity for innovation and the community that we are creating is greater than any individual.

We've built our technology using the best of cloud and open-source technologies to create an open, data-first platform that is enriched with analytical models and modernly connected to internal and external apps. These apps drive clinical decision support, patient engagement, and other facilitators of innovative, information-enriched health experiences.

Data Engineers at VillageMD build distributed components, pipelines, and tools that enable our organization to make analytical, data-driven decisions. We're in a unique position to impact everyone in primary care from independent, family-owned practices to world-class health systems. We aggregate, process, and deliver rich datasets to improve the effectiveness of primary care for our doctors and patients.

What are examples of work that Data Engineers have done at VillageMD?
Built and implemented a data profiling tool to reverse engineer data schemas from new data sources facilitating normalization of the data into our data model
Created a summary data platform supporting our presentation layer that allows clinicians and operators in our practices to pinpoint interventions on-demand to patients most in need
Analyzed and designed the best ways to expand our data model to incorporate more data that's mission critical
What will make you successful here?
Strong analytical and technical skills
A real passion for problem solving and learning new technology
Vision to balance speed and maintainability in solution design
The ability to handle multiple, concurrent projects
Crafting and implementing requirements, keeping projects on track, and engaging partners
Challenging the status quo to improve our processes and tools
Communicating complex technical details in meaningful business context
A low ego and humility; an ability to gain trust by doing what you say you will do
What you might do in your first year:
Own ten projects to design and implement best-in-class data processing enabling clean data flow directly to our data model and on to our presentation layer
Work with analytics, engineering and operations to design and implement a new analytics product that supports improving patient health
Design a new concept within our data model to meet a new operational or analytical need
The following experience is relevant to us:
5+ years of full-time experience including extensive experience with healthcare data
Ability to understand and design relational data structures required
Very strong capabilities manipulating data using SQL
Knowledge of, and/or willingness to learn, non-relational data structures and other technologies (e.g. Postgres, Redshift, Cassandra, MongoDB, Neo4j, S3, etc.)
Experience or willingness to learn building information pipelines utilizing Python or Java a plus
BS/MS in computer science, math, engineering, or other related fields is required.
Track record of successfully executing projects with multiple partners
What can we offer you?
Competitive salary, bonus, and health benefits
Paid gym membership
Fun, fast-paced, startup environment (with snacks)
Pre-tax savings on commute expenses
Remote flexibility
A highly-collaborative, conscientious, forward-thinking environment that welcomes the impact you can make from Day 1.
A clear link between our daily work on products and services and the improved quality of healthcare that this work facilitates for patients.
At VillageMD, we see diversity and inclusion as a source of strength in transforming healthcare. We believe building trust and innovation are best achieved through diverse perspectives. To us, acceptance and respect are rooted in an understanding that people do not experience things in the same way, including our healthcare system. Individuals seeking employment at VillageMD are considered without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",4.0,VillageMD,"Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,7,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,IL,4664,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
1457,457,Customer Insights Data Scientist,$105k-$124k,"Hi, We’re AppFolio.

We’re innovators, changemakers, and collaborators. We’re more than just a software company — we’re a cloud-based powerhouse that creates products to make our customers’ lives easier. We’re revolutionizing the way people do business, and we want your ideas, your enthusiasm, and your passion to help us keep on innovating.

We love where we work, and you can, too.

To find out more about what AppFolio has to offer, check out appfolioinc.com/careers.

The Customer Insights Analyst will bring together quantitative and qualitative data and be responsible for the ongoing analysis, reporting, and insight identification for vital Customer Experience programs and metrics such as but not limited to NPS and VOC. As part of the CX team to build a focused set of CX metrics used across the business as predictive measures that improve the customer experience and drive business outcomes.

Outcomes
Launch VOC text analytics capabilities by leveraging technology and machine learning.
Implement & create text analytics models and processes to synthesize and identify emerging customer insights informing product development.
Stitch together multiple customer data sources (CRM and product data) to perform comprehensive CX analysis to identify past, present, and potential customer patterns yielding actionable insights to drive business change.
Build CX metrics - data and dashboard
Bring together multiple customer data sources (CRM and product data) to perform comprehensive CX analysis to identify past, present and potential customer patterns yielding actionable insights to drive business change
Own monthly analysis and insights for NPS program leading to recommendations for actions across the business to drive an increase in NPS in targeted customer segments
Contribute to ongoing improvements to NPS reporting, dashboards, and engagement across the company.
Identify and champion impactful customer experience insights aligned to our key business priorities across customer segments, markets, and offerings.
Competencies
Strategic Thinking. Ability to execute against a clear framework for defining a predictive set of Customer Experience metrics that drive business outcomes. Experience with CX metrics industry trends, best practices, and technology capabilities is preferred.
Tireless Advocate for the Customer. Lead with the customer's voice in everything you do and instill the customer mindset across the organization.
Analytical Skills. Able to synthesize quantitative and qualitative data across separate customer listening posts to draw impactful insights that inform strategy and prioritization.
Agile & Experimentation Mindset. Unafraid to take innovative approaches to problems and bring other's creative ideas forward with an agile ""progress over perfection"" mindset.
Business Acumen. Ability to connect the dots and communicate how customer experience efforts and metrics can impact business priorities and commit to delivering specific business outcomes.
Communication. Storyteller with the ability to weave together data, insights, and voice of the customer to inspire an organization to action.
Influence and Partnership. Relationship builder with the ability to navigate across the organization to drive alignment and action effectively.
CX Industry Expertise. Develop expertise, knowledge, and connections of the CX industry, best practices, and experts to inform our work and how we operate.
Must-Haves
2+ years experience in the CX space understanding how customer data can be used to dig into problems and work cross-functionally to improve the customer experience
Experience building and leading text analytics models with experience building using Clarabridge(preferably), Qualtrics, and or Medallia.
Solid understanding of industry-standard methodologies of customer insights, and desire to help evolve our VoC program
Strong ability to analyze quantitative and qualitative data, optimize data sets, tools, and analysis techniques to drive business outcomes.
Understanding of how to apply statistical methods to identify drivers of business results based on customer feedback and customer journey touch points
Sharp emotional intelligence and skills in leading robust multi-functional relationships.
Effective communicator with written and oral presentations to inspire actions. Demonstrate validated presentation, demonstration, and technical writing skills.
Substantial experience with analytical software (Tableau, SQL, data warehouse, etc.) preferred.
Experience working in a fast-paced, data-driven B2B SaaS environment is preferred.
Bachelor's degree, Master's Degree preferred.
Our Story

AppFolio (NASDAQ: APPF) was founded in 2006 with the mission to revolutionize vertical industry businesses by providing great software and service. Our easy-to-use, cloud-based software helps our customers more effectively market, manage, and grow their businesses. Today our software solutions exist in two verticals including the real estate (AppFolio Property Manager, AppFolio Property Manager PLUS, and AppFolio Investment Manager) and legal (MyCase) industries.

To find out more about what AppFolio has to offer, check out appfolioinc.com/careers.",4.6,AppFolio,"San Diego, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,14,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,5202,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
1459,459,Lead Data Scientist – Network Analysis and Control,$105k-$124k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

The Lead Data Scientist must have an entrepreneurial spirit, a willingness to take risks, and a desire to advance the state of the art in networking. This position will require direct application of data science principals, experience with complex communication networks, and an understanding of network-focused data analytics and automation. If this sounds like you, and you have five plus years of professional experience in this area, then put it to work in this senior technical leadership position by joining us in MITRE’s Infrastructure and Networking Technical Center.

Key Functions:
Develop data analytics approaches to predict network behaviors or detect behavioral anomalies in the environment
Design data analytic systems to support network automation and network security initiatives and projects for multiple government agencies and sponsors
Offer technical leadership in the area of data science to government sponsors and internally within the department
Work in cross-discipline teams serving as the subject matter expert in the area of data analytics and data science
Lead innovation and research activities including internal R&D efforts
Serve as a subject matter expert and trusted advisor to government sponsors
Minimum Qualifications:
BS and 8 years related experience
Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or applicants who are eligible for security clearances
Possess an active Secret level security clearance
Required Qualifications:
BS in Computer Science, Mathematics, or a similar field with at least five years of experience in relevant positions
Hands-on software development skills (Python, Scala, Java)
Experience working with Big Data tools (e.g. Spark, Hadoop, Elasticsearch, Kafka)
Prior experience working with databases (e.g., PostgreSQL, Oracle, MySQL, MongoDB, Neo4j)
Experience conducting original research using data science techniques, including machine learning, statistical modeling, and data visualization
Working knowledge of data science workflow from data wrangling and cleaning to exploratory analysis all the way through to reporting and visualization
Working knowledge of various machine learning paradigms (deep learning, reinforcement learning, neural networks, etc.) with an understanding of mathematical underpinnings of various models
Experience performing data analytics in cloud environments, particularly AWS
Understanding of traditional IP networking (including architecture, protocol design and analysis)
Demonstrated ability to take risk and achieve significant work program or organizational outcomes
Excellent written and verbal communications skills
Ability to obtain and maintain a Top-Secret and above level security clearance
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, or related field, with a focus on machine learning
Experience developing prototype data science applications and deploying at-scale against Big Data
Familiarity with programmable control plane (e.g. SDN) and data plane technologies (e.g. P4)
Exposure to operational technology (OT) networks and relevant protocols commonly leveraged in these environments (e.g. DNP3, MODBUS)
Understanding of the applicability of machine learning models to network and distributed systems
Proven track record of proposing and leading R&D initiatives and successfully transitioning to operational environment
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,MITRE,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,VA,5320,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1460,460,Data Scientist,$105k-$124k,"Fidelity TalentSource is your destination for discovering your next temporary role at Fidelity Investments. We are currently sourcing for a Data Scientist to work at Fidelity in Boston, MA.

At Fidelity’s Artificial Intelligence Center of Excellence (COE), you won’t be just tinkering around the edges, you’ll be building critical solutions that will benefit our clients for years to come. We work closely with business partners, collect requirements and deliver high value AI/ML solutions that drive customer and business value. Those of us who love to work with data see this as the pinnacle of opportunities that you cannot find anywhere else in the industry.

These positions are all located in Boston, MA.

The Team

The AIML (Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning) team contributes to the vitality and growth of the organization through researching and building complex, cutting edge and scalable AI algorithms, models, platforms and technologies to significantly improve customer experience and drive business results. Our team of high caliber scientists, mathematicians and statisticians use rigorous quantitative approaches to ensure that we are efficiently building algorithms and technology relevant to the business or customer experience issue at hand.

The Expertise You Have
Minimum Master’s Degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, Computational Statistics, Operations Research, Machine Learning or related technical fields.
Advanced knowledge in model evaluation, tuning and performance, operationalization and scalability of scientific techniques and establishing decision strategies.
Hands on experience developing supervised and unsupervised machine learning algorithms (regression, decision trees/random forest, neural networks, feature selection/reduction, clustering, parameter tuning, etc.),
Experience in evaluating and making decisions around the use of new or existing tools for a project.
Experience in projects involving large scale-multi dimensional databases, complex business infrastructure, and cross-functional teams. Three to five successfully launched ML projects would be ideal.
Programming skills in Python, Spark, Scala, R or MatLab
The Skills You Bring
Your solid skills in algorithm development and predictive modeling
You have deep knowledge of some combination of the following:
Natural Language Processing (NLP)
Deep Learning, Neural Networks
Real Time Event Detection and Scoring
Time series analysis, Econometrics
Robotic Process Automation
Cloud ML
The Value You Deliver

You will partner with business stakeholders to identify/prioritize top AI opportunities, create business/technical requirements, transform large volumes of data into AI-driven solutions using creative, cutting edge open source methods/technologies, lead ML strategy and road map planning, work across teams and influence the direction of external teams. The ideal candidate will combine experienced AI/ML/Open Source/Tech knowledge with hands on experience building algorithms/models/programming and outstanding business skills (revenue/cost drivers, customer experience, customer journey, communication, etc.) to manage and deliver complex/critical projects driving significant value to Fidelity.

Company Culture

At Fidelity, we are focused on making our financial expertise broadly accessible and effective in helping people live the lives they want. We are a privately held company that places a high degree of value in creating and furthering a work environment that attracts the best talent and reflects our commitment to our associates.

Company Overview

We recruit individuals from a variety of backgrounds, including technology and customer service, to fill assignments across Fidelity’s U.S.-based regional and investor center locations. If you would like to experience Fidelity’s diverse and inclusive workplace while expanding your skillset and developing your professional network, consider a role with Fidelity TalentSource.

For information about working at Fidelity TalentSource, visit FTSJobs.com.

Company Overview

Fidelity TalentSource, formerly Veritude, is the in-house temporary staffing provider for Fidelity Investments, one of the largest and most diversified global financial services firms in the industry. We recruit individuals from a variety of backgrounds, including technology and customer service, to fill assignments across Fidelity’s U.S.-based regional and investor center locations. If you would like to experience Fidelity’s diverse and inclusive workplace while expanding your skill set and developing your professional network, consider a role with Fidelity TalentSource. For information about working at Fidelity TalentSource, visit FTSJobs.com.

Information about Fidelity Investments

At Fidelity, we are focused on making our financial expertise broadly accessible and effective in helping people live the lives they want. We are a privately held company that places a high degree of value in creating and nurturing a work environment that attracts the best talent and reflects our commitment to our associates. We are proud of our diverse and inclusive workplace where we respect and value our associates for their unique perspectives and experiences. For information about working at Fidelity, visit FidelityCareers.com.

Fidelity Investments and Fidelity TalentSource are equal opportunity employers.",3.9,Fidelity TalentSource,"Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,34,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,MA,5388,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
1461,461,Senior Machine Learning Engineer,$105k-$124k,"Introduction to Shield
Shield AI’s mission is to protect service members and civilians with artificially intelligent systems. For our team, no idea is too ambitious. We don’t ever want to stop working to make possible what looks out of reach today. We have assembled a world-class team dedicated to shaping the future of artificially intelligent systems. We are backed by top tier venture capital investors, have been shipping product since 2018 and are rapidly expanding.

Job Description
Are you a passionate and innovative software engineer looking to help develop state of the art AI products? Are you eager to make a positive difference in the world? Do you want to work alongside mission driven and values focused teammates? Shield AI is just the place for you!
As a Machine Learning Engineer, you will work on exciting applications of machine learning for robotic systems. You will work alongside a team of passionate and driven engineers to solve a wide variety of challenging problems to include object detection, scene understanding, face verification, and action recognition. You will conduct literature reviews to drive team decisions and develop a framework for training, validation, and evaluation. Your contributions will help provide the situational awareness that is essential to the safety of our users!
Join us to push the state of the art in autonomous robotics for protecting lives.
What you'll do
Develop algorithms for the accurate detection, classification, and localization of high-value objects for tracking and analysis
Develop algorithms for scene understanding; build scene graphs, recognize obstacles for navigation, and estimate threat or intent
Contribute to our machine learning foundation tools for curating data and developing/analyzing models
Inform sensor decisions for optimal approaches to machine learning for product requirements
Develop state-of-the-art approaches in the areas described above, as applied to our unique problems
Projects you might work on
Improving the tooling and pipelines that allow us to develop models at scale
Developing and optimizing models for multiple tasks of interest
Extending models to optimize execution and pull in more functionality such as tracking or motion prediction
Developing robust APIs for easy interfacing with internal and external software components
People we're looking for have the following required education and experience
5+ years of professional work experience as a machine learning and/or software engineer
MS in Computer Science or Engineering, similar degree, or equivalent practical experience
Experience with contributing to large and complex software projects
Practical experience with machine learning frameworks such as PyTorch and TensorFlow
Competencies
Deep learning model development
Software Engineering
C++
Python
TensorFlow
Caffe/Caffe2
PyTorch
scikit-learn
OpenCV
Multi-threaded development
Excellent communication skills
Preferred qualifications
Experience producing, deploying, and improving production models
Experience with ROS
Experience with CUDA
Passion for solving problems that make a difference
If you're interested in being part of our team, apply now!

Shield AI is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.

To conform to U.S. Government regulations, applicant must be a U.S. citizen, lawful permanent resident of the U.S., protected individual as defined by 8 U.S.C. 1324b(a)(3), or eligible to obtain the required authorizations from the U.S. Department of State.",4.8,Shield AI,"San Diego, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,5,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,3826,1,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
1465,465,Marketing Analytics Data Scientist,$105k-$124k,"Tinder brings people together. With tens of millions of users and a presence in every country on earth, our reach is expansive and rapidly growing. Tinder’s Analytics Team is looking for a Data Scientist with expertise in Marketing.

The Marketing Analytics team takes ownership of the decisions being made from our data – we develop a deep understanding of both the business and its data and establish close working relationships with all teams - starting with Marketing but also including Product, Engineering, and Finance – so that we can provide recommendations and make proposals regarding prioritization of initiatives, product launches, A/B tests, and company performance.

As a Data Scientist in this role, you will be a partner to the Marketing team, you will be :
Interpreting data and analyzing results using statistical techniques,
Developing and implementing data analyses, data collection systems and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality
Acquiring data from primary or secondary data sources and maintaining databases

Additionally, you’ll be providing support for A/B test design and analysis as well as data-driven insights through ad-hoc analyses, presentations, and automated reports and dashboards. This role will require experience with SQL, data wrangling, statistics, and A/B testing as well as the ability to work in cross-functional teams to drive actionable insights. Experience with user growth and acquisition across consumer products is a plus.
Key Roles and Responsibilities:
Find the “story” in the data and communicate insights and opportunities with executive and other internal teams
Master and own the analytical understanding of customer behavior and business performance
Analyze models to better understand the value and churn behavior of our users
Perform ongoing ad-hoc analyses to evaluate the efficiency of our marketing spend, building reporting infrastructure, and assisting in making budgeting recommendations to optimize growth
Integrate captured event data with other sources of customer data, such as surveys, ad publishers and app store data
Support reporting and business intelligence needs of the entire Marketing team.

Skills Required:

2+ years of relevant experience
Ability to think objectively and interpret meaningful themes from quantitative and qualitative data
Ability to build constructive and effective relationships with a broad and diverse group of business partners
Ability to execute on complex analytics projects where you have to determine salient questions in a complex ecosystem and present action-oriented conclusions
Proficiency with SQL requiredScripting skills, preferably in Python.
Strong Python/NumPy/PANDAS skills a plusKnowledge of statistics, specifically experimental design and analysis
Proficiency in Microsoft Excel and Microsoft PowerPointFamiliarity with common marketing KPIs, metrics, and growth experiments
As part of our team, you’ll enjoy:

· The hustle of a startup with the impact of a global business
· Tremendous opportunity to seek some of the industry’s most exciting problems
· Working with an outstanding team of creative, fun and highly motivated people
· Comprehensive health coverage, competitive salary, and 401(k) match

At Tinder, we don’t just accept difference — we celebrate it, we support it, and we thrive on it for the benefit of our employees, our products, and our community. Tinder is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",3.9,Tinder,"Los Angeles, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,8,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,3470,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
1467,467,Data Engineer,$105k-$124k,"Numerator is looking for a Senior Data Engineer who is a Big Data enthusiast and has a passion for working with an interesting robust set of data. This person will work in our platform to help ensure that our data quality is flawless. As a company, we have millions of new data points every day that come into our system. You will be working with a passionate team of engineers to solve challenging problems and ensure that we can deliver the best data to our customers, on-time. You will be using the latest cloud data warehouse technologies to build robust and reliable data pipelines.

Duties/Responsibilities Include

Develop expertise in the different upstream data stores and systems across Numerator
Design, develop and maintain data integration pipelines for Numerators growing data sets and product offerings
Collaborate with product and engineering teams to take requirements from prototype to production
Build data validation testing frameworks to ensure high data quality and integrity
Write and maintain documentation on data pipelines and schemas

Requirements

Bachelors degree in Computer Science or related field of study required; Masters degree preferred
5 + years of experience in the data warehouse space
Knowledge of software engineering best practices across the development lifecycle, coding standards, code reviews, source management, build processes, testing, and operations
Knowledge of and experience implementing data security and governance best practices
Expert in SQL, including advanced analytical queries, window functions, CTEs and query optimization
Advanced proficiency in Python (data structures, algorithms, object oriented programming, using APIs)Experience administering a cloud data warehouse (Redshift, Snowflake, Vertica)
Experience with a data pipeline scheduling framework (Airflow)
Experience with schema design and dimensional data modeling

Exceptional candidates will have

Amazon Web Services (EC2, DMS, RDS) experience
Terraform and/or ansible (or similar) for infrastructure deployment
Airflow - Experience building and monitoring DAGs, developing custom operators and using script templating solutions
Experience supporting production systems and developing on-call/incident management playbooks
Ability to work with team members located in multiple geographies and time zones.
Curious and interested in learning about the latest in data warehouse technology Interest and willingness to mentor junior team members

What we offer you

An inclusive and collaborative company culture - we work in an open environment while working together to get things done, and adapt to the changing needs as they come.
An opportunity to have an impact in a technologically data driven company.
Ownership over platforms and environments of an industry leading product.
Market competitive total compensation package.
Volunteer time off and charitable donation matching.
Strong support for career growth, including mentorship programs, leadership training, access to conferences and employee resource groups.
Regular hackathons to build your own projects and Engineering Lunch and Learns.
Great benefits package including health/vision/dental, unlimited PTO, 401k matching, travel reimbursement and more.

If this sounds like something you would like to be part of, we’d love for you to apply! Don't worry if you think that you don't meet all the qualifications here. The tools, technology, and methodologies we use are constantly changing and we value talent and interest over specific experience.

We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.1,Numerator,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,16,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,3796,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
1468,468,Associate Data Scientist,$105k-$124k,"The Associate Data Scientist performs data analysis to extract knowledge or insight from structured or unstructured data. He or she applies advanced statistical algorithms for analysis of large-scale, complex datasets. He or she keeps up to date with cutting-edge techniques in programming, machine learning, big data, and healthcare modeling and seeks ways to advance the organization’s capabilities in analytics.

Apply machine learning/deep learning/artificial intelligence techniques.
Perform large-scale experimentation and build data-driven models to answer business questions.
Create hypotheses and experiments to identify hidden relationships and construct new analytics methods.
Develop and implement Markov decision process models and healthcare economic models.
Use advanced analytics methods to extract value from business data.
Articulate a vision and roadmap for the utilization of data as a valued corporate asset.
Visualize information and develop reports on results of data analysis.
Influence product teams through presentation of data-based recommendations.
Spread best practices to analytics and product teams.
Implement new tools to make data analysis more efficient.
Willing and able to learn new technologies on the job.
Ability to communicate complex results to technical and non-technical audiences.
Ability to work with minimal supervision.
Desire to work in a highly collaborative environment.
Uphold company mission and values through accountability, innovation, integrity, quality, and teamwork.
Support and comply with the company’s Quality Management System policies and procedures.
Regular and reliable attendance.
Ability to lift up to 10 pounds for approximately 5% of a typical working day.
Ability to work on a mobile device, tablet, or in front of a computer screen and/or perform typing for approximately 80% of a typical working day.
Ability and means to travel between Madison locations.
Ability to travel 5% of working time away from work location, may include overnight/weekend travel.

Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Statistics, Computer Science, or related field; or High School Degree/General Education Diploma and 4 years of relevant experience in lieu of Bachelor’s degree.
2+ years of experience working with large datasets for drawing business insights.
Demonstrated working knowledge in Python or R programming.
Professional working knowledge with machine learning (to solve complex business problems), predictive modeling, leveraging both structured and unstructured data source, relational databases, and SQL.
Professional working knowledge of statistics and modeling techniques.
Demonstrated ability to perform the Essential Duties of the position with or without accommodation.
Authorization to work in the United States without sponsorship.
Preferred Qualifications
Master’s degree in related field of study.
Professional working knowledge with distributed computing and big data technologies such as Spark or related technologies.
Professional working knowledge with statistical methodologies and tools (R, SAS, SPSS, etc.), mathematical optimization, control theory, and time-series analysis.
Professional working knowledge with Natural Language Processing, Information Retrieval, or Recommender Systems.

We are an equal employment opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, color, creed, disability, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex, sexual orientation, and any other status protected by applicable local, state or federal law. Applicable portions of the Company’s affirmative action program are available to any applicant or employee for inspection upon request",4.1,Exact Sciences Corporation,"Madison, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,25,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,WI,3750,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,1
1470,470,Sr. Data Scientist,$105k-$124k,"Who is Trace3?

Trace3 is a leading Transformative IT Authority, providing unique technology solutions and consulting services to our clients. Equipped with elite engineering and dynamic innovation, we empower IT executives and their organizations to achieve competitive advantage through a process of Integrate, Automate, Innovate.

Our culture at Trace3 embodies the spirit of a startup with the advantage of a scalable business. Employees can grow their career and have fun while doing it!

Trace3 is headquartered in Irvine, California. We employ more than 850 people all over the United States. Our major field office locations include Atlanta, Denver, Detroit, Indianapolis, Grand Rapids, Lexington, Los Angeles, Louisville, San Diego, San Francisco, and Scottsdale.

Ready to discover the possibilities that live in technology?

Come Join Us!

Street-Smart - Thriving in Dynamic Times

We are flexible and resilient in a fast-changing environment. We continuously innovate and drive constructive change while keeping a focus on the ""big picture."" We exercise sound business judgment in making high-quality decisions in a timely and cost-effective manner. We are highly creative and can dig deep within ourselves to find positive solutions to different problems.

Juice - The ""Stuff"" it takes to be a Needle Mover

We get things done and drive results. We lead without a title, empowering others through a can-do attitude. We look forward to the goal, mentally mapping out every checkpoint on the pathway to success, and visualizing what the final destination looks and feels like.

Teamwork - Humble, Hungry and Smart

We are humble individuals who understand how our job impacts the company's mission. We treat others with respect, admit mistakes, give credit where it's due and demonstrate transparency. We ""bring the weather"" by exhibiting positive leadership and solution-focused thinking. We hug people in their trials, struggles, and failures – not just their success. We appreciate the individuality of the people around us.

About the Role: Do you enjoy solving computer vision problems such as optical character recognition, object detection and recognition and image classification? Text and document classification using natural-language processing tools, or predicitve analytics applied to time series? Do you love learning and trying out new state of the art machine learning and deep learning algorithms? Are you passionate in building computer AI solutions and applications?

At Trace3, you will work on problems for our enterprise clients. You will design and build AI products that will impact some of the largest companies in the country. You will be able to learn from fellow deep learning and machine learning engineers and data scientists, and follow and share cutting-edge research. You will research and POC some of the coolest technologies available and will have access to a pipeline of up-and-coming technologies made available through Trace3's VC relationships.

The Senior Data Scientist needs to be self-motivated, self-directing, adaptable and comfortable working in less-structured environments. The ideal candidate should be looking for an opportunity to help client transform their business using ML/DL/AI. Candidates will need experience in working on and leading large complex data science and business transformation projects. There is an opportunity for the candidate to eventually move into a leadership and management position as the Data Science team grows. Approximately 30-50% travel is required.

What You'll Do:
Perform project tasks independently, and may direct the efforts of others
Lead analytical effort for client engagements
Develop analytical skills and act an advisor for junior staff and external partners
Provide quantitative and business analytic skills to develop and implement solutions across several industry verticals, specifically financial, industrial and manufacturing, healthcare life sciences, consumer product & retail, telecom.
Define the key business problems to be solved and formulate mathematical approaches to solve those given problems
Form and maintain trusted relationships with clients and be the 'go-to' contact point for projects
Participate in and/or lead the development of deliverable content that meets the needs of the client and contract
Anticipate client needs and formulate solutions to client issues
Review deliverables for accuracy and quality
Contribute to new business proposals and proposal development
Manages own personal and professional development; seeks opportunities for professional growth and expansion of consulting skills and experiences
Qualifications & Interests:
8+ years relevant experience with a proven track record of leveraging analytics and large amounts of data to drive significant business impact.
Understanding of state of the art deep learning techniques
Solid understanding of CNN, RNN, supervised and unsupervised learning, optimization techniques
Experience with one or more deep learning frameworks such as TensorFlow, Deeplearning4j, Keras, PyTorch, etc.
Proficiency in at least one higher-level programming language such as Java, Scala, Python, C++, R, etc.
A focus on computer vision and/or machine learning and with Natural Language Processing (NLP) would be a plus.
PhD in Machine Learning, Statistics, Computer Science, Operations Research, Engineering, Mathematics or related field would be a plus
Proficient at translating unstructured business problems into an abstract mathematical framework.
Exceptional interpersonal and communication skills, including the ability to describe the logic and implications of a complex model to all types of business partners.
Self-starter with a passion for your work and attention to detail.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Humble with a team-first attitude.
The Perks:
Comprehensive medical, dental and vision plans for you and your dependents
401(k) Retirement Plan with Employer Match, 529 College Savings Plan, Health Savings Account, Life Insurance, and Long-Term Disability
Competitive Compensation
Training and development programs
Stocked kitchen with snacks and beverages
Collaborative and cool office culture
Work-life balance and generous paid time off
***To all recruitment agencies: Trace3 does not accept unsolicited agency resumes/CVs. Please do not forward resumes/CVs to our careers email addresses, Trace3 employees or any other company location. Trace3 is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/CVs.",3.5,Trace3,"Irvine, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,18,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,CA,6530,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,0
1472,472,Principal Data Scientist - R&D Oncology,$105k-$124k,"Job Description / Capsule

The Machine Learning and AI team in AstraZenecas Oncology Data Science & Analytics group is where we develop and apply sophisticated algorithms and techniques to solve the hardest problems in oncology drug discovery and development. The team uses their scientific, quantitative, and problem-solving skills to work on a broad range of challenges across the whole oncology portfolio, working collaboratively with other scientists across a range of disciplines to scope, define, and deliver projects that both advance the state of the art in data science and accelerate the delivery of innovative medicines to patients.

As a Principal Data Scientist you will play a key role on the front line in this rapidly growing team working to extract insight from complex biomedical data. You will apply and develop your leadership skills and your expertise in rigorous quantitative data science to provide solutions to a variety of data science problems, researching, recommending and delivering novel methodologies to solve the problems that matter to the oncology pipeline.

Examples of projects the team works on include machine learning models for developing digital biomarkers, patient risk stratification for clinical trials, new algorithms for survival analysis, approaches to quantitatively analyse wearable data, linking of medical imaging data with omics and longitudinal outcomes to identify and/or validate new drug targets, and much more!

Typical Accountabilities
Provides advanced quantitative expertise to AstraZeneca projects and researches and recommends appropriate data science solutions, appropriately communicating with a range of stakeholders.
Develops novel data science solutions where off-the-shelf methodologies do not fit.
Leads small (2-3 person) data science projects of defined scope.
Independently keeps own knowledge up to date and learns from senior team members, proposing appropriate training courses for personal development.
Coaches/mentors junior data scientists and others to drive the development of data science as an AZ capability.
Works within established frameworks to deliver a variety of tasks that support projects in meeting their objectives.
Reviews working practices and ensures non-compliant processes are escalated.
Ensures own work is compliant within Clinical Development.
Collaborate in a multidisciplinary environment with world leading clinicians, data scientists, biological experts, statisticians and IT professionals.
Education, Qualifications, Skills and Experience

Essential
MSc degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering)
Extensive hands-on experience applying data science tools in practice.
Practical software development skills in standard data science tools (such as R or python)
Extensive knowledge of mathematical modelling and statistical modelling techniques, and drive to continue to learn and develop these skills.
Communication, business analysis, and consultancy.
Minimum 5+ years of work experience
Desirable
PhD degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering).
Experience within the pharmaceutical industry.
In-depth experience of working in a global organization with complex/geographical context",4.0,AstraZeneca,"New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,107,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,114.5,NY,3286,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1482,482,Senior Data Scientist,$43k-$72k,"Grubhub is dedicated to connecting hungry diners with our wide network of restaurants across the country. Our innovative technology, easy-to-use platforms and streamlined delivery capabilities make us an industry leader today, and in the future of online food ordering.
We strive to create a workplace that reflects the diversity of our customers and the communities we serve. When you join our team, you become part of a community that works together to innovate, solve problems, take risks, grow, work hard and have a ton of fun in the process!
Why Work For Us
We have a fast-paced environment and that is what our teams thrive on. Grubhub believes in empowering people and offering opportunities for development, as well as professional growth. We value strong, positive relationships in all areas: with each other, our customers and our greater community. Want to be a part of a team of diverse collaborators in an authentically fun culture? If so, we want to talk to you - and hear what’s your favorite restaurant for food delivery!
More About the Role:
Grubhub is looking for a data scientist to join the Pricing team. As a part of Pricing, you’ll be a member of a small team of data scientists and engineers who shape and optimize how we charge our diners, shaping hundreds of millions in revenue annually. You will work closely both with financial stakeholders as well as engineers to ship models that make Grubhub more efficient with the way in which it charges customers. You’ll construct models and A/B tests as well as write code to improve our modeling capabilities.

Prototype and ship large-scale models that help drive profit or order volume
Conduct A/B experiments to validate the effectiveness of these models
Work closely with financial stakeholders to construct models that drive business goals
Leverage big data tools to incorporate new data sources into modeling pipelines
Work closely with data scientists and backend engineers to implement and maintain your changes

MS with 5+ years of relevant industry experience or PhD in computer science, engineering, statistics, machine learning, mathematics, or in another quantitative field
Experience shipping changes to a production environment
Comfortable with using git, basic Linux commands, and object-oriented programming languages (Scala, Java, Python)
Experience performing analysis with large-scale SQL tooling (Presto, BigQuery, etc.)
Familiarity with basic AWS tools like EC2 and S3
Excellent communication and data presentation skills
Effective working in a fast-paced team environment
Preferred Qualifications
Demonstrated ability to work on cross-functional teams
Experience making high-impact decisions (multiple millions of dollars)
Ability to comprehend and debug complex systems that might cross team and tool boundaries across the company

Flexible PTO. Grubhub employees are provided a generous amount of time to recharge their batteries.
Health and Wellness. We provide programs that support your overall well-being such as generous medical benefits, employee network groups, company-wide fitness challenges, and a comfortable and casual workplace! We also support our parents by offering 8 weeks of paid parent bonding time, a 4-week returnship program, and 6-8 weeks paid medical leave.
Learning and Career Growth. Your personal and professional development is a priority at Grubhub. From day one, we empower you to lead and be an active participant in your career growth. We provide continuous learning opportunities, training, and coaching and mentorship programs.
MealPerks. Who’s ready for some lunch? We provide our employees with a weekly Grubhub credit to enjoy and support local restaurants. We also offer company-wide meals several times a year to bring our Grubhub family together.
Fun. Every Grubhub office has an employee-led Culture Crew that connects people through fun, meaningful events and initiatives. Some of our popular past events include: Wing-eating contests, Grubtoberfest, 5k Runs, Bring Your Child to Work Day, regular happy hours, and more!
Social Impact. We believe in the importance of serving the communities that support our business. In addition, employees are given paid time off each year to support the causes that are important to them.

Grubhub is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics. The EEO is the Law poster is available here: DOL Poster. If you are applying for a job in the U.S. and need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to TalentAcquisition@grubhub.com and let us know the nature of your request and contact information. Please note that only those inquiries concerning a request for reasonable accommodation will be responded to from this email address.
CA Privacy Notice: If you are a resident of the State of California and would like a copy of our CA privacy notice, please email privacy@grubhub.com.",3.9,Grubhub,"New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,16,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,57.5,NY,5093,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,1,0,0
1484,484,Data Engineer,$43k-$72k,"Data Engineer

\*Must be a US Citizen living in the DC Metro area.
Description*
The Data Engineer is primarily responsible for designing data ontologies for a variety of data types and developing data pipelines for unstructured, semi-structured, and structured data into a centralized data repository. The Data Engineer will support the processing of new datasets into the data repository and perform various development activities to keep pace with the increasing amount of data being ingested and analyzed.
Responsibilities*
• Develop data pipelines for ingesting structured and unstructured data into a centralized data repository for storage and analysis.
• Design entity relationship diagrams for different types of data.
• Contribute to the on-going design and development of the data repository architecture as new datasets are incorporated.
Requirements*
• 2+ years of relevant experience
• Strong programming skills in one or more programming languages (e.g. Python, Golang).
• Strong scripting skills (e.g. Bash).
• Experience developing data pipelines.
• Experience designing Entity Relationship (ER) diagrams.
• Experience working with a variety of databases (e.g. SQL, Elasticsearch, Neo4j).

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: Up to $200,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
Multiple locations
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
www.excygent.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1.0,"Excygent, LLC","Reston, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,57.5,VA,1874,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1485,485,Data Scientist,$43k-$72k,"At Waymo, we're focused on bringing self-driving technology to the world. Our mission is to make it safe and easy for people and things to move around. Today, our driverless cars are serving our first customers with no drivers behind the wheel. To experience our self-driving technology, see this 360-degree video.

In this data science role, you will:
Safety evaluation is of fundamental importance to Waymo, and measuring it is subtle. This role works with a wide variety of teams across the company (onboard software engineering, product, safety, systems engineering) to evaluate the driving and safety performance of Waymo's self driving car. This is based on a wide variety of data from real and simulated driving from Waymo's self-driving system as well as from external data sources.
The Planner Team is responsible for ""motion planning"" for the self driving car. This includes gracefully handling many complex situations involving social interactions (merging, negotiating narrow roads, etc), while dealing with a noisy and uncertain environment. Evaluation of this onboard decision-making system is a complex, open-ended problem with tremendous potential impact. The quality of the road maneuvers we execute is subjective, contextual, and geometrically subtle, and evaluation needs apply to a wide variety of conditions with an extremely long tail.
Additionally:
Analysis and improvement of existing data sources and metrics
Development of novel approaches to measuring and improving
Self-driving performance (either generally, or for motion planning specifically)
Collaborate with engineers and other data scientists to evaluate and improve core
Waymo technologies, with a focus on bringing statistical depth, general analytical rigor, and accurate causal interpretation of data.
We'd like you to have:
PhD in statistics, math, or other quantitative area
Progressive statistics background either in academia or industry
Data science and system evaluation experience
Willingness to understand a complex system and its various components
Experience with tools for manipulating big data
Experience with R/Python and statistical libraries
It's preferred if you have experience in:
Experience with C++
Familiarity with Spark/MapReduce
Training or interest in geometry or classical physics",2.9,Waymo,"Mountain View, CA",-1,Unknown,11,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,57.5,CA,2293,0,data scientist,1,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0
1486,486,Head of Real-World Data Science,$43k-$72k,"Genesis Research is an international healthcare consultancy providing end-to-end value evidence strategy, development, and communication services to Life Sciences companies. We are looking for an individual with demonstrated leadership, biopharma industry experience, and strong methodological skills to lead a growing team epidemiologists and RWE scientists. Our RWE-S team has seen exceptional growth and success in providing holistic and comprehensive support to Life Science organizations. The professional leading this team must possess and demonstrate a passion for innovative research, maintain accountability for all RWE deliverables, develop RWE scientists and research teams. This person must understand the needs of clients’ internal and external stakeholders and leverage this understanding to suggest and design value-added, fit-for-purpose research approaches. This role reports to the Chief Scientific Officer. Location: Hoboken, NJ, USA, although remote locations may be considered. Local and international travel of up to 20% is required.


Accountabilities within this role:
• Be the Genesis Research Authority on study design, methodology, and result interpretation for all RWE Deliverables
• Lead, manage, and ensure maximum utilization of a team of epidemiologists and health services researchers charged with designing, implementing, and managing a wide range of studies assess the distribution, patterns and determinants of health and disease conditions and examine access to and the use, costs, quality, delivery, organization, and outcomes of health care.
• Create, update, and maintain Methodological and Scientific Standard Operating Procedures (SOP) that RWE teams will follow
• Support Client Managers with execution and delivery of high-priority and highvisibility studies as a Client-facing subject matter expert
• Provide training, oversight, and guidance for new and current members of the Epidemiology team
• Ensure that the Epidemiology team members are aware of and understand RWD data sources, their strengths and limitations, and statistical software when designing studies
• Manage team capacity in concert with Client Management needs
• Motivate teams during periods of high demand

Qualifications:
▪ Master’s degree, MD or PhD within a relevant discipline (Epidemiology, Public Health, Statistics)
▪ 10+ years of consulting, industry, or academic experience
▪ Experience generating and interpreting real-world and observational research required
▪ Excellent verbal and written communication skills
▪ Proficiency in relevant software such as MS office (Word, Excel and PowerPoint) and statistical packages
▪ Exceptional organizational skills and attention to detail
▪ Enthusiasm to learn and motivation to develop oneself and others within Genesis Research
▪ Flexibility to adapt to client project needs in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial workplace

Compensation:
Competitive salary
Performance-related bonus C
ompany-matched 401k plan
Medical/dental benefits

Genesis Research is an equal opportunity employer.",4.6,Genesis Research,"Hoboken, NJ",-1,1 to 50 Employees,11,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,57.5,NJ,3049,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
1487,487,Data Engineer,$43k-$72k,"About MasterControl:

MasterControl Inc. is a leading provider of cloud-based quality and compliance software for life sciences and other regulated industries. Our mission is the same as that of our customers to bring life-changing products to more people sooner. The MasterControl Platform helps organizations digitize, automate and connect quality and compliance processes across the regulated product development life cycle. Over 1,000 companies worldwide rely on MasterControl solutions to achieve new levels of operational excellence across product development, clinical trials, regulatory affairs, quality management, supply chain, manufacturing and postmarket surveillance. For more information, visitwww.mastercontrol.com.

Summary

At MasterControl we are building our next generation data platform that will leverage AI/ML techniques to help redefine how our customers bring lifesaving and lifechanging products to market. To enable this, we need your help building our data pipeline, DataMart and data lake.

You will be responsible for implementing the data life cycle consumption from the data source to the end model. By gathering requirements from Product, you will transform data in near real-time which will be consumable by AI model training, business intelligence analytic tools, and self-service platforms. You will need a strong emphasis on data modeling, as well as proficiency in data transformation. You will be responsible for integration into the CI/CD pipeline as well as unit and integration testing of all processes. You will need experience with structured, semi-structured, and unstructured data sources. You will need a bachelor's degree in a STEM related field, or equivalent experience. You will have some work experience with and a passion for Big Data.

Responsibilities
Pull data from all customer databases into S3 and put into a queryable format
Model the data for optimal performance (ETL, star-schema like, ORC, partitioning, etc ...)
Pull data from a real-time streaming architecture (Kafka) and do near-real-time aggregations andprojections of the data, storing the results in S3
Help automate the provisioning of AWS Lake Formations, EMR/Spark/S3 and other services in AWS
Analyze data to find patterns worthy to expose to the end-user
Help tie corporate data to customer data from an OLTP store
Help us discover ways to use Big Data technologies in a Machine Learning pipeline (discover, clean, label, train, test)
Other assigned duties
Preferred Skills
Scala/Python/SQL/Java
Apache Spark with EMR and/or other Big Data tools
Kafka Streams experience is big plus
Airflow experience is a plus
Big Data Mindset (Spark/Hive/Hadoop/HCatalog/Hudi). Understanding of the Big Data landscape.
Warehouse Architectures (Star Schema/Snowflake/Vaults/Lakes)
Familiarity with AWS and Cloud Formation or Terraform
Data Modelling
ETL Best Practices
Passionate about creatively solving business problems.
Effectively prioritize and execute tasks in a high-pressure environment.
The ability to non-emotionally coach and mentor others.
The ability to not participate in 'techno-arrogant' conversation.
Meet multiple, challenging deadlines while communicating expectations clearly.
Physical Demands and Working Conditions
Must be able to work well with people.
Ability to operate a computer and work at a desk for extended periods of time.
Ability to communicate effectively in writing, in person, over the telephone and in e-mail.
Why Work Here?

#WhyWorkAnywhereElse

#ExceptionalTeamCulture

MasterControl is a place where Exceptional Teams come together to do their best work. Hiring Exceptional Teams, including the best talent in our industry, is a core value of ours. MasterControl employees are surrounded by intelligent, motivated individuals every day. We like to call it #TheBestTeamOnThePlanet.

We value every employee and their contribution to what makes MasterControl successful. We give right back to the employee through a generous benefits package, great flexibility, and continuous opportunities for advancement.

Not only do we hire Exceptional Teams, but we work hard to keep them here by developing and challenging their skillsets, encouraging professional development and growth, and offering a culture that can't be found elsewhere. Which is why we say - #WhyWorkAnywhereElse?

To put it simply, working at MasterControl is fun, challenging, and rewarding. From our Fitness Clubs to our awards programs, from our company parties to our competitive benefits, you can't really go wrong. MasterControl could be your next (and last) career move!

We are growing quickly and always looking for talented individuals to add to #TheBestTeamOnThePlanet!

Here are some of the benefits MasterControl employees enjoy:
Generous PTO package of three weeks, increasing after just three years of employment
Competitive compensation with annual merit increase reviews
100% medical premium coverage (yes, you read that right!)
Dental/Vision Plans
401k Plan
Employer Paid Life Insurance Policy ($50K)
Great Flexibility
Wellness Programs (every employee gets a Fitbit!)
Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis.

Job Posted by ApplicantPro",3.8,MasterControl,"Salt Lake City, UT",-1,201 to 500 Employees,27,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,57.5,UT,5219,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
1495,495,Senior Data Scientist - Algorithms,$43k-$72k,"Company Description: Quartet is a pioneering healthcare technology company striving to improve the lives of people with mental health conditions. We connect people to a personalized care team to get them the right care at the right time. Our collaborative technology platform and range of services brings together physicians, mental health providers, and insurance companies to effectively improve patient outcomes and drive down healthcare costs. Backed by $93MM in venture funding from top investors like Oak HC/FT, GV (formerly Google Ventures), F-Prime Capital Partners, and Polaris Partners, Quartet is headquartered in NYC and is currently operating in several markets across the United States — Pennsylvania, Washington, Northern California, and New Jersey.

Role Description: As a Sr. Data Scientist at Quartet, you will work in collaboration with other data scientists, bioinformaticians and platform engineers. In this role, you will build machine learning models and recommendation services to enable our applications to suggest timely and appropriate behavioral health care interventions for patients. You'll work with datasets that include millions of detailed medical, pharmacy, lab claims, EHR, and application data. You will help with development and validation of new algorithms that enhance our system in terms of scalability, reliability and accuracy. The ideal candidate will be an entrepreneurial, motivated data scientist who is well-versed in data analysis and algorithm implementation and eager to learn new things and make an impact on the industry. Health data experience is a plus, but it's not necessary.

Responsibilities:
Work with an interdisciplinary technical team to develop statistical models in Quartet’s platform.
Apply data mining and machine learning techniques to develop better personalization and recommendation for patients’ and doctors’ needs.
Design and develop effective models, features, and algorithms involving multiple datasets - user activity, EHR, ADT, medical claims, pharmacy claims, lab test claims etc.
Derive insights from descriptive analysis that drive a data-informed process for experimenting with new products to improve patient outcomes.
Qualifications:
Experience building high quality data products.
7+ years experience as a data scientist, software engineer with predictive modeling, or similar experience of solving real problems with data mining and machine learning techniques.
PhD or Master’s Degree in computer science, machine learning, applied statistics, physics, or a related quantitative discipline.
Proficiency in building Machine Learning (supervised and unsupervised) models and recommendation systems.
Strong knowledge of mathematical fundamentals: probability theory, linear algebra and statistics.
Ability to execute, starting from problem definition, to a working implementation.
Ability to clearly communicate across disciplines and work collaboratively.
Proficiency in Python and code versioning systems like git.
Expertise with data science toolkits like scikit-learn and pandas.
Knowledge of software architectures and tools such as Scala, Hadoop.
Familiarity working in a Linux server-based environment.
Employee Benefits for Quartet include: Unlimited vacation, volunteer opportunities, catered lunches, snacks, team events and outings, full medical, dental + vision coverage, generous parental leave, commuter benefits, 15 free therapy sessions + unlimited copay reimbursements for mental healthcare, 401K, ESPP, gym benefits.

Want to know what Quartet life is like? Click here to meet our team. Quartet is committed to building a diverse team and fostering an inclusive culture, and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We embrace and encourage our employees' differences in race, religion, color, national origin, gender, family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, veteran status, disability, pregnancy, medical conditions, and other characteristics. Headhunters and recruitment agencies may not submit resumes/CVs through this Web site or directly to managers. Quartet does not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes. Quartet will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with Quartet. Please note: Quartet interview requests and job offers only originate from quartethealth.com email addresses (e.g. jsmith@quartethealth.com). Quartet will also never ask for bank information (e.g. account and routing number), social security numbers, passwords, or other sensitive information to be delivered via email. If you receive a scam email or wish to report a security issue involving Quartet, please notify us at: security@quartethealth.com.

Have someone to refer? Email talent@quartethealth.com to submit their details to us.",3.9,Quartet Health,"New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,6,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,57.5,NY,4815,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
1496,496,Data Science Team Lead,$43k-$72k,"Artlin Consulting is seeking a Data Science Team Lead to join our staff as a key contributor on an Executive-level Department of Defense Analytic team, leveraging knowledge of data science, methodologies, and processing techniques to support analytics and gather data from disparate Federal, Defense and public databases in support of Major Weapon System acquisition and program management. The individual in this role will work directly with Department leadership and a diverse analytical research cell.

Position Overview:

Directs and supervises a team of 4 data scientists from junior to expert.
Reports to senior leaders the status, risks, and issues of a variety of data science tasks.
Applies technical and analytical techniques to explore and examine data from multiple disparate sources with the goal of discovering patterns and previously hidden insights, providing process efficiencies, or addressing a pressing business problem.
Apply expertise in computer science, software development, and the latest technologies to design and implement analysis infrastructure and tools, analytic workflow processes, automations, and complex data visualizations.
Creates informational briefings that explain methodologies and analytical findings to peers and customer stakeholders.

Required Education/Experience/Skills:

Active DoD Secret security clearance.
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, or other related fields.
5+ years of relevant work experience.
Strong team-building skills as well as confidence when working with senior leadership and peers.
Experience with Business Intelligence (BI) Tools such as MS Excel, Advana, Qlik, R, Python, or similar.
Experience leveraging programming languages to script the extraction, formatting, and transformation of data from a wide variety of organizational system.
Microsoft Project, Excel and PowerPoint.

Desired Education/Experience/Skills:

Master's Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, or other related fields.
Experience with Business Intelligence Tools like Alterix, Tableau, or similar.
Big data and cloud processing experience.
SQL Database experience.
DoD/Federal Government experience.

Artlin Consulting, LLC is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",4.1,Artlin Consulting,"Alexandria, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,9,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,57.5,VA,2249,1,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
1497,497,Data Scientist/ Analyst,$43k-$72k,"Join our Renewables Operations team in Houston, TX or Chicago, IL as a Renewable Generation Performance Engineer.

In this role, you will be responsible for support functions relating to solar generation facilities betterment, facilities efficiency of monitoring and reporting (via automation), plant performance measurements, and maintain supplier and service provider relationships as it relates to generation portfolio performance. This position reports directly to the Director Performance Monitoring & Analytics.

What you’ll do:
Help facilitate improvement / automation of operations and reporting tasks via SQL procedures, and other script languages.
Work with site engineers to monitor and evaluate equipment and system performance by examining and trending the results of condition-monitoring activities, reviewing equipment failures, analyzing availability/reliability information. Follow-up actions, based on identified problems, trends, and root cause determinations, are timely and effective.
Improve solar site performance by providing recommendations regarding availability, production and reliability issues/initiatives to Engie site and senior level management.
Lead standardization of operations and maintenance and engineering processes including reporting functions
Work with various internal and external groups including engineering and technical support personnel, site operating personnel and Engie global performance teams other teams in Asset Management.
Support the site in developing (RCA’s) for inverters, trackers, and panel faults and failures and work OEM ‘s to provide upgrades and develop implementation plans to remedy.
Manage solar equipment suppliers’ technical resources to ensure focus on priorities and achieve performance improvement targets by being ENGIE’s technical point of contact.
Support operational reviews, solar site commissioning, end of warranty inspections and procurement to ensure proper equipment selection and operation
Ability to travel for short term assignments as required.
Act as a team member with all employees of the solar sites and collaborate with members of the ENGIE team at other sites across various businesses.
Work multiple projects concurrently including supporting future business development projects.

Qualifications

What you bring:
Bachelor’s degree in engineering or computer science required, computer credits certifications a plus.
Minimum two years of relevant experience.
Desired working knowledge of wind and/or solar power generation equipment, and applicable SCADA control and HMI systems.
Possess strong planning, scheduling and project management skills with the ability to plan and work independently.
Possess strong computer and analytical skills; ability to use and program databases (SQL, Python, Pearl, BASH). Expertise of Microsoft Office (excel pivot tables, advanced formula’s)
Expertise using VM environments like Virtual box, Azure and AWS.
Desired working knowledge of Linux.
Must have and be able to maintain a valid driver’s license.

Why ENGIE?
ENGIE North America isn’t just participating in the Zero-Carbon transition, we’re leading it! Join us as we develop energy that is more renewable, more efficient and more accessible to everyone.

Unite with us in leading the transformation of the world of energy! ENGIE is looking for talented and motivated individuals to create the future of energy and customer solutions. Join a rewarding and flexible work environment that encourages innovation and creativity to help customers meet their energy challenges today and in the future. Are you up for the challenge?

ENGIE is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability.

This job advertisement is supported by the ENGIE Talent Acquisition team. All related inquiries must be communicated through Talent Acquisition and not directed to ENGIE North America Managers. Failure to follow the ENA process may result in nonpayment of agency fees.

Job
: Operations / Production sites
Primary Location
: North America-United States-Texas-Houston North America-United States-Illinois-Chicago
Organization
: ENA Renewables
Schedule
: Full-time
Nature of Responsibility
: Senior professionnal / Team leader

Job Posting
: Aug 28, 2020, 10:06:48 PM",3.6,ENGIE North America Inc.,"Houston, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,25,Company - Public,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,57.5,TX,4263,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
1500,0,Data Scientist,$111k-$175k,"COMPANY

AccuWeather, recognized and documented as the most accurate source of weather forecasts and warnings in the world, has saved tens of thousands of lives, prevented hundreds of thousands of injuries and tens of billions of dollars in property damage. With global headquarters in State College, PA and other offices around the world, AccuWeather serves more than 1.5 billion people daily to help them plan their lives and get more out of their day through innovative digital media properties, such as AccuWeather.com and mobile, as well as Business Solutions (AFB), radio, television, newspapers, and the 24/7 AccuWeather Network.

Additionally, AccuWeather produces and distributes news, weather content, and video for more than 180,000 third-party websites. Among AccuWeather's many innovative and award-winning features free to the public are MinuteCast® Minute by Minute™ forecasts with Superior Accuracy™. Further, AccuWeather serves more than half of Fortune 500 companies and thousands of businesses globally.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Work with multiple data formats, databases, and storage technologies to perform comprehensive analysis and report findings.
Partner with different departments to determine needs, scope solutions, and communicate findings to non-technical audiences.
Independently perform data cleaning, merging, analysis, and visualization including predictive analytics, statistical modeling, and machine learning.
Visualize and communicate results.
Engage in cloud-based development & implementation of machine learning.
Explore, test, and implement methods that perform machine learning techniques that will leverage some of the largest datasets on the planet.
Design and build technology that supports continuous improvements in machine learning driven forecasting systems.
Support AccuWeather labs innovation efforts.
Keep abreast with best practices and trends.
QUALIFICATIONS:
B.S. or M.S. (preferred) in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Meteorology or a similar, relevant field.
Experience working with and deploying projects in a cloud infrastructure.
Experience accessing and working with scientific data sets.
Familiarity working with large datasets leveraging technology that may include BigQuery, AWS Athena, Tableau, and/or Power BI
Analyzing data through R and/or Python
Familiarity with one or more RTB ad management & DSP & SSP platforms
Deep mathematical and technical understanding of many AI methodologies.
Excellent organizational and time management skills.
Desire and interest in keeping up to date on what is and what is new in data science.
AccuWeather is proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity to all applicants and existing employees and we evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, creed, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy and gender identity/expression), sexual orientation, age, ancestry, physical or mental disability, marital status, political affiliation, religion, citizenship status, genetic information, veteran status, or any other basis protected under applicable federal, state, or local law. View the EEO is the Law poster here and its supplement here. The pay transparency policy is available here.

AccuWeather is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodations to individuals with disabilities. If you need a reasonable accommodation because of a disability for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to human.resources@accuweather.com and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.",3.7,AccuWeather,Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,58,Company - Private,other_industries,Media,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,143.0,Remote,3618,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1501,1,Data Scientist,$111k-$175k,"C3.ai is a leading enterprise AI software provider for accelerating digital transformation. The comprehensive and proven C3 AI Suite uses a model-driven abstraction layer to enable organizations to develop, deploy, and operate enterprise scale AI applications 40x to 100x faster than alternative approaches. www.c3.ai

As a Data Scientist, you will participate in the definition of new analytics capabilities able to provide our customers with the information they need to make proper decisions to support our customers in operating the internet of things (IoT). In addition, you will help find the appropriate machine learning / data mining algorithms to answer these questions. Finally, you will be responsible for implementing this into the product and making it available to our customers.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve similar results at large-scale.

Your Responsibilities:
Driving adoption of Deep Learning systems into next-generation of C3.ai products.
Designing and deploying Machine Learning algorithms for industrial applications such as fraud detection and predictive maintenance.
Collaborating with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields.
Applied Machine Learning experience (regression and classification, supervised, and unsupervised learning).
Strong mathematical background (linear algebra, calculus, probability and statistics).
Experience with scalable ML (MapReduce, streaming).
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team.
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference.
Excellent verbal and written communication.
Preferred
Experience with JavaScript and prototyping languages such as Python and R. Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
Knowledge in electrical engineering and cyber-physical systems is a plus.
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.) is a plus.
C3.ai provides a competitive compensation package and excellent benefits including:
Competitive salary, generous stock options, 401K, medical, dental, and vision benefits. At the office, we offer a fully stocked kitchen with catered breakfast and lunch, table tennis and pool table, free membership at our on-site gym, Friday evening social hours with food, drink and music and a fun team of great people.
C3.ai is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status.",4.5,C3.ai,"Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,11,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,143.0,CA,2849,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1503,3,Data Scientist,$111k-$175k,"Description

Job Description:

This role uses Data Science and Engineering techniques to satisfy customer requirements. This role evaluates and uses algorithms for Natural Language Processing (NLP), Artificial Intelligence (AI), and Machine Learning (ML). This role develops scripts, notebooks or applications (using Python or Java and associated libraries or frameworks: Scikit-Learn, Numpy, Tensorflow, Pytorch, Spark, Spark MLlib, H20.ai, etc.) that utilize, collect, aggregate and clean large data sets to perform analysis, clustering, entity resolution and structured information extraction for work products. Models are trained and refined using these tools and evaluated for effectiveness using appropriate criteria/metrics for the task. This role collaborates across a team of Data Scientists, Data Administrators, Software and Data Engineers to produce work products.

Primary Responsibilities

This role designs and develops methods, processes, and systems to consolidate and analyze structured and unstructured, diverse sources including big data sources.
This role develops and uses advanced software programs, algorithms, query techniques, model complex business problems, and automated processes to cleanse, integrate, and evaluate datasets.
This role supports objectives and tasks by leveraging numerous tools and techniques to include Python, Splunk, query experience, R and the like.
Works with cross-discipline teams to ensure connectivity between various data sources and business problems.
Identifies meaningful insights and interprets and communicates findings and recommendations.
This role develops algorithms and analytical techniques to improve business performance.
Maintains awareness of emerging analytics and big-data technologies.

Basic Qualifications

Master’s degree in engineering, computer science, or other related technical field or Bachelor’s degree in a business or management-related field accompanied by experience managing technical requirements in complex programs.
Experience with Python, Splunk, and query experience is required.
Experience negotiating complex scenarios and challenges and devising courses of action to resolve situations with predictable outcomes.
Experience leading critical objectives where decision making is of utmost concern to the outcome.
Experience supervising others.

Education

Candidate must have Masters with 12-15 years of prior relevant experience or Doctorate with 8+ years of prior relevant experience.

Clearance

Candidate must have an active TS/SCI with polygraph.

NSOINT

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph

Travel:
No

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world's toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company's 33,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Virginia, Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $10.19 billion for the fiscal year ended December 28, 2018. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.6,Leidos,"Reston, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,51,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,143.0,VA,4572,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,1
1504,4,Senior IT Data Scientist - Operations,$111k-$175k,"Job Description

Job Title: Senior IT Data Scientist - Operations

City: Lake Forest / State: Illinois

Job Description

Join Reynolds Consumer Products… a world of opportunities! At Reynolds Consumer Products, we are passionate about achieving results and have fun winning as a team! We provide amazing job opportunities for growth with competitive salaries and benefits in an exciting, dynamic, fast-paced, and fun workplace environment. Are you looking to build a strong career and make a positive impact? Then we have an opportunity for you! We currently have an opportunity for an Operations Senior Data Scientist to join our team located at our Company Headquarters in Lake Forest, IL.

Your Role:

As an Operations Senior Data Scientist, you will primarily be responsible for solving operations problems by processing and analyzing data from multiple sources to identify meaningful relationships, patterns and trends. You will prepare data insights and proposals in narrative and visual forms and leverage advanced data science methods to discover opportunities to increase equipment effectiveness, reduce costs and provide insights to plants on process disruptions. You will have the opportunity to:
Improve the manufacturing process by formulating hypotheses, conducting experiments and delivering improvements to KPIs based on findings
Maintain and tune analytical models to predict and monitor the condition of plant equipment
Influence manufacturing decision makers by presenting statistical insights
Ensure our manufacturing operations operate at peak efficiency
Ultimately, you will be a vitally important team member in our Digital Manufacturing Group and help Reynolds Consumer Products succeed by leveraging data insights.

You will love it here if…
You are not only a team-player, but you foster a collaborative team environment
You are analytic, enjoy new challenges and thrive in a fast paced manufacturing operation
You are committed to operational excellence and to keeping others safe in the workplace
We need you to have:
A strong proficiency in statistical analysis methods and tools, e.g., Python, Machine Learning
3-5 years of experience in data model development, data visualization, and application of advanced analytics to drive business outcomes
3-5 years of experience in the design and implementation of data infrastructures and data hierarchies
Experience in AWS Analytics platform
SQL query skills
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
BA/BS in Data Analytics, Engineering, Business, or a related field
Icing on the cake:
Experience developing and implementing predictive maintenance and predictive quality models
Data visualization skills in Power BI
Prior experience working in operations research or related field, e.g., Industrial Engineering or Manufacturing
For applicants or employees who are disabled, or require a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application or hiring process, you may request assistance by calling us at (847)482-3550 or email Recruitment@ReynoldsBrands.com.

No recruiter calls or emails please.

Reynolds Consumer Products is an Equal Opportunity Employer EEO AA M/F/Vet/Disability.

Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, national origin, sex, protected veteran status or disability.

Reynolds Consumer Products is an Equal Opportunity Employer that complies with the laws and regulations set forth in the following EEO is The Law Poster: http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf

The Pay Transparency Policy Statement can be found on this link:

http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/PayTransparencyNondiscrimination.html

The poster and the supplement can be found on this link.

http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/ofccpost.htm

For applicants or employees who are disabled, or require a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application or hiring process, you may request assistance by calling us at (847)482-3550 or email Recruitment@ReynoldsBrands.com.

No recruiter calls or emails please.",3.5,Reynolds Consumer Products,"Lake Forest, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,10,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,143.0,IL,4082,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1506,6,"Sr. Manager, Supply Chain Business Intelligence and Data Science",$111k-$175k,"At Niagara, we’re looking for Team Members who want to be part of achieving our mission to provide our customers the highest quality most affordable bottled water.

Consider applying here, if you want to:

Work in an entrepreneurial and dynamic environment with a chance to make an impact.
Develop lasting relationships with great people.
Have the opportunity to build a satisfying career.

We offer competitive compensation and benefits packages for our Team Members.

Sr. Manager, Supply Chain Business Intelligence and Data Science

The Supply Chain Business Intelligence (BI) team owns data visibility and insights initiatives within the Supply Chain department. BI, together with Continuous Improvement (CI) and Training teams makes up the recently established “Supply Chain Solutions” team. This team plays a central role in defining the future of how Niagara’s Supply Chain department will operate and whether the company itself will be able to maintain a competitive advantage in our market space. The BI team support all Supply Chain functions: Planning, Procurement, Logistics, and Customer Service.

The Senior Manager of Supply Chain Business Intelligence is a Supply Chain leader who understands data from both operational/strategic points of view and is responsible for providing “Data-to-Insight” (BI) tools to support and enhance business strategies. Said leader will act as the main conduit between Supply Chain and IT as well as collaborate with other BI units housed within Finance/ Manufacturing/ Engineering. As such, s/he will be responsible for developing a roadmap and portfolio of all B.I. and technology projects necessary to support the long-term competitive needs of the entire supply chain department as well as the company as a whole. This individual will lead a team of business intelligence analysts who own the end to end for implementing data marts, ad-hoc self-serve reports, and dashboards to empower the broader group of business users.

Furthermore, Data Science will be an integral part of this role. As an organization, we are very keen on exploration in this area and leveraging it to perpetuate our competitive advantage in the coming decade. With this backdrop in mind, we seeking a candidate who has significant hands-on experience working on “Data Insight” type initiative where Data Science concepts were rigorously applied within a framework of best-of-breed Data Science toolsets. This is in addition to and not in lieu of the more traditional BI responsibilities and demonstrated leadership skillset that were laid out in the proceeding segment.

Essential Functions

Serves as a key point of contact for all data visibility and insights initiatives within the Supply Chain department and supports initiatives undertaken by cross-functional process improvement teams.
Coordinates with Supply Chain leadership and develops BI technology and Data Science capability roadmaps for all Supply Chain functions; primary partners include: Logistics, Customer Service, Procurement, Strategic Planning, as well as non-Supply Chain functional partners such as Finance/IT.
Injects direct Data Science know-how into the organization, including skillset and experience working within a robust Data Science platform such as Amazon SageMaker and RapidMiner.
Ensures that the necessary data architecture and software tools are available to allow for insightful and impactful machine learning, big data, and statistical analyses.
Leads the development of various predictive analytics/optimization/heuristics based models.
Employs data mining, data warehousing, segmentation, and other analytical techniques to capture important trends and create relevant measurement dashboards in platforms such as IBM Cognos, Tableau, Informatica, and Oracle OBIEE/OACS.
Understands the functional and technical design/architecture of ERP/OTM/WMS/EDI technologies.
Maintains continued enhancements and augmentations to existing B.I. tools and supply chain technology solutions.
Monitors and manages data issues and establish plans for ensuring data quality and integrity between transaction source systems and reporting environments.
Spearheads the development of policies, processes, standards, and best practices in data and integration management.
Develops and executes a strategy to provision business users with very accessible daily technical support answering analytical & technology related questions.
Publishes periodic updates on status of various initiatives to all Supply Chain team members and key stakeholders in other departments.
Collaborates with Continuous Improvement team to re-engineer processes, software enhancements, and KPIs framework to fully leverage our ever advancing BI capabilities.
Collaborates with Supply Chain Training team and Supply Chain leaders to administer appropriate trainings necessary to standardize technology usage.

Please note this job description is not designed to contain a comprehensive list of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without prior notice.

Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications:
6 Years – Experience in Technology Consulting or Data Analytics
6 Years – Experience in or supporting Operations/Strategy
4 Years – Experience managing people and projects
experience may include a combination of work experience and education
Preferred Qualifications:
10+ Years– Experience in Technology Consulting or Data Analytics
10+ Years – Experience in or supporting Operations/Strategy
6 Years – Experience managing people and projects
experience may include a combination of work experience and education
Competencies

Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Self-motivated with a proven record of taking the initiative
Ability to adjust and execute in a very dynamic and ever-changing environment
Ability to excel and deliver results working cross-functionally in a matrix environment
Technology acumen – Strong knowledge of latest Supply Chain integration technologies such as EDI, Web Services, Block Chain and etc.
Software skills – Subject Matter Expert level knowledge/experience in enterprise systems such as Oracle EBS, JDA, Logility
Leadership – Displays passion and optimism; Inspires and motivates others to perform well; Influences actions and opinions of others
People Management and Development – Fosters a quality focus in others; Builds upon areas of strength; Designs and executes plan to improve areas of weakness
Change Management – Communicates changes, builds commitment, and overcomes resistance
Oral Communication – Speaks clearly and persuasively in both positive and negative situations; Demonstrates ability to communicate well with other team members and with non-technical end users; Demonstrates refined and comprehensive presentation skills
Written Communication – Writes clearly and informatively; Presents numerical data effectively; Able to read and interpret intricate written information and data

This position embodies the values of Niagara’s LIFE competency model, focusing on the following key drivers of success:

Lead Like an Owner
Provides strategic input and oversight to departmental projects
Skilled in reducing costs and managing timelines while prioritizing long run impact
Leads/facilitates discussions to get positive outcomes for the customer
Makes strategic and sustainable data driven decisions which prioritize the needs of the customer over departmental/individual goals
InnovACT
Continuously evaluates existing programs and processes, and develops new initiatives to increase efficiency and reduce waste
Creates, monitors, and responds to departmental performance metrics to drive continuous improvement
Communicates a clear vision, organizes resources effectively, and adjusts the strategy as needed when managing change
Find a Way
Demonstrates ability to think analytically and synthesize complex information
Effectively delegates technical tasks to subordinates
Works effectively with depts, vendors, and customers to achieve organizational success
Identifies opportunities for collaboration in strategic ways
Empowered to be Great
Engages in long term talent planning
Provides opportunities for the development of all direct reports
Understands, identifies, and addresses conflict within own team and between teams

Education

Minimum Required:
Bachelor's Degree in Supply Chain/Information Technology/Business Analytics/Systems Engineering/Data Science or other related field
Preferred:
Master's Degree in Supply Chain/Information Technology/Business Analytics/Systems Engineering/Data Science or other related field

Certification/License:

Required: N/A
Preferred: APICS CPIM/CSCP, PMP PMI

Foreign Language

Required: None Required
Preferred: None Required

Any employment agency, person or entity that submits a résumé into this career site or to a hiring manager does so with the understanding that the applicant's résumé will become the property of Niagara Bottling, LLC. Niagara Bottling, LLC will have the right to hire that applicant at its discretion without any fee owed to the submitting employment agency, person or entity.

Employment agencies that have fee agreements with Niagara Bottling, LLC and have been engaged on a search shall submit résumé to the designated Niagara Bottling, LLC recruiter or, upon authorization, submit résumé into this career site to be eligible for placement fees.",3.6,Niagara Bottling,"Diamond Bar, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,57,Company - Private,manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,143.0,CA,9466,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
1508,8,Manager of Data Science,$111k-$175k,"At Niagara, we’re looking for Team Members who want to be part of achieving our mission to provide our customers the highest quality most affordable bottled water.

Consider applying here, if you want to:

Work in an entrepreneurial and dynamic environment with a chance to make an impact.
Develop lasting relationships with great people.
Have the opportunity to build a satisfying career.

We offer competitive compensation and benefits packages for our Team Members.

Manager of Data Science

Our growing Business Intelligence team, is responsible for Niagara’s manufacturing data insights, aptitude, and system solutions as an integral part of driving business growth and improvement. As part of this team, the Manager of Data Science is responsible for establishing and leading a world-class data science team, by leveraging analytic insights to inform business decisions and improve business strategies. Data science responsibilities primarily focus on our comprehensive manufacturing operations, as well as cross-functional initiatives with IT, Supply Chain, Engineering, Finance, and Asset Management.

The Manager of Data Science is responsible for effectively building, developing and engaging a team of manufacturing BI and data science analysts, while also serving as a broader organizational leader. The leader of data science proactively works with business executives and various key stakeholders across the business to provide advanced data modeling systems, design & launch innovative complex models, utilizing modern and traditional techniques/methodologies. The manager of data science serves as an essential part of Niagara’s long-term strategy and vision by delivering business solutions based on analytic insights.

Essential Functions

Leveraging a “hands-on” approach, oversee all manufacturing business intelligence and data science activities ensuring alignment with departmental and business-wide vision and strategies.
Generate value through data science; create and implement the data science strategy/roadmap in alignment with our company strategy, linking data-related activities to business results.
Work in coordination with business stakeholders to proactively identify and address priority business questions.
Build the business’s data science competency and talent needs through role definition, and development of a team of data scientists.
Drive business analytics and capabilities; answering key business questions using innovative analytic and data science techniques.
Driving operational excellence; managing team productivity and quality of deliverables. Ensure consistent adoption of standards, processes and methodologies.
Designs, develops and implements a broad array of business analytics that solve complex problems. Identifies new opportunities to further leverage analytics, data and analytical tools.
Ensures best practice adoption within stated areas of responsibility, applying appropriate levels of technical capability, standardization and subject matter expertise.
Proactively manages static BI reporting and ad hoc analytics requests, ensuring consistent quality and timeliness in delivery to business stakeholders.
Drive education and evangelization of data sciences throughout the business by communicating the vision and use cases of advanced analytics.
Works closely with other data and analytics teams, inclusive of data analytics, data warehousing, and data engineering teams in creating big data applications through the utilization of structured and unstructured data, designing optimal data architecture, and experimenting on new machine learning techniques.
Monitor trends in key business KPIs, providing valuable insights to relevant departments for overall business performance improvement.
Collaborate with external data and analytics partners. Lead the development and design of the departmental vision, capabilities, infrastructure, and roadmap of data sciences capabilities.
Please note this job description is not designed to contain a comprehensive list of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without prior notice.

Competencies

Experience with scripting languages (R, Python, SQL, Java, etc.)
Experience in various enterprise resource solution tools such as Oracle ERP, Oracle EBS, and Oracle OBIEE/OACS.
Proven strong aptitude in data visualization platforms such as Tableau, Alteryx, PowerBI, Cognos, Grafana.
Proven strong aptitude in data science platforms such as MS Azure, RapidMiner
Experienced in Manufacturing Execution Systems / Efficiency Improvement Analysis Applications
New System Implementation & Administration
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques.
Proficiency in Microsoft Office applications (Excel, Word, PowerPoint, and Access)
Entrepreneurial; Initiative and resourcefulness with limited guidance.
Leadership – Engaging, passionate, courageous leader who inspires and influences team members of all levels with humility and respect
Project Management – Detail oriented with the ability to prioritize multiple tasks and projects and complete assignments quickly and accurately.
Problem Solving – Identifies and resolves problems in a timely manner; gathers and analyzes information skillfully
Oral Communication - Speaks clearly and persuasively; Demonstrates ability to communicate well with other team members and with non-technical end users; demonstrates presentation skills.
Team Work - Balances team and individual responsibilities; contributes to building a positive team spirit; able to build morale and group commitments to goals and objectives.
Written Communication - Writes clearly and informatively; presents numerical data effectively

Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications:
4 Years – Experience in Field or similar
2 Years – Experience managing people/projects
experience may include a combination of work experience and education
Preferred Qualifications:
6 Years – Experience in Field or similar
4 Years – Experience managing people/projects
experience may include a combination of work experience and education
Education

Minimum Required:
Bachelor's Degree (Machine learning, Computer Science, Statistics, Engineering or similar.)
Master's Degree (Machine learning, Computer Science, Statistics, Engineering or similar.)

Any employment agency, person or entity that submits a résumé into this career site or to a hiring manager does so with the understanding that the applicant's résumé will become the property of Niagara Bottling, LLC. Niagara Bottling, LLC will have the right to hire that applicant at its discretion without any fee owed to the submitting employment agency, person or entity.

Employment agencies that have fee agreements with Niagara Bottling, LLC and have been engaged on a search shall submit résumé to the designated Niagara Bottling, LLC recruiter or, upon authorization, submit résumé into this career site to be eligible for placement fees.",3.6,Niagara Bottling,"Diamond Bar, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,57,Company - Private,manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,143.0,CA,7030,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
1511,11,Principal Data Scientist,$111k-$175k,"Technology. Flexibility. Diversity. At the center of it all are the Digital Accelerator and Advanced Analytics teams at Cummins, working together as a high-energy startup within a Fortune 500 organization. At this Midwestern technology hub, today’s sharpest, most curious minds transform what-ifs into realities.

#LifeAtCummins is about POWERING YOUR POTENTIAL .You’ll have global opportunities to develop your career and make your community a better place - to break ground professionally and be your best personally.

About Digital Accelerator and Advanced Analytics:

Cummins' Digital Accelerator functions as our own tech startup, with strategic access to Fortune 150 resources and talents. Steering the innovation of new experiences for customers, Digital Accelerator is boldly transforming Cummins into a modern and agile technology company. Through the conception, build and launch of inspiring digital solutions, the unique hub of vision and creativity leverages open architecture, connectivity, big data, advanced analytics, internet-of-things, edge computing and more, to drive the company forward on its journey towards smart technologies.

This is an exciting opportunity in Columbus, IN for a Principal Data Scientist. This is an active business facing role where you will work and collaborate with teams to solve problems in a results, customer centric environment.

Your impact will happen in these and other ways:

Manages and Implements advanced analytics projects which solve complex analytical problems using quantitative approaches through a combination of analytical, mathematical and technical skills.
Researches, designs, implements and validates cutting-edge algorithms to analyze diverse sources of data to achieve targeted outcomes by leveraging complex statistical and predictive modeling concepts, machine-learning approaches, clustering and classification techniques.
Liaises with business stakeholders and leverages business knowledge to industrialize and monetize insights from advanced analytics projects.
Leads key objectives and business goals through the use of data science methodology.
Leverages data science methodology to solve complex business problems.
Creates algorithms using more complex statistical methodologies through the use of statistical programming languages and tools.
Partners with domain experts to verify model capabilities and translate modeling outputs from statistical inferences into business language.
Partners with Solution Architect to enable appropriate data flow/data model, development using appropriate tools/technology, rapid prototyping and informs the design of analytical products.
Trains and mentors less experienced employees on data science tools and methodologies.
Continuous development and advancement of the organization through knowledge sharing and collaboration.
Participates in planning for advancement of the Data Science profession.

Qualifications

Experience:

Significant experience in a relevant discipline area is required with a demonstrated track record of analyzing complex business systems and large data sets. Knowledge of the latest technologies and trends in data science is highly preferred and includes:

Familiarity analyzing complex business systems, industry requirements, and/or data regulations
Background in processing and managing large data sets
Applied knowledge of big data, open source and third party toolsets
SQL query language
Clustered compute cloud-based implementation experience
Experience in building analytical solutions
Experience coaching on implementation of machine learning solutions

Significant experiences in the following are preferred:

Designing and implementing Big Data platform solutions using open source and third-party tools
Microsoft Azure and/or Amazon Web services environment
Experience in Agile software development
Familiarity with validation and testing of machine learning systems
Familiarity with Continuous Integration and Continuous Delivery (CI/CD)

Manage the analytics technical road map in collaboration with supported delivery partners
Design analytics solution approach in collaboration with delivery partners
Provide design direction and technical guidance to developments teams
Oversee in-use model performance and corrective action
Manage activities of a small team of employees

Skills

Programming - Creates, writes and tests computer code, test scripts, and build scripts using algorithmic analysis and design, industry standards and tools, version control, and build and test automation to meet business, technical, security, governance and compliance requirements.

Data Mining - Extracts insights from data by identifying relationships and patterns through use of a suite of data exploration and data visualization techniques to understand the underlying structure of the data and enable sound conclusions upon model building.

Predictive Modeling - Develops analytical or machine learning models by using appropriate variable transformations, feature selection strategies, imputation strategies, class rebalancing, resampling strategies and quality control measures to generate predictive insights used in solving business questions.

Statistical Modeling - Develops descriptive and explanatory statistical models, and simulations for regression, classification, outlier detection, anomaly detection, time series forecasting using knowledge of foundational statistics such as null hypotheses significance tests, regression models, generalized linear modeling, time series analysis, rank statistics, probability distribution fitting survival analysis, etc. to validate hypotheses for any given statistical or business question.

Problem Solving - Solves problems using a systematic analysis process by leveraging industry standard methodologies to create problem traceability and protect the customer; determines the assignable cause; implements robust, data-based solutions; identifies the systemic root causes and recommended actions to prevent problem reoccurrence.

Requirements Analysis - Evaluates relationships and interdependencies between requirements based upon their complexity and value to the business in order to determine feasibility and prioritization.

Strategic Roadmap Planning - Produces a high-level, multi-year product and capability roadmap utilizing internal and external business resource, asset and market knowledge and experience to communicate the organization's focus and priorities to internal and external stakeholders.

Tech savvy - Anticipating and adopting innovations in business-building digital and technology applications.

Manages complexity - Making sense of complex, high quantity, and sometimes contradictory information to effectively solve problems.

Collaborates - Building partnerships and working collaboratively with others to meet shared objectives.

Develops talent - Developing people to meet both their career goals and the organization’s goals.

Communicates Effectively - Developing and delivering multi-mode communications that convey a clear understanding of the unique needs of different audiences.

Education, Licenses, Certifications

College, university or equivalent degree or equivalent work experience in relevant technical discipline is required.
This position may require licensing for compliance with export controls or sanctions regulations.

Compensation and Benefits

Base salary rate commensurate with experience. Additional benefits vary between locations and include options such as our 401(k) Retirement Savings Plan, Cash Balance Pension Plan, Medical/Dental/Life Insurance, Health Savings Account, Domestic Partners Coverage and a full complement of personal and professional benefits.

Cummins and E-verify

At Cummins, we are an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer dedicated to diversity in the workplace. Our policy is to provide equal employment opportunities to all qualified persons without regard to race, gender, color, disability, national origin, age, religion, union affiliation, sexual orientation, veteran status, citizenship, gender identity and/or expression, or other status protected by law. Cummins validates right to work using E-Verify. Cummins will provide the Social Security Administration (SSA) and, if necessary, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS), with information from each new employee’s Form I-9 to confirm work authorization.

Ready to think beyond your desk? Apply for this opportunity to start your career with Cummins today.careers.cummins.com

Not ready to apply but want to learn more? Join our Talent Community to get the inside track on great jobs and confidentially connect to our recruiting team: https://www.cumminstalentcommunity.com/profile/join/

#DAAAI

Job
SYSTEMS/INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Primary Location
United States-Indiana-Columbus-US, IN, Columbus, Sears Building
Job Type
Experienced - Exempt / Office
Recruitment Job Type Exempt - Experienced
Job Posting
Jul 23, 2020, 8:42:21 PM
Unposting Date
Ongoing",3.9,Cummins Inc.,"Columbus, IN",-1,10000+ Employees,101,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,143.0,IN,9012,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1512,12,Principal/Sr Principal Data Scientist 3/4 - (TS/SCI/Poly),$111k-$175k,"Research and Sciences

Qualifications:

At the heart of Defining Possible is our commitment to missions. In rapidly changing global security environments, Northrop Grumman brings informed insights and software-secure technology to enable strategic planning. We're looking for innovators who can help us keep building on our wide portfolio of secure, affordable, integrated, and multi-domain systems and technologies that fuel those missions. By joining in our shared mission, we'll support yours of expanding your personal network and developing skills, whether you are new to the field or an industry thought-leader. At Northrop Grumman, you'll have the resources, support, and team to do some of the best work of your career.

Are you interested in expanding your career through experience and exposure, all while supporting a mission that seeks to ensure the security of our nation and its allies? If so, then Northrop Grumman is the place for you. As a leading global security company, we provide innovative systems, products and solutions to our customers worldwide. We are comprised of diverse professionals that bring different perspectives and ideas, understanding that the more experiences we bring to our work the more innovative we can be. As we continue to build our workforce, we look for people that exemplify our core values, leadership characteristics, and approach to innovation.

Northrop Grumman Mission Systems has an exciting opportunity for a Principal / Sr Principal Data Scientist who will be a member of a program's Data Science Team. Our ideal candidate will create data exploitation architectures/models/protocols, statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies to identify trends in large data sets.

This position will be based in Chantilly, VA.

This position may be filled as a level 3 or level 4.

CIMS
NGMSCIMS",3.8,Northrop Grumman,"Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,81,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,143.0,VA,1851,1,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1513,13,Data Scientist,$111k-$175k,"Location: * Davenport, IA. Position is in-house, applicants must be willing to commute or relocate.
What we do: *
TapOnIt is revolutionizing the way businesses attract and connect with customers via their powerful messaging platform. A female-founded company launched in April 2015 by Katie Castillo-Wilson and her sister Sara Castillo, TapOnIt has quickly emerged as a leader in message tech space and is ramping up for exponential growth.

How? We leverage direct messages (SMS / MMS) and a rich mobile web interface to deliver meaningful communications to targeted & smart audiences. With text messages having a 99% open-rate - including 90% opened within three minutes of being received - TapOnIt technology delivers immediate visibility and results for brands at a fraction of the cost of traditional forms of advertising. Our tech has continued to evolve over the last five years, and our branded product, TapOnIt Deals, has provided valuable insight and a proven record of success.
You’ll spend time on: *
Maintaining data warehouse
Performing quality control tests
Developing external web services
Utilizing REST APIs to integrate with 3rd party systems
Being part of a highly motivated team working with agile methodologies
Working in an innovative and fast moving environment
Minimum qualifications: *
BSc/MSc in Computer Science, Computer/Electrical Engineering, Machine Learning or similar quantitative discipline
2-3 years of experience in a Data Engineering or similar role
Working experience in SQL (SQL Server, PostgreSQL)
Familiarity with Linux systems will be considered as a plus
Preferred qualifications: *
Knowledge of the mobile industry and text messaging
Able to work in an agile environment
Excellent oral and written English communication skills, willing to work and coordinate with multiple teams for solution delivery
Excellent leadership skills and ability to drive solutions, take initiative, meet deadlines and deliver results.
What we offer: *
A startup environment that is fast-paced, agile and collaborative with few rigid boundaries
Meaningful, hi-tech projects that make a difference
Competitive compensation package with bonus opportunities
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Training according to your desired path and development needs
Free coffee, snacks & company swag
Casual dress code, because we want you to feel comfortable
Hypoallergenic office dog: )
A company culture that values employees’ unique skills and allows them to grow
Equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $70,000.00 - $85,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
We practice social distancing, temperature monitoring, routine cleaning of shared spaces, and have masks and disinfectants available to employees at all times.

Experience:
Data Engineering: 2 years (Required)
Linux: 1 year (Preferred)
SQL Server: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Davenport, IA 52803 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.taponittech.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/taponitdeals/
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",2.8,TapOnIt Mobile Deals,"Davenport, IA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,5,Unknown,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,143.0,IA,3461,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1514,14,Data Scientist,$111k-$175k,"Transforming the future of healthcare isnt something we take lightly. It takes teams of the best and the brightest, working together to make an impact.
As one of the largest healthcare technology companies in the U.S., we are a catalyst to accelerate the journey toward improved lives and healthier communities.
Here at Change Healthcare, were using our influence to drive positive changes across the industry, and we want motivated and passionate people like you to help us continue to bring new and innovative ideas to life.

If youre ready to embrace your passion and do what you love with a company thats committed to supporting your future, then you belong at Change Healthcare.
Pursue purpose. Champion innovation. Earn trust. Be agile. Include all.
Empower Your Future. Make a Difference.


Title:

AI Data Scientist

Overview of Position

The Data Scientist will be responsible for supporting Artificial Intelligence, Machine Learning, and Data Science solutions for Change Healthcare, reporting to an AI Data Science leader under the Chief AI Officer. Were looking for data scientists with a passion for artificial intelligence to help drive a new generation of data and machine learning enabled services and products to impact healthcare.

You will enjoy working with a highly talented and diverse team of data scientists specializing in deep learning, active learning, and classical machine learning, one of the richest data sets in US healthcare, nearly limitless cloud compute resources including Spark clusters and GPUs, and the ability to see your insights turned into real products.

The ideal candidate will have a background in machine learning, have experience working with large data sets, and have some experience in building and deploying data-driven innovative AI solutions. You are focused on results, a self-starter, able to put the customer first, team first, and have demonstrated success in using data science to develop and deploy AI solutions with a focus on customer impact. You also are able to rapidly prototype new ideas and methods to deliver quality code that is testable and concise.

What will be my duties and responsibilities in this job?
Use AI/ML technologies to innovate current Chang Healthcare operations. The tasks of innovation include, but not limited to: Smart revenue management, Intelligent payment platform, medical chart reading, code reading with noisy and incomplete OCR documents, Conversational AI to facilitate customer services and other healthcare related use cases
Work closely with business and operations to understand the business requirements. To be able convert ambiguous requirements to mathematical AI models that can be trained and deployed to solve business problems
Have strong implementation skills to the proposed solutions and work closely with engineering team to create product pipelines that are scalable and flexible
Willing to work in an agile and fast-moving working environment
Passion for learning and innovating at new AI technologies that can facilitate future projects
What are the requirements needed for this position?
Ph.D. in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics, bioinformatics or other hardcore technical fields with profound mathematical training. Proficient in translating unstructured business problems into an abstract mathematical framework
Fluency in one of the scripting languages, such as: Python, Scalar, PySpark and others
Experience with Spark, MapReduce and other big data processing tools is preferred
Familiar with both SQL and noSQL databases, ability to write efficient queries in SQL
Expertise in NLU/NLP, Conversational AI
Expertise with one of the Deep Learning platforms, such as, TensorFlow, Pytorch, and Keras
Expertise in Knowledge Graph and personalization
Ability to initiate and drive projects to completion with minimal guidance
The ability to communicate the results of analyses in a clear and effective manner
Familiar with AWS and its components, such as EMR, S3, EC2, SageMaker. or customer build AI Platform
What other skills/experience would be helpful to have?
Ph.D. with experiences on medical coding, medical chart reading, entity detection, and other reading comprehension using AI/NLP technologies
Ph.D. with experience on big data processing in the areas of Revenue cycle management includes, but not limited to, risk management, payment accuracy, smart reconciliation, etc...
Ph.D. with experiences on conversational AI technologies, such as AI model for intent detection, NER, dialog management and other related components
Experience with medical ontologies, medical Knowledge Graph that links multiple entities, such as patients, providers, and payers. Possess the ability to run large scale inference on top of KG and generate business values
Experience with medical image processing, diagnosis based on images and narratives using AI technologies
Exceptional interpersonal and communication skills, including the ability to describe the logic and implications of a complex model to all types of partners (product managers, engineers, designers, senior executives)
What are the working conditions and physical requirements of this job?
General office demands
Join our team today where we are creating a better coordinated, increasingly collaborative, and more efficient healthcare system!

Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Statement

Change Healthcare is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, national origin, disability, or veteran status. To read more about employment discrimination protections under federal law, read EEO is the Law at https://www.eeoc.gov/employers/eeo-law-poster and the supplemental information at https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/OFCCP_EEO_Supplement_Final_JRF_QA_508c.pdf.

If you need a reasonable accommodation to assist with your application for employment, please contact us by sending an email to applyaccommodations@changehealthcare.com with ""Applicant requesting reasonable accommodation"" as the subject. Resumes or CVs submitted to this email box will not be accepted.

Click here https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/pdf/pay-transp_%20English_formattedESQA508c.pdf to view our pay transparency nondiscrimination policy.

Change Healthcare maintains a drug free workplace and conducts pre-employment drug-testing, where applicable, in accordance with federal, state and local laws.",2.8,Change Healthcare,"Seattle, WA",-1,10000+ Employees,13,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,143.0,WA,6553,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,0
1516,16,Azure Data Engineer,$111k-$175k,"Country:
United States

Cities:
Denver, Los Angeles, Phoenix, San Francisco, Seattle

Area of expertise:
Analytics

Job Description

Why Avanade:
14-time winner of Microsoft Partner of the Year
24,000+ certifications in Microsoft technology
90+ Microsoft partner awards
17 Gold Competencies
3,500 analytics professionals worldwide
1,000 data engineers
Implemented analytics systems for more than 550 clients
400 AI practitioners
300 cognitive service experts

Do you enjoy making sure that information is accessible and easy to use? So do we.

You’re a data designer who knows how to find, store and present a range of information from different sources so that everyone can access what they need quickly and simply, and use it effectively.

About You:
You draw on your considerable experience in bringing data and statistics to life to solve sometimes complex problems, and you’re comfortable looking after several projects at once. You’re able to make your own decisions while at the same time supporting more junior team members.

About the Role:
As a Senior Consultant, Data Engineering, you know the importance of data to the business. You design and set up projects that bring together information from a variety of sources, to enable analysis and decision-making. You make sure that data is accessible and easy to use, so that it can be used for routine and ad-hoc analysis.

Day-to-day you will:
Use your knowledge to plan and deliver data warehouse and storage
Take part in designing and running bespoke data services for individual projects
Stay up to date with business best practice in using and retrieving data
Design, develop, adapt and maintain data warehouse architecture and relational databases that support data mining
Create and use effective metrics and monitoring processes
Support deal teams by providing subject knowledge and solutions for client proposals
Author reports that include key performance indicators show where current operations can be improved, and identify the causes of any problems
Create and maintain report forms and formats, information dashboards, data generators and canned reports, as well as other information portals and resources
Travel as required

Your Skills and Experience Include:
Database, storage, collection and aggregation models, techniques and technologies and how to apply them in business
Employing statistical and data visualization tools and techniques
Experience in structured problem solving
Great project and people management
Using SharePoint, PowerPivot, SRRS, Excel – including pivot tables and macros
Working with SQL.

Education:
You’re likely to have a Bachelor’s degree in Applied Mathematics, Statistics or another relevant field, or an equivalent combination of education and experience. You also have five to seven years of relevant professional experience.


Apply now",3.9,AVANADE,"Los Angeles, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,20,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,143.0,CA,2847,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1521,21,Junior Data Scientist,$111k-$175k,"What Great Looks Like In This Role

Our ideal teammate is someone who is a continuous learner who can adapt and thrive in complex, uncertain and changing situations. Someone who enjoys tackling complex tasks in a collaborative environment is well-suited to a position on our team. Self-motivated individuals comfortable working in a challenging, fast paced, technical environment are highly encouraged to apply!

You Are Able To Demonstrate This Through

A track record of thinking outside the box, taking initiative, and promoting innovation and change-making Ownership, commitment and follow-through in achieving results in school or work projects
Managing priorities effectively and adapting quickly to achieve goals
Pursuing opportunities for continuous learning to develop new skills and perspectives

About the Data Science Development Program

The Data Science Development Program (DSDP) trains junior team members to become well-rounded data scientists within three years. The development program includes high impact project work, mentorship from senior data scientists, in-house training and workshops, and sponsorship for graduate level coursework at the University of Massachusetts Amherst.

Data Science Development Program Highlights:
High-impact project work: Junior data scientists work together with MassMutuals data scientists to solve challenging problems in finance,

operations, marketing, digital initiatives, security, and product development.

Interdisciplinary learning: In the DSDP, junior data scientists are exposed to multiple fields within and adjacent to data science such as data visualization, software engineering, and enterprise architecture.

Mentorship: Peer mentors and senior mentors across data science domains are paired with each member of the DSDP
Training & Development: In-house workshops, tech-talks, seminars, and team-wide learning challenges such as our annual Month of Code

are available to all development program members.

Academic coursework: Members of the DSDP engage in graduate-level courses at the University of Massachusetts Amherst in computer science and statistics according to an individually tailored development plan.

Volunteer & Community Opportunities: Team members have many opportunities to volunteer throughout the year. Junior data scientists volunteer at hackathons throughout the state, attend community data events, speak at external talks, and participate in community data for good efforts annually..

About Us

The MassMutual Data Labs in downtown Amherst consists of a dynamic team that is actively engaged in dozens of high-impact projects across the enterprise, frequently working remotely with teams based in Springfield, MA, New York, and Boston. Our environment and workspace reflects our dedication to innovation and learning, and has a collaborative, start-up vibe. We hold weekly training meetings to present technical ideas, new models, or interesting code libraries.

Junior Data Scientist Duties Include
Statistical analysis
Programming in R and Python
Data ingestion and data cleaning
Model building, testing, deployment, and maintenance Building visualizations
Presenting and explaining output
Executive presentations and discussions
Adherence to internal standards in data science Collaboration across functions and business units

Application Instructions
To finalize your application for consideration, all applicants must submit a portfolio. For instructions, visit https://datascience.massmutual.com/dsdp/apply

We accept applications from early career professionals and graduating students from undergraduate and graduate programs.

Minimum qualifications

Bachelors degree

Academic study or independent training in computational, quantitative, or technical fields, such as computer science, math, physics, or statistics

Working knowledge of Python, R, and SQL
Quantitative and technical skills in math and computer science Community engagement, involvement, and volunteerism Demonstrated leadership and change-making
Strong communication skills

Preferred qualifications

Enthusiastic about pursuing an interdisciplinary career in data science, analytics, and technology Research and/or practical experience in related fields
Demonstrated work experience through part time employment, internships, or professional endeavors

Committed to Diversity and Inclusion

Our employees are the embodiment of the idea that we all are stronger and better through our support for one another. By valuing people for who they are, how they think, and what they bring to the table, weve become a stronger, more innovative company. We continue to receive external recognition for our policies and programs that seek to create a diverse and inclusive environment.

Americas Best Employer for Diversity Forbes (2019)
Score of 100 on the Human Rights Campaign Corporate Equality Index (2019)
National Association for Female Executives Top Company for Executive Women (2018) Disability Equality Index (DEI) Best Place to Work for Disability Inclusion (2019) Diversity Best Practices Inclusion Index Company (2018)",3.8,MassMutual,"Amherst, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,169,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,143.0,MA,5095,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0
1526,26,Data Engineer,$111k-$175k,"77 West Wacker Dr (35012), United States of America, Chicago, Illinois

At Capital One, were building a leading information-based technology company. Still founder-led by Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Richard Fairbank, Capital One is on a mission to help our customers succeed by bringing ingenuity, simplicity, and humanity to banking. We measure our efforts by the success our customers enjoy and the advocacy they exhibit. We are succeeding because they are succeeding.

Guided by our shared values, we thrive in an environment where collaboration and openness are valued. We believe that innovation is powered by perspective and that teamwork and respect for each other lead to superior results. We elevate each other and obsess about doing the right thing. Our associates serve with humility and a deep respect for their responsibility in helping our customers achieve their goals and realize their dreams. Together, we are on a quest to change banking for good.

Data Engineer

Do you love building and pioneering in the technology space? Do you enjoy solving complex business problems in a fast-paced, collaborative,inclusive, and iterative delivery environment? At Capital One, you'll be part of a big group of makers, breakers, doers and disruptors, who love to solve real problems and meet real customer needs.

We are seeking Data Engineers who will be a part of a team thats building new analytical and machine learning tools and frameworks to exploit advantages in the latest developments in cloud computing. As aCapital One Data Engineer, youll have the opportunity to be on the forefront of driving a major transformation within Capital One. Learn more about#lifeatcapitalone and our commitment todiversity & inclusion by jumping toslides 25-40 on our Corporate Social Responsibility Report.

What Youll Do:
Collaborate with and across Agile teams to design, develop, test, implement, and support technical solutions in full-stack development tools and technologies
Work with a team of developers with deep experience in machine learning, distributed microservices, and full stack systems
Utilize programming languages like Java, Scala, Python and Open Source RDBMS and NoSQL databases and Cloud based data warehousing services such as Snowflake
Share your passion for staying on top of tech trends, experimenting with and learning new technologies, participating in internal & external technology communities, and mentoring other members of the engineering community
Collaborate with digital product managers, and deliver robust cloud-based solutions that drive powerful experiences to help millions of Americans achieve financial empowerment
Perform unit tests and conducting reviews with other team members to make sure your code is rigorously designed, elegantly coded, and effectively tuned for performance
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree
At least 2 years of experience in application development
At least 1 years of experience in big data technologies (Cassandra, Accumulo, HBase, Spark, Hadoop, HDFS, AVRO, MongoDB, or Zookeeper)
Preferred Qualifications:
Master's Degree
3+ years of experience in application development
1+ year experience working on streaming data applications (Spark Streaming, Kafka, Kinesis, and Flink
1+ years of experience with Amazon Web Services (AWS), Microsoft Azure or another public cloud service
1+ years of experience with Ansible / Terraform
2+ years of experience with Agile engineering practices
1+ years in-depth experience with the Hadoop stack (MapReduce, Pig, Hive, Hbase)
1+ years of experience with NoSQL implementation (Mongo, Cassandra)
2+ years of experience developing Java based software solutions
2+ years of experience in at least one scripting language (Python, Perl, JavaScript, Shell)
2+ years of experience developing software solutions to solve complex business problems
2+ years of experience with UNIX/Linux including basic commands and shell scripting
At this time, Capital One will not sponsor a new applicant for employment authorization for this position.",3.9,Capital One,"Rolling Meadows, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,26,Company - Public,financial_related,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,143.0,IL,4050,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
1527,27,Senior IT Data Engineer,$111k-$175k,"Description

Job Description:

As the Senior IT Data Engineer, you will be a member of a multi-disciplinary team that supports the Joint Regional Security Stack (JRSS). You interface with other technical teams, DISA personnel, vendor technical support, and with technical representatives from DoD services. You will work as part of an integrated, cross-platform team to provide military base/post/camp/station migration support services DoD-wide as the JRSS stacks are deployed and used for operations. You will leverage your understanding of Kafka, modern data architectures and Data Streaming to support the design, development, implementation and automation of enterprise level solutions for our DoD customers. You will support requirements analysis, systems design, integration, testing, and associated documentation. You will also provide tier 3 support for the operations and maintenance of fielded systems.

Primary Responsibilities
Support the design and implement the Data Ingest pipeline

Ensure throughput and capacity of Kafka Connect
Normalize data feeds into a common schema for ingestion into Elastic and into mission partner systems
Enrich data feeds with derived metadata
Route incoming data feeds into topic topology
Support the addition of new data sources
Support changes in schemas
Implement any data reduction strategies such as duplicate event aggregation

Support the design, publishing and maintenance of schemas

Schema design and optimization
Maintain Schema Registry
Work with mission partners to leverage schemas and data

Develop connectors for non-standard data sources

Manage Topics

Establish naming conventions
Design topic hierarchies
Optimize and manage partitions
Design and manage partition placement
Handle partition balancing

Support the development and implementation of automation

Build out Ansible deployment of Confluent components
Build out Ansible deployment of replication configuration
Manage Ansible for operations (upgrades, scaling, etc.)
Provide Ansible toolkit for mission partners

Build User Defined Functions (UDF) to support real time streaming data processing & analytics in KSQL

Build, optimize, and maintain KStreams processing jobs

Basic Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience/combined education, with 12+ years of experience; or 10+ years of professional experience with a related Master’s degree.
Experience with Kafka
Experience with RedHat Linux
Experience with KSQL
Experience with Ansible
Experience with data architectures and data streaming
U.S. citizenship and an active DoD Secret clearance. In addition, you must be able to successfully obtain up to Top Secret based on requirements from the customer and program.
DoD 8570 IATII certification

Preferred Qualifications

Experience with enterprise level architecture design and development
Experience with container technologies
Experience with multiple scripting/programming languages (e.g., Python, Java, etc.)
Good Debugging Skills and troubleshooting skills
Good written and oral communication skills

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
Yes

Clearance Level Required:
Secret

Travel:
Yes, 10% of the time

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Software Engineering

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world's toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company's 33,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Virginia, Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $10.19 billion for the fiscal year ended December 28, 2018. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.6,Leidos,"Springfield, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,51,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,143.0,VA,5069,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
1530,30,Data Scientist,$111k-$175k,"Performs advanced data design and analysis using the Electronic Medical Record (EMR) to create new knowledge useful to KP and outside organizations. Extracts and cleans large volumes of healthcare data across dozens of sources. Applies expert statistical methodologies to clinical outcomes. Partners effectively with physicians, other clinicians, software engineers and business managers to communicate findings using data visualization techniques.

Essential Responsibilities:
Works with physicians, epidemiologists, statisticians, business managers, and software engineers, to formulate and scope questions and translate knowledge into care transformation
Develops algorithms and predictive models to solve critical health service problems
Influences a general audience to understand the quality, completeness, and appropriate use of data
Provides advice about choice of statistical approaches, perform statistical analysis
Develops tools and libraries to create efficiencies for future work
Develops systematic approaches to assure data validity.
Identifies new sources of data within the electronic medical record that will improve information about target diseases and clinical processes.
Establishes links across existing data sources; process large volumes of data needed for complex research/operational studies
Trains Data Consultants and other data workers.
Kaiser Permanente conducts compensation reviews of positions on a routine basis. At any time, Kaiser Permanente reserves the right to reevaluate and change job descriptions, or to change such positions from salaried to hourly pay status. Such changes are generally implemented only after notice is given to affected employees.

Basic Qualifications:
Experience
Minimum eight (8) years of experience with multivariate data analysis commonly used in epidemiology (e.g. logistic regression, linear regression, cluster analysis, Cox proportional hazard analysis, GEE, and hierarchical models).
Minimum eight (8) years of experience writing and executing complex queries to extract/process data (e.g. SQL), including linking tables and variables from very large datasets.
Minimum eight (8) years of programming experience to build and validate machine language and statistical algorithms and to perform statistical analysis (e.g. R, Python, SAS)
Education
Master's degree required in a quantitative health field (epidemiology, math/statistics, bioinformatics) or computer science.
License, Certification, Registration
N/A

Additional Requirements:
Demonstrated understanding of data systems and architecture.
Experience using data science, AI, and machine-learning platforms to build and deploy supervised and unsupervised models.
Demonstrated ability to create and execute solutions to complex data science problems.
Demonstrated ability to lead project efforts, communicate effectively with team members, and guide decision making.
Advanced knowledge of data visualization tool principles, theories, and concepts.

Preferred Qualifications:
Experience working with electronic medical record, to conduct health research and analytics.
Experience using novel open source software for analytic and non-analytic processing.
Experience with health record standards, including HL7 and other interchange and coding standards highly desirable.
Advanced training in biostatistics and/or statistics (degree or continuing education).
Demonstrated scholarly activities to advance the field (e.g., teaching, presentations at conferences, lead or co-authorship of scientific manuscripts).
Demonstrated understanding of clinical workflows.
Demonstrated proficiency with Natural Language Processing.
Well versed in open source libraries and methodologies for creating data workflows composed of most appropriate technologies, including command line tools, containerized tools, microservices, etc.

Kaiser Permanente is an equal opportunity employer committed to a diverse and inclusive workforce. Applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy), age, sexual orientation, national origin, marital status, parental status, ancestry, disability, gender identity, veteran status, genetic information, other distinguishing characteristics of diversity and inclusion, or any other protected status.

External hires must pass a background check/drug screen. Qualified applicants with arrest and/or conviction records will be considered for employment in a manner consistent with federal and state laws, as well as applicable local ordinances, including but not limited to the San Francisco and Los Angeles Fair Chance Ordinances.",4.0,Kaiser Permanente,"Oakland, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,75,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,143.0,CA,4643,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
1532,32,Associate Data Scientist,$61k-$104k,"The Associate Data Scientist performs data analysis to extract knowledge or insight from structured or unstructured data. He or she applies advanced statistical algorithms for analysis of large-scale, complex datasets. He or she keeps up to date with cutting-edge techniques in programming, machine learning, big data, and healthcare modeling and seeks ways to advance the organization’s capabilities in analytics.

Apply machine learning/deep learning/artificial intelligence techniques.
Perform large-scale experimentation and build data-driven models to answer business questions.
Create hypotheses and experiments to identify hidden relationships and construct new analytics methods.
Develop and implement Markov decision process models and healthcare economic models.
Use advanced analytics methods to extract value from business data.
Articulate a vision and roadmap for the utilization of data as a valued corporate asset.
Visualize information and develop reports on results of data analysis.
Influence product teams through presentation of data-based recommendations.
Spread best practices to analytics and product teams.
Implement new tools to make data analysis more efficient.
Willing and able to learn new technologies on the job.
Ability to communicate complex results to technical and non-technical audiences.
Ability to work with minimal supervision.
Desire to work in a highly collaborative environment.
Uphold company mission and values through accountability, innovation, integrity, quality, and teamwork.
Support and comply with the company’s Quality Management System policies and procedures.
Regular and reliable attendance.
Ability to lift up to 10 pounds for approximately 5% of a typical working day.
Ability to work on a mobile device, tablet, or in front of a computer screen and/or perform typing for approximately 80% of a typical working day.
Ability and means to travel between Madison locations.
Ability to travel 5% of working time away from work location, may include overnight/weekend travel.

Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Statistics, Computer Science, or related field; or High School Degree/General Education Diploma and 4 years of relevant experience in lieu of Bachelor’s degree.
2+ years of experience working with large datasets for drawing business insights.
Demonstrated working knowledge in Python or R programming.
Professional working knowledge with machine learning (to solve complex business problems), predictive modeling, leveraging both structured and unstructured data source, relational databases, and SQL.
Professional working knowledge of statistics and modeling techniques.
Demonstrated ability to perform the Essential Duties of the position with or without accommodation.
Authorization to work in the United States without sponsorship.
Preferred Qualifications
Master’s degree in related field of study.
Professional working knowledge with distributed computing and big data technologies such as Spark or related technologies.
Professional working knowledge with statistical methodologies and tools (R, SAS, SPSS, etc.), mathematical optimization, control theory, and time-series analysis.
Professional working knowledge with Natural Language Processing, Information Retrieval, or Recommender Systems.

We are an equal employment opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, color, creed, disability, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex, sexual orientation, and any other status protected by applicable local, state or federal law. Applicable portions of the Company’s affirmative action program are available to any applicant or employee for inspection upon request",4.0,Exact Sciences Corporation,"Madison, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,25,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,WI,3750,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,1
1533,33,Data Scientist,$61k-$104k,"Why Should You Join First Advantage?

First Advantage is in the midst of a technology revolution, and the best time to join us is right now! We are developing incredible solutions, working with amazing customers, and we would love to see how your skills could help get people back to work. Our brand new Data team is recruiting several passionate people in greater metropolitan areas across the Central and Eastern time zones (namely Chicago, Atlanta, Charlotte, Austin, Boston, Houston, Columbus, Tampa, etc) in the US! This opportunity is for remote work, with occasional travel to our Atlanta office.

First Advantage has over 4000 employees across the world and does over 71 million background screens a year, so if you’re looking for opportunities working with advanced technologies to produce awesome user experiences and securely process high-volume transactions leveraging massive amounts of data, then this is the place for you!

We work with Fortune 100 and Global 500 hundred companies, so your work will directly impact some of the largest enterprises in the world!

We need talent that is Informed, Insightful, Transformational, and Progressive

We’re looking for a Data Scientist! You’re our ideal candidate if you have 8+ years of experience and strong expertise with SQL/Oracle PLSQL, and 3+ years of experience working with data modelling tools like Python, RStudio, TensorFlow, etc. The Data Scientist will be working with business and technical teams to develop machine-learning models for FADV’s background screening products. We’re looking for someone who can do the deeply analytical work, while also presenting their work to internal and external customers. If you meet those requirements, and have experience working with Business Intelligence tools, you could be a perfect fit!

Our brand new Data team have the opportunity to build a game-changing solution from the ground up, and that solution will drive the next generation of background screening. Joining our team right now is an incredible opportunity to be on the ground floor of our technology transformation, and will give you a chance to make a real difference!

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor degree in Engineering or equivalent is required
Minimum of 8 years of strong experience and expertise with SQL/Oracle PLSQL
Minimum of 3+ years of experience working with Data Modelling tools using Pyton, RStudio, TensorFlow etc
Strong data analytics and data science skills
Experience with Analytical programming languages using R/Python libraries
Strong experience in Relational Databases and Big Data analytics in the cloud is preferred
Knowledge of other BI tools like Qlik, Oracle Business Intelligence, SQL Server Reporting, Cognos would be a plus
Candidate must have Strong communication skills and creative skills
Education:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering or related technical field or equivalent relevant work experience
Experience:
Minimum of 8 years of strong experience and expertise with SQL/Oracle PLSQL , Perl, Shell scripting
Minimum of 5+ years of experience working with data modelling & database designs
Other Knowledge, Skills, Abilities or Certifications:
Strong data analytics and data science skills
Strong experience with end to end automation
Experience with bulk data loading & data cleansing
Experience working with Oracle, MySQL databases and Linux environments
Experience with Analytical programming languages using R/Python libraries would be a plus
Strong experience in Relations Database and Big Data analytics preferred
Candidate must have Strong communication skills and creative skills",3.5,First Advantage Corporation,Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,17,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,Remote,3618,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
1536,36,Data Engineer,$61k-$104k,"About Conduent:

Conduent delivers mission-critical services and solutions on behalf of businesses and governments – creating exceptional outcomes for its clients and the millions of people who count on them. Through people, process and technology, Conduent solutions and services automate workflows, improve efficiencies, reduce costs and enable revenue growth. It’s why most Fortune 100 companies and over 500 government entities depend on Conduent every day to manage their essential interactions and move their operations forward.

Conduent’s differentiated services and solutions improve experiences for millions of people every day, including two-thirds of all insured patients in the U.S., 11 million employees who use its HR Services, and nearly nine million people who travel through toll systems daily. Conduent’s solutions deliver exceptional outcomes for its clients including $17 billion in savings from medical bill review for workers compensation claims, up to 40% efficiency increase in HR operations, and up to 40% improvement in processing costs, while driving higher end-user satisfaction. Learn more at www.conduent.com.

Job Description:

We are looking for a Data Engineer who will be part of our Analytics Practice and will be expected to actively work in a multi-disciplinary fast paced environment. This role requires a broad range of skills and the ability to step into different roles depending on the size and scope of the project; its primary responsibility is the development and mainteneance of data pipelines including acquisition, transformation, loading and processing of data.

Responsibilities:

Engineer and maintain a modern Cloud data pipeline to collect, organize, and process data from disparate sources.
Performs data management tasks, such as conduct data profiling, assess data quality, and write SQL queries to extract and integrate data
Develop / maintain efficient data collection systems and sound strategies for getting quality data from different sources
Consume and analyze data from the data pool to support inference, prediction and recommendation of actionable insights to support business growth.
Design, develop and maintain ETL processes using tools and scripting. Troubleshoot and debug ETL processes. Performance tuning and opitimization of the ETL processes.
Provide support to new or existing applications while recommending best practices and leading projects to implement new functionality.
Collaborate in design reviews and code reviews to ensure standards are met. Recommend new standards for visualizations.
Learn and develop new ETL techniques as required to keep up with the contemporary technologies.
Reviews the solution requirements and architecture to ensure selection of appropriate technology, efficient use of resources and integration of multiple systems and technology.
Support presentations to Customers and Partners
Advising on new technology trends and possible adoption to maintain competitive advantage

Experience Needed:

5+ years of related experience is required.
A BS or Masters degree in Computer Science or related technical discipline is required
ETL experience with data integration to support data marts, extracts and reporting
Experience connecting to varied data sources
Excellent SQL coding experience with performance optimization for data queries.
Understands different data models like normalized, de-normalied, stars, and snowflake models. Worked with transactional, temporal, time series, and structured and unstructured data.
Worked in big data environments, cloud data stores, different RDBMS and OLAP solutions.
Experience in cloud-based ETL development processes.
Experience in deployment and maintenance of ETL Jobs.
Is familiar with the principles and practices involved in development and maintenance of software solutions and architectures and in service delivery.
Has strong technical background and remains evergreen with technology and industry developments.

Additional Requirements

Demonstrated ability to have successfully completed multiple, complex technical projects
Prior experience with application delivery using an Onshore/Offshore model
Experience with business processes across multiple Master data domains in a services based company
Demonstrates a rational and organized approach to the tasks undertaken and an awareness of the need to achieve quality.
Demonstrates high standards of professional behavior in dealings with clients, colleagues and staff.
Is able to make sound and far reaching decisions alone on major issues and to take full responsibility for them on a technical basis.
Strong written communication skills. Is effective and persuasive in both written and oral communication.
Experience with gathering end user requirements and writing technical documentation
Time management and multitasking skills to effectively meet deadlines under time-to-market pressure
Requires some travel (on average 10%-20%)
Closing:

Conduent is an Equal Opportunity Employer and considers applicants for all positions without regard to race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, national origin, age, gender identity, gender expression, sex/gender, marital status, sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, medical condition, use of a guide dog or service animal, military/veteran status, citizenship status, basis of genetic information, or any other group protected by law.

People with disabilities who need a reasonable accommodation to apply for or compete for employment with Conduent may request such accommodation(s) by clicking on the following link, completing the accommodation request form, and submitting the request by using the ""Submit"" button at the bottom of the form. For those using Google Chrome or Mozilla Firefox please download the form first: click here to access or download the form. You may also click here to access Conduent’s ADAAA Accommodation Policy.",2.8,Conduent,"Morrisville, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,3,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,NC,5910,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
1537,37,Geospatial Data Engineer (TS/SCI-Full Scope Polygraph),$61k-$104k,"Clearance: Current TS/SCI ISSA (Full-Scope Polygraph) required*
Description: Provide data flows and transformations to automate, script, visualize, and modeling subnational wealth. Day to day technical tasks include meeting with the customer to understand and refine the requirements. The data engineer will use Nifi and Python to create data flows and transformations and understand the workflow of the project. They will work with the customer to implement any requested updates, move data storage to RDS, and work with security to ensure the entire system is compliant. They will compile security controls and artifacts and contribute to the Standard Operating Procedures and other related documents.

Other Technical Skills:
Experience scripting in Python and using NiFi
Some knowledge of geospatial software such as ArcGIS, QGIS (or willingness and ability to learn)
Experience with SQL, PostGreSQL/PostGIS
Knowledge of best practices for data standards, data management, data quality
Core Competencies:
Conceptual, quantitative, organizational, research, writing, verbal communication, and graphical representation skills.
Sound judgment and creative problem solving and independent working skills.
Sound interpersonal and teamwork skills to work with individuals and organizations, to include varying levels and types (Government, industry, and academia).
Facilitation skills to bring diverse groups together on issues and reach consensus across stakeholders.
The ability to perform complex analyses and to communicate its results using accurate, concise, and effective writing and through descriptive and graphical representations.
Technical understanding of the systems supporting aspects of the functional areas.
Knowledge of standard tools [e.g., the Agency Data Services Network (ADSN), iCE workstations, Microsoft Office, the Agency Internet Network (AIN), and the Microsoft Office software applications], as appropriate; and a demonstrated ability to learn to use and support other tools that may be added or developed as the program evolves.
Flexibility in assisting with ad hoc tasks and in adjusting as tasks are re-prioritized.
Travel: Minimal CONUS travel may be required.

Company Information: New Light Technologies (NLT) provides comprehensive Information Technology, Geospatial Information Systems (GIS) and Remote Sensing technology consulting and staffing solutions for government, commercial, and non-profit organizations. NLT employs a cadre of experienced project managers, infrastructure experts, system architects, data scientists, web developers, geospatial experts and software engineers who work across a broad range of COTS, Open Source, and custom technologies to devise the best solutions. NLT specializes in DevOps enterprise-scale Systems Design, Integration, Development, and Management, and offers exceptional capabilities in Infrastructure Modernization, Cloud Migration & Management, Virtualization, Microservices, & Containerized Computing, and the development of High-Performance Mobile Computing solutions.

NLT has a diverse customer base and is looking to bring on team members to work on-site, virtually, and embedded with our customers to help them reach, meet, and exceed their mission goals in every engagement. NLT offers competitive salaries and benefits including PTO, Healthcare, access to a vast network of group benefits such as commuter benefits and retirement plan access. NLT is an equal opportunity employer.

Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Pay: $80,000.00 - $110,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
On call
Weekends
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Commission pay
Signing bonus
COVID-19 considerations:
While most of our work is done remotely during the COVID-19 Pandemic, this job in the National Security Sector requires physical presence on site.

Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
Please list any presentations, repos, or other online content that is publicly available if you have them. For proper consideration, please make sure to take our skills tests in this indeed posting.
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Required)
Contract Length:
1 year
More than 1 year
Varies
Contract Renewal:
Likely
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://NewLightTechnologies.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",5.0,"New Light Technologies, Inc.","McLean, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,other_industries,Accounting & Legal,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,VA,4906,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
1538,38,Data Scientists with TS/SCI,$61k-$104k,"Veteran Owned Firm Seeking Data Scientists with TS/SCI to support a client in Springfield, VA

My name is Stephen Hrutka, and I am the owner of a Veteran-owned firm in Washington, DC focused on Supply Chain, Strategic Sourcing, and Technical/Cleared Recruiting.

HRUCKUS helps other Veteran Owned businesses recruit for positions across the SBA, HHS, DARPA, and other cutting-edge R&D related defense agencies.

We are looking to hire (2) data scientists to support NGA in Springfield, VA. The role is remote to start, no idea when traditional onsite will begin.

Please see below for the position description. If you’re interested, I'd be glad to provide more details about the role and further discuss your qualifications.

Thanks,

Stephen M Hrutka
Principal Consultant
www.hruckus.com

Position Tasks:
Develop Python or R code to read/categorize large amounts of unstructured data
Develop code to evaluate Intelligence Information Reports (IIRs) for metadata accuracy
Develop code that recognizes and extracts entities from IIRs w/ 90% accuracy
Visualize data derived from structuring of unstructured/semi-structured data
Brief results of code development to leadership to include methods, limitations, and assumptions
Position Deliverables:
Monthly reports
Code modules using Natural Language Processing to analyze multiple unstructured data files and database the information derived
Code modules using Entity Recognition to analyze multiple unstructured data files and identify all people, groups, and categories of objects
Code modules using Latent Semantic Indexing to analyze multiple unstructured data files and database the information derived
Develop code that can be stand-alone or incorporated into existing applications
Visualizations of large data sets, bringing forward unobscured data, and enabling personnel to understand the data quickly
Position Requirements:
Government Security Clearance
Minimum of (3) years of experience related to the following areas: parametric and non-parametric statistical methods; visualizing statistical effects in complex datasets; performing statistical data analysis in Python and/or R; providing and explaining clear analytical results in well-written reports
Ability to write and execute queries in SQL
Ability to visualize data with aid of data visualization tools such as Tableau
Bachelor’s degree in computer science or related field
Ability to work in distributed systems and to develop creative solutions to data problems
Experience with database tools
Preferred Qualifications:
Statistical Modeling: 10 years
Natural Language Processing: 5 years
Python and R: 3 years
Latent Semantic Indexing: 5 years
SQL: 3 years
Tableau: 1 year
Entity Recognition: 5 years",5.0,HRUCKUS,"Springfield, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,7,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,VA,2719,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1539,39,Data Scientist,$61k-$104k,"Research and Sciences

Qualifications:

Are you interested in expanding your career through experience and exposure, all while supporting a mission that seeks to ensure the security of our nation and its allies? If so, then Northrop Grumman is the place for you. As a leading global security company, we provide innovative systems, products and solutions to our customers worldwide. We are comprised of diverse professionals that bring different perspectives and ideas, understanding that the more experiences we bring to our work the more innovative we can be. As we continue to build our workforce we look for people that exemplify our core values, leadership characteristics, and approach to innovation.

We are seeking a Data Scientist to support our customer in Raleigh, NC. This is an on-site position with no telecommute possibilities. In today's economy, our customer must respond faster than ever before; and we have to base that response on insights from data analytics modeling instead of ""years of experience"" or historical reporting. The Data Science and Exploration group will provide the organization with future-oriented analyses that can be used to help drive changes and improvements in business practices. By employing analytical techniques, applied to research data, which go beyond simply describing the data we will be able to explore the hidden relationships and patterns within the data.

The selected candidate will have experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods and tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms, and creating/running simulations. The ideal candidate will be adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. They must have an ability to drive business results with their data-based insights. The candidate should be highly analytical with a knack for analysis, math and statistics, with demonstrated critical thinking and problem-solving skills. Passion for machine-learning and research are also highly coveted.

Roles and Responsibilities include but not limited to:
• Data exploration - Explore large data sets using a variety of tools to build model ready data products and provide any requirements to ETL developers to productize.
• Model Building - Description: Leverage analytics tools like SAS to build complex statistical and machine learning models to build predictive and prescriptive strategies.
• Adhoc Insight Generation - Description: Quickly explore data and apply descriptive statistics to provide rapid insights for the business customer.
• Create data mining architectures/models/protocols, statistical reporting, and data analysis methodologies to identify trends in large data sets. Analysis may have many applications such as to address a business issue or provide a competitive advantage for the organization
• Utilizes strong statistical and data visualization skills
• Uses and applies technical principles, theories, and concepts
• Demonstrates the skill and ability to perform professional tasks
• Develops recommended solutions to technical problems as assigned
• Submits work for review of soundness of technical judgment, quality, and accuracy
• Contributes to the completion of assigned technical tasks",3.8,Northrop Grumman,"Raleigh, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,81,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,NC,3334,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1540,40,Data Scientist for Detector Physics,$61k-$104k,"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311174

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Signature Science and Technology Division

Group: Detection Physics
*Job Description**
The Detection Physics Group within the National Security Directorate at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is seeking a research scientist who will focus on studies of radiation detection physics using Artificial Intelligence/ Machine Learning (AI/ML) techniques. The Detection Physics Group includes research ranging from low background and high energy fundamental particle physics to radiation detection related to non-proliferation and national security applications. This position will focus on the expanding role of AI/ML within the group. It will provide the opportunity to perform analysis of data from existing experimental setups, and to propose, develop, and demonstrate relevant techniques on new data sets for advanced applications.

Major duties and responsibilities: Contribute to the development of the analysis of a variety of types of radiation detectors and experiments. Perform, analyze, and interpret detector characterizations for detectors of interest, including semiconductor detectors, scintillators, proportional counters, silicon photomultipliers, and others. Develop a detector-physics-focused AI/ML strategy with an eye toward fostering new funding streams and research directions. Engage in research activities with the broader AI/ML community at PNNL.
*The hiring level will be determined based on the education, experience and skill set of the successful candidate based on the following:**
*Level 2:** Works on problems of moderate scope where analysis of situations or data requires a review of a variety of factors. Exercises judgment within defined procedures and practices to determine appropriate action. Builds productive internal/external working relationships. Works under general supervision. Follows established procedures. Infrequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts on routine matters.
*Level 3:** A seasoned, experienced professional with a full understanding of area of specialization; resolves a wide range of issues in creative ways. This job is the fully qualified, careeroriented, journey-level position. Independently determines and develops approach to solutions. Frequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 2 years of experience, or Masters degree with 0-2 years of experience, or PhD with 0 years of experience.

+ Programming capability with languages such as C/C++, Python, MatLab, and R.

+ Experience with ""standard"" and AI/ML data analysis techniques.

+ Experience with particle detection software and hardware.
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with at least 5 years of well-aligned prior experience or a masters degree with 3 years of relevant experience or a PhD degree with at least 1 year of experience.

+ PhD in experimental nuclear or high energy particle physics, or related fields.

+ Experience with software tools such as PyTorch, Tensorflow, and Keras.

+ Experience with data analysis and simulation packages such as ROOT, Geant4, and MCNP.

+ Implementation experience with high-performance parallel codes and/or accelerators (FPGAs/GPUs).

+ High level of motivation and ability to work with, form, and lead collaborative research teams.

+ Adaptability to thrive in a rapidly evolving, multitasked, research environment.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Detection Physics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-09-09_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-12-08_",3.9,PNNL,"Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,55,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,WA,5622,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,1
1541,41,Sr Data Scientist,$61k-$104k,"We are looking for a Senior Data Scientist to work with one of our US-based clients, which is one of the oldest and most trusted sources of global and financial news. In addition to print news, our client owns one of the most popular websites in the world and diversified its business across a range of media including information services, book publishing, and digital real estate services.

The team will be architecting a highly-scalable platform to power data acquisition, categorization, calculations, and visualization.
You are the one if you have:
At least five years of experience working in data analysis and data mining
Experience using R and Python
Knowledge in business intelligence
Proven experience regarding data and server security and manipulating large amounts of survey data
Strong communications skills
AdTech experience is a plus
Text Mining and Sentiment Analysis is a big plus
Our Engineers bring the vision and goals of our clients to life by bringing experience and passion to the software development process. Spark Digital Engineers take pride in elegant and robust solutions that bring peace of mind to those who rely on them.

Do you bring experience and passion to your work and team? Does seeing a software product take shape and come to life make you happy? If yes, you’d fit right in at Spark Digital and we’d love to talk about the Senior Data Scientist role we’re looking to fill.",4.5,Spark Digital,"New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,9,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,NY,1415,1,data scientist,1,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
1546,46,Machine Learning Engineer,$61k-$104k,"Machine Learning Engineer

US Citizenship is required due to security clearance requirements.

Are you a motivated engineer who is passionate about embracing new challenges and solving the hardest technical problems in a team-oriented environment? Every day, the engineers at Expedition Technology work together to solve our Nations defense and intelligence challenges by using Machine Learning and Deep Learning to demystify data obtained from signals and images.

Our applied research and development mindset afford our people the opportunity to work on the most cutting-edge methods of optimizing deep learning networks, developing state-of-the-art algorithms and ultimately producing software products that are critical to our nations defense infrastructure.

The success we have already achieved has made Expedition Technology one of the top Machine Learning/Deep Learning research organizations in the Defense and Intelligence communities and we need additional intelligent, passionate, creative people to join our team.

When you join our team, youll have the opportunity to:
Dive directly into the latest computer vision and signal processing research to replicate new techniques published in academia and find ways to make those ideas work on a larger scale
Use your strong Python coding skills to research, design, develop and expand upon algorithms that will train neural networks to deliver actionable intelligence faster and more effectively
Develop deep-learning software prototypes that demonstrate potential usefulness to our customers
Analyze data from disparate sources including images, video, radar, signals and more
Brainstorm solutions to the toughest problems alongside a team of smart, creative, passionate engineers
Participate in machine learning brownbag sessions and other forms of collaborative learning to keep abreast of the constant changes in Machine and Deep Learning
Required skills:
Strong problem-solving skills combined with deep intellectual curiosity and the desire to push technical boundaries
Strong coding skills- preferably in Python, C/C++, Julia or other object-oriented language in a Linux environment
Software development skills and the desire to work on cutting edge development in a Cloud environment
Deep understanding of data structures and algorithms
Knowledge of computer vision and/or signal processing including techniques for classification and feature extraction
Excellent oral, written, presentation and communication skills
Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or related field. Advance degrees welcome
US Citizenship- Must be a US Citizen eligible to maintain a US Government security clearance
Desired skills:
Experience with deep learning frameworks like Tensorflow, PyTorch, Caffe or Keras
About Expedition Technology

At Expedition Technology, we push the boundaries of what is possible every day. Our engineers work on the most challenging problems in Computer Vision, Digital Signal Processing and Software Engineering from a Machine Learning/Deep Learning perspective and collaborate to find the answers. We are a research-focused company whose mission it is to solve our customers most pressing needs in a creative, novel manner.

Expedition Technology offers self-directed, company-paid Medical, Dental and Vision benefits and the freedom to allow you to select which benefits matter most. We offer a 401k with a generous company match, a student loan repayment program, equity shares, paid holidays, paid time off and an education reimbursement allowance. Most importantly, we offer an environment where we are encouraged to push boundaries, take risks and enjoy the rewards.

Interested in joining our team? Lets explore together.

EXP is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer that believes a diverse range of talent creates an environment that fuels creativity and innovation. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, national origin, genetic information or protected veteran status.

Powered by JazzHR",5.0,"Expedition Technology, Inc.","Herndon, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,7,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,VA,4151,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
1549,49,Data Engineer,$61k-$104k,"The Role

The Spur Group is looking for a Data Engineer to join our Data& AI organization. As a Data Engineer, you will lead the design, implementation, and successful delivery of large-scale, critical, and complex data architecture, storage, and pipelines that improve the lives of tens of millions of people every single day. Best of all, you’ll be part of a team-centric culture where fellow consultants and managers support you and encourage you to grow every day.

What You'll Do
Build large-scale distributed data processing systems, data lakes, and optimize for both computational and storage efficiency on cloud platforms like AWS.
Design, implement and automate data pipelines sourcing data from internal and external systems, transforming the data for the optimal needs of various systems.
Design data schema and operate cloud-based data warehouses and SQL database systems.
Write Extract-Transform-Load (ETL) jobs
Design, implement and automate integrations with analytical tool (i.e., jupyter, excel, SAS) and business intelligence (i.e., PowerBI, Tableau) tools
Own the design, development and maintenance of ongoing metrics, reports, analyses, dashboards, etc. to drive key business decisions.
Drive architectural plans and implementation for future data storage, ETL, reporting, and analytic solutions.
Provide insightful code reviews, receive code reviews constructively and take ownership of outcomes (“you ship it, you own it”), working very efficiently and routinely deliver the right things in the front-end UI area.
Who You Are (What you'd bring to Spur)
You have a background in data and software engineering and a passion to learn.
You've made mistakes in the past and have learned a lot from them. You apply this learning regularly.
You believe there are generally multiple ways to solve a technical problem, each with different trade-offs.
You approach projects, tasks, and unknowns with curiosity, and enjoy sharing what you know and what you learn with the people around you.
You believe that a team is strongest when it is diverse and includes multiple perspectives.
You are able to put yourself into your customer's shoes. You frequently immerse yourself in the customer experience to understand how you can better serve them.
Requirements
BS in Computer Science or related field, or an equivalent in relevant work experience.
Experience implementing big data processing technology: Hadoop, Apache Spark, etc.
3+ years of Coding proficiency in at least one modern programming language (Python, Ruby, Java, etc.).
Experience writing and optimizing advanced SQL queries in a business environment with large-scale, complex datasets.
3+ years experience in cloud-first design, preferably AWS (VPC, Serverless databases and functions, dynamic autoscaling, container orchestration, etc.).
Experience in data architecture, databases (e.g., MySQL, Redshift, PostgreSQL), SQL and DDD/ER/ORM design.
Interest and curiosity in emerging technologies on the web like GraphQL, web assembly, Lambda functions, MLaaS, etc
Knowledge of software engineering practices& best practices for the software development life cycle, including coding standards, code reviews, source control management, build processes, testing, and operations.
Why Spur

We are go-to-market consultants who drive results that matter. As the leading authority on go-to-market solutions, we act as an extension of our client teams, providing the support, tools, and strategies to achieve important outcomes. If you tackle challenges with unmatched persistence and believe learning is critical to ongoing growth, we want you on our team.

At The Spur Group, we’re committed to diversity, inclusion, equity and belonging. We live and breathe our core values of Inclusion, Courage, Accountability, Respect and Excellence, and we hope to see them in every employee. Visit our to learn more about us and why we’ve been voted one of the best places to work in Seattle.

The Spur Group is an equal employment opportunity employer. We are committed to building a diverse and inclusive culture that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, and skills. We consider all candidates regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, disability status, or characteristic protected by federal, state, and local law.",3.6,The Spur Group,"Redmond, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,16,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,WA,4380,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1550,50,Data Scientist,$61k-$104k,"Artlin Consulting is seeking motivated individuals who are passionate about helping clients achieve excellence. Qualified candidates will have a creative, holistic, and systematic approach to problem-solving.

The intermediate data scientist with solid data analytics and science expertise. The Defense Acquisition Data Scientist will be a key contributor on an Executive-level Department of Defense Analytic team, leveraging knowledge of data science, methodologies, and processing techniques to support analytics and gather data from disparate Federal, Defense and public databases in support of Major Weapon System acquisition and program management. As the Data Scientist, you will work with Department leadership and a diverse analytical research cell.

Position Responsibilities:
Leverage technical and analytical expertise to explore and examine data from multiple disparate sources with the goal of discovering patterns and previously hidden insights, providing process efficiencies, or addressing a pressing business problem.
Apply expertise in computer science, software development, and the latest technologies to design and implement analysis infrastructure and tools, analytic workflow processes, automations, and complex data visualizations.
Apply technical and analytical techniques to explore and examine data from multiple disparate sources with the goal of discovering patterns and previously hidden insights, providing process efficiencies, or addressing a pressing business problem.
Apply expertise in computer science, software development, and the latest technologies to design and implement analysis infrastructure and tools, analytic workflow processes, automations, and complex data visualizations.
Create informational briefings that explain methodologies and analytical findings to peers and customer stakeholders.
Document and visualize data both temporally and spatially, and present data to managers.
Create and provide informational briefings that are required to explain methodologies and analytical findings to peers and customer stakeholders.
Investigate and implement new scientific analysis and methodologies to support data analytics efforts and stay current with evolving technologies and capabilities.
Complete ad hoc data extract and reporting tasks as requested by organizational leaders.
Perform data extracts and loads from source data systems to analytical data stores.
Work with business leaders to solve business problems by understanding, preparing, and analyzing data to predict emerging trends and provide recommendations to optimize business results.
Experience Level:
Bachelor's Degree Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics or other business-related field, Master's Degree preferred
2+ years of relevant consulting or industry experience, DoD/Federal Government experience preferred.
Strong problem solving and troubleshooting skills with experience exercising mature judgment
Proven experience effectively prioritizing workload to meet deadlines and work objectives
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Demonstrated ability to write clearly, succinctly, and in a manner that appeals to a wide audience
Proven ability working successfully in a collaborative and diverse environment
Experience interacting with Senior Leadership
Secret Security Clearance and above for this role
Tools and Proficiency Level:
Experience with Business Intelligence Tools like MS Excel, Advana, Qlik, R, Python, or similar - Required
Experience with Business Intelligence Tools like Alterix, Tableau, or similar - Desired
Experience leveraging programming languages to script the extraction, formatting and transformation of data from a wide variety of organizational systems
Big data and cloud processing experience
Experience working in a cloud based environment
Microsoft Project, Excel and PowerPoint
MS Access, SQL Server, SharePoint, and Visual Basic programming knowledge is a plus
Position Overview:
Applies technical and analytical techniques to explore and examine data from multiple disparate sources with the goal of discovering patterns and previously hidden insights, providing process efficiencies, or addressing a pressing business problem.
Apply expertise in computer science, software development, and the latest technologies to design and implement analysis infrastructure and tools, analytic workflow processes, automations, and complex data visualizations.
Creates informational briefings that explain methodologies and analytical findings to peers and customer stakeholders.
Required Education/Experience/Skills:
Active DoD Secret security clearance.
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, or other related fields.
2+ years of relevant work experience.
Strong team-building skills as well as confidence when working with senior leadership and peers.
Experience with Business Intelligence (BI) Tools such as MS Excel, Advana, Qlik, R, Python, or similar.
Experience leveraging programming languages to script the extraction, formatting, and transformation of data from a wide variety of organizational system.
Microsoft Project, Excel and PowerPoint.
Desired Education/Experience/Skills:
Master's Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, or other related fields.
Experience with Business Intelligence Tools like Alterix, Tableau, or similar.
Big data and cloud processing experience.
SQL Database experience.
DoD/Federal Government experience.
Artlin Consulting, LLC is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",4.1,Artlin Consulting,"Alexandria, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,9,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,VA,5508,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
1551,51,Data Engineer (StudentTracker 3.0),$61k-$104k,"About the Role:


If you are a self-starter, thrive in a fast-paced environment, and get energized about driving new data driven services, then this job is for you!

The Clearinghouse is seeking a hands-on Engineer, Data with a solid background in Data Warehouse architectures, metadata management, data profiling, data modeling, data quality and a proven ability to learn quickly, effectively collaborate with others, and successfully design and implement solutions. Using their excellent communication and presentation skills, the Engineer socializes technical concepts and builds consensus with internal stakeholders.

The Engineer works with the business and development teams to design and implement the appropriate data solutions for Clearinghouse database-driven applications and services. The Engineer accomplishes this by performing data analysis of current and future systems and services, educating on industry best practices and policies, creating proposed database component designs and data models, and working with the architecture and development teams to refine and implement these designs.

How You Contribute:
Develop and maintain the PL/SQL Packages.
Develop and maintain ETL code.
Design Data Marts and create data models.
Work with Data owners to document and maintain Data Dictionary.
Develop scripts to maintain data quality and deploying data changes across different environments
Monitor, assess and optimize data processing performance.
Demonstrate NSC’s competencies, which align with our corporate values.
Core Competencies include: Customer Focus, Optimizes Work Processes, Collaborates, Communicates Effectively, and Be Open and Authentic.
Manager will provide more detail to candidates as needed.
Position may be required to perform other duties as required. These essential functions are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the job. Reasonable accommodations will be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform these essential functions.

What You Bring to the Table:
Bachelor’s degree required in Computer Science, Systems Engineering, or Information Systems, or some equivalent combination of education and experience, including through military service.
Proficient in:
PL/SQL programming typically acquired through 4-7 years of experience programming with this technology.
Developing scripts using Shell, Python or similar language.
Experience with:
Working on an Agile/Scrum development
Cloud and open source-based data management technologies like AWS Redshift, DynamoDB, Postgres, Glue and Kinesis
Version control tools such as SVN, GIT, AWS Code Commit
Proficient with:
Data Warehouse production maintenance.
ETL/ELT development.
OLTP and data warehouse design.
Metadata management.
Creating and implementing data models.
Database performance monitoring and SQL optimization.
Excellent communication skills.
Demonstrated ability to work independently and directly with the data owners to gather requirements and architect change.
Live within a commutable distance of Pittsburgh, PA.
Additional Desired Requirements:
Experience with Oracle technologies including Oracle database and ODI.
Physical Demands:

Use of a computer terminal and/or laptop computer for 8 or more hours a day.
Use of a copy machine, and telephone.
Frequently required to sit for 7 or more hours per day in close proximity to others in an open office environment.
Occasionally required to use hands and fingers to operate, handle, and reach.
Vision abilities include close vision and the ability to adjust focus.
Must be able to travel occasionally via car, train, and/or airplane as needed.",3.0,National Student Clearinghouse,"Pittsburgh, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,27,Nonprofit Organization,other_industries,Education,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,PA,3659,0,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1552,52,Data Scientist,$61k-$104k,"Description

Job Description:

This role uses Data Science and Engineering techniques to satisfy customer requirements. This role evaluates and uses algorithms for Natural Language Processing (NLP), Artificial Intelligence (AI), and Machine Learning (ML). This role develops scripts, notebooks or applications (using Python or Java and associated libraries or frameworks: Scikit-Learn, Numpy, Tensorflow, Pytorch, Spark, Spark MLlib, H20.ai, etc.) that utilize, collect, aggregate and clean large data sets to perform analysis, clustering, entity resolution and structured information extraction for work products. Models are trained and refined using these tools and evaluated for effectiveness using appropriate criteria/metrics for the task. This role collaborates across a team of Data Scientists, Data Administrators, Software and Data Engineers to produce work products.

Primary Responsibilities

This role designs and develops methods, processes, and systems to consolidate and analyze structured and unstructured, diverse sources including big data sources.
This role develops and uses advanced software programs, algorithms, query techniques, model complex business problems, and automated processes to cleanse, integrate, and evaluate datasets.
This role supports objectives and tasks by leveraging numerous tools and techniques to include Python, Splunk, query experience, R and the like.
Works with cross-discipline teams to ensure connectivity between various data sources and business problems.
Identifies meaningful insights and interprets and communicates findings and recommendations.
This role develops algorithms and analytical techniques to improve business performance.
Maintains awareness of emerging analytics and big-data technologies.

Basic Qualifications

Master’s degree in engineering, computer science, or other related technical field or Bachelor’s degree in a business or management-related field accompanied by experience managing technical requirements in complex programs.
Experience with Python, Splunk, and query experience is required.
Experience negotiating complex scenarios and challenges and devising courses of action to resolve situations with predictable outcomes.
Experience leading critical objectives where decision making is of utmost concern to the outcome.
Experience supervising others.

Education

Candidate must have Masters with 12-15 years of prior relevant experience or Doctorate with 8+ years of prior relevant experience.

Clearance

Candidate must have an active TS/SCI with polygraph.

NSOINT

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph

Travel:
No

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world's toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company's 33,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Virginia, Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $10.19 billion for the fiscal year ended December 28, 2018. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.6,Leidos,"Reston, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,51,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,VA,4572,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,1
1553,53,Data Scientist,$61k-$104k,"Overview


JM&A Group is one of the largest independent providers of finance and insurance (F&I) products in the automotive industry. For nearly 40 years, the company has helped automobile dealers achieve unsurpassed levels of performance. JM&A Group provides more than 3,800 dealerships with a variety of products and services, such as new and used vehicle protection plans, pre-paid maintenance plans and GAP protection programs. Among JM&A Group’s competitive advantages is its robust training and consulting services for F&I professionals, and the company is actively evolving to meet consumer preferences to remain a market leader and a partner of choice.

Job Description


JM&A, a division of JM Family Enterprises, Inc., is looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join its Customer Services Admin team. The Data Scientist will partner with stakeholders from various business functions to identify data science opportunities, have the knowledge, experience and technical skills to leverage internal and external data, and apply the right machine learning/big data technologies to turn such data into valuable insights and solutions for the company. The candidate will be tasked with gathering and integrating large volumes of data to develop complex predictive / machine learning models to drive actionable results and insights especially in the areas of fraud / anomaly detection, claims automation / self service and general efficiency opportunities. This is a highly visible and impactful role where the Data Scientist will interact with the senior and executive level management and have the opportunity to influence what we do and how we do it through data science.

Responsibilities:
Create a collaborative and effective working relationship with functional leaders to understand business problems, identify opportunities / use cases to improve the performance of our businesses
Lead / Contribute to the development of actionable solutions. This includes all aspects of the solution development including problem and goal definition, defining a plan for:
Sampling of the data and conducting experiments
Data extraction
Ingestion and processing (outlier and missing data handling)
Exploratory data analysis
Feature engineering (weight of evidence, label encoding, label count encoding, target encoding, time-series, polynomial interactions, binning, outlier handling)
Feature selection (forward, backwards, information value)
Hyperparameter optimization of machine learning models
Experiment tracking for A/B testing and reproducibility, model evaluation, model interpretability, results communication and deployment
Contribute to the adoption and better understanding across the company of data science best practices and tools and stay up to date regarding new knowledge and developments in this domain
#LI-JD1

Job Requirements
Core skills in Computer Science: Data Structures, Algorithms, Programming Paradigms and Relational Databases
Deep working experience applying statistics and machine learning techniques to real-world problems and data and deploying models to production
Hands-on experience with SQL and tools to access databases
Expertise in Python and R
Expertise with open source data mining/machine learning/big data programming libraries, models and frameworks (e.g. Pandas, Scikit-Learn, H2O, TSFresh, FeatureTools, MLflow, Shap, Microsoft Interpret, Tensorflow, Statsmodels, Pandas-Profiling, Seaborn, Plotly, Spark, Koalas)
Working experience with cloud computing services such as Amazon AWS, Microsoft Azure or Google Cloud Platform
Excellent presentation skills to non-technical Associates communicating complex concepts in terms the audience can understand through understandable language, tables and visualizations
When evaluating the candidate, special attention will be paid to the following competencies:
Intellectual Curiosity and Critical Thinking, necessary to analyze a problem from multiple perspectives and examine the interrelationships between data that may appear superficially unrelated
Autonomous, to own projects end-to-end; ability to work on the entire stack without being dependent on other team members
Focus, to design and test a technique over days and weeks, find it doesn’t work, learn from the failure, and try again
Creativity, to invent and try new approaches to solving a problem
Attention to Detail, in order to maintain rigor and to detect and avoid over-reliance on intuition when examining data
Clear and concise written and oral communication, in order to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear and precise manner
Interpersonal skills, necessary to build good working relationships and work as part of a team
PhD or Masters in Computer Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Math or a related discipline or equivalent skill set",4.0,JM&A Group,"Deerfield Beach, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,42,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,FL,4814,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,1,0,1
1555,55,Senior IT Data Scientist - Operations,$61k-$104k,"Job Description

Job Title: Senior IT Data Scientist - Operations

City: Lake Forest / State: Illinois

Job Description

Join Reynolds Consumer Products… a world of opportunities! At Reynolds Consumer Products, we are passionate about achieving results and have fun winning as a team! We provide amazing job opportunities for growth with competitive salaries and benefits in an exciting, dynamic, fast-paced, and fun workplace environment. Are you looking to build a strong career and make a positive impact? Then we have an opportunity for you! We currently have an opportunity for an Operations Senior Data Scientist to join our team located at our Company Headquarters in Lake Forest, IL.

Your Role:

As an Operations Senior Data Scientist, you will primarily be responsible for solving operations problems by processing and analyzing data from multiple sources to identify meaningful relationships, patterns and trends. You will prepare data insights and proposals in narrative and visual forms and leverage advanced data science methods to discover opportunities to increase equipment effectiveness, reduce costs and provide insights to plants on process disruptions. You will have the opportunity to:
Improve the manufacturing process by formulating hypotheses, conducting experiments and delivering improvements to KPIs based on findings
Maintain and tune analytical models to predict and monitor the condition of plant equipment
Influence manufacturing decision makers by presenting statistical insights
Ensure our manufacturing operations operate at peak efficiency
Ultimately, you will be a vitally important team member in our Digital Manufacturing Group and help Reynolds Consumer Products succeed by leveraging data insights.

You will love it here if…
You are not only a team-player, but you foster a collaborative team environment
You are analytic, enjoy new challenges and thrive in a fast paced manufacturing operation
You are committed to operational excellence and to keeping others safe in the workplace
We need you to have:
A strong proficiency in statistical analysis methods and tools, e.g., Python, Machine Learning
3-5 years of experience in data model development, data visualization, and application of advanced analytics to drive business outcomes
3-5 years of experience in the design and implementation of data infrastructures and data hierarchies
Experience in AWS Analytics platform
SQL query skills
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
BA/BS in Data Analytics, Engineering, Business, or a related field
Icing on the cake:
Experience developing and implementing predictive maintenance and predictive quality models
Data visualization skills in Power BI
Prior experience working in operations research or related field, e.g., Industrial Engineering or Manufacturing
For applicants or employees who are disabled, or require a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application or hiring process, you may request assistance by calling us at (847)482-3550 or email Recruitment@ReynoldsBrands.com.

No recruiter calls or emails please.

Reynolds Consumer Products is an Equal Opportunity Employer EEO AA M/F/Vet/Disability.

Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, national origin, sex, protected veteran status or disability.

Reynolds Consumer Products is an Equal Opportunity Employer that complies with the laws and regulations set forth in the following EEO is The Law Poster: http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf

The Pay Transparency Policy Statement can be found on this link:

http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/PayTransparencyNondiscrimination.html

The poster and the supplement can be found on this link.

http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/ofccpost.htm

For applicants or employees who are disabled, or require a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application or hiring process, you may request assistance by calling us at (847)482-3550 or email Recruitment@ReynoldsBrands.com.

No recruiter calls or emails please.",3.5,Reynolds Consumer Products,"Lake Forest, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,10,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,IL,4082,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1556,56,"Big Data Engineer, Analytics",$61k-$104k,"Technology is constantly changing, and our adversaries are digitally “going dark” at a rate that is exceeding law enforcement’s ability to keep pace. Those charged with protecting the United States are not always able to access the evidence needed to prosecute crime and prevent terrorism. The Government has trusted in Peraton to provide the technical ability, tools, and resources to bring criminals to justice. In response to this challenge, we are seeking a talented Big Data Engineer with a focus in Analytics.

What you’ll do…

Provide entity resolution expertise in support of a large scale search and discovery application
Work closely with entity resolution subject matter experts, program engineers and stakeholders to integrate complex data sources into operation and develop new analytics and algorithms
Support advanced data exploitation capabilities using Hadoop related technologies
Enhance the data processing infrastructure using open source and commercial technologies
Capture and define requirements for entity resolution features and functionality from a UI end-user perspective
Analyze documentation and source data of new data feeds
Develop scripts to ETL source data into destination format
Provide O&M monitoring and resolution of production web services using monitoring tools including Ganglia, Jenkins, and other means
Modify pipeline scripts to enhance functionality and support bug fixes
Resolve bugs by modifying pipeline scripts and entity resolution explanation service scripts
Coordinate development efforts in an agile team

You’d be a great fit if…

You’ve obtained a BS degree and have five (5) years of relevant experience. However, equivalent experience may be considered in lieu of degree.
You have three (3) or more years of experience using Hadoop or other large-scale data warehouse technologies to support entity and relationship resolution and operations
You have one (1) year of experience in Apache, Spark, Hive, Pig, ER Resolution Engines, Unix scripting, Novetta Entity Analytics, Waremen Pro or similar ER engines
You have a current Top Secret security clearance with SCI eligibility and the ability to obtain a polygraph

It would be even better if you…

Have hands on experience with any of the following technologies:
SQL
Linux scripting
AWK, PERL, BASH or other scripting language
SOLR
Jenkins configuration to perform O&M operations
Spark

What you’ll get…

An immediately-vested 401(K) with employer matching
Comprehensive medical, dental, and vision coverage
Tuition assistance, financing, and refinancing
Company-paid infertility treatments
Cross-training and professional development opportunities
Influence major initiatives
This position requires the candidate to have a current Top Secret security clearance and the ability to obtain a polygraph. Candidate must possess SCI eligibility.
We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We consider applicants without regard to race, color, religion, age, national origin, ancestry, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, marital status, veteran status, disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or membership in any other group protected by federal, state, or local law.",3.5,Peraton,"Chantilly, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,3,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,VA,3236,0,data engineer,0,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0
1557,57,Aviation Data Scientist and Machine Learning Engineer,$61k-$104k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE has an immediate opening for an Aviation Data Scientist with a specialization in machine learning to be part of a dynamic team of professionals working to improve the efficiency of traffic flow management operations in the United States National Airspace System (NAS). We are looking to expand our team with someone with demonstrated technical excellence involving analysis of aviation data and the application of machine learning techniques to solving complex problems. Key Functions: The successful candidate will be part of a team conducting analyses of multiple, integrated sets of aviation, weather, and other related data to identify ways to improve predictive models, identify trends impacting operations, and apply machine learning techniques to solve complex problems. Qualifications: Preferred Qualifications: - Experience using tools such as Java, R, and Python to prepare and analyze time series data. - Coding, data modeling, simulation, and data visualization experience (e.g., Tableau). - Excellent statistical and mathematical skills. - Excellent written and verbal communications skills. - Experience with machine learning techniques and algorithm development. - Familiarity with machine learning frameworks (like TensorFlow, Keras, or PyTorch) and libraries (like scikit-learn). - Knowledge of Hadoop (e.g., Pig, Spark) or another distributed computing system. - Past experience working in the aviation domain and with aviation data. Skill is desired, but not required. Minimum Qualifications: BS in Data Science, Machine Learning, or related field of study.

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,MITRE,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,VA,3412,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,0
1558,58,Data Scientist,$61k-$104k,"About Triplebyte

Triplebyte is transforming the way software engineers are hired. Our mission is to build an open, valuable and skills-based credential for all engineers and data scientists. This is important because millions of people have skills (and deserve good jobs), but don't fit the profile that recruiters seek. We aim to cut out that noise by matching opportunities to people who have the skills to succeed in them - regardless of their background.

Companies like Apple, Dropbox and American Express trust Triplebyte's technical assessment to identify the best engineers for their open roles and reduce the time and effort it takes to hire them.

We raised a $35 million Series B and our team of 64 is growing! We're building out the leadership of our team to help us scale to the next phase.

Press Links:

You can read more about our company and hear from our founders in the press here:

Triplebyte raises $35M for its online coding test and credentialing service for hiring engineers

Triplebyte incubates ColorStack to increase Black and Latinx representation in CS programs

CNBC (Your Next Job Interview Could be with a Robot)

Building an Engineering Team - Harj Taggar and Ammon Bartram

Role Description

As a data scientist at Triplebyte, you'll have the opportunity to work on a variety of challenges to help us scale. You'll be part of a small team, who are leveraging data to fix technical hiring. Your day to day, will include a mix of dataset acquisition, statistical modeling, exploratory data analysis, and software engineering. You'll report directly to Triplebytes' Head of Machine Learning and will work alongside a team of 6-8 machine learning engineers and data scientists.Fields your work will touch on
Psychometrics
Recommender systems
Time series analysis
Survival analysis
Bayesian inference
Probabilistic programming
This is an ideal role for a data scientist who wants the scope and responsibility to own features/products from the inception and research phase through to measuring real-world results.

Compensation and Benefits

Competitive salary and stock options package

Open vacation policy

Employer paid health, vision and dental insurance

401(k) plan with matching

Pre-tax commuter benefits

Daily catered lunches

The Company is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions on the basis of merit and business needs. The Company does not discriminate against employees or applicants (in any aspect of employment, including, but not limited to recruiting and hiring, job assignment, compensation, opportunities for advancement, promotion, transfers, evaluation, benefits, training, discipline, and termination), on the basis of any characteristic protected under applicable federal, state, or local laws.",3.2,Triplebyte,California,-1,51 to 200 Employees,5,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,CA,2771,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1560,60,Data Scientist in Artificial Intelligence Early Career,$61k-$104k,"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311096

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing & Analytics

Group: Data Sciences & Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and deep learning research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to geo-spatial analytics, AI assurance, adversarial machine learning, human language technologies, computer vision, disaster response and recovery, health security, and other related fields.

The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as geospatial intelligence, natural language processing, few-shot learning, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery.
*Minimum Qualifications**
Bachelor's with 0-1 years of experience or a Master's degree with 0 years of experience is required.
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-20_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-10-19_",3.9,PNNL,"Seattle, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,55,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,WA,4798,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,1
1561,61,Associate Data Scientist,$61k-$104k,"Job Description

As an Associate Data Scientist, you will apply modern data storage, movement, and transformation architectures and techniques to extract and engineer features from any scale structured or unstructured data in health, IT system, business processes, or external data. You will also access, cleanse, compile, and transform disparate data sets to conduct exploratory and pre-defined analyses using scientifically valid techniques and generate meaningful insights as well as assist with feasibility studies to identify data availability, quality and modeling requirements, and dependencies.

Qualifications

Basic Qualifications
Master’s Degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Analytics, Biostatistics, Applied Mathematics, Software Engineering, Data Science, or related field, or equivalent relevant work experience
At least 1 year of statistical programming and applied programming work experience
At least 1 year Data mining, quantitative analysis, and/or statistical modeling including predictive performance and algorithm optimization work experience
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with relational databases and SQL; NoSQL databases (hBase, Cassandra, MongoDB, Couch DB, Riak) and unstructured data; Spark; Pig and Avro
Experience with agile software development methodologies
Expectations
Willing to travel up to 20% of the time as needed
Must be currently residing in or willing to relocate to the Kansas City metro area",4.0,Cerner,"North Kansas City, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,41,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,MO,1445,0,data scientist,0,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,1
1563,63,"Data Scientist, Junior/Mid-level - FAA",$61k-$104k,"Position: Data Scientist, Junior/Mid-level - FAA

Job Summary

This position will apply advanced analytical and mathematical techniques to solve complex decision problems. Candidate will use ESRI/ArcGIS products in conjunction with high performance computing, big data analytics and data visualization techniques to assist the development of a data collection and analysis system.

Years of Relevant Experience

The position requires 2 - 7 equivalent years of experience in Geographical Information Systems, operations research, modeling and simulation, or technical analysis. Specific experience with the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) or the Aviation Industry is desired.

Essential Job Functions
Individual will support model and simulation development to provide quantitative analyses, cost-benefit and economic analyses to support the Federal Aviation Administration Program Acquisition and Operational Systems Evaluation.
Individual will have experience in developing ESRI Survey123 data collection forms
Individual will have experience in data collection, data normalization techniques, statistical analysis and performance metrics development
Individuals will have experience with compiling and integration map data for automation
Individuals will be required to contribute effectively to working groups through oral and written communication and cooperative working relationships
Individuals will support the develop of custom visualizations
Education Requirements

Bachelor’s degree required, preferably in Engineering, Mathematics, Operations Research, Physics, Economics, or similar.

Master’s degree is a plus

Skills Requirements
Experience with ESRI Tool set – ArcGIS, Survey123
Experience with pSQL/ relation databases is desired
Experience with MATLAB, SAS, Python, Java/C++/VBA and MS Office Products is desired
Experience with and data visualization tools such Shiny, Tableau, Cold Fusion is desired
Security Requirements

Must be a US citizen or a legal resident for three of the past five years

Must meet eligibility requirements for a US Public Trust security clearance",4.8,Cobec Consulting,"Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,13,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,82.5,DC,2099,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,1
1564,64,Data Scientist,$78k-$133k,"Publishers Clearing House (PCH), located in Jericho, NY is looking for a strongData Scientist who is passionate about using the power of algorithms to drive customer engagement and monetization. As a part of our Analytics team, you will be utilizing enormous volumes of data on customers, PCH products, channels, and developing advanced statistical algorithms to solve unique business problems. This is an exciting opportunity to work with big data to build data products backed by algorithms to delight customers and to drive significant advances in PCH Commerce (online and Direct Mail), Search, Online Gaming, and Digital Advertising business.

Responsibilities include but are not limited to:
Work comfortably with multi-terabyte, and billion+ rows data to extract insights and building predictive models to maximize profit
Utilize large-scale data mining and machine learning techniques to discover actionable patterns in the data
Perform rigorous model development, evaluation, design hypothesis tests, oversee test execution and result evaluation
Communicate complex analyses in a clear and actionable manner
Desired skills, experience& qualifications:
Masters degree required in Machine Learning, Applied Math, Computer Science, Economics, Statistics, or a related quantitative field
2 to 5 years’ experience in building predictive models using SAS Enterprise Guide (EG) , SAS Enterprise Miner or/and Python
Solid understanding of advanced statistical concepts, especially related to modelling is a must
Experience with publishers and or ad tech companies, experience in media, advertising and marketing vertical is a plus
Knowledge of programmatic advertising and digital acquisition. Experience in building optimization models /algorithms for media spends and maximize CPM
Experience working with enterprise-level digital analytics platform such as Google Analytics is a plus
Experience with cloud platforms AWS or Google Could Platforms (preferred)
Experience with ETL and building data pipelines and familiarity with distributed storage and big data computing technology is a plus
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Publishers Clearing House (PCH), headquartered in Jericho, NY, and with offices in NYC, Portland, ME and Boston, MA, is a leading direct-to-consumer company offering a broad range of products, digital entertainment services to consumers as well as customized solutions for advertisers. Our continued success in today’s new digital publishing environment is built on PCH’s unique, free-to-play, chance-to-win value proposition, which enables individually personalized offers based on the trusted first-party relationship we maintain with millions of consumers and is fueled by the excitement of the Publishers Clearing House brand.

Join our winning team and apply today!

This position is located in Jericho, NY. Candidates must reside in the NY tri-state area

PCH is an Equal Opportunity Employer",3.1,Publishers Clearing House,"Jericho, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,67,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,NY,2939,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
1565,65,"Sr. Data Scientist, Consumer Behavior",$78k-$133k,"Company Description

Wish is a mobile e-commerce platform that flips traditional shopping on its head. We connect hundreds of millions of people with the widest selection of delightful, surprising, and—most importantly—affordable products delivered directly to their doors. Each day on Wish, millions of customers in more than 160 countries around the world discover new products. For our over 1 million merchant partners, anyone with a good idea and a mobile phone can instantly tap into a global market.

We're fueled by creating unique products and experiences that give people access to a new type of commerce, where all are welcome. If you’ve been searching for a supportive environment to chase your curiosity and use data to investigate the questions that matter most to you, this is the place.

Job Description

At Wish, our Data Science & Engineering team is composed of Data Scientists, Data Analysts & Data Engineers who focus on centralizing corporate data in order to gain insights, knowledge and scalability, that empower a proactive and rigorous analysis of key business indicators. Our mission is to derive wisdom from data via the application of Data Science.

Wish has exciting opportunities for talented Data Scientists on our Buyer Side (Product) data science team. This is a unique opportunity to experiment with a 500 million strong consumer base that draws 100+ million MAU. Successful candidates will have extensive backgrounds in quantitative fields and significant experience with experiment design and execution at scale.

#LI-WISHXDS #HiringNow

What you'll be doing:
Proactively develop insights and models to help us understand user behavior, identify opportunities and make better product decisions.
Lead the design, analysis, and interpretation of experiments that shape decision-making across the company
Propose, test and implement new experimentation methodologies, causal-inference approaches that can sharpen our product decision-making process.
Research, identify and implement new frameworks to better measure success of our products and shape our strategy
Mentor junior data scientists on how to use more advanced methods and solve business problems
Qualifications
Advanced degree in a quantitative field.
A minimum of 3 years of Data Science experience in technology or research industry.
Proficient in Python or R
Deep statistical skills utilized in A/B testing, analyzing observational data, and modeling
An advanced ability to translate business questions into analysis and experiments that yield business insights and shape the company strategy
Preferred Qualifications:
Demonstrated track record of successful projects in applying quantitative techniques to improve a product or business.
7+ years work experience in technology or research industry.
Domain expert in one of the fields: statistics, machine learning, optimization, and economics.
Additional Information

Wish values diversity and is committed to creating an inclusive work environment. We provide equal employment opportunity for all applicants and employees. We do not discriminate based on any legally-protected class or characteristic. Employment decisions are made based on qualifications, merit, and business needs. If you need assistance or accommodation due to a disability, please let your recruiter know. For job positions in San Francisco, CA, and other locations where required, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Individuals applying for positions at Wish, including California residents, can see our privacy policy here.",3.5,Wish,"Seattle, WA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,9,Company - Private,other_industries,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,WA,3599,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1566,66,Senior Data Engineer,$78k-$133k,"About SecurityScorecard:


SecurityScorecard is an industry-leading cybersecurity company backed by Google, Sequoia, and Riverwood. Our mission is to make the world a safer place. We measure your and your vendors' cyber-health by assigning a security rating of ""A"" through ""F"" based on outside-in, non-intrusive data. Our Comprehensive security ratings, advanced data analytics, and actionable insights discover Third-Party Vulnerabilities & Security Gaps In Real-Time.
We are headquartered in NYC with over 200+ employees globally, raised over $110M USD, used by 1,000+ enterprise customers, and rating 1.5 million companies. We have created a new category of enterprise software, and our culture has helped us be recognized as one of the 10 hottest SaaS startups in NY for two years in a row.
Our vision is to create a new language for companies and their partners to communicate, understand, and improve each other's security posture.

What you will do:


As a Senior Software Engineer on the Data Pipeline Platform team, you will help us scale, support, and build the next-generation platform for our data pipelines. The team's mission is to empower data scientists, software engineers, data engineers, and threat intelligence engineers accelerate the ingestion of new data sources and present the data in a meaningful way to our clients.

You will design and implement systems for ingesting, transforming, connecting, storing, and delivering data from a wide range of sources with varying levels of complexity and scale. You will enable other engineers to deliver value rapidly with minimum duplication of effort. Automate the infrastructure supporting the data pipeline as code and deployments by improving CI/CD pipelines. Monitor, troubleshoot, and improve the data platform to maintain stability and optimal performance.

Who you are:
Bachelor's degree or higher in a quantitative/technical field such as Computer Science, Engineering, Math
6+ years of data pipeline software development experience
Exceptional skills in at least one high-level programming language (Scala, Java, Go, Python or equivalent)
Actively using and a strong understanding of big data technologies such as Kafka, Spark, Storm, Apache Flink, Databricks toolkit and Cassandra
Experience with Dataflow orchestration in Google Cloud Flow, Airflow, or Conductor
Experience with AWS services including EMR, S3, Redshift, and RDS
Excellent communication skills to collaborate with cross-functional partners and independently drive projects and decisions
Previous experience working in distributed teams. We are a remote-first company!
Located in the U.S. or Canada
Benefits:
Competitive salary
Full health benefits
Stock options
401K
You are always welcome to work from home
$3000 per year education fund
#1 Ranked Cybersecurity Analytics company in the word
SecurityScorecard embraces diversity. We believe that our team is strengthened through hiring and retaining employees with diverse backgrounds, skillsets, ideas, and perspectives. We make hiring decisions based upon merit and do not discriminate based on race, religion, national origin, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, or marital, veteran, or disability status.",4.1,SecurityScorecard,Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,7,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,Remote,3222,1,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
1570,70,Data Scientist- Streetsboro Ohio Office,$78k-$133k,"The Step2 Company is the largest American manufacturer of preschool and toddler toys and one of the world’s largest rotational molders of plastics. It’s our mission to be the leading innovator of children's products that build imaginations and enrich the family's celebration of childhood.

Step2 proudly employs moms, dads, grandparents, aunts, uncles and everyone in between. We offer an environment of fun and hard work. Our mission of bringing families together isn’t just for our customers. The Step2 family starts with our employees and we’re excited that you’re interested in joining our team!

PRIMARY FUNCTION: Reporting to the IT Director, and in close collaboration FP&A, the Data Scientist will support our product, sales, operations, and marketing teams with insights gained from analyzing company data. The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. They must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. They must have a proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights. They must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams. The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

SPECIFIC DUTIES/ACCOUNTABILITIES:
Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis
Keep up-to-date with latest technology trends
Communicate results and ideas to key decision makers
Implement new statistical or other mathematical methodologies as needed for specific models or analysis
Optimize joint development efforts through appropriate database use and project design
Functions as Oracle subject matter expert and ensures end users are properly trained to use system and reports appropriately; troubleshoots issues.
Serves as the System Administrator for the Daily Operating System (D.O.S.) Report and supporting network.
Ensures functionality and accuracy of reports which make up the D.O.S. report (i.e. Mold Placement Master, Mold Placement Report, Attendance Rosters).
Keeps D.O.S. supporting data updated (i.e. labor standards, NSP pricing, tooling information, goals, etc.)
Data mines and analyzes data from Oracle to provide user-friendly ad-hoc reports as request by various departments and upper level management.
Design and create a data repository to achieve the above objectives
BASIC QUALIFICATIONS:
5-7 years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models, a degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field.
Experience working with and creating data architectures.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across teams.
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques.
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Google Analytics, Site Catalyst, Adwords, Content Analytics, Facebook Insights, etc.


ADDITIONAL QUALIFICATIONS:
Excellent project management skills
Ability to explain complex issues clearly and succinctly
Effectively summarizes and communicates results
Ability to forecast potential problems and pitfalls
What are the perks?
· Parental Leave
· 401k with Employer Match
· Tuition Assistance
· Company Paid Life& Disability Insurance
· Adoption Assistance
· Medical, Dental and Vision
· Premium FREE Medical Plan
· Employee Discount
· 10 Paid Holidays
· Advancement Opportunities
Join our family!

Apply today or text Step2Jobs to 97211 to connect with a recruiter.

Step2 is an Equal Opportunity Employer



Step2 is an Equal Opportunity Employer",3.3,Step2,"Streetsboro, OH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,29,Company - Private,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,OH,4210,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
1571,71,Senior Data Engineer,$78k-$133k,"Brain Corp is a San Diego-based AI company creating transformative core technology for the robotics industry. Our diverse engineering teams in Software, Hardware Design, and Embedded Systems are creating comprehensive solutions to support the builders of today's autonomous machines in successfully producing, deploying, and supporting commercial robots across industries and applications. Brain Corp is funded by the SoftBank Vision Fund and Qualcomm Ventures. For more information please visit: https://www.braincorp.com/

Position Summary:

As a member of the Software Engineering team, the Senior Data Engineer owns the definition, execution, and delivery of technical architecture for Brain Corporation's Product Analytics team. Your work will improve the quality, reliability, accuracy, and consistency of our data. You will help build project-specific data pipelines and validation tools. You will have a hands-on role with product specialists and be responsible for working with them to understand data requirements and then implement those requirements in software.

Duties and Responsibilities:
Fully own critical portions of Brain Corporation's product analytics data model.
Collaborate with stakeholders to understand needs, model tables using data warehouse best practices, and develop data pipelines to ensure the timely delivery of high-quality data.
Work with technical and product stakeholders to understand data-oriented project requirements.
Write code that is understandable, simple, and easy to maintain.
Design, implement and ensure the accuracy of validation and related services for data models.
Think and work agile, including automated testing, continuous integration and deployment.
Manage numerous requests concurrently and strategically, prioritizing when necessary.
What you need:
Bachelor's in Computer Science or other related field.
5-8+ years software development experience.
Passionate about data quality and delivering effective data to impact the business.
Experience with sourcing and modeling data from application REST-like APIs.
MPP/Cloud data warehouse solutions (Snowflake, etc).
Proficiency in SQL, experience writing ETLs.
Proficiency in JavaScript/Node.js, Python, or willingness to translate experience in equivalent language.
Things that make a difference:
Master's in Computer Science or other related field.
Experience with Kafka, AMQP or other message bus.
OpenAPI/Swagger.
Express.js, NestJS.
SAML, OKTA.
Azure experience is a plus.
Being comfortable outside of your comfort zone - explore new tech, make your own tool, or find a new way to address an old problem.
Physical Demands:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Essential functions may require maintaining the physical condition necessary for sitting, walking or standing for periods of time; operating a computer and keyboard; talk and hear at normal room levels; using hands to finger, grasp, and feel; repetitive motion; close visual acuity to prepare and analyze data and figures; transcribing; viewing a computer terminal; extensive reading; lift, push, carry, or pull up to 10 pounds.

Work Environment:

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. The noise level in the work environment is usually quiet to moderate. Employee is exposed to the typical office environment with computers, printers and telephones.",3.5,Brain Corp,"San Diego, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,11,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,CA,3677,1,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,1
1573,73,Biological Data Scientist,$78k-$133k,"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311163

Directorate: Earth and Biological Sciences Directorate

Division: Biological Sciences

Group: Biological Systems Science
*Job Description**
The new Computational Biology Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is seeking a senior data scientist to join our team to provide technical expertise on existing projects, lead in the development of new research proposals, and provide leadership and mentorship to junior scientists and peers. Expertise in statistics, machine learning, analysis of omic data, biomarker discovery, software development, proposal development, prior management experience, and working in multidisciplinary teams are highly relevant.

The data scientist will contribute to diverse fundamental science research programs studying human health problems such as cancer and infectious diseases as well as microbial communities and environmental microbiology. The candidate will be responsible for data analysis from various high-throughput omics platforms, such as DNA/RNA sequence data, proteomics and metabolomics. The position involves technical work with complex multi-omics data from ongoing studies, focusing on application of methods for analysis, data integration, and machine learning. The incumbent will define and carry out the application of existing methodologies, as well as perform original research in the field of computational biology as needed to extract meaning from complex biological data. In addition to technical research, this position expects leadership in mentoring, publishing, project leadership, strategic planning and business development.

The ideal candidate should have a strong statistics and programming skills with knowledge of fundamental basic biology. The candidate should have good communication skills with a demonstrated capability to perform multi-disciplinary, collaborative research, be the lead author of a significant number of technical products and have national recognition through professional societies or participation in national meetings in statistics or computational biology. The candidate should also have an interest in applying new approaches and knowledge to science problems associated with human health, bioenergy, and carbon cycling. The candidate should be highly proficient in at least on programming language (Python, R, e.g.) and have experience in software development practices (version control, unit testing, etc.).
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ BS/BA with 7 years of experience, MS/MA with 5 years of experience, or PhD with 3 years of experience
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ PhD in statistics, biostatistics, bioinformatics or a closely related field.

+ Significant experience with software development tools (GitHub) and Python or R development experience

+ Demonstrated ability to collaborate within and across institutions

+ National reputation through scientific publication and conference presentation

+ Prior team leadership
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Closing Statement**
+ U.S. Citizenship

_Directorate:_ _Earth & Biological Sciences_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Biological Systems Science_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-09-28_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-10-05_",3.9,PNNL,"Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,55,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,WA,4172,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1575,75,Claims Data Scientist,$78k-$133k,"About ConcertAI

ConcertAI is the leading provider of precision oncology solutions for biopharma and healthcare, leveraging the largest collection of research-grade Real-world Data and the only broadly deployed oncology-specific AI solutions. Our mission is to improve translational sciences; accelerate therapeutic clinical development; and provide new capabilities for post-approval studies to accelerate needed new medical innovations to patients and to improve patient outcomes.
ConcertAI has emerged as one of the highest growth technology companies in Real-world Data and AI, backed by industry leading private equity companies: SymphonyAI, Declaration Partners, Maverick Ventures, and Alliance|Bernstein.

Role Summary
As a Claims Data Scientist at ConcertAI, you will be responsible for data exploration, and analysis on patient data for various stakeholders in the oncology and healthcare domain, including claims and claims-clinical linked data assets. You will report to the Vice President of Data Products. You should have a good mix of programming/CS, visualization, stats/math, and ML skills (with a particular strength in at least 2 of those areas), and ideally, you have been applying those skills in healthcare. You should have previous experience with healthcare claims. You will design methods and models around client driven needs and you will collaborate with various subject matter experts to inform those methods. You will assist the client delivery team with insights, dashboards, and ad-hoc analytics. You will also work with the engineering team to build prototypes and models for new product development.
Responsibilities
Understand external claims data assets and oversee the ingestion, processing, de-identification, and provisioning for data assets and research projects.
Understand client / product needs and translate them into tactical R&D initiatives with defined goals and timelines.
Reason about healthcare specific problems to analyze visualize, interpret, and contextualize results.
Run a variety of analytics from data QA to complex models.
Become the internal subject matter expert on all things claims.
Implement models using high level software packages (SKlearn, R, TensorFlow, Spark).
Collaborate on software projects with engineers, providing analytical guidance and contributing to codebase.
Requirements
BSc or higher in a STEM field, with formal training in CS, stats, and math.
Strong programming abilities in at least one high level language (python, stata, R).
Knowledge of statistical methods- regression, ANOVA, EDA, PCA, etc.
Basic visualization skills- matplotlib/seaborn/plotly/etc, tableau.
Experience with big data – Cloud data warehouses, cluster computing, Spark, MapReduce/Hadoop.
Experience with healthcare claims data
Intimate familiarity with the python data science stack (pandas, sklearn, numpy/scipy).
Firm understanding of claims data processing and adjudication, including rejections, re-submissions, and identifying final claims.
Ideal candidate would have a competency around linking EMR and claims data via identity management.
Learn More About ConcertAI

ConcertAI is transforming how healthcare is delivered and dedicated to improving patient outcomes in oncology by offering innovative solutions on how data and intelligence is used to solve healthcare problems. We are creating something special in our culture, by building a collaborative, engaged, patient focused, team approach to our mission. Our high-performance teams are looking to add great talent to the mix and we are hiring for the right mix of new skills and diverse mindset. Learn more about ConcertAI at www.concertai.com or on LinkedIn .",3.6,ConcertAI,Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,Remote,3678,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,0
1579,79,Artificial Intelligence/Machine Learning Data Scientist,$78k-$133k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

The Aviation Safety & Analysis department is individuals with interest in applying their data science skills to deep and challenging problems in the aviation domain. We have a treasure trove of data including time series, text and sensor data and challenging problems to solve. We are seeking skills in machine learning, deep learning, text mining, big data and software/application development.

If Sklearn, pyTorch, Keras,TensorFlow, LSTM, LDA, anomaly detection, entity extraction, summarization mean something to you, we want to talk to you. You are not required to have skills in all of these but should have hands-on skill in at least one area and the ability to dive deep in the data, and learn the necessary skills to get the job done.

The candidate will work with the FAA and international customers, leveraging one of the largest repositories of aviation data to improve the capabilities, safety, and efficiency of the aviation system.

The candidate will be responsible for supporting a team of more senior AI/ML staff and Data Scientists in the following tasks:
Leveraging AI/ML techniques and solutions to identify complex patterns for predicting safety hazards
Increasing the efficiency and quality of the vulnerability discovery process by tightly integrating automated processes, AI/ML techniques and human SME/analyst expertise
Develop and prototype AI algorithms and software tools.
Enhance and maintain current analysis tools, including automation of current processes using AI/ML algorithms.
Conduct quantitative data analysis using a variety of datasets, including developing retrieval, processing, fusion, analysis, and visualization of various datasets
Develop techniques that make use of both digital flight data, text-based safety reporting, and a variety of other aviation data sets both in a silo and in a fused environment to identify potential safety vulnerabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related fields
Hands-on Software Development Skills (Python-Preferred)
Experience or educational courses/projects in Machine Learning, and/or Text Mining Algorithms.
Ability to work closely with Domain experts to develop tools/algorithms needed to answer research questions in their studies
Excellent Communication Skills (with the abilty to explain developed tools and ML algorithms to a non-technical audience)
Ability to formulate operational problems in aviation domain as technical problems that allows for reuse of leading research in the area.
Proven ability to work independently to learn new technologies, techniques, processes, languages, platforms, systems
Strong analytic, inferencing, critical thinking, and creative problem-solving skills
Self-starter with ability to work both independently and with a team

Preferred Qualifications:
1 to 2 years of relevant experience
Experience with Deep Learning Frameworks such as Keras, Tensorflow, PyTorch,Mxnet etc. Ability to apply these frameworks to real problems in the ‘time -series’ domain
Experience with interpretability of deep learning models
Big Data Skills (Hadoop, Spark, recent deep learning platforms)
Visualizations/Web Development Skills (e.g. Tableau, MEAN stack - MongoDB, ExpressJS, AngularJS, NodeJS).
Practical experience with statistical analysis
Experience with text mining tools and techniques including in areas of summarization , search (e.g. ELK Stack) , entity extraction, training set generation (e.g. Snorkel) and anomaly detection
Expert software development skills lifecycle including developing and maintain good production quality code
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,MITRE,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,VA,5495,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,0
1580,80,Lead Data Scientist,$78k-$133k,"Our mission is to make the best mental health tools radically accessible for everyone.

We are pioneers in building personalized digital mental health tools to help millions of people with mental health difficulties. We are building a suite of regulated, prescription only digital therapeutics as well as a sophisticated delivery platform capable of responding to the lived experience of our users.

Our tools are powered by the latest research in NLP and ML, use scientifically proven techniques from Cognitive Behavior Therapy, and are based on 10 years of intervention science at Stanford University. Our founder has an international reputation in Digital Mental Health intervention development. And our Chairman is Andrew Ng; and Dan Jurafsky is a member of our advisory board, both globally recognized leaders in AI/NLP.

There has never been a better time to use your data science skills for good. Given the recent acceleration in infrastructure to allow for the meaningful adoption of DTx, our strong product reputation and existing relationships within health systems, Woebot is in a period of explosive growth. We are looking for a product-minded data scientist to continue to create value for our users, customers, and execute on our IP strategy.

What you will do:

As a leader in the Product team, you will work cross-departmentally with clinical and engineering team members to build machine learning and AI algorithms that are the core of Woebot's intelligence. There are four areas we want you to own and drive:

Drive An Insights & Analytics Culture
You will help create data analysis and analytics pipelines that improve not only the underlying ML algorithms but also the product and the user's experience.
You will lead a team of Analysts and be responsible for good data driven hygiene, including the creation, redesign, and maintenance of analytics dashboards and BI tools such as BigQuery, Google Data Studio, or Tableau.
You will also advise on data labeling strategy so that Woebot's conversational engine is continuously improved and informs changes in features, content, and UX.
Improve User Personalization:
Woebot exchanges 4.7 M messages with our users every week. You will create & lead a data-driven personalization strategy for this audience.
We consider personalization to be key for developing a relationship over time while delivering precision interventions, that is; the right method to the right person at the right time.
Contribute To Evidence:
In the next 6 months, you'll help Woebot develop evidence & trends to demonstrate the value of our highest priority products.
You're helping answer the most pressing questions in the mental health field around engagement, dose, and treatment outcomes.
In partnership with our Clinical team and academic partners, we expect you to contribute to our pipeline of peer-reviewed published research.
In addition to some platform-related pieces, you will lead publication in Data Science and HCI research.
What Your First 90 Days Could Look Like
By Day 30 - Assess the lay of the landscape & team - and make suggestions around in house analytic tools, dashboard and strategies.
By Day 60 - understand the roadmap with our founder and reverse engineer our tailored interventions. Deliver a prioritized list of roadmap items.
By Day 90 - Submit your first publication. Execute on a plan for improving user outcomes with our analytics and ML.
Role Specific Competencies:
PhD in Data Analysis or ML/AI or computational field with 8-10+ years of applied experience
Knowledge of one or more modern ML/NLP frameworks, such as PyTorch, Tensorflow, or Keras
Track Record of publishing in peer reviewed academic literature
You've led and managed other analysts and data scientists.
Strong written and verbal communication skills
What you will add to our culture:
Strong work-ethic: Works hard to get a job done.
Proactive & flexible: Able to hit the ground running, takes responsibility for finding a way to get the job done.
Empathic: Place a high value on user-experience, are a team player motivated to help others be successful.
High standards: Applies high standards toward everything.
Humble: You want to learn and grow in the role, and are open to feedback on how to do that.
What we offer:
Competitive Salary
Stock Options
Flexible PTO
Health, Dental & Vision
Healthy Snacks & Meals
Woebot is an equal opportunity employer and we deeply value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",4.1,Woebot Health,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,3,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,CA,4608,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,0
1581,81,Clinical Data Scientist,$78k-$133k,"You will conduct analyses using various disparate types of healthcare data (e.g., clinical trial data, insurance claims data, Electronic Health Record (EHR) data, etc.). You will explore these data with a critical eye and transform these data into meaningful insights, creating outputs that may be used for publication, regulatory submissions, internal decision-making, market tracking, or other uses. Working closely with the other members of the Clinical Computational Sciences team, you will be encouraged to use new and emerging data sources and technologies to drive innovation and to conduct analyses at scale.
The Impact You Will Have
Our mission is to make innovative drugs affordable and accessible. You will be instrumental in making that vision a reality. We are working to build a truly modern and efficient clinical development organization, with data at the core of what we do. You will play a key role in analyzing this data in support of our development programs.
Your Superpowers
You hold a Masters or PhD in biostatistics, epidemiology, health economics, public health, computational biology or another quantitative scientific discipline, with 1-3 years of work experience
You are problem focused, creative, and practical in how you apply data to problems
You love working with data and live for the “aha!” moments where you use it to answer meaningful questions
You have experience applying observational and statistical methods to conduct rigorous scientific analyses
You’re energized by the prospect of rolling up your sleeves to tackle important problems in drug development and reimbursement
You can program fluently in a modern statistical programming software (e.g., R) and want to develop your skills further.
You’ve worked with data scientists and software engineers to put code into production – you think about scalable ways to improve the reach of your work.
You want to build a career in clinical data analysis (biostatistics, health economics, RWE, etc.)
Bonus points if you have experience in genomic data analysis or oncology data experience
You are an excellent communicator – you can use data to tell a clear and compelling story and can communicate complex analyses to many types of stakeholders
You have a curious mind and are excited to learn new skills, tools, and about novel types and uses of data.
EQRx is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",5.0,EQRx,"Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,MA,2640,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
1583,83,Data Scientist Virtual Hiring Event,$78k-$133k,"Aveshka Hiring Event! Data Scientist

Event Details
Date: Friday, October 2, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Data Scientist

Intake Details:

Requirements

Data Visualization

Big Data

Programming

What to bring to this event

Updated resume

What to wear

Dress code is Casual (come as you are, but please be presentable).

About Aveshka

Aveshka is a professional services firm that helps clients by developing creative yet highly effective solutions to today’s ever-increasing threats and challenges. Our name, derived from the Hindi word meaning “innovation” or “discovery,” reflects our drive to bring cutting-edge, breakthrough solutions to the table. Our clients appreciate our team’s thought leadership, candid advice, and genuine partnership.

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

Responsibilities

•Handles raw data (e.g., structured, unstructured and mixed datasets), and analyzes data through the application of various statistical techniques or tools.

•Familiar with programming languages such as, but not limited to, R, SAS, Python, MatLab, SQL, Hive, Pig, and Spark.

•Experienced in working with and exploiting big data; distributed computing; predictive modeling; mathematics; statistics; machine learning; story-telling; and visualization.

•Demonstrates ability to extract meaning from and interpret data using a variety of tools and methods from statistics and machine learning.

•Ability to collect, clean, and mung data

in a timely manner as part of a cross-functional team in an intelligence, or related environment.

•Possesses strong working knowledge of the

Microsoft Office Suite, including Access, Excel, PowerPoint, Project, Visio, and Word.

Required

Experience:

•1-10 years of related experience

•Experience with programming languages such as, but not limited to: R, SAS, Python, MatLab, SQL, Hive, Pig, and Spark.

•Experience with using the Microsoft Office suite, including Access, Excel, PowerPoint, Project, Visio, and Word

Required Education:

•Bachelor’s Degree",3.6,Aveshka,"Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,10,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,DC,2271,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
1584,84,Data Science Software Engineer,$78k-$133k,"The Schneider organization is seeking an experienced Data Science Software Engineer to be responsible for the creation of tools and applications that enable complex Advanced Analytics solutions within the enterprise. You will create conceptual prototypes to test new concepts, develop advanced analytics systems to solve challenging business problems, and deploy these tools and systems into the business and monitor their effectiveness and usefulness. You will also research the use of purchased and open-source technologies and concepts that support the creation of tools and systems for use by technical and non-technical users.

About the role:
Provide expert technical guidance in project working groups. Will frequently be asked to lead technical project discussions.
Gather requirements, design, develop, test, implement, and support applications developed across various development environments and in various languages.
Work with the Engineering team to develop and apply heuristics and mathematical concepts, such as natural language processing (NLP), simulation, optimization, machine learning, and statistical models to business problems. Develops state-of-the-art advanced analytics solutions for complex business problems.
Create prototype applications for complex solutions to implement approved concepts, actively guides and monitors the prototype when deployed to key users, transitions the prototype into a production system and provides production-support after implementation.
Follow appropriate development methodologies while developing applications.
As an associate you will enjoy a strong work/life balance that includes paid vacation and holidays along with paid personal time off. You will also have access to medical, dental, and vision insurance and enjoy our company-paid life insurance and 401k savings with a company funded retirement plan. Schneider is dedicated to continuous individual development and offers a wide variety of opportunities through company-paid training and more than 170 personal development courses. What are you waiting for? You will love it here!

Our ideal candidate will have:
Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, or related field, plus a minimum of 5 years of IT work experience in systems analysis, designing, programming, system admin, implementation and maintenance of applications within an application domain; or the equivalent.
Advanced knowledge of advanced analytics software technologies, technical design, programming, monitoring, and troubleshooting enabling software related technologies. Knowledgeable of advanced analytics strategies, architectural standards and best practices.
Two or more years of experience with two or more programming languages from the following list required: Java, Python, JavaScript, C++, Ruby, C#, Objective-C or R.
Advanced experience with Python or Java specifically.
Experience with any data science tools such as R, SAS, or SPSS a plus. Experience with the HDFS/YARN/Spark and related tools a plus.
Experience with mathematical modeling languages (DOcplex/CPLEX, Matlab, GAMS) a plus.
Experience developing applications in a Linux server environment preferred.
Company overview:

Schneider is a premier provider of transportation and logistics services. Our legacy started in 1935 with one man, one truck and one dream. Since then, we’ve grown and evolved to become a nearly $5 billion company (2019 revenue) with one of the broadest portfolios of services in the industry delivering superior customer experiences.

The Schneider Way:
We treat our customers, associates, shareholders and suppliers with integrity, dignity and respect.
We are a desirable employer due to our dedication to achieving mutually beneficial, lasting relationships.
We are a responsible member of the community.
Core Values:
Safety- first and always
Integrity in every action
Respect for all
Excellence in all that we do
Rise to the challenge and become a part of the Schneider family. Be the difference with a leader in an industry that impacts the world.

Apply today at http://www.schneiderjobs.com/.
Schneider is an equal opportunity employer.",3.2,Schneider,"Green Bay, WI",-1,10000+ Employees,85,Company - Public,other_industries,Transportation & Logistics,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,WI,4149,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
1585,85,"Sr. Manager, Supply Chain Business Intelligence and Data Science",$78k-$133k,"At Niagara, we’re looking for Team Members who want to be part of achieving our mission to provide our customers the highest quality most affordable bottled water.

Consider applying here, if you want to:

Work in an entrepreneurial and dynamic environment with a chance to make an impact.
Develop lasting relationships with great people.
Have the opportunity to build a satisfying career.

We offer competitive compensation and benefits packages for our Team Members.

Sr. Manager, Supply Chain Business Intelligence and Data Science

The Supply Chain Business Intelligence (BI) team owns data visibility and insights initiatives within the Supply Chain department. BI, together with Continuous Improvement (CI) and Training teams makes up the recently established “Supply Chain Solutions” team. This team plays a central role in defining the future of how Niagara’s Supply Chain department will operate and whether the company itself will be able to maintain a competitive advantage in our market space. The BI team support all Supply Chain functions: Planning, Procurement, Logistics, and Customer Service.

The Senior Manager of Supply Chain Business Intelligence is a Supply Chain leader who understands data from both operational/strategic points of view and is responsible for providing “Data-to-Insight” (BI) tools to support and enhance business strategies. Said leader will act as the main conduit between Supply Chain and IT as well as collaborate with other BI units housed within Finance/ Manufacturing/ Engineering. As such, s/he will be responsible for developing a roadmap and portfolio of all B.I. and technology projects necessary to support the long-term competitive needs of the entire supply chain department as well as the company as a whole. This individual will lead a team of business intelligence analysts who own the end to end for implementing data marts, ad-hoc self-serve reports, and dashboards to empower the broader group of business users.

Furthermore, Data Science will be an integral part of this role. As an organization, we are very keen on exploration in this area and leveraging it to perpetuate our competitive advantage in the coming decade. With this backdrop in mind, we seeking a candidate who has significant hands-on experience working on “Data Insight” type initiative where Data Science concepts were rigorously applied within a framework of best-of-breed Data Science toolsets. This is in addition to and not in lieu of the more traditional BI responsibilities and demonstrated leadership skillset that were laid out in the proceeding segment.

Essential Functions

Serves as a key point of contact for all data visibility and insights initiatives within the Supply Chain department and supports initiatives undertaken by cross-functional process improvement teams.
Coordinates with Supply Chain leadership and develops BI technology and Data Science capability roadmaps for all Supply Chain functions; primary partners include: Logistics, Customer Service, Procurement, Strategic Planning, as well as non-Supply Chain functional partners such as Finance/IT.
Injects direct Data Science know-how into the organization, including skillset and experience working within a robust Data Science platform such as Amazon SageMaker and RapidMiner.
Ensures that the necessary data architecture and software tools are available to allow for insightful and impactful machine learning, big data, and statistical analyses.
Leads the development of various predictive analytics/optimization/heuristics based models.
Employs data mining, data warehousing, segmentation, and other analytical techniques to capture important trends and create relevant measurement dashboards in platforms such as IBM Cognos, Tableau, Informatica, and Oracle OBIEE/OACS.
Understands the functional and technical design/architecture of ERP/OTM/WMS/EDI technologies.
Maintains continued enhancements and augmentations to existing B.I. tools and supply chain technology solutions.
Monitors and manages data issues and establish plans for ensuring data quality and integrity between transaction source systems and reporting environments.
Spearheads the development of policies, processes, standards, and best practices in data and integration management.
Develops and executes a strategy to provision business users with very accessible daily technical support answering analytical & technology related questions.
Publishes periodic updates on status of various initiatives to all Supply Chain team members and key stakeholders in other departments.
Collaborates with Continuous Improvement team to re-engineer processes, software enhancements, and KPIs framework to fully leverage our ever advancing BI capabilities.
Collaborates with Supply Chain Training team and Supply Chain leaders to administer appropriate trainings necessary to standardize technology usage.

Please note this job description is not designed to contain a comprehensive list of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without prior notice.

Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications:
6 Years – Experience in Technology Consulting or Data Analytics
6 Years – Experience in or supporting Operations/Strategy
4 Years – Experience managing people and projects
experience may include a combination of work experience and education
Preferred Qualifications:
10+ Years– Experience in Technology Consulting or Data Analytics
10+ Years – Experience in or supporting Operations/Strategy
6 Years – Experience managing people and projects
experience may include a combination of work experience and education
Competencies

Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Self-motivated with a proven record of taking the initiative
Ability to adjust and execute in a very dynamic and ever-changing environment
Ability to excel and deliver results working cross-functionally in a matrix environment
Technology acumen – Strong knowledge of latest Supply Chain integration technologies such as EDI, Web Services, Block Chain and etc.
Software skills – Subject Matter Expert level knowledge/experience in enterprise systems such as Oracle EBS, JDA, Logility
Leadership – Displays passion and optimism; Inspires and motivates others to perform well; Influences actions and opinions of others
People Management and Development – Fosters a quality focus in others; Builds upon areas of strength; Designs and executes plan to improve areas of weakness
Change Management – Communicates changes, builds commitment, and overcomes resistance
Oral Communication – Speaks clearly and persuasively in both positive and negative situations; Demonstrates ability to communicate well with other team members and with non-technical end users; Demonstrates refined and comprehensive presentation skills
Written Communication – Writes clearly and informatively; Presents numerical data effectively; Able to read and interpret intricate written information and data

This position embodies the values of Niagara’s LIFE competency model, focusing on the following key drivers of success:

Lead Like an Owner
Provides strategic input and oversight to departmental projects
Skilled in reducing costs and managing timelines while prioritizing long run impact
Leads/facilitates discussions to get positive outcomes for the customer
Makes strategic and sustainable data driven decisions which prioritize the needs of the customer over departmental/individual goals
InnovACT
Continuously evaluates existing programs and processes, and develops new initiatives to increase efficiency and reduce waste
Creates, monitors, and responds to departmental performance metrics to drive continuous improvement
Communicates a clear vision, organizes resources effectively, and adjusts the strategy as needed when managing change
Find a Way
Demonstrates ability to think analytically and synthesize complex information
Effectively delegates technical tasks to subordinates
Works effectively with depts, vendors, and customers to achieve organizational success
Identifies opportunities for collaboration in strategic ways
Empowered to be Great
Engages in long term talent planning
Provides opportunities for the development of all direct reports
Understands, identifies, and addresses conflict within own team and between teams

Education

Minimum Required:
Bachelor's Degree in Supply Chain/Information Technology/Business Analytics/Systems Engineering/Data Science or other related field
Preferred:
Master's Degree in Supply Chain/Information Technology/Business Analytics/Systems Engineering/Data Science or other related field

Certification/License:

Required: N/A
Preferred: APICS CPIM/CSCP, PMP PMI

Foreign Language

Required: None Required
Preferred: None Required

Any employment agency, person or entity that submits a résumé into this career site or to a hiring manager does so with the understanding that the applicant's résumé will become the property of Niagara Bottling, LLC. Niagara Bottling, LLC will have the right to hire that applicant at its discretion without any fee owed to the submitting employment agency, person or entity.

Employment agencies that have fee agreements with Niagara Bottling, LLC and have been engaged on a search shall submit résumé to the designated Niagara Bottling, LLC recruiter or, upon authorization, submit résumé into this career site to be eligible for placement fees.",3.6,Niagara Bottling,"Diamond Bar, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,57,Company - Private,manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,CA,9466,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
1586,86,Machine Learning Engineer,$78k-$133k,"Description
This role will be part of our Applied Data Team and will be responsible for providing Machine Learning Engineering support.
Tasks & responsibilities required of this role include but are not limited to:
Construct machine learning models including data collection, normalization, and standardization, data pipeline construction, model selection and hyperparameter tuning, working ml systems that can add new data into ml model.
Create apps to present ml models and host them in the cloud or locally.
Create pipelines to query and retrieve and update data for existing applications to keep them updated
Supervise the scaling and management of the machine learning modeling ecosystem
Find orthogonal data sets to supplement models and increase alpha
Stay abreast of new technology and machine learning methodologies and implement them into the model building architecture
Work alongside (re)insurance domain experts to improve predictive aspects of their lines of business
Requirements:
3+ years of demonstrative excellence in building, scaling, and productizing machine learning models
Experience working with sparse, high dimensional, and time series data
Python ml stack
Experience dealing with imbalanced classes
Deep Learning Architectures
ML Optimization Techniques
Cloud Services: Azure, AWS, Google Cloud
Distributed systems: Hadoop, MapReduce, Spark
Databricks
Ensemble Stacking and Meta Learners
Classification and Regression Metrics
Regularization Methods
Version Control
Quant trading experience welcome but not required
Kaggle ranking of expert or higher a plus",3.5,TransRe,"New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,43,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,NY,1583,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1587,87,Senior Data Scientist,$78k-$133k,"Are you a talented and passionate engineer? Do you love solving problems and making ideas come to life? Are you a lifelong learner who thrives in dynamic environments and enjoys the challenge of learning new technologies and techniques? Are you a team player and enjoy collaboration, but you are also self-directed and enjoy the autonomy to be able to manage your own schedule and workload? Do you appreciate the importance of good communication and know that teamwork takes practice, effort and a good attitude? If so, we want to speak with you.

The Senior Data Scientist is responsible for collaborating with the team to design and implement systems that focus on forecasting, allocating, delivering, and reporting of advertising on the internet, TV, and connected devices. The successful candidate will utilize advanced mathematical, optimization, machine-learning, software engineering, and programming skills to solve challenging problems.

Responsibilities
Develop innovative forecasts, models, algorithms, and solutions and build prototypes and production implementations
Dig deep into high volumes of data, engineer features for improved forecast performance
Work cross-functionally to gather feedback and requirements from end users
Be a key contributor to product innovation and company strategy
Communicate technical information clearly to both technical and non-technical people
Required Qualifications
Degree in Operations Research, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Industrial Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or related field; MS/PhD preferred
3+ years of relevant experience
Strong analytical, statistical, and math abilities; Exceptional problem-solving skills
Excellent communication skills
Extreme attention to detail
Ability to work as part of a team in a fast-paced environment
#LI-KR1

About Amobee
The world’s leading independent advertising platform, Amobee unifies all advertising channels—including TV, programmatic and social—across all formats and devices. We provide marketers with streamlined, advanced media planning capabilities powered by in-depth analytics and proprietary audience data. Our platform and technology, provides the most advanced advertising solutions for the convergence of digital and advanced TV— including linear TV, over the top, connected TV, and premium digital video. Enabling advertisers to plan and activate across more than 150 integrated partners, including Facebook, Instagram, Pinterest, Snapchat and Twitter.

Amobee has been named to Fortune’s Top 10 Best Workplaces in Advertising and Marketing. Amobee’s platforms have been widely recognized amongst our industry winning numerous awards in technology innovation, see all Amobee Awards. We are a wholly owned subsidiary of Singtel, one of the largest telco companies in the world, reaching over 700 million mobile subscribers in 21 countries. Amobee operates across North America, Europe, Middle East, Asia and Australia. For more information, visit amobee.com or follow @amobee

In addition to our great environment, we offer a competitive base salary, employee development programs and other comprehensive benefits. Please send a cover letter along with your resume when applying to the position of interest located at Amobee.com. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. No phone calls and no recruiting agencies, please.",3.8,Amobee,"Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,15,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,MD,3359,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1589,89,Data Scientist II,$78k-$133k,"Nolij Consulting LLC is a certified Women-Owned Small Business (WOSB) that provides information technology services in test and evaluation (T&E), enterprise architecture (EA), electronic health record (EHR) modernization, infrastructure operations and maintenance (O&M), data analytics and visualization, and agile transformation. Our mission is to understand the challenges and goals of our clients, address them with innovative solutions, and work together to achieve project success. Were eager to hear from candidates like you that can join and contribute to our team.

Nolij Consulting has an opening for a Data Scientist II to join our team based in Vienna, VA.

Responsibilities:
Must be able to design, modify, develop, write and implement software programming applications.
Must be able to support and/or install software applications/operating systems.
Must be able to participate in the testing process through test reviews and analysis, test witnessing and certification of software.
Must be able to design, plan, and coordinate work teams.
Must be able to provides technical support to project team members.
Must be familiar with a variety of the field concepts, practices, and procedures.
Must be able to rely on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
Must be able to perform a variety of tasks.
Must be able to lead and direct the work of others.
Must exhibit a wide degree of creativity and latitude.
Must typically be able to report to a head of a unit/department
Requirements:
Required a bachelor's degree in science or a related area.
Required 6-8 years of experience in the field.
Note: Since this position is for a Federal Project, a candidate must possess US Citizenship to obtain Clearance.
Do you like the idea of being a driver on a team of distinction? If so, we want to hear from you. To apply, go to https://www.nolijconsulting.com/careers/

Nolij is an EEO/Affirmative Action employer and encourages all qualified applicants to apply.",4.1,Nolij Consulting,"Vienna, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,8,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,VA,1978,1,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1590,90,Machine Learning Engineer,$78k-$133k,"The Video & Image Understanding Group develops and applies cutting-edge computer vision and deep learning techniques to solve problems in object detection, recognition, localization & tracking; biometrics; 3D scene reconstruction; threat detection; vision-aided navigation; and situational awareness. Our projects integrate algorithmic research, software engineering, and application system development to produce innovative capabilities that address challenging national security problems. We actively collaborate with research engineers across STR, as well as with academic researchers and industry partners to develop practical and powerful computer vision solutions.

The Role:
Develop, implement and evaluate machine learning algorithms to detect, segment, classify and track objects in diverse imaging modalities.
Apply machine learning techniques to integrate information from multiple looks and multiple modalities to improve scene understanding capabilities.
Develop and apply transfer learning and domain adaptation techniques to solve scene understanding problems where limited measured training data is available.
Perform data analysis on experimental data and identify performance improvement strategies.
Transition machine learning algorithms to prototype and/or real-time systems demonstrations.
Who You Are:
BS, MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Applied Mathematics or related technical discipline
Strong scientific software development skills
Independent analytical problem-solving skills
Experience in machine learning techniques, particularly deep learning
Motivated collaborator and excellent communicator to both technical and non-technical audiences
Some Other Relevant Skills You May Have:
Experience with Python and C/C++
Experience in developing and applying machine learning techniques to solving computer vision problems",4.5,Systems & Technology Research,"Woburn, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,10,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,MA,1875,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
1591,91,Geospatial Programmer/Data Scientist,$78k-$133k,"Maxar is looking for a Geospatial Programmer/Data Scientist to join our team. We use quick iteration and regular feedback to the prototype for our government customers before ultimately discovering the perfect fit. We embed our Geospatial Programmers with analytic teams to create custom-tailored web apps.

Life with Us
Project: Were improving upon models that use Artificial Intelligence / Machine Learning (AI/ML) to search for and identify objects. You would be the leader in this effort to design a scalable cloud-based solution and turn it into a real-world solution.
Career: Were very serious about professional development and continuing education. We offer everyone the opportunity to define their career trajectory. Our group has some amazing resources at its disposal specifically for this purpose. You will work with your direct supervisor, and/or a mentor, to set appropriate goals and design a plan to help you make consistent progress.

Day-to-day with your colleagues:
Youll be developing and enhancing a geospatial app and the supporting infrastructure. This app is used to facilitate greater workforce performance by:

Building and training Deep Learning models to accurately identify specified objects.

Accessing large and various data sets

Working with multiple mission partners to identify and evaluate data sources.

We work in a very Lean-Agile environment without the overhead associated with traditional Scrum and eliminated unnecessary development meetings and we love it! We work together with our govt. stakeholders in their spaces in a very free-flowing and technology-forward environment.

Minimum Requirements:
Must be a US Citizen with a current/active TS/SCI clearance with Polygraph

Bachelor's degree in mathematics, computer science or related field, or additional 4 years of professional work experience in lieu of degree

2+ years of relevant experience.

Recent experience with some of the following technologies:

Programming and Data Science Tools: Python, Anaconda Environments, and basic experience or knowledge of Pytorch, Tensorflow, or similar ML packages.

Limited experience in training ML models, classification, or object detection.

Understanding of methods for labeling training data for Machine Learning models.

Experience with Linux Terminal commands and usage.

Basic knowledge of Cloud Computing.

Preferred Skills:
Willingness to learn new tasks and tools.

Experience in Continuous Integration/Continuous Delivery (CI/CD) Pipeline techniques and tools.

Experience performing AI/ML projects in a cloud environment.

Strong interpersonal skills.

#cjpost",3.5,Maxar Technologies,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,VA,2614,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,1,0,0,0
1592,92,Technical Data Engineer: Electrical,$78k-$133k,"PROGRAM*: Korea Country Standard Technical Order Sustainment
In this role, your primary functions would include the following:
The Technical Data Engineer II is responsible for the overall execution and day to day operation of all areas of the Korean F-15 Electrical System Country Standard Technical Orders (CSTOs)
Ensures production/development and timely/quality delivery of F-15 Electrical CSTOs
Interpret engineering data, engineering change proposals and other changes, directives and incorporate them into F-15 Electrical system CSTOs
Utilize Adobe FrameMaker, Photoshop and Distiller software to update existing and develop new CSTOs and illustrations
Develop maintenance data on new systems incorporated into the aircraft and support technical data
Interface with USAF, Customer and other contractor personnel
Help other team members during periods of peak production requirements
Continue building the technical strength of the group to support future program needs
REQUIREMENTS: *
US Citizenship
Valid DOD Secret Clearance
Possess the advanced F-15 knowledge, experience and recognized ability to be considered an expert in technical field
Possess the ability to perform tasks and oversee the efforts of junior and mid-level personnel within the technical field
Travel in support of technical data conferences, meetings, reviews, validations, verifications, and other technical data related activities when requested. Such travel may be both CONUS and OCONUS.
Familiar with U.S. Air Force (USAF) field and depot level maintenance activities, USAF technical data, material qualification and acquisition systems, and USAF maintenance policies & programs
EDUCATION/OTHER: *
Associate’s Degree or equivalent experience in a related field
Min 5 yrs technical data update experience in a related field
Min 5 yrs F-15 related experience *_or 10_* years of directly related experience with proper certifications
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
technical data: 5 years (Preferred)
F-15 related: 5 years (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location",-1.0,Ascension Global Solutions,"Warner Robins, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,GA,2206,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1593,93,Technical Data Engineer: Electrical,$78k-$133k,"PROGRAM*: Korea Country Standard Technical Order Sustainment
In this role, your primary functions would include the following:
The Technical Data Engineer II is responsible for the overall execution and day to day operation of all areas of the Korean F-15 Electrical System Country Standard Technical Orders (CSTOs)
Ensures production/development and timely/quality delivery of F-15 Electrical CSTOs
Interpret engineering data, engineering change proposals and other changes, directives and incorporate them into F-15 Electrical system CSTOs
Utilize Adobe FrameMaker, Photoshop and Distiller software to update existing and develop new CSTOs and illustrations
Develop maintenance data on new systems incorporated into the aircraft and support technical data
Interface with USAF, Customer and other contractor personnel
Help other team members during periods of peak production requirements
Continue building the technical strength of the group to support future program needs
REQUIREMENTS: *
US Citizenship
Valid DOD Secret Clearance
Possess the advanced F-15 knowledge, experience and recognized ability to be considered an expert in technical field
Possess the ability to perform tasks and oversee the efforts of junior and mid-level personnel within the technical field
Travel in support of technical data conferences, meetings, reviews, validations, verifications, and other technical data related activities when requested. Such travel may be both CONUS and OCONUS.
Familiar with U.S. Air Force (USAF) field and depot level maintenance activities, USAF technical data, material qualification and acquisition systems, and USAF maintenance policies & programs
EDUCATION/OTHER: *
Associate’s Degree or equivalent experience in a related field
Min 5 yrs technical data update experience in a related field
Min 5 yrs F-15 related experience *_or 10_* years of directly related experience with proper certifications
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
technical data: 5 years (Preferred)
F-15 related: 5 years (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location",-1.0,Ascension Global Solutions,"Warner Robins, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,GA,2206,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1594,94,Technical Data Engineer: Electrical,$78k-$133k,"PROGRAM*: Korea Country Standard Technical Order Sustainment
In this role, your primary functions would include the following:
The Technical Data Engineer II is responsible for the overall execution and day to day operation of all areas of the Korean F-15 Electrical System Country Standard Technical Orders (CSTOs)
Ensures production/development and timely/quality delivery of F-15 Electrical CSTOs
Interpret engineering data, engineering change proposals and other changes, directives and incorporate them into F-15 Electrical system CSTOs
Utilize Adobe FrameMaker, Photoshop and Distiller software to update existing and develop new CSTOs and illustrations
Develop maintenance data on new systems incorporated into the aircraft and support technical data
Interface with USAF, Customer and other contractor personnel
Help other team members during periods of peak production requirements
Continue building the technical strength of the group to support future program needs
REQUIREMENTS: *
US Citizenship
Valid DOD Secret Clearance
Possess the advanced F-15 knowledge, experience and recognized ability to be considered an expert in technical field
Possess the ability to perform tasks and oversee the efforts of junior and mid-level personnel within the technical field
Travel in support of technical data conferences, meetings, reviews, validations, verifications, and other technical data related activities when requested. Such travel may be both CONUS and OCONUS.
Familiar with U.S. Air Force (USAF) field and depot level maintenance activities, USAF technical data, material qualification and acquisition systems, and USAF maintenance policies & programs
EDUCATION/OTHER: *
Associate’s Degree or equivalent experience in a related field
Min 5 yrs technical data update experience in a related field
Min 5 yrs F-15 related experience *_or 10_* years of directly related experience with proper certifications
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
technical data: 5 years (Preferred)
F-15 related: 5 years (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location",-1.0,Ascension Global Solutions,"Warner Robins, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,GA,2206,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1595,95,Technical Data Engineer: Electrical,$78k-$133k,"PROGRAM*: Korea Country Standard Technical Order Sustainment
In this role, your primary functions would include the following:
The Technical Data Engineer II is responsible for the overall execution and day to day operation of all areas of the Korean F-15 Electrical System Country Standard Technical Orders (CSTOs)
Ensures production/development and timely/quality delivery of F-15 Electrical CSTOs
Interpret engineering data, engineering change proposals and other changes, directives and incorporate them into F-15 Electrical system CSTOs
Utilize Adobe FrameMaker, Photoshop and Distiller software to update existing and develop new CSTOs and illustrations
Develop maintenance data on new systems incorporated into the aircraft and support technical data
Interface with USAF, Customer and other contractor personnel
Help other team members during periods of peak production requirements
Continue building the technical strength of the group to support future program needs
REQUIREMENTS: *
US Citizenship
Valid DOD Secret Clearance
Possess the advanced F-15 knowledge, experience and recognized ability to be considered an expert in technical field
Possess the ability to perform tasks and oversee the efforts of junior and mid-level personnel within the technical field
Travel in support of technical data conferences, meetings, reviews, validations, verifications, and other technical data related activities when requested. Such travel may be both CONUS and OCONUS.
Familiar with U.S. Air Force (USAF) field and depot level maintenance activities, USAF technical data, material qualification and acquisition systems, and USAF maintenance policies & programs
EDUCATION/OTHER: *
Associate’s Degree or equivalent experience in a related field
Min 5 yrs technical data update experience in a related field
Min 5 yrs F-15 related experience *_or 10_* years of directly related experience with proper certifications
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
technical data: 5 years (Preferred)
F-15 related: 5 years (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location",-1.0,Ascension Global Solutions,"Warner Robins, GA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,105.5,GA,2206,0,data engineer,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1596,96,Data Scientist - AI/ML Specialist,$75k-$131k,"Our team Our team is looking for a Data Scientist with experience in Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML). The selected Data Scientist - AI/ML Specialist will support a U.S. Government customer who is applying new and innovative methods in computer vision and object detection in order to address some of our most pressing intelligence problems.

Maxar is looking for a Data Scientist with experience in Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML) to join our team in Northern VA. The selected Data Scientist - AI/ML Specialist will support a U.S. Government customer who is applying new and innovative methods in computer vision and object detection in order to address some of our most pressing intelligence problems.

Life with Us

Your Career: Were very serious about professional development and continuing education. We offer
everyone the opportunity to define their own career trajectory. Our group has some amazing resources at its
disposal specifically for this purpose. You will work with your direct supervisor and/or a mentor to set
appropriate goals and design a plan to help you make consistent progress.

Day-to-day with your colleagues:
Youll be supporting an R&D, rapid prototyping office whose mission is to apply new and cutting-edge tools and methods to intelligence problems. This office loves innovators, self-starters, and people passionate about our nations security.

These AI/ML applications and experiments are used to:
Extract meaningful insight.

Narrow search areas.

Tip/cue.

Find rare objects.

Predict vulnerabilities.

Encouraging further analytic exploration.

Reducing the friction of flawed workflows.

Youll collaborate with our geographically dispersed team primarily via Zoom & Slack.

Minimum Requirements:
Must be a US Citizen with a current/active TS/SCI security clearance with Polygraph.

Bachelors degree in a relevant field (physics, mathematics, computer science, operations research, etc.).

5 years of relevant experience with Data Science and Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning.

Experience with Data Science Tools (eg R, Python, SAS, Matlab, TensorFlow).

Experience with applying Data Science techniques to overhead imagery - ie; computer vision, object detection.

Preferred Education and Experience:
Experience with NoSQL databases.

Ability to provide subject matter guidance.

Ability to manage personal project priorities and deliverables.

Ability to provide controls for technical rigor and quality of output.

#cjpost",3.5,Maxar Technologies,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,VA,2518,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
1597,97,Data Scientist BSLEF8,$75k-$131k,"E3/Sentinel’s Homeland Security Enterprise (HSE) division is an integrated organizational entity fostering increased collaboration and synergies across the Homeland domain. HSE combines the skills and talents of over 245 (and growing) E3S employees and subcontractor staff supporting multiple components across DHS, including but not limited to: U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP), Transportation Security Administration (TSA), U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE), Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), U.S. Coast Guard (USCG), Science and Technology Directorate (S&T), Countering Weapons of Mass Destruction Office (CWMD), Federal Protective Services (FPS), and the DHS Headquarters Management Directorate. Our team provides rapid, innovative and specialized solutions that enable our HSE clients to success at meeting dynamic mission objectives.

Each day U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP) oversees the massive flow of people, capital, and products that enter and depart the United States via air, land, sea, and cyberspace. The volume and complexity of both physical and virtual border crossings require the application of “big data” solutions to promote efficient trade and travel. Further, effective “big data” solutions help CBP ensure the movement of people, capital, and products is legal, safe, and secure.
In response to this challenge, E3/Sentinel, as a trusted mission partner of CBP, seeks capable, qualified, and versatile data scientists to help lead the development and delivery of high-quality predictive modelling solutions. Successful applicants will serve as recognized subject matter experts in the application of quantitative methods, machine learning algorithms, and predictive models to address complex national and homeland security challenges. They will help our team to leverage large structured and unstructured datasets to develop and operationalize models, tools, and applications that drive optimized decision making. Project tasks include data collection, mining, data and text analytics, clustering analysis, pattern recognition and extraction, automated classification and categorization, and entity resolution to implement and enhance automated risk assessment. The products we develop provide actionable insight with real and immediate impact on the safety and security of the United States, its citizens, visitors, and economy.

Lead and perform hands-on analysis and modeling involving the creation of intervention hypotheses and experiments, assessment of data needs and available sources, determination of optimal analytical approaches, performance of exploratory data analysis, and feature generation (e.g., identification, derivation, aggregation).
Collaborate with mission stakeholders to define, frame, and scope mission challenges where big data interventions may offer important mitigations and develop robust project plans with key milestones, detailed deliverables, robust work tracking protocols, and risk mitigation strategies.
Demonstrate proficiency in extracting, cleaning, and transforming CBP transactional and mission data associated within an identified problem space to build predictive models as well as develop appropriate supporting documentation.
Leverage expert knowledge of a variety of statistical and machine learning techniques and methods to define and develop programming algorithms; train, evaluate, and deploy predictive analytics models that directly inform mission decisions.
Execute projects including those intended to identify patterns and/or anomalies in large datasets; perform automated text/data classification and categorization as well as entity recognition, resolution and extraction; and named entity matching.
Brief project management, technical design, and outcomes to both technical and non-technical audiences including senior government stakeholders throughout the model development/ project lifecycle through written as well as in-person reporting.

Bachelor’s Degree (required), Master’s or Ph.D. degree (preferred) in operations research, industrial engineering, mathematics, statistics, computer science/engineering, or other related technical fields with equivalent practical experience
Significant experience in developing machine learning models and applying advanced analytics solutions to solve complex business problems.
Proficiency with statistical software packages: SAS, SPSS Modeler, R, WEKA, or equivalent.
Experience with programming languages: R, Python, Scala, Java, SQL, or equivalent.
Experience constructing and executing queries to extract data in support of EDA and model development.
Experience with unsupervised and supervised machine learning techniques and methods.
Experience working with large-scale (e.g., terabyte and petabyte) unstructured and structured data sets and databases.
Experience performing data mining, analysis, and training set construction.
Completed CBP Background Investigation clearance (active or re-instate-able)

Experience with big data technologies (e.g., Hadoop, HIVE, HDFS, HBase, MapReduce, Spark, Kafka, Sqoop).
Proficiency with Unsupervised Machine Learning methods including Cluster Analysis (e.g., K-means, K-nearest Neighbor, Hierarchical, Deep Belief Networks, Principal Component Analysis), Segmentation, etc.
Proficiency with Supervised Machine Learning methods including Decision Trees, Support Vector Machines, Logistic Regression, Random/Rotation Forests, Categorization/Classification, Neural Nets, Bayesian Networks, etc.
Experience with pattern recognition and extraction, automated classification, categorization, and entity resolution (e.g., record linking, named-entity matching, deduplication/ disambiguation).
Experience working in a team and deploying solutions in an iterative or agile/DevOps continuous integration and delivery environment using lifecycle management methods and tools.
Experience with visualization tools and techniques (e.g., Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, Tableau, SAS Visual Analytics, PowerBI).

E3/Sentinel is an equal opportunity employer and Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (VEVRAA) federal contractor. All qualified applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, or status as a qualified individual with a disability. E3/Sentinel hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.",4.4,E3 Federal Solutions,"Alexandria, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,16,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,VA,6516,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,1
1598,98,Aviation AI/ML Data Scientist,$75k-$131k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

The candidate will work with the FAA and international customers, leveraging one of the largest repositories of aviation data to improve the capabilities, safety, and efficiency of the aviation system. The candidate will be responsible for working both individually and with a team of data scientists in the following tasks:
Performing anomaly detection and capability development using a variety of aviation safety data
Leveraging AI/ML techniques and solutions to identify complex patterns for predicting safety hazards
Increasing the efficiency and quality of the vulnerability discovery process by tightly integrating automated processes, AI/ML techniques and human SME/analyst expertise
Develop and prototype AI algorithms and software tools.
Enhance and maintain current analysis tools, including automation of current processes using AI/ML algorithms.
Conduct quantitative data analysis using a variety of datasets, including developing retrieval, processing, fusion, analysis, and visualization of various datasets
Develop techniques that make use of both digital flight data, text-based safety reporting, and a variety of other aviation data sets both in a silo and in a fused environment to identify potential safety vulnerabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Demonstrable aerospace/aviation knowledge or experience, this is a must
Bachelor’s Degree in Aerospace Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related fields
Hands-on Software Development Skills (Python-Preferred)
Experience or educational courses/projects in Machine Learning, and/or Text Mining Algorithms.
Ability to work closely with domain experts to develop tools/algorithms needed to answer research questions
Excellent Communication Skills (with the ability to explain tools and ML algorithms to a non-technical audience)
Proven ability to work independently to learn new technologies, techniques, processes, languages, platforms, systems
Strong analytic, inferencing, critical thinking, and creative problem-solving skills
Self-starter with ability to work both independently and with a team
Preferred Qualifications:
5 years of relevant experience
Experience with Deep Learning Frameworks such as Keras, Tensorflow, PyTorch, Mxnet, etc. Ability to apply these frameworks to real problems in the ‘time -series’ domain
Experience with interpretability of deep learning models
Big Data Skills (Azure, Hadoop, Spark, recent deep learning platforms)
Visualizations/Web Development Skills (e.g. Tableau, D3, etc).
Practical experience with statistical analysis
Experience with text mining tools and techniques including in areas of summarization, search (e.g. ELK Stack), entity extraction, training set generation (e.g. Snorkel) and anomaly detection
Expert software development skills lifecycle including developing and maintaining good production quality code
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,MITRE,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,VA,4733,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,0
1599,99,Big Data Engineer,$75k-$131k,"The Big Data Engineer is responsible for engaging in the design, development and maintenance of the big data platform and solutions at Quicken Loans. This includes the platform host data sets that support various business operations and enable data-driven decisions as well as the analytical solutions that provide visibility and decision support using big data technologies. The Big Data Engineer is responsible for administering a Hadoop cluster, developing data integration solutions, resolving technical issues, and working with Data Scientists, Business Analysts, System Administrators and Data Architects to ensure the platform meets business demands. This team member also ensures that solutions are scalable, include necessary monitoring, and adhere to best practices and guidelines. The Big Data Engineer helps mentor new team members and continues to grow their knowledge of new technologies.

Responsibilities
Develop ELT processes from various data repositories and APIs across the enterprise, ensuring data quality and process efficiency
Develop data processing scripts using Spark
Develop relational and NoSQL data models to help conform data to meet users needs using Hive and HBase
Integrate platform into the existing enterprise data warehouse and various operational systems
Develop administration processes to monitor cluster performance, resource usage, backup and mirroring to ensure a highly available platform
Address performance and scalability issues in a large-scale data lake environment
Provide big data platform support and issue resolutions to Data Scientists and fellow engineers
Requirements
Master's degree in computer science, software engineering or a closely related field
2 years of experience with Hadoop distribution and ecosystem tools such as Hive, Spark, NiFi and Oozie
2 years of experience developing batch and streaming ETL processes
2 years of experience with relational and NoSQL databases, including modeling and writing complex queries
Proficiency in at least one programming language, such as Python or Java
Experience with Linux system administration, scripting and basic network skills
Excellent communication, analytical and problem-solving skills
Who We Are

Were Americas largest mortgage lender, closing loans in all 50 states. J.D. Power ranked Quicken Loans Highest in Customer Satisfaction in Primary Mortgage Origination for the past nine consecutive years, 2010 2018. The company was also ranked highest in the nation for client satisfaction among mortgage servicers by J.D. Power for five consecutive years, 2014 through 2018, each year the company was eligible. Theres a simple reason weve been so successful: We care about the people we work with.

If youre tired of stuffy, bureaucratic workplaces, then youll be delighted to find something different here. We strive to make a creative, fun and collaborative environment you simply wont find anywhere else. Quicken Loans was named #1 in ESSENCE Magazines first ever list of Best Places to Work for African Americans in 2015. We've been on Computerworld's ""Best Places to Work in IT"" list for 13 years running, hitting #1 the last five years. We were also ranked #14 in FORTUNE Magazines list of ""100 Best Companies to Work For"" in 2018, remaining in the top-30 for the past 15 years.",3.8,Quicken Loans,"Detroit, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,35,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,MI,3298,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,1
1600,100,"Senior Data Scientist (Palo Alto, CA or Remote US)",$75k-$131k,"The Opportunity

Eversight is the recognized leader in AI-powered price and promotions. Eversight's proprietary cloud-based SaaS solution brings AI and continuous experimentation to consumer brands and retailers. Our software acts as a coach, enabling market leaders to transform pricing and promotion strategy for the $3.4 trillion spent in consumer goods retail using intelligent, real-time data and insights.

Reporting directly to the Head of Data Science, you will be at the center of what determines Eversight's success as a company. You will analyze the data and develop production code using the newest Data Science and Machine Learning techniques to determine the optimal prices and promotions for major product manufacturers and retailers that sell these products.

Responsibilities
Research, implement and modify modern Data Science techniques. More specifically:
Build Statistical and Machine Learning models that describe the impact of prices and promotions on shopper behavior, including behavioral pricing effects. You'll need to find middle ground between using flexible modern AI methods and proven classical methods.
Develop Optimization and Experiment Design systems, which determine the best prices to set for each product in each store each week. Finding a good balance on the exploration-exploitation tradeoff will be important.
Design and run pricing experiments across hundreds of stores and tens of thousands of products
Create model validation methods to make sure that our models are accurate and to quantify the impact of our solutions on the clients' bottom line
Work with Product Management to generate ideas and quickly turn them into efficient, well-tested, functioning code (we mostly use Python)
Partner with the Engineering team to create highly scalable solutions
Serve as Data Science expert both within Eversight and for our clients
Lead custom analyses and connect them to actionable Business and Product insights
Help prioritize new feature development by assessing potential impact
Be a go-to resource for science-related questions about the product
Behavioral Profile
Analytical, framework thinker
Comfortable in a fast-paced environment
Highly collaborative
Strong at translating Data Science concepts to non-technical audiences
Business focused; measures work in its contributions to business outcomes and prioritizes effort against deliverables accordingly
Minimum Qualifications
5+ years of relevant experience in Data Science and/or Machine Learning with direct impact on business value
B.S., M.S., or PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Operations Research, Machine Learning, Engineering, Economics, Computer Science or relevant quantitative field
Strong understanding of Generalized Linear Models
Ability to write efficient code in Python
Experience with Hypothesis Testing and Maximum Likelihood Estimation
Preferred Qualifications
Team leadership experience strongly preferred
Startup experience strongly preferred
Experience in A/B testing and Design of Experiments
Agile experience
Experience with NumPy and Pandas (or equivalent experience in R)
Strong in math and statistics: Linear Algebra, Bayesian Methods, Regressions, Calculus
Experience in Machine Learning methods: Neural Networks (Deep Learning, Embeddings, Sequence Modeling, CNN), Tree-based methods (GBDT, Random Forest), Regularization Methods (L1/L2 penalties, Feature Selection, Dimensionality Reduction)
Demand Modeling, Pricing, and Causal Inference experience


Location

Palo Alto, CA

About the Company

Eversight is the recognized leader in AI-powered pricing and promotions. Global brands and retailers rely on the Eversight platform to optimize pricing in response to market conditions and to deliver higher ROI on promotional spend. Eversight's Pricing Suite and Offer Innovation Suite solutions are driving strong margin and sales volume improvements for leading companies such as Coca-Cola, General Mills, Raley's, and Rite Aid. Founded in 2013, Eversight is headquartered in Palo Alto, California, with offices in Chicago and New York.",4.2,Eversight,Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,7,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,Remote,4062,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,1,1,0,0
1601,101,"Sr.Manager, Digital Data Science Management",$75k-$131k,"Sr.Manager, Digital Data Science Management
Location


Englewood Cliffs, New Jersey

Department (Org 2)


Analytics & Data Sciences- S20568

Job Requisition

24436

Apply Now


Company:
LG Electronics U.S. (LGEUS)

Job Function:
Marketing

At LG, innovation is the foundation of everything we do. We make products and services that make lives better, easier and happier through increased functionality and fun. Put simply, we make “Life Good” – from home appliances, consumer electronics, vehicle components and mobile communications to business innovations in digital signage, air conditioning, solar and LED lighting.

We are currently seeking our newest innovator to join our dynamic team as a Senior Manager, Digital Data Science Management (Head of Analytics) on the Digital Transformation (DXP) Team!

Job Summary

Responsibilities

The analytics and data Science team at LGE (dXp) is looking for a candidate to lead the Analytics practice. The head of Analytics will be responsible for setting up Key performance metrics, evaluating campaigns and generating insights related to consumer digital behavior. The position will evaluate CRM, Social, Site analytics and campaign performance under the analytics umbrella, using data from all Google marketing platforms (GA360, DV360, SA360, optimizer, CM). A key part of the Head of Analytics' responsibility will be determining data visualizations, reporting procedures and cadences utilizing dynamic and interactive dashboards. The Role will work closely with other DXP teams to define campaign goals and strategy, KPIs, and implementation and ad hoc reporting needs and cadence.

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Math, Economics, Statistics or related field

Minimum of 10 years of experience in Digital Analytics experience is required

Degree preferably in one of the following areas - statistics, data science, physics, computer science or social sciences heavy in quantitative methodologies like economics, psychology, political science, sociology (but not limiting)

Solid knowledge and experience with Google Analytics (preferred but not limiting) or Omniture

Some experience with other Google platforms desired – DV360, SA360, DCM

Understanding of MarTech ecosystem/A sound knowledge of the digital space, social media, emerging tech, voice, podcasts, and related technologies

Advanced excel skills and Data visualization in tableau or google data studio preferred.

Experience with marketing campaigns with measurable outcomes

Strong conceptual, communication (written, verbal, presentation) and collaboration skill

A willingness to invent and learn you and not afraid to put an idea into action, measure its success, and apply learnings to future decisions

Proactive, organized, efficient, detail-oriented, unassailable focus on the basics, accountable, enthusiastic, able to follow detailed instructions and make thoughtful recommendations

Ability to balance multiple, competing directions and manage multiple projects successfully

Natural ability to build interpersonal relationships and manage conflict

LG Electronics, USA Inc., LG Mobile Research USA LLC, LG Electronics, Alabama, inc., LGEVU and Zenith Electronics LLC provides equal employment opportunity to all individuals regardless of their race, color, creed, religion, gender, age, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by state, federal, or local law. Further, the Company takes affirmative action to ensure that applicants are employed and employees are treated during employment without regard to any of these characteristics

#LI-YS1",3.9,LG Electronics U.S. (LGEUS),"Englewood Cliffs, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,68,Subsidiary or Business Segment,other_industries,Retail,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,NJ,3658,1,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1602,102,Big Data Engineer,$75k-$131k,"NO AGENCIES*
Big Data Lead Developer*
Our growing organization is seeking a skilled professional to serve as an internal resource for our specialized focus in the field of Big Data/Hadoop Development. We provide Fortune 500 clients throughout the United States with IT consultants in a wide-ranging technical sphere.

In order to fully maintain our incoming nationwide and international hires, we will be hiring a *Big Data Lead Developer* for our Atlanta, GA (US) headquarters to coach/mentor our incoming classes of consultants. If you have a strong passion for the various Big Data platforms and are looking to join a seasoned team of IT professionals, this could be an advantageous next step.

This is a full-time internal position that *requires relocation* to Atlanta. No travel required after relocation. The Big Data/Hadoop SME will take on the following responsibilities:
Interviewing potential consultants to ensure all onboarding employees will be successful in Big Data domains prior to each onboarding
The design, development and maintenance of our best-in-class Big Data/Hadoop development training materials
Training, guiding and mentoring junior to mid-level developers
Preparing mock interview situations to enhance the esteemed learning process provided by the company
Acting as a primary resource for individuals working on a variety of projects throughout the US
Interacting with our Executive and Sales team to ensure that projects and employees are appropriately matched
Prepping consultants for interviews for specific assignments involving development and implementation of Hadoop and other environments
The ideal candidate will not only possess a solid knowledge of Big Data infrastructures, but must also have a fluency in the following areas (allowing for fluid interactions with other team members scattered across the entry to senior level spectrum):
Hadoop development and implementation
Strong in Object Oriented Development in Scala/Java platform
Hands on experience in big data technologies including Scala or Spark, Hadoop, Hive, HDFS.
Strong SQL skills and experience
Designing, building, installing, configuring and supporting Big Data Clusters Spark/Kafka
Translate complex functional and technical requirements into detail design Implementing ETL process for integration of data from disparate sources
Cloud Experience is a plus
Skills Include:
5+ Years of professional experience in the IT Industry
Bachelor’s Degree in the Computer Science field
Good knowledge in back-end programming, specifically Java/Scala
Good knowledge of database structures, theories, principles and practices
Analytical and problem-solving skills
Proven understanding with Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, Hive, and HBase
Good aptitude in multi-threading and concurrency concepts
Able to work in Atlanta, Georgia
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $90,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Big Data: 7 years (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",3.8,Enhance IT,"Charlotte, NC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,NC,3056,0,data engineer,0,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
1603,103,"Data Scientist, Cloud Business Operations",$75k-$131k,"53303

About NetApp

NetApp provides software, systems, and services to manage, store and share data via on-premises, and private and public clouds to customers worldwide. NetApp is emerging as a leader in providing public cloud services on all major cloud platforms, including Amazon Web Services (AWS), Microsoft , and Google Cloud Platform (GCP). These cloud services, such as Cloud Volumes; Cloud Insights, Virtual Desktop Service, Global File Cache, SaaS backup, and Spot, avails customers to consider many more options on how and where to manage their critical workloads and data for optimal business and financial outcomes. The NetApp Public Cloud Services business unit is at the forefront of our effort to transform NetApp into a leader in the cloud market.
Job Summary
About the Position

This Cloud Business Operations Data Scientist will be the primary go to person for all of NetApp Public Cloud Services needs for analyzing tons of cloud services usage and billing data to derive intelligent business insights for enabling NetApp’s highest growth business. This person will be an expert in both understanding the data, as well as architecting and developing business logic and code to deliver automation in business intelligence. This is a highly technical role with deep understanding of Azure programming, R, SQL databases, visualization on Tableau, and scripting, along with years of experience in cloud services business operations. Knowledge of public cloud-based transactions on the top 3 cloud provider marketplaces (AWS, Azure and GCP) is a must, along with experience and understanding of integrations with internal systems for CRM, CPQ, Subscriptions Billing and Finance.

This role will coordinate with product management, IT and operations, and other NetApp functions including sales, marketing, and finance to understand, analyze and improve product pricing, SKU design, and transaction processing of our existing cloud offerings and upcoming innovations. This role will also act as the primary operations liaison between product management teams and business operations. The right person for this role has deep understanding of public cloud marketplace transaction processing, billing, metering, and revenue/usage reporting. This person also has extensive experience in dealing with cross-functional business requirements and engaging with key stakeholders at both the executive/VP level and with delivery teams.
Job Requirements
Key Responsibilities
Analyze usage and billing data from multiple sources to derive business intelligence
Develop business logic and write code to automate BI output
Design and develop visualization dashboards in Tableau
Understand public cloud marketplace transaction processes and provide guidance to business operations teams on implementation best practices
Leverage business insights to provide guidance to product management for pricing and transaction processing design
Skills and Qualifications
10+ years of experience working with various cloud providers, software vendors and/or consulting organizations
5+ years of experience in data analysis and business insights
5+ years of experience in Azure programming, R, SQL databases and Tableau
Understanding of enterprise cloud solutions and related technical offerings
Collaborative personality; comfortable working across many functions and teams, and engaging with senior executives
A creative go-getter who is full of ideas and can execute on those ideas in a fast-paced, demanding environment with excellent interpersonal and social skills
A bachelor’s degree in engineering or science is required. A master’s degree is data science, data analysis or statistics is preferred.
Travel Required

20% (includes domestic and int.)
Education
A bachelor’s degree in engineering or science is required. A master’s degree is data science, data analysis or statistics is preferred.

Nearest Major Market: San Jose
Nearest Secondary Market: Palo Alto
Job Segment:
Operations Manager, Scientific, Database, Cloud, Operations, Engineering, Technology

Apply now »",3.8,NetApp,"Sunnyvale, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,28,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,CA,4069,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
1604,104,Machine Learning Engineer,$75k-$131k,"With the continued impact of COVID-19 and social distancing measures, Kensho is conducting all interviews and on-boarding activities remotely. At the present time, all employees are working remotely, until further notice. When the time comes to open our offices, Kensho will fully support those employees who would like to continue working remotely and not ask anyone to return to the office until they are comfortable.

At Kensho, we hire talented people and give them the freedom, support, and resources needed to build cutting edge technology and products for our parent company, S&P Global. As a result, we produce technology that is scalable, robust, and solves the challenges of one of the world’s largest, most successful financial institutions.

As a Machine Learning Engineer, you will be responsible for tackling a wide range of problems from natural language processing to timeseries prediction. You will move beyond the theoretical confines of academia and apply your tradecraft to build machine learning systems on real world data. In this role, you will constantly collaborate and work with groups of engineers. Our Machine Learning team is responsible for delivering ML-based solutions from problem framing, to prototyping, and production application.
Are you looking to make impactful, scalable contributions that transform the way we think about data? If so, we would love to help you excel here at Kensho. We take pride in our tightly-knit, team-based community that provides our Kenshins with a collaborative, supportive environment to bring transparency to the biggest challenges in data.
What You’ll Do
You will conduct original research on large proprietary and open source data sets
Identify, research, prototype, and build predictive products
You will build cutting-edge models for understanding vast amounts of textual data
Write production code
You will write tests to ensure the robustness and reliability of your productionized models
You will work closely with software engineers to build incredible systems
Technologies You’ll Use
Python and specifically NumPy, SciPy, Pandas, SciKit-learn
Neural network packages like TensorFlow/Keras and pytorch
ML packages like LightGBM and XGBoost
OpenFST
Elasticsearch
Required Skills, Knowledge & Experience
You have 3+ years of experience being a major machine learning contributor at a top company, hedge fund, or university
You have at least one core programming expertise, such as Python (NumPy, SciPy, Pandas), MATLAB, or R
You have experience with advanced machine learning methods
You possess strong statistical knowledge, intuition, and experience modeling real data
You demonstrate effective coding, documentation, and communication habits
You have a strong research acumen and experiment design skills
You have the ability and credibility to lead a team
You have a stellar ability to communicate even the most complicated methods and results to a broad, often non-technical audience
Several of the following terms should hold deep meaning for you: LSTM, lookahead bias, bagging, boosting, stacking, information retrieval, batch norm, entity recognition, bootstrapping, Glorot initialization, Kullback-Leibler divergence, GLOVE, SMAPE, HMM, MAP, exponential family, VC dimension, EM, L1, TD(Lambda)
How to Really Get Our Attention
Your GitHub/Kaggle profile shows a project or problems you’ve tackled
You have relevant research or publications
You are a specialist in deep learning in an academic setting or production-grade machine learning


At Kensho, we pride ourselves on providing top-of-market benefits, including:
- Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance
- 100% company paid premiums
- Unlimited Paid Time Off
- 18 weeks of 100% paid Parental Leave (paternity and maternity)
- 401(k) plan with 6% employer matching
- Generous company matching on donations to non-profit charities
- Up to $20,000 tuition assistance toward degree programs, plus up to $4,000/year for ongoing professional education such as industry conferences
- Plentiful snacks, drinks, and regularly catered lunches
- Dog-friendly office (CAM office)
- In-office gyms and showers (CAM, DC) or Equinox membership (LA, NYC)
- Stipend towards commuter or gym reimbursement
- Bike sharing program memberships
- Compassion leave and elder care leave
- Mentoring and additional learning opportunities
- Opportunity to expand professional network and participate in conferences and events
About Kensho
Kensho uses machine learning, artificial intelligence, natural language processing and data visualization techniques to solve some of the hardest analytical problems and create breakthrough financial intelligence solutions for our parent company, S&P Global.
Kensho was founded in 2013 by Harvard & MIT alums and was acquired by S&P Global in 2018. Kensho continues to operate as a startup in order to maintain our distinct, independent brand and to promote our breakthrough, innovative culture. Our team of Kenshins enjoy a dynamic and collaborative work environment that runs autonomously from S&P, while leveraging the unparalleled breadth and depth of data and resources available as part of S&P Global. As Kenshins, we pride ourselves on maintaining an innovative culture that depends on diversity and inclusion.
We are an equal opportunity employer that welcomes future Kenshins with all experiences and perspectives. Kensho is headquartered in Cambridge, MA, with offices in New York City, Washington D.C. and Los Angeles. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",4.1,Kensho,"Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,7,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,MA,5648,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
1607,107,Senior Data Scientist 3 Artificial Intelligence,$75k-$131k,"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311094

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing & Analytics

Group: Data Sciences & Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and artificial intelligence research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to AI assurance, remote sensing and geo-spatial analytics, human language technologies, computer vision, and other related fields.

+ The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as geospatial intelligence, natural language processing, few-shot learning, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery (e.g., publication in conferences such as NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred)

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 5 years of experience, Masters with 3 years of experience or PHD with 1 year of experience
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",3.9,Pacific Northwest National Laboratory,"Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,55,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,WA,5240,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,1
1609,109,Lead Data Engineer,$75k-$131k,"Lead Data Engineer

As a data engineer in Zipcar’s data engineering team, your mission is to build real-time and offline solutions to make data accessible and reliable while leveraging the largest-scale data processing technologies in the world -- and then apply them to the Zipcar's most critical and fundamental data problems.

What you will do:
Build and own mission critical data pipelines that power Zipcar’s business
Develop solutions in bleeding-edge data technologies on AWS eco-system
Partner with architects and data analysts to make the best technology decisions
Create and maintain data models, data catalogs, and data security
Mentor team members and assist them in developing, testing and deploying software
What you’ll love about being a Zipster in Engineering:
You’ll get to come to work every day knowing that you’re contributing to the success of the world’s leading car sharing network
You'll be joining a collaborative, diverse, passionate team of Zipsters
You’ll get to work in a flexible work environment that is innovative and resourceful
At Zipcar, we encourage new tools and ideas- your opinion always matters!
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in computer scienceor related field
5+years’ experiencewith data engineering or data warehousing, or an equivalent data-oriented software engineering background
5+ years’ experience with SQL, optimizing queries and tuning database performance
3+years’ experiencewith key AWS technologies (Redshift, S3, IAM;alsoKinesis, Lambda, EMR, Spark, Hive)
3+years’ experiencewith ETL technologies (e.g. Talend, Informatica,Matillion)
4+years’ experiencewith Java, Python,Scalaand other programming languages
Experience withdbtand Airflow a strong plus
Familiarity with data analysis and data science tools (Looker,Jupyter, R) is a plus
Who are we?

Glad you asked! Zipcar is the world’s leading car-sharing network, found in urban areas and university campuses in more than 500 cities and towns. Our team is smart, creative and fun, and we’re driven by a mission – to enable simple and responsible urban living.

Being a Zipcar member gives you easy access to a car nearby without all the cost and hassle of owning one. Founded in 2000, Zipcar disrupted – or innovated – the traditional model of car ownership and independent studies show that Zipcar’s model of car sharing is proven to reduce vehicle ownership, freeing up more city space for people. Zipcar provides members with socially responsible, sustainable mobility options that support the global environment, their communities and city livability.

Zipcar is a subsidiary of Avis Budget Group, Inc. (Nasdaq: CAR), a leading global provider of mobility solutions. For more information, visit: www.zipcar.com.

The extra mile:

We encourage Zipsters to bring their whole selves to work - unique perspectives, personal experiences, backgrounds, and however they identify. We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer – M/F/D/V.",3.1,Zipcar,"Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,20,Subsidiary or Business Segment,other_industries,Travel & Tourism,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,MA,2948,1,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
1610,110,Senior Data Scientist 4 Artificial Intelligence,$75k-$131k,"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311095

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing & Analytics

Group: Data Sciences & Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and artificial intelligence research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to AI assurance, remote sensing and geo-spatial analytics, human language technologies, computer vision, and other related fields.

+ The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as natural language processing, remote-sensing and geo-spatial intelligence, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery (e.g., publication in conferences such as NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred)

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 7 years of experience, Masters with 5 years of experience or PHD with 3 years of experience
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",3.9,Pacific Northwest National Laboratory,"Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,55,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,WA,5242,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,1
1612,112,Data Scientist Principal,$75k-$131k,"Schneider is seeking an innovative Principal Data Scientist to join our Engineering team. Our Principal Data Scientists, foster thought leadership in analytics and decision sciences to elevate the performance of the enterprise. You will proactively evaluate new technologies and identify industry best practices, while leveraging our existing processes and technical capabilities to deliver exceptional results.

Our Principal Data Scientists:
Foresee future challenges and provide perspective and insight on how to best position the department and enterprise for success.
Represent Schneider as a thought leader within the industry and academia through symposiums, annual meetings and partnerships.
Design, collaborate and implement solutions and new proof of concepts using new and existing technologies.
Mentor junior associates and collaborate with diverse departments to frame and solve business opportunities.
Oversee external relationships with software vendors to influence product functionality and our academic partners to influence curriculum design.
As an associate you will enjoy a strong work/life balance that includes paid vacation and holidays along with paid personal time off. You will also have access to medical, dental, and vision insurance and enjoy our company-paid life insurance and 401k savings with a company funded retirement plan. Schneider is dedicated to continuous individual development and offers a wide variety of opportunities through company-paid training and more than 170 personal development courses. What are you waiting for? You will love it here!

Ideal candidates will have:
Earned a PhD degree in Data or Computer Science, Engineering, Physics, Economics, Mathematics, or related field, plus eight years of relevant work experience. Or a master’s degree plus ten years of relevant work experience.
Proficient understanding in designing and implementing data science models using open source as well as commercial programming languages.
A demonstrated ability to understand the uses and limitations of statistical and programming methodologies to select the appropriate methodology to complete projects.
Experience working with Java and/or Python.
Company overview:

Schneider is a premier provider of transportation and logistics services. Our legacy started in 1935 with one man, one truck and one dream. Since then, we’ve grown and evolved to become a nearly $5 billion company (2019 revenue) with one of the broadest portfolios of services in the industry delivering superior customer experiences.

The Schneider Way:
We treat our customers, associates, shareholders and suppliers with integrity, dignity and respect.
We are a desirable employer due to our dedication to achieving mutually beneficial, lasting relationships.
We are a responsible member of the community.
Core Values:
Safety- first and always
Integrity in every action
Respect for all
Excellence in all that we do
Rise to the challenge and become a part of the Schneider family. Be the difference with a leader in an industry that impacts the world.
Apply today at http://www.schneiderjobs.com.

Schneider is an equal opportunity employer.",3.2,Schneider,"Green Bay, WI",-1,10000+ Employees,85,Company - Public,other_industries,Transportation & Logistics,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,WI,3154,1,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
1613,113,Data Scientist,$75k-$131k,"Description

SAIC is seeking a Data Scientist to help advance the mission of NGA’s Office of Special Programs performing duties including algorithm and tool design, creation, and maintenance, technology transition, algorithm verification and validation, and software test.
Design, test, and modify data processing algorithms using real and/or surrogate data
Design, test, and modify geospatial big-data processing algorithms and enable implementation in either Python or Java suitable for a cloud-based architecture using Spark, Elastic Search and/or Hadoop
Engage with users to understand needs an analytic strength/weakness of developed algorithms
Perform data analysis to identify algorithms technical limitations or defects, document findings and suggest solutions
Process/manipulate geospatial data and provide recommendations to provide additional utility beyond manual exploitation
Interact professionally with senior-level executives and other personnel prioritizing and accomplishing assigned tasks in a fast-paced environment with deadlines
Qualifications
MA/MS programing, computer science disciplines plus work experience (8+ years)
Must currently possess an active Top Secret/SCI Clearance and IC Polygraph
Working knowledge of Oracle, Java, C++, Linux, HTML, Python and/or parallel processing algorithm
Experience in GEOINT, SOM (NGA), data science, imagery science, GIS domains
Familiarity with systems integration, software test and V&V activities",3.8,SAIC,"Springfield, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,7,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,VA,1463,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1616,116,Director of Data Science,$75k-$131k,"Overview


Analysis Group is one of the largest international economics consulting firms, with more than 1,000 professionals across 14 offices in North America, Europe, and Asia. Since 1981, we have provided expertise in economics, finance, health care analytics, and strategy to top law firms, Fortune Global 500 companies, and government agencies worldwide. Our internal experts, together with our network of affiliated experts from academia, industry, and government, offer our clients exceptional breadth and depth of expertise.

Analysis Group provides economic, financial, and strategy consulting to law firms, corporations, and government agencies. At Analysis Group, Data Science is a center of excellence within a company that already has decades of experience focused on analysis involving data. Within Data Science, the Director of Data Science is charged with collaborating with leading internal and external academic experts to find creative solutions to some of the most challenging and high-value problems we face.

The Director of Data Science contributes to both client engagements and to the design and development of internal data science tools and infrastructure. The client work is diverse, utilizing a wide variety of complex and novel data sources, and supporting cases across industries including: finance, healthcare, antitrust, intellectual property, energy, and technology. The tool and infrastructure work assists the firm in developing cutting-edge data science and high-performance computing techniques for common business challenges.

The Director of Data Science helps Analysis Group in maintaining our leadership position in terms of advancing methodology and data computations, and works to increase Data Science knowledge within the firm, both through mentorship to more junior Data Science team members and via interactions with Consulting teams. The Director also is involved in recruiting, assisting in building out the team over time.

Essential Job Functions and Responsibilities:
Work with project teams to creatively address data science/computing challenges
Take initiative to identify opportunities for technology to enhance service offerings
Act as a resource and participate in client engagements and research as part of the project team
Maintain up-to-date knowledge of data science and computing tools, providing technical training and helping to grow the in-house knowledge base
Present research at selected conferences; serving as an expert
Maintain individual contributions while providing mentorship to other data scientists and analysts conducting work such as:
Optimize procedures for managing and accessing large databases (e.g., insurance claims, electronic health records, financial transactions)
Create interactive analytics portals and data visualizations (e.g., using R/Shiny, Python/Flask, D3)
Build and maintaining high performance computing (HPC) tools on grid and cloud computing environments
Develop and reviewing open source macros and packages in R, Python and other Object Oriented Languages
Establish optimized procedures for repetitive or computationally intensive tasks (C, C++, Cuda-C)
Use natural language processing methodologies to work with EMR data, social media data and other unstructured data
Contribute to team growth/development via assistance with advisorship and recruiting
Contribute to firm’s strategy for data science tools and infrastructure
Qualifications
Track record of using data to solve real-world problems
Experience applying multiple software tools and languages to provide data-driven analytical solutions to decision makers or research teams
Strong credentials and experience in database management and data visualization
PhD or advanced degree in computer science or data science-related field, with relevant experience. Other candidates with at least three years of relevant experience in the field will also be considered
Background in Statistics/Econometrics or Biostatistics
Extensive experience in programming languages like Python, C++, Java
Knowledge of R, Shiny and SQL
Familiar with online/cloud computing/storage (e.g., AWS)
Linux and basic system administration experience
Demonstrated experience working on project teams and collaborating with others
Strong communication skills
­
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.
Please view Equal Employment Opportunity Posters provided by OFCCP here.
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor's legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.8,Analysis Group,"Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,39,Private Practice / Firm,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,MA,5230,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,1,1,0,0
1618,118,"Data Scientist, Product Development",$75k-$131k,"Spokeo is a people search engine that both enlightens and empowers our customers. With over 12 billion records and 18 million visitors per month, we reconnect friends, reunite families, prevent fraud, and more.

We are looking for a Data Scientist, Product Development to join us in Pasadena, CA, and help us turn our vast repository of data into usable information leveraging solutions that include matching techniques, machine learning, and graph theory to resolve entities across disparate data sets. Ultimately, these entity relationships will be used to build models that will be incorporated into the Spokeo product suite. This is part of Spokeo's Data Operations Team and is not an analytics-based role.

Responsibilities:
Profiling, processing, and evaluating large structured and unstructured data sets.
Developing data-driven models.
Data mining using state-of-the-art methods.
Collaborating with product and engineering to understand the needs of the company and assisting with the development of innovative solutions to meet those needs.
Productionalizing and maintaining algorithms primarily focused on entity resolution, linking, and scoring.
Creating automated anomaly detection systems and quality assurance metrics to constantly track performance.
Keeping up to date with the latest technology trends.
Performing Ad-hoc analysis and presenting results.
Requirements:
Degree in Machine Learning, Computer Science, Engineering, Physics, Statistics, Applied Math, Operations Research, or other quantitative fields.
Minimum of 3 years of working experience in analytics, data mining, data visualization, and/or predictive modeling.
Proficiency in working with statistical tools (such as R, SAS), database query languages (SQL), and scripting languages (Python required).
Experience with Hadoop and NoSQL related technologies such as MapReduce, Spark, Hive, ElasticSearch, and DynamoDB.
Comfortable training and communicating complex ideas to non-technical audiences.
Demonstrated ability to lead and execute projects from start to finish.
Privacy Notice for Candidates: https://www.spokeo.com/recruiting-policy

Spokeo is an equal opportunity employer. Applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status. Spokeo fosters a business culture where ideas and decisions from all people help us grow, innovate, create the best products and be relevant in a rapidly changing world.

Recruiters or staffing agencies: Spokeo is not obligated to compensate any external recruiter or search firm who presents a candidate or their resume or profile to a Spokeo employee without 1) a current, fully-executed agreement on file and 2) being assigned to the open position (as a search) via our applicant tracking solution.

]]>",3.6,Spokeo,"Pasadena, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,14,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,CA,2865,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
1620,120,Data Scientist,$75k-$131k,"Job Capsule


The Data Scientist analyzes complex and unstructured data using state-of-the-art data science methods for data driven decision making. This role uses knowledge of data science methods and applies analytics to solve real world problems. The Data Scientist will work with customers to collect and understand data, perform wrangling, develop applications and collaborate actively across the organization and with senior management to accomplish various objectives.

Job Duties/Roles
Apply advanced data science concepts to deliver data driven digital offerings and insights
Be able to write independent source code, validate and test for model quality assessment and improvement
Experience with Data Visualization tools such as Power BI or Tableau or Spotfire
Use machine learning and artificial intelligence methods, classification, regression algorithms
Comfortable working independently on data engineering, pre-processing and data preparation tasks to prepare data for further analysis
Generate Intellectual Property for the company
Stay current in the field of advanced analytics and take initiative to apply new technologies
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Required (KSAR)
Python - Numpy, Pandas, lamdas, keras, Tensorflow, MS Cognitive AI, Matlab, R, SQL
OOP(Object Oriented Programming)
ANN, RNN, Classification, Clustering, CNN, Regression tools
Exposure to building RestFul APis for data science modelling is a plus
Practical experience using predictive analytics, multiple approaches, to ID abnormalities and failures using time series and unstructured data sources.
Knowledge of data architectures and systems is a plus
Minimum years of Experience


Minimum 3 years of relevant experience in data / analytics.

Country Requirements


Must be a US Citizen or Permanent Resident (US Person) and able to work on Government Data with ITAR classification

Required/Preferred Education Requirements


BS degree required in Data Science or Computer Science or Engineering or another relevant field",3.5,American Bureau of Shipping,"Houston, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,158,Other Organization,other_industries,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,TX,2013,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
1621,121,Software Engineer - Data Science,$75k-$131k,"Join ClearEdge and be a part of the team of men and women that solve some of the DoD’s most complex technical challenges. Every day, ClearEdge empowers customers in Government and industry with innovative data driven solutions.
Check out our extremely competitive benefits package at clearedgeit.com/benefits which includes a 10k annual training/education benefit, tech bonuses, and state of the art technology lab. We also offer monthly TechConnect and DeepDive collaboration sessions with our entire technical staff, fully paid.

Your mission: Work with a dynamic team and key stakeholders to generate and execute challenging solutions to mission problems.
We are seeking Software Engineers of all levels with Data Science experience. The position requires a self-starter with excellent problem-solving skills. The right person will work closely with the customer to gather requirements for assisting in solving real world problems using data science techniques. The candidate should be experienced with exploratory data analysis, machine learning, network graph modeling, information insight, data mining, data driven analytics and statistical methods.
You will excel in this role if you are:
Results-oriented developer who can leverage your technical skills and techniques to successfully design, develop and deploy software solutions
Self-motivated and have a desire to build new skills
Are familiar with Agile frameworks and methodologies with a desire to be a certified SCRUM Master
Enjoy learning new technologies, are a forward thinker, and are interested in growing your career with a cutting-edge technology company
A day in the life consists of:
Working directly with clients, managers and technical staff to understand business needs, develop technical plans, and deliver data-driven analytical solutions that solve client problems
Creating and deploying predictive models from a wide variety of data sources and types using the latest mathematical and statistical methods
Performing enterprise level software development, integration, and implementation using advanced data science or big data technologies
Establishing and implementing end-to-end proof of concepts
Performing data mining, statistical analysis, predictive modeling and simulation, and forecasting for the development of solutions
Working across multi-functional teams to formulate, prototype, implement, and fine tune solutions
Educating product development and operations teams using documentation, presentations, and demonstrations
Establishing strong, collaborative working relationships with Government customers, technical staff, and peers
What we are expecting from you:
Experience in the design and development of data science software applications
Bachelor’s or Advanced degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or other technical discipline
Experience with Exploratory Data Analysis including wrangling, grooming, transformation, and analysis
Experience applying statistical methods to solve data problems
Software development programming experience in languages such as Python, R, Java, Scala
Experience using IDE tools such as Jupyter to develop and demonstrate results
Experience with integrating and using Data Science libraries such as scikit-learn, MlLib, Pandas, python (Jupyter, scikit-learn, pandas, etc.), R, Java
Experience with supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques
Experience with Agile development and Agile tools (i.e. Jira, Confluence)
Experience within the SIGINT mission environment and an understanding of customer data formats
Strong analysis and problem-solving experience
Nice to have:
Experience using large-scale distributed frameworks such as Hadoop, Spark, Tensorflow
Experience with GPU-based machine learning techniques


About us: Experienced advanced analytic development company providing new Cyber solutions to current and emerging missions.
Our Core Values of Honesty, Integrity, Loyalty, Fairness, Respect, Responsibility, and Accountability drive our mission and vision and are the heart of what we do each day. We combine our Core Values with the three key elements of people, technology, and integrity to repeatedly deliver stellar results within our primary competencies.
ClearEdge is also pleased to share that we have recently expanded our prime and subcontract presence into new Cyber markets!
If this position does not fit your skillset, please visit our Careers page to explore our current openings, or contact a ClearEdge recruiter at careers@clearedgeit.com. ClearEdge is an equal opportunity employer.",4.1,ClearEdge,"Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,18,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,MD,4564,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,1
1622,122,Senior Data Scientist,$75k-$131k,"About Us

At GutCheck, we pioneered agile market research to provide our clients with actionable insights at the speed of their business. As the marketplace rapidly evolves, we're evolving with it. By combining qualitative, quantitative, and behavioral methodologies, our team of full-service research experts synthesizes insights to help clients make more confident business decisions -- connecting them with their target consumers earlier and more often in the development process.

What Makes Our Approach Different

We create heroes out of our clients by providing them with contextualized insights to more efficiently and effectively connect with their target audiences. Enabled by technology and automation, we are dedicated partners who take a human-first approach to delivering powerful insights. Today, we are bringing agile to strategy: enabling brands to gather robust foundational insights in an agile, iterative way to inform key business within the demands of today's innovation timelines.

Here's where you come in:

As our Senior Data Scientist, you will be the primary contributor that will operationalize predictive models built with machine learning and advanced analytic technologies. GutCheck owns years of structured and unstructured data. We've started to identify patterns in our world-class market research using machine learning technologies such as TensorFlow. You will help us by providing expertise on mathematical concepts for the broader cross-functional analytics team and inspire the adoption of advanced analytics and data science across the entire breadth of our organization.

You will work closely with our talented and agile Product and Engineering teams to craft scalable, well-designed solutions that address the technical and architectural challenges inherent to making sense of our data. We have a focus on quality, automation, and innovation. We encourage our Engineers to think creatively and flexibly when choosing solutions, tools, and techniques. Our team offers an environment where trust and innovation are encouraged, egos aren't accepted, and collaboration is core to our DNA.

You will advocate, evangelize and build data-fueled products that help our internal and external customers gain deeper insights into direct, targeted consumer feedback. This data can and will be coupled with third-party data sources to help our clients be heroes by making well informed business decisions. You'll help research and choose which data sources will provide unique and compelling insights, and then you'll dig in and become an expert on that data. You will provide insight into leading analytic practices, design and lead iterative learning and development cycles, and ultimately produce new and creative analytic solutions that will become part of our core deliverables.

For more information on the company and the GutCheck team, please go to www.gutcheckit.com

This job description is not a complete list of your qualifications or position roles. GutCheck is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to equal opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, gender, gender identity, genetic information, parental or pregnancy status, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, or Veteran status.",3.9,GutCheck,"Denver, CO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,11,Company - Private,other_industries,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,CO,3310,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0,0
1625,125,Senior Data Scientist (Remote Option),$75k-$131k,"Description

The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions. The Senior Data Scientist work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.

Responsibilities

This is a unique opportunity for a motivated individual to influence Humana’s vision to provide coordinated, integrated care via home care solutions and ECOM (Enterprise Clinical Operating Model). The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions. The work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.

Responsibilities

Recommend, design, and develop actionable analytic solutions for key business problems through in-depth investigations of healthcare utilization trends and outcomes
Use advanced analytic techniques like machine learning, predictive modeling to develop sophisticated models to solve the business problem
Use industry leading database systems, clinical decision engines and algorithms to extract meaningful insights from structured and unstructured data by leveraging NLP/ML
Ensure the developed models or statistical tests are reusable and modular for effective transition to cloud in the future
Work directly with aligned business partners and assist in requirements definition, project scoping, timeline management, and results documentation to ensure professional relationship management
Build ‘smart’ systems that learn from health intervention outcomes, clinical programs over time
Collaborate with multiple cross-functional teams to understand the business needs, identify any operational barriers and issues, and facilitate their resolution

In the first year this role will focus on the following

Develop effective partnerships with internal business partners and coworkers
Work in an agile way to produce, interpret and recommend real time optimization opportunities for the business to implement using advanced analytics techniques
Enhance the ability to work in a fast-paced environment, multitask and quickly pivot based on business needs
Develop subject matter expertise in the business needs and serve as a consulting resource for the clinical analytic needs of the stakeholders
Implement real time business feedback of analytics based on the direct needs of internal customers

Required Qualifications

Master’s Degree + 3 years’ experience OR Bachelor’s Degree + 5 years’ experience.
Data Analytics, Computer Science or related quantitative program
Experience in using mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
Experience in working with assignments that involve moderately complex to complex issues using statistical modeling, time-series analysis, and advanced analytics to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
Experience in working with both structured and unstructured data to create reports, projections, models, and presentations to support business strategy and tactics
Ability to make decisions on moderately complex to complex issues regarding technical approach for project components
Demonstrated problem solving, strategic and analytic thinking capabilities
Experience in working with cross-functional teams, organizing and managing multiple priorities and/or projects
Must be passionate about contributing to an organization focused on continuously improving consumer experiences

Preferred Qualifications

Master's Degree or PhD
Knowledge of healthcare claims, clinical programs and interventions, health outcomes, population health

Additional Information

This position can be located in Boston, Louisville or Work from home (remote)

Scheduled Weekly Hours

40",3.8,Humana,"Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,59,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,103.0,MA,4072,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,1,1,0,1
1627,127,Aviation Data Scientist & Machine Learning Engineer,$106k-$182k,"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE has an immediate opening for an Aviation Data Scientist with a specialization in machine learning to be part of a dynamic team of professionals working to improve the efficiency of traffic flow management operations in the United States National Airspace System (NAS). We are looking to expand our team with someone with demonstrated technical excellence involving analysis of aviation data and the application of machine learning techniques to solving complex problems.

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,MITRE,"McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,62,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.0,VA,2306,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1628,128,Junior Data Scientist Data Science Development Program,$106k-$182k,"Description
Junior Data Scientist | Data Science Development Program
Amherst, MA

Deadline to apply: October 15, 2020
Start date: Mid-June, 2021

To finalize application, you must also submit a portfolio of project work. See below for more information.

What Great Looks Like In This Role

Our ideal teammate is someone who is a continuous learner who can adapt and thrive in complex, uncertain and changing situations. Someone who enjoys tackling complex tasks in a collaborative environment is well-suited to a position on our team. Self-motivated individuals comfortable working in a challenging, fast paced, technical environment are highly encouraged to apply!

You Are Able To Demonstrate This Through

A track record of thinking outside the box, taking initiative, and promoting innovation and change-making Ownership, commitment and follow-through in achieving results in school or work projects
Managing priorities effectively and adapting quickly to achieve goals
Pursuing opportunities for continuous learning to develop new skills and perspectives

About the Data Science Development Program

The Data Science Development Program (DSDP) trains junior team members to become well-rounded data scientists within three years. The development program includes high impact project work, mentorship from senior data scientists, in-house training and workshops, and sponsorship for graduate level coursework at the University of Massachusetts Amherst.

Data Science Development Program Highlights:
High-impact project work: Junior data scientists work together with MassMutuals data scientists to solve challenging problems in finance,

operations, marketing, digital initiatives, security, and product development.

Interdisciplinary learning: In the DSDP, junior data scientists are exposed to multiple fields within and adjacent to data science such as data visualization, software engineering, and enterprise architecture.

Mentorship: Peer mentors and senior mentors across data science domains are paired with each member of the DSDP
Training & Development: In-house workshops, tech-talks, seminars, and team-wide learning challenges such as our annual Month of Code

are available to all development program members.

Academic coursework: Members of the DSDP engage in graduate-level courses at the University of Massachusetts Amherst in computer science and statistics according to an individually tailored development plan.

Volunteer & Community Opportunities: Team members have many opportunities to volunteer throughout the year. Junior data scientists volunteer at hackathons throughout the state, attend community data events, speak at external talks, and participate in community data for good efforts annually..

About Us

The MassMutual Data Labs in downtown Amherst consists of a dynamic team that is actively engaged in dozens of high-impact projects across the enterprise, frequently working remotely with teams based in Springfield, MA, New York, and Boston. Our environment and workspace reflects our dedication to innovation and learning, and has a collaborative, start-up vibe. We hold weekly training meetings to present technical ideas, new models, or interesting code libraries.

Junior Data Scientist Duties Include
Statistical analysis
Programming in R and Python
Data ingestion and data cleaning
Model building, testing, deployment, and maintenance Building visualizations
Presenting and explaining output
Executive presentations and discussions
Adherence to internal standards in data science Collaboration across functions and business units

Application Instructions
To finalize your application for consideration, all applicants must submit a portfolio. For instructions, visit https://datascience.massmutual.com

/dsdp/apply

We accept applications from early career professionals and graduating students from undergraduate and graduate programs.

Minimum qualifications

Bachelors degree

Academic study or independent training in computational, quantitative, or technical fields, such as computer science, math, physics, or statistics

Working knowledge of Python, R, and SQL
Quantitative and technical skills in math and computer science Community engagement, involvement, and volunteerism Demonstrated leadership and change-making
Strong communication skills

Applications are accepted on a rolling basis through 2020, with priority consideration for applications received by Friday, October 23rd

*Ability to work in U.S. without sponsorship now or in the future

Preferred qualifications

Enthusiastic about pursuing an interdisciplinary career in data science, analytics, and technology Research and/or practical experience in related fields
Demonstrated work experience through part time employment, internships, or professional endeavors

Committed to Diversity and Inclusion

Our employees are the embodiment of the idea that we all are stronger and better through our support for one another. By valuing people for who they are, how they think, and what they bring to the table, weve become a stronger, more innovative company. We continue to receive external recognition for our policies and programs that seek to create a diverse and inclusive environment.

Americas Best Employer for Diversity Forbes (2019)
Score of 100 on the Human Rights Campaign Corporate Equality Index (2019)
National Association for Female Executives Top Company for Executive Women (2018) Disability Equality Index (DEI) Best Place to Work for Disability Inclusion (2019) Diversity Best Practices Inclusion Index Company (2018)",3.8,MassMutual,"Amherst, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,169,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.0,MA,5556,0,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0
1629,129,Senior Data Scientist with Top Secret,$106k-$182k,"What You'll Get to Do as a Data Scientist: *
Leads data science efforts, working closely with clients and data to understand mission and data.
Develops algorithms leveraging modern data science technologies including reinforcement learning systems, machine learning and more.
Provides clients with technical expertise for a project or program. Able to manage technology projects or lead technology solutioning.
Provides highly technical and specialized guidance and solutions to complex IT problems; performs elaborate analyses and studies.
Evaluates, recommends, and executes new technologies and updates existing infrastructure to ensure optimal performance and efficiency.
Develops IT strategies to ensure the systems meet existing and future requirements based on needs and regulations.
Works in a variety of environments and has excellent verbal and non-verbal communication skills. Works effectively and independently.
You’ll Bring These Qualifications: *
Must have an active TS or TS/SCI
At least 5 years of experience developing in languages commonly used for data analysis such as Python, R, Julia, or SAS
Experience working with multiple database types such as SQL, Redis and MongoDB
Experience building and integrating the at the application and database level
Experience developing REST/SOAP APIs and messaging protocols and formats
At least 2 years of theoretical and practical background in statistical analysis, machine learning, predictive modeling, and/or optimization
Experience implementing event/data streaming services such as Kafka
Experience prototyping front-end visualizations utilizing data visualization suites such as Kibana or Splunk
At least 2 years of experience developing Reinforcement learning systems utilizing at least one of the following methodologies. Finite Markov Decision Processes, Support Vector Machines, Q-Learning, Stochastic Finite State Machines, MCTS or other hybrid Deep Reinforcement Learning processes
Experience in theoretical and practical background in statistical analysis, machine learning, predictive modeling, and/or optimization.
Experience developing in languages commonly used for data analysis such as Python, R, Julia, or SAS
Experience working with databases such as SQL or MongoDB.
Experience working with large-scale data sets.
Experience producing data visualizations for a variety of different audiences.
Excellent verbal and written communications skills along with the ability to present technical data and approaches to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Professional Development Assistance
Retirement Plan
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
On Call
Experience:
SAS: 5 years (Preferred)
Data Science: 5 years (Preferred)
Machine Learning: 5 years (Preferred)
Data Engineering: 5 years (Preferred)
R: 5 years (Preferred)
Python: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Washington, DC 20016 (Preferred)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.oneglobeit.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,OneGlobe LLC,"Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,15,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.0,DC,3291,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1630,130,Data Engineer,$106k-$182k,"Data Engineer

Benefits Data Trust (BDT)
seeks a capable Data Engineer to help develop our new Google Cloud data platform and run our current data infrastructure. BDT embraces Data4Good and is a fast-growing, digitally enabled non-profit that improves benefits access for thousands of underserved people.

As part of our Data Engineering team in our Data Science department, the Data Engineer will:
Build out our new GCP data platform and collaborate on architectural patterns for it with the Data Engineering team
Support the development of machine learning models with productionizing, monitoring and alerting tools
Write, update, and maintain ETL jobs across our data pipelines (mostly in Airflow)
Implement continuous improvements using our existing tools/technologies, which include SQL, Airflow, Python, Docker/Kubernetes, and others such as Terraform and Apache Beam. May also be expected to research and select other tools when the situation demands
Collaborate with internal customers to identify ongoing platform improvements (teams including Analytics, Projects, Policy, Software Engineering, and others throughout the organization)
Consult to software engineers on data-related changes to BDT’s suite of software applications, including schema/model design, table structure, and data collection
Engage with colleagues and collaborators using curiosity, critical thinking, a drive to completion, empathy, and a focus on impact
Follow existing data access and performance design standards for the data platform, software engineering, and all products and services accessing BDT information
Based in our Center City Philadelphia office, the Data Engineer reports to the Director of Data Science.

Due to COVID-19, BDT is operating under a remote-working protocol, following governmental requirements and CDC guidelines. While this job will begin as fully remote, when BDT determines it is safe to do so based on public health recommendations, we will move back into our Centre Square office. At that time, all Philadelphia-based staff are expected to transition back into the office.

Successful candidates will demonstrate the following through their experience (typically 3-5 years as a Data Engineer):
Communication and Relationship-building – with technical peers and some stakeholders
Cloud-based Solution Implementation, of data platforms and infrastructure, including event-driven architectures, microservices and pattern design, supporting compliance and regulated environments (including PII and PHI)
Workflow and pipeline development to ensure reliability, availability, and consistency
Systems Engineering – on-system service management, typically in *nix environments
Data Modeling and Warehousing – proficient understanding of relational data structures and schemas; some familiarity with semi-structured, unstructured (big data) schemas
Automation, monitoring, and alerting – creating these tools based on existing designs and frameworks; resolving bugs and issues
Cloud engineering – working towards certification on any of the major hyperscale cloud platforms
Data Encapsulation & Transfer methodologies – understands standards for file formats and transfer methods
Also interested in relevant experience including:
o Experience with BI implementations/uplifts (we currently use Looker) and/or Data Governance models and methods
o Machine learning techniques, productionizing machine learning models, and/or creating models
About BDT

Benefits Data Trust (BDT) is a national nonprofit that helps people live healthier, more independent lives by creating smarter ways to access essential benefits and services. Each year, BDT helps tens of thousands of people receive critical supports using data, technology, targeted outreach, and policy change. Since its inception in 2005, BDT has screened more than one million households and secured over $7 billion in benefits and services. BDT employs more than 200 people and provides enrollment assistance to individuals in six states, and policy assistance to states nationwide. For more information, visit bdtrust.org.",3.3,Benefits Data Trust,"Philadelphia, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,15,Nonprofit Organization,other_industries,Non-Profit,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.0,PA,4087,0,data engineer,1,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1631,131,Data Scientist,$106k-$182k,"Data Scientist

As Data Scientist at HP Inc. in San Diego, you will join an industry-leading organization and work on developing frameworks for systematic data science modeling to identify optimal marketing, pricing and sales decisions for our Printing & PC business. Working within a dynamic, highly skilled and diverse Pricing Strategy and Analytics team (economists, engineers, scientists or even musicians majority of them with a PhD) you will build models and develop tools and analytical processes to develop pricing and marketing strategies for HP printers, cartridges and PCs around the world.

Responsibilities:
Develop and apply statistical methods to analyze the effect of pricing and sales decisions on business performance
Develop and implement frameworks and processes for systematic and automated data analysis
Develop tools to ingest, merge, and clean data sets
Immerse yourself in very large data sets and complex problems
Visualize and interpret the results of analyses, and create strategy recommendations
Present the results and the corresponding recommendations to the relevant stakeholders, including senior leadership
Qualifications:
Interest in data science, pricing, economics, and/or consumer behavior
Scientific thinking and ability to design and critically analyze quantitative research
Ability to think creatively about research problems and invent original solutions to modeling challenges
Ability to build and interpret complex linear regression models, with machine learning experience a plus
Knowledge of and experience in deploying numerical optimization routines
Proficiency with Python and R is required
Strong analytical skills, with a high level of attention to detail
Proficiency in Microsoft Excel and Microsoft PowerPoint
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Nice-To-Haves:
Knowledge of price optimization approaches, price discrimination models and a general knowledge of main concepts from the industrial organization literature
Experience working with large data sets
Experience in data engineering
Exposure to digital marketing
Experience working in or collaborating with industry
Experience creating data visualizations
Ability to build dashboards and other tools using front-end development skills
Experience in software development
Education & Experience
Bachelors, Master's or PhD degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Economics, Quantitative Marketing, Mathematics, Physics or equivalent
1-3 years experience including graduate or postgraduate research",4.1,HP Inc.,"San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,81,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.0,CA,2518,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
1634,134,Sr. DATA SCIENTIST,$106k-$182k,"Title: Sr. Data Scientist

Company: Samsung Research America (SRA)

Lab: Visual Display Intelligence Lab

Location: Mountain View, CA

Lab Summary:

At Visual Display Intelligence lab, Samsung Research America, we operate as a start-up while leveraging the broader assets of a larger global enterprise. We do advance research and development to immensely benefit our core business verticals in the space of Ads and Marketing. Our team primarily focuses on processing huge data sets, build robust and scalable big data pipelines, conduct advanced research in implementing state-of-the-art ML and AI techniques, build data services that are both real-time and batch based. All those combined provide the best-in-class experience to our customers across consumer electronics and internet of things. Many of our engineers take pride in publications, filing A-grade patents and build robust products and services.

Position Summary:

As a Staff Software Engineer you will primarily focus on building unified Audience platform by working directly with Product Managers, Lab leaders, researchers, Big data/AI/ML engineers, brainstorm different ideas and also build POCs and propose projects that cater to the broader business needs. If there is evinced interest to invest on those projects, you could lead them to fruition. You will help design data pipelines, maintain large scale distributed systems, help manage the modern data warehousing infrastructure, analyze key metrics for decision makers to provide visual insights that will change the company direction and benefit consumers. The ideal candidate will be someone who comes from a strong analytical background that has demonstrated experience in the following areas:

Responsibilities:
Build and maintain large scale distributed systems to support the whole pipeline from data collection and training to deployment and real-time serving
Write efficient implementations of ML algorithms over CPUs & GPUs
Integrate our in-house systems with open source technologies like Kubernetes and Tensorflow
Build abstractions to automate various steps in different ML workflows
Build tools to debug, visualize and inspect various features and models
Work with the engineers who use the platform, and help them be more impactful by improving the platform
Minimum Qualifications:
Strong knowledge of Computer Science fundamentals including object-oriented design, data structures, operating system, computer networks.
(5+ years) Software development experience, ideally in Python, Scala or Java
(5+ years) Experience with MySQL, Postgres, Cassandra, Redis, Redshift, OracleDB or MongoDB
(3+ years) Microservice-oriented architectures and related OSS technologies (e.g. Kubernetes, Kafka, Celery/RabbitMQ, nginx, Redis, Airflow, etc)
(3+ years) Experience working in distributed and streaming environment, preferably using Spark, Kafka, Flink etc
(3+ years) Experience with AWS in an enterprise environment
(3+ years) CI/CD and test automation frameworks (Cypress.io, Jenkins, Appium, UIAutomation, Bazel, etc)
Preferred Qualifications:
BS, MS or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering or a related technical field
Strong communication and inter-personal skills
Experience with leading large-scale multi-engineer projects
Samsung is an EEO/Veterans/Disabled/LGBT employer. We welcome and encourage diversity as we strive to create an inclusive workplace.",3.7,Samsung Research America,"Mountain View, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,32,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.0,CA,3390,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,1,0,0
1635,135,Data Scientist,$106k-$182k,"DATA SCIENTIST JOB DESCRIPTION
We are looking to hire a highly creative Data Scientist to address data analytics challenges in our organization, to collect large volumes of data from varying sources, clean and interpret data, create solutions to overcome challenges and communicate with interested parties.

To succeed in this position; you need to be curious, creative and tech savvy.

You need to stay up to date with data programming software and apps,

have outstanding understanding of statistics and mathematics, and be

proficient in writing algorithms. Top candidates will be persistent, and

have excellent analytical and problem-solving skills.
Data Scientist Responsibilities:
Having meetings with team members regarding projects
Collecting and interpreting data
Automating and integrating processes.
Researching solutions to overcome data analytics challenges
Communicating and meeting with engineers, IT teams and other interested parties
Sharing complex ideas verbally and visually in an understandable manner with non-technical stakeholders.
Deploys solutions so that they provide actionable insights to the organization and are embedded or integrated with application systems
Supports and drives analytic efforts designed around organization’s strategic priorities and clinical/business problems
Works in a team to drive disruptive innovation, which may translate into improved quality of care, clinical outcomes, reduced costs, temporal efficiencies and process improvements.
Builds and extends our analytics portfolio supported by robust documentation
Works with autonomy to find solutions to complex problems using open source tools and in-house development
Stays abreast of state-of-the-art literature in the fields of operations research, statistical modeling, statistical process control and mathematical optimization
Creates and communicates project plans and other required project documentation and provides updates to leadership as necessary
Works with the analytics team and clinical/business stakeholders to develop pilots so that they may be tested and validated in pilot/incubator settings
Performs analysis to evaluate primary and secondary objectives from such pilots
Data Scientist Responsibilities Continued:
Assists leadership with strategies for scaling successful projects across the organization and enhances the analytics applications based on feedback from end-users and clinical/business consumers
Assists leadership with dissemination of success stories (and failures) in an effort to increase analytics literacy and adoption across the organization.
Data Scientist Requirements:
A MS or PhD degree in Applied Mathematics or Statistics preferred.
5+ years public health experience.
Advanced coursework in analysis and programming.
Experience using data visualization tools.
Experience with data querying languages, and statistical or mathematical software.
Proficient in writing algorithms, and knowing when to apply them.
Excellent understanding of statistics, multi-variable calculus and linear algebra.
Outstanding communication skills.
Ability to present and speaking in front of audiences.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $55,000.00 - $60,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Our staff is currently working from home due to COVID-19 until further notice.

Experience:
Public Health Experience: 5 years (Required)
data visualization tools & querying languages: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Master's (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",1.4,"Sickle Cell Disease Association of America, Inc.","Hanover, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.0,MD,3729,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,1,0,1
1636,136,Data Engineer,$106k-$182k,"Overview

ID.me is a digital identity network and our mission is to make the world a more trusted place by facilitating transparent and efficient interactions between people and organizations.

We are looking for a Data Engineer to join our Product team to design and build a robust set of tools and pipelines to support data analytics efforts. You’ll manage and optimize our core infrastructure by creating and maintaining data pipelines. You will work with other engineers and analysts from the Product and Business teams to design, implement, and maintain a data ecosystem that delivers actionable insights to make key business decisions. You have technical chops but can also work independently to prioritize issues, work within ambiguity, and manage conflicting deadlines. You are creative, data-driven, results-oriented, and eager to help us solve data problems of varying complexities.

Responsibilities
Develop technical solutions using proven techniques in data and analytics processes
Develop, prototype, and build frameworks based on open source and commercially available tools
Orchestrate and maintain data pipelines that meet security standards and ensure the integrity and quality of data
Demonstrate a passion for serving the needs of internal and external customers by enabling them with self-service reporting tools and analytics capabilities
Drive the execution of data initiatives that provide key performance metrics
Understand the data related challenges, nuances, and requirements to identify and recommend the optimal technical approach
Train and educate team members as well as stakeholders about best practices in data engineering and governance
Collaborate closely with the engineering and devops team to implement DataOps, thus reducing our analytics development cycle
Research and improve our data platform to ingest, process, transform, and distribute insightful data to our audience ranging from executives, analysts, and engineers to customers, vendors, and partners
Evangelize data driven culture by breaking down silos and encouraging data sharing
Qualifications
3+ years of hands-on experience in data engineering for a SaaS company or a mature startup
Proven experience working with various tools but more importantly, familiarity with how to best assemble and deploy production ready data stack to any cloud environment
BS in a quantitative or scientific field such as computer science, computer engineering or equivalent experience
Experience in applying agile software development approach - Git, CI/CD, Jira, etc - to data engineering
Familiar with SQL and other popular programming languages (such as Ruby, Python, .NET, etc)
Exceptional fluency with SQL; you conquered the join venn diagram long ago and have moved on to explaining cost based optimization to your peers on the engineering team
Some level of experience working in the cloud - AWS, Azure, or GCP
Experience with ingesting, processing, and visualizing data sources of varying types - structured/relational and unstructured
Experience in developing, managing, and manipulating large, complex datasets
Data-driven, detail-oriented individual with excellent storytelling and problem-solving abilities
Ability to work independently and autonomously, as well as part of a team
Superb time management, prioritization of tasks and ability to meet deadlines with little supervision
Vision: To be the world's leading digital identity network empowering people to control their own information and to prove their credentials across all channels: online, call center, and in-person.

Mission: To make the world a more trusted place by delivering the highest level of security with the least amount of friction at the lowest possible cost.

People: We have an audacious mission. We aim to fix the identity layer of the internet. Billions of people will live better lives with more trust and convenience thanks to ID.me. We are like Special Forces. We take on the most difficult challenges with amazing teammates.

ID.me Core Values: *Don't be a jerk. *Always compete. *Ask questions like a 5-year old. *Inspire people with your passion. *Make something better every day. *Treat each customer like your favorite family member. *Own your mistakes so you can learn from them. *Details are everything. *Communicate like a scientist. *Be truthful (even when it's hard). *Reflect ID.me's values in your actions. *Act like an owner.

ID.me Career Site & Culture Deck: https://www.id.me/careers",3.3,Id.me,"McLean, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,9,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.0,VA,4480,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,0
1638,138,Data Engineer,$106k-$182k,"Kingfisher Systems, Inc. specializes in providing a full range of Information Technology, Cybersecurity, Intelligence, and support services to the U.S. Government. Kingfisher Systems core competency is technology-enabled services, with a specific focus on national security. Since 2005, Kingfisher has established itself as a recognized and trusted mission partner whose mission is safeguarding sensitive information, operations, and programs for our Federal customers and warfighters.

Responsibilities:

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is seeking a Data Engineer to provide data flows and transformations to automate, script, visualize, and modeling subnational wealth. Day to day technical tasks include meeting with the customer to understand and refine the requirements. The candidate will use Nifi and Python to create data flows and transformations and understand the workflow of the project. They will work with the customer to implement any requested updates, move data storage to RDS, and work with security to ensure the entire system is compliant. They will compile security controls and artifacts and contribute to the Standard Operating Procedures and other related documents.

Skills Requirements:
The successful candidate should have experience with scripting in Python and using Nifi. Some knowledge of geospatial software such as ArcGIS, QGIS is preferred or willingness to learn.
Knowledge of best practices for data standards, data management, data quality.
Experience with SQL, PostGreSQL/PostGIS. Ability to communicate analysis to experts and lay persons alike.
Years of Experience: Minimum of 3 years experience.

Degree Requirement: Bachelor's degree in computer science, geography, or related field.

Minimum Clearance Requirement: Minimum Top Secret clearance with SCI Eligibility. Applicants selected will be subject to an additional security investigation and thus may have additional eligibility requirements to meet.

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, among other things, or status as a qualified individual with a disability.",4.5,Kingfisher Systems,"Falls Church, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,15,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.0,VA,2236,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1640,140,Data Scientist,$106k-$182k,"We have an opportunity for a Data Scientist to join our talented Data Analytics team. The successful candidate will work with customers and the engagement team to support the project management, project data analysis, process improvement, data conversion, and integration needs of our federal customer.

Typical responsibilities include
Collecting large sets of structured and unstructured data from disparate sources.
Cleaning and validating data to ensure accuracy, completeness, and uniformity.
Analyzing data to identify patterns and trends.
Developing solutions and integrating, extending, and contributing to Open Source software
Devising and applying models and algorithms to mine the stores of big data.
Interpreting data to discover solutions and opportunities.
Requirements
Active Secret Clearance
Strong client engagement skills
Experience with languages such as Python, R, SAS, and SQL
Experience with version control systems, including Github or Gitlab
Experience with designing, developing, and deploying analytic software and algorithms
BS degree in Physics, Computer Science, Mathematics, or another quantitative discipline
Desired skills
Experience with open source Big Data tools including Apache Spark or Apache NiFi
Experience with entity resolution
Experience with Natural Language Processing using modern deep learning techniques
Benefits

Perks of working at NetImpact Strategies:
Your health comes first – we offer comprehensive medical, dental, & vision insurance that starts the first of the month after you join the team
Invest in your future – 401(k) Plan – Immediately vested employer contributions; no matching required
Work hard, play hard – we offer a generous Paid Time Off (PTO) policy and observe ALL ten (10) federal holidays
Pawsitively pawesome – Pet Insurance (because our little critters are part of our families, too!)
Invest in your education – Tuition reimbursement, internal training programs, & company-sponsored industry certifications
Be part of a dynamic and collaborative work environment recently ranked by The Washington Post as a Top Work Place in 2019!
Have fun and celebrate and give back – Team building activities, community volunteering, quarterly HQ days, & an offsite annual awards banquet
ABOUT US

NetImpact Strategies specializes in Strategy and Business Transformation, IT Modernization, Data-Driven Intelligence, Cloud Services, and Cybersecurity. We are a team of skilled Consultants who listen to our clients’ needs. We design and implement comprehensive, tailored solutions that are both mindful of the client's culture and organizational dynamics. As mission needs change, new priorities emerge, technologies advance, and methodologies evolve; NetImpact stands out as a trusted advisor that can solve the challenges of today while looking for the opportunities of tomorrow. Our professionals stay abreast of these changes to provide agile, outcome-focused results for federal agency strategic and tactical needs. Approaching engagements as a partner, we provide solutions that empower our clients to achieve results that align with their mission and strategic vision.

ACCESSIBILITY NOTE

NetImpact Strategies is committed to complying with all applicable provisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act, as amended (“ADA”), and applicable state and local laws. It is NetImpact’s policy not to discriminate against any qualified person or applicant with regard to any terms or conditions of employment on the basis of such individual’s disability. Consistent with this policy of non-discrimination, NetImpact will provide reasonable accommodations to an individual with a disability, as defined in the ADA or applicable law, who has made NetImpact aware of his/her disability, unless doing so would cause undue hardship to NetImpact. If you are an applicant and need a reasonable accommodation when applying for job opportunities within NetImpact, or request a reasonable accommodation to utilize NetImpact’s online employment application, please contact careers@netimpactstrategies.com.

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER

NetImpact is committed to the development of a creative, diverse, and inclusive work environment. In order to provide equal employment and advancement opportunities to all individuals, employment decisions at NetImpact will be based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. NetImpact does not discriminate against any person because of race, color, creed, religion, sex (including gender identity, sexual orientation, and pregnancy), marital status, national origin, disability, age, veteran status, genetic information or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, and local laws (referred to as ""protected status"").",4.1,NetImpact Strategies,"Vienna, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,11,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.0,VA,4715,0,data scientist,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
1641,141,Machine Learning Engineer,$106k-$182k,"About Triplebyte

Triplebyte is transforming the way software engineers are hired. Our mission is to build an open, valuable and skills-based credential for all engineers and data scientists. This is important because millions of people have skills (and deserve good jobs), but don't fit the profile that recruiters seek. We aim to cut out that noise by matching opportunities to people who have the skills to succeed in them - regardless of their background.

Companies like Apple, Dropbox and American Express trust Triplebyte's technical assessment to identify the best engineers for their open roles and reduce the time and effort it takes to hire them.

We raised a $35 million Series B and our team of 64 is growing! We're building out the leadership of our team to help us scale to the next phase.

Press Links:

You can read more about our company and hear from our founders in the press here:

Triplebyte raises $35M for its online coding test and credentialing service for hiring engineers

Triplebyte incubates ColorStack to increase Black and Latinx representation in CS programs

CNBC (Your Next Job Interview Could be with a Robot)

Building an Engineering Team - Harj Taggar and Ammon Bartram

Role Description

Triplebyte screens and evaluates thousands of engineers per month to find the best candidates for our partner companies. Human decision making doesn't work at our scale; our marketplace is powered by automated assessment and decision making. Triplebyte has three cornerstone ML products: our quiz, our interview, and our matchmaking. As a machine learning engineer, you'll be responsible for the end-to-end process of designing and running experiments to serving production models at scale. Some of our pipelines use off the shelf components, but we're also implementing custom models and techniques from the latest research papers. We're also building forecasting tools for internal teams to measure and predict outcomes. This is an ideal role for an engineer or data scientist who wants the scope and responsibility to own features/products from the inception and research phase through to measuring real-world results.Fields your work will touch on
Psychometrics
Recommender systems
Time series analysis
Survival analysis
Bayesian inference
Probabilistic programming
Requirements
Robust exploratory/experimental skills. We have a novel dataset of candidate profiles and interview outcomes from our candidate screening process and our hiring marketplace. You'll be responsible for designing and evaluating experiments to predict downstream outcomes.
Ability to implement models from research. Some of our best improvements in both speed and predictiveness has come from doing literature surveys and implementing novel techniques from research papers.
Engineering skills. This is a hybrid research/engineering role. You'll be responsible for productionizing your pipelines/models and integrating against our back-end services.

Compensation and Benefits

Competitive salary and stock options package

Open vacation policy

Employer paid health, vision and dental insurance

401(k) plan with matching

Pre-tax commuter benefits

Daily catered lunches

The Company is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions on the basis of merit and business needs. The Company does not discriminate against employees or applicants (in any aspect of employment, including, but not limited to recruiting and hiring, job assignment, compensation, opportunities for advancement, promotion, transfers, evaluation, benefits, training, discipline, and termination), on the basis of any characteristic protected under applicable federal, state, or local laws.",3.2,Triplebyte,California,-1,51 to 200 Employees,5,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.0,CA,3683,0,machine learning engineerr,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1642,142,Machine Learning Engineer,$106k-$182k,"About Alpha Health
We’re on a mission to remedy the financial complexity crippling healthcare in America.

Our aim is to organize and use all healthcare information to reduce the cost of care and improve the patient experience.

As the first Unified Automation company for healthcare, we use the same machine learning approaches that made driverless cars possible to provide health systems with a single solution for revenue cycle management. Alpha Health’s Unified Automation brings together the best of people, data and technology to efficiently, accurately and autonomously navigate the complex state of medical reimbursement in the United States.

We are growing rapidly:
- The contracting process in healthcare typically averages nine months. Yet, in less than 12 months time, the team has landed multiple provider clients of all sizes across the US.
- The team has also deployed at several of these customers, providing meaningful and measurable value within 90 days.

We’ve built a cross-functional skill set deep into the DNA of the company. We have technology experts from the top Silicon Valley technology companies (Google, Facebook, etc) and machine learning PhD programs (Stanford, etc). We also have senior leaders from the frontlines of healthcare with decades of experience leading teams of medical billers at some of the most prominent healthcare institutions in the US. And we have a deep bench of talent from healthcare services firms like the Advisory Board, Optum and Triage Consulting.

Our founding team includes Silicon Valley leaders who have founded or been founding team members of multiple companies with successful exits, including in excess of $350 million.

We are expanding our team to support our work with existing customers as well as new customers. If you love to execute, we’d love to hear from you.

Alpha Health is based in South San Francisco. As a company we embraced remote work opportunities before COVID-19. We consider ourselves experts in working collaboratively wherever our team members happen to reside.

As part of the ML team you will work alongside machine learning PhDs from top schools (e.g., Stanford), as well as experienced machine learning engineers from top companies(e.g., Google). You will be putting machine learning into practice, so your code directly affects our customers immediately. You will be working with large proprietary medical and clinical datasets containing both structured documents, natural language and images.
What You'll Do
· Participate in developing state-of-art machine learning solutions to address large scale healthcare problems
· Design and build pipelines that collect, preprocess, and deliver data with a measurable quality
· Write production-ready software with fast and efficient algorithms
Skills & Qualifications
· 2+ years of work experience in machine learning or data engineering
· Strong proficiency in one or more programming languages such as Python and C++
· Hands-on development experience with big data technologies such as SQL and AWS/Cloud Platform
· Knowledge of machine learning frameworks such as Scikit-Learn, Keras, Tensorflow
· Full-stack development experience for an end to end machine learning solution preferred
· Experience with Natural Language Processing or Computer Vision a plus
· Strong communication and interpersonal skills with meticulous attention to detail
What We Offer
· Work with an experienced and complementary founding team consisting of serial entrepreneurs, AI experts and healthcare industry experts
· Competitive salary and equity grants
· Full employer coverage for health, dental and vision insurance
· Full employer coverage for life insurance
· 401k Plan
· Free membership to One Medical (Concierge Clinic) for you and your family (if you are in a region covered by One Medical)
· Flexible Vacation Policy",5.0,Alpha Health,"South San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.0,CA,3846,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,1,1,1,0,0
1643,143,Translational Data Scientist/Data Engineering,$106k-$182k,"20-Aug-2020

Job ID
300507BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""20. That’s how many years of data we have in our informatics systems! Enriched every day by more than 1000 Translational Medicine scientists. If you like data, there is no better place to be!

Who are we?

Our team of 30 Data Scientists are leveraging this data to accelerate drug development. NIBR Translational Medicine is in charge of creating data needed for submission of all Novartis drugs: Toxicology, DMPK, Phase I and II Clinical Trials, and most clinical Omics. We have one of the richest data pool in the Pharma world.
As a Translational Data Scientist, using your knowledge of research, you will analyze the Translational Medicine data landscape, and design ways to integrate data to speed up its analysis and the project delivery. Creating new capacities for Translational Medicine teams by easing access to data, relevant algorithms, and visualizations as part of the Novartis Digital Strategy, you will make drug development faster.

Your main responsibilities will be to:
• Organize access to data via APIs, applications and textual and graphical representations of the data in close collaboration with data scientists. Build application Proof of Concepts with selected scientists, organize scale up with relevant partners and release to NIBR community.
• Push community adoption of techniques and tools crafted by supporting power users and coordinating training sessions.
• Be a liaison between partners involved: scientific teams having data intensive needs, teams crafting enterprise solutions, internal and external partners producing similar solutions.
• Maintain expertise in methodologies for data handling, visualization and User Experience
• Mentor and encourage others to tackle problems
Posting Title
Translational Data Scientist/Data Engineering",4.0,Novartis,"Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,24,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.0,MA,1852,0,data scientist,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1644,144,Data Scientist,$106k-$182k,"JOB DESCRIPTION

AccruePartners values our contract and consulting employees. We offer a competitive benefits package to meet the diverse needs of all of our contractor and consulting employees and their family members. Here is a listing of what our company offers: 401(k) Medical, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, Employee Assistance Program, Medical and Prescription Drug, Short and Long-Term Disability Insurance.

THE TEAM YOU WILL BE JOINING:

Fortune 500 Company
World leader in commercial data and insight
Constantly expanding the size and improving the quality of their global database; currently exceeding 280 million businesses worldwide
Focus on valuable relationships allowing customers to succeed

WHAT THEY OFFER YOU:

Culture: Energetic, forward thinking individuals, passionate about compliance, risk assessment and management
Growth: Partake in a learning program with robust curriculum that will enhance the value you bring to your team and the company
Opportunity: Extensive international network with offices on five continents
Stability: A storied and commanding brand with almost two centuries of experience

WHERE THE POSITION IS LOCATED:

Reston, VA

THE BACKGROUND THAT FITS:

Undergrad degree in a Risk related field (Accounting, Business, Economics, Finance, Math/Stat, Operations Research, etc.) with 1 to 3 years of applicable experience
Strong programming skills with the ability conduct research utilizing R, and Python to manipulate data and conduct statistical analysis
Strong SQL skills and experience
Ability to effectively communicate complex ideas to both a technical and non-technical audience
Willingness to travel to client locations as needed

Essential Responsibilities

Engage clients with the colleagues to identify their business needs and develop, implement, and manage solutions
Participate in all aspects of a modeling engagement, including design, development, validation, calibration, documentation, approval, implementation, monitoring, and reporting
Strong SAS programming skills with an ability to apply common procedures and data manipulations, write macro functions and learn new procedures when necessary

Preferred Qualifications

Experience implementing text analytic techniques (including NLP) to create structured fields from unstructured datasets
Experience working with very large datasets
Experience working with outside clients on statistical engagements
Experience with graph databases and visualizations
Experience applying modern machine learning techniques
Experience applying data and analytics for capital markets use-cases",2.6,AccruePartners,"Reston, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,18,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.0,VA,2592,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,1,0
1645,145,Senior Data Scientist,$106k-$182k,"We are looking for a Data Scientist who will be responsible for shaping our company’s data strategy innovating the $85B digital and linear television advertising market. You are passionate about all things data and tech, and have extensive knowledge of the digital space. You are accomplished in the areas of creating new analysis and deriving business-changing insights and you are ready to support the strategic objectives of a highly cross-functional organization.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Your work will have an outsized impact on tools we’re building, forecasting, planning, allocation, and audience behavior prediction
Work with Pb-scale data sets representing the total US video and TV audiences
You will build new, and support scaling out existing models in support of audience segmentation
You will be working with the data-engineering team to product ML pipelines and coordinating data models with other engineering teams
Building Data Models and managing machine learning pipelines
QUALIFICATIONS:
Managing ML pipelines with tools such as Python, Julia, and Apache Spark
SQL fluency and an understanding of relational data models
Comfortable in the Linux environment
A master of all trades mentality and an ability to embrace new challenges regularly
Eager and energized to work with some of the latest open source technologies
Able to work on-site in Los Angeles, CA
PhD in Data Science, Physics, Mathematics or other scientific field
PERKS:
Unlimited paid time off each year
Annual vacation stipend
Onsite gym, fitness classes and personal trainer
Casual dress code
Kitchen stocked with healthy snack snacks
Health, dental and vision benefits
Parental leave
Epic growth
ABOUT

At VideoAmp, we believe in challenging advertising paradigms to maximize value for clients. We do this by enabling companies to execute on business outcomes across their media investment instead of more traditional media metrics. VideoAmp is the software and data solutions company powering the convergence of the linear TV and digital video advertising. Our solutions connect linear TV viewership with addressable data assets to benefit the marketing and media industries. This enable marketers and content owners to holistically plan, transact, and measure deduplicated audiences across digital video, OTT, connected and linear TV advertising.

Come and join us!",3.5,VideoAmp,"Los Angeles, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,6,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.0,CA,2348,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,1,0,1
1650,150,"Scientist/Machine Learning Engineer, Applied Science",$106k-$182k,"The Scientist/Senior Scientist/Lead Scientist - (Machine Learning Engineers) will work with the rest of the team to research, invent, and implement the next generation prediction, optimization, and analytics technology. You are a brilliant, motivated self-starter and an extremely fast learner with top notch problem solving, and analytical skills. You have a deep sense of curiosity and innate desire to dig deep into terabytes of data and love to play with the innards of complex algorithms, mathematical constructs and code.

Responsibilities
Research, design and/or implement solutions to challenging problems in real-time bidding domain, such as all kinds of optimization problems, audience understanding, etc.
Research and improve features and machine learning models for production pipeline.
Provide insights and suggestions on customer campaign optimization problems and product/platform optimization problems through statistical data analysis when needed.
Drive innovation by identifying and formulating new problems, publishing papers, filing patents, etc.
Required Qualifications
PhD degree in a closely related field (e.g.: computer science/engineering, optimization) with publications in the area is strongly preferred
Or Masters with significant experience in advertising and Machine Learning
Experience in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, data mining, statistical modeling, optimization, algorithms, big-data, game theory
Proficiency with one or more programming languages - ability to write/debug production code.
Excellent communication skills – ability to present and communicate complex ideas in simple terms
Strong statistical/math/analytical abilities; Exceptional problem solving skills
Desired Qualifications
Previous experience in the advertising industry
Strong programming experience with Java, C/C++, Python and/or Scala
Excellent knowledge in algorithms and data structures
#LI-KM1

About Amobee
The world’s leading independent advertising platform, Amobee unifies all advertising channels—including TV, programmatic and social—across all formats and devices. We provide marketers with streamlined, advanced media planning capabilities powered by in-depth analytics and proprietary audience data. Our platform and technology, provides the most advanced advertising solutions for the convergence of digital and advanced TV— including linear TV, over the top, connected TV, and premium digital video. Enabling advertisers to plan and activate across more than 150 integrated partners, including Facebook, Instagram, Pinterest, Snapchat and Twitter.

Amobee has been named to Fortune’s Top 10 Best Workplaces in Advertising and Marketing. Amobee’s platforms have been widely recognized amongst our industry winning numerous awards in technology innovation, see all Amobee Awards. We are a wholly owned subsidiary of Singtel, one of the largest telco companies in the world, reaching over 700 million mobile subscribers in 21 countries. Amobee operates across North America, Europe, Middle East, Asia and Australia. For more information, visit amobee.com or follow @amobee

In addition to our great environment, we offer a competitive base salary, employee development programs and other comprehensive benefits. Please send a cover letter along with your resume when applying to the position of interest located at Amobee.com. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. No phone calls and no recruiting agencies, please.",3.8,Amobee,"Redwood City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,15,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.0,CA,3460,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,1
1651,151,AI Ops Data Scientist,$106k-$182k,"Company

AstraZeneca is a global, innovation-driven biopharmaceutical business that focuses on the discovery, development and commercialization of prescription medicines for some of the world's most serious diseases. But we're more than one of the world's leading pharmaceutical companies. At AstraZeneca, we're proud to have a unique workplace culture that inspires innovation and collaboration. Here, employees are empowered to express diverse perspectives and are made to feel valued, energized and rewarded for their ideas and creativity.

Role

We are looking for a data scientist to join our new AI Ops platform team in Science IT. The ideal candidate will have industry experience working in a range of different cloud environments where they devised and deployed large-scale production infrastructure and platforms for data science. The position will involve taking these skills and applying them to some of the most exciting data & prediction problems in drug discovery.

The successful candidate will be part of a new, close-knit team of deeply technical experts and together have the chance to create tools that will advance the standard of healthcare, improving the lives of millions of patients across the globe. Our data science environments will support major AI initiatives such as clinical trial data analysis, knowledge graphs, imaging & omics for our therapy areas. You will also have responsibility to help provide the frameworks for data scientists to develop scalable machine learning and predictive models with our growing data science community, in a safe and robust manner.

As a strong software leader and an expert in building complex systems, you will be responsible for inventing how we use technology, machine learning, and data to enable the productivity of AstraZeneca. You will help envision, build, deploy and develop our next generation of data engines and tools at scale. You will be bridging the gap between science and engineering and functioning with deep expertise in both worlds.

Key Accountabilities
Liaise with R&D data scientists to understand their challenges and work with them to help productionise models and algorithms.
Be part of the development roadmap to build and operationalise our data science environment, platforms and tooling.
Support any external opportunities, through close partnership and engagement such as Benevolent.AI collaboration.
Deployment of systems, applications and tooling for data science on cloud environments.
Understanding of the necessary guardrails required for different use cases and data sensitivities.
Adapt standard machine learning methods to best exploit modern parallel environments (e.g. distributed clusters, multicore SMP, and GPU).
Provide the necessary infrastructure and platform to support the deployment and monitoring of ML solutions in production Optimizing solutions for performance and scalability.
Liaise with the Data Engineering team to ensure that the platform and the solutions deployment therein benefit from an optimised and scalable data flow between source systems and analytical models
Implementing custom machine learning code and developing benchmarking capabilities to monitor drift of any analyses over time.
Understanding of the latest AI webservices and data science tools, from DataBricks to citizen data science tools like Dataiku, C3.AI and Domino. Experience working on regulatory data would be helpful but not essential.
Liaise with other teams to enhance our technological stack, to enable the adoption of the latest advances in Data Processing and AI
Being an active member of the Data Science team, you will benefit from, and contribute to, our expanding bank of Data Science algorithms and work efficiently with our data science infrastructure.
Testing and assessing the quality of new tools.
Team recruitment, training provision and coaching
Candidate Knowledge, Skills and Experience
BSc in Computer Science or related quantitative field or MSc/Ph.D degree in Computer Science or related quantitative field.
More than 2 years of experience and demonstrable deep technical skills in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, recommendation systems, pattern recognition, natural language processing or computer vision.
Experience managing an enterprise platform and service, handling new customer demand and feature requests.
Strong software coding skills, with proficiency in Python and Scala preferred.
Significant experience with AWS cloud environments, working knowledge of Google and Azure platforms. Knowledge of Kubernetes, S3, EC2, Sagemaker, Athena, RDS and Glue is essential. Certification in appropriate areas will be viewed favourably.
Experience with best practice of data transport and storage within cloud system.
Experience building large scale data processing pipelines. e. g. Hadoop/Spark and SQL.
Experience provisioning computational resources in a variety of environments.
Experience with containers and microservice architectures e.g. Kubernetes, Docker and serverless approaches.
Experience with automation strategies e.g. CI/CD, gitops.
Use of Data Science modelling tools e.g. R, Python, SAS and Data Science notebooks (e.g. Jupyter).
Creative, collaborative, & product focused.
Ability to just get things done.",4.0,AstraZeneca,"Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,107,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.0,MD,5274,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1654,154,"Data Scientist II, Product Analytics",$106k-$182k,"The Opportunity


At Livongo, data is at the heart of our culture of innovation. We're looking for a Data Science analytics team member to collaborate with Product Management and Marketing as we work toward optimizing our UX and messaging.

As a Data Scientist, Product Analytics your main focus will be to measure member experience and guide product decisions, ultimately making Livongo's products more valuable, delightful and intuitive to our Members. We're looking for someone with at least 2 years of experience in Data Analytics. In addition to technical data science skills, core competencies such as collaboration, decision-making, communication and flexibility will be key to your success.

This role offers the challenge and excitement of converting data analysis into real-life benefits. Come help us break new ground, while measurably improving lives and saving millions in healthcare costs.

Responsibilities
Provide insights about our products and member experience to inform Product teams for roadmap and feature decisions
Conduct exploratory analysis and develop statistical models to answer key product usage and engagement questions
Help Product and Marketing teams use experimentation (A/B testing) and cohorting to test assumptions and launch new marketing campaigns, features and product releases
Partner with Product teams to define and benchmark metrics for new features launches and initiatives and help create a culture of measurement
Candidate Profile
2+ years of work experience in product/data analytics or a related discipline
Data science experience (SQL, Python, R) and familiarity with managing large data sets
A general knowledge of machine learning approaches is a plus.
The ability to collaborate and communicate with Product Managers and help them craft hypotheses, and define and measure KPIs
Confidence working with ambiguity, unknown variables, and missing context (and the ability to find ways to bridge those gaps when necessary)
A self-starter approach, with strong motivation and drive for excellence
BS degree in Engineering, Computer Science or a related filed in lieu of degree, relevant work experience and/or trade school
Why Join Livongo?


The Transformative Name in Healthcare: The transformative industry forces in Community, Content and Commerce are now household names. As Amazon is to Commerce, Livongo is to Healthcare. With our Applied Health Signals engine, AI+AI, we've transformed how care is delivered.

Our Work Truly Matters: Livongo's proprietary, consumer-first technology is revolutionizing the experience of living with a chronic health condition. Our data-driven digital health engine enables our Members to seamlessly manage multiple health conditions on one empowering platform. We use smart, connected devices, personalized digital guidance, and 24x7x365 access to health professionals to make it easier for people to stay healthier.

Make an Impact: Do you want to accomplish something meaningful? To create results that matter? Livongo's innovative solution produces industry-leading member satisfaction, measurable clinical outcomes and proven healthcare costs savings. Here you can truly improve lives.

The Largest Digital Health IPO in History: We are at a milestone period in our history. On July 25, 2019 we took our company public, in order to elevate and expand the way the industry views us, thus ushering us into a whole new set of mission-critical conversations that will help us accomplish the work still to be done. As we reach new levels of achievement, we accelerate our ability to deliver life-changing services.

Focus on PEOPLE: Livongo has been voted one of the Best Places to Work in healthcare, by Fortune Magazine and Best Place to Work! Talented, passionate individuals make the difference, in this fast-moving, collaborative and inspiring environment.

Diversity and Inclusion: At Livongo we believe that personal and professional diversity is the key to innovation. We hire based solely on your strengths and qualifications, and the way in which those strengths can directly contribute to your success in your new position.

Growth and Innovation: We've already made healthcare history, yet we remain on the threshold of very big things. Leading the industry with our Applied Health Signals category, we have cracked the code to transforming healthcare. Come grow with us and support our mission to make a tangible difference in the lives of our Members.

See photos, watch videos and learn more about Livongo: follow us on Glassdoor.

#LivongoIPO #appliedhealthsignals

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we never have and never will discriminate against any job candidate or employee due to age, race, religion, color, ethnicity, national origin, gender, gender identity/expression, sexual orientation, membership in an employee organization, medical condition, family history, genetic information, veteran status, marital status, parental status or pregnancy (including breastfeeding we have a mother's room in both our offices). In our innovative and inclusive workplace, we prohibit discrimination and harassment of any kind.",4.7,Livongo,"Mountain View, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,6,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.0,CA,5127,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1655,155,Senior Data Engineer,$106k-$182k,"Our Data Warehouse team is looking to add a Senior Data Engineer. Qualified applicants will have 5-7 years’ experience in a Data Engineer position with a background supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency, and workload management. Ideal candidates will be experts in Talend, Python, Snowflake, CID and SQL.

Here's what you can expect from the job and what you need to be successful:

Job duties
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture, including building a data pipeline infrastructure for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL , cloud based relational or non-relational databases employing Talend, and/or scripting languages like Perl/Python
Build complex data platforms, and large scale CI/CD data pipelines utilizing a variety of technologies (REST APIs, Teamcity, Jennkis) and cloud databases (Snowflake)
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements, including automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in the organization’s data integration platform
Collaborate with technical staff to identify, learn, and understand software problems
Follow established configuration/change control processes
Identify options for potential solutions and assessing them for both technical and business suitability
Work closely with peers, stakeholders, and end users to ensure technical compatibility and user satisfaction
Essential Skills
A minimum of 5 years of developing ETL processes using Talendnformatica including the processing of NoSQL and JSON formats. Talend Certification preferred.
Strong skills with Ant, Maven, GIT, Jenkins, TeamCity.
Experience in writing Jenkins, Teamcity pipeline groovy, PowerShell scripts
Strong skills in source code repository tools such as Clear Case, SVN, CVS, and Git.
Advanced working knowledge in scripting languages, including Python, Perl and Shell.
Deep understanding of ETL, ELT, Talend, Informatica, Hadoop
Demonstrate independence, creativity, and initiative; as well as the ability to master the company's product architecture and its business goals
Experience in working in an Agile project management environment
Excellent problem solving and critical thinking skills
Superb verbal and written communication skills
Location: San Jose, CA 95134

First Tech is not currently offering Visa sponsorship for this position",3.4,First Tech Federal Credit Union,"San Jose, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,68,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,144.0,CA,2530,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
1659,159,Principal Data Scientist,$145k-$163k,"About Figure

At Figure, we're on a mission to transform financial services through blockchain, bringing speed, efficiency and savings to both consumers and institutions.

Accomplishing this kind of transformation requires building really big things. And we understand that building big requires a creative, team oriented and supportive environment where everyone can do their absolute best work. The Figure team is comprised of incredibly driven, innovative, collaborative and curious people who love architecting and building from scratch. Everyone at the company is encouraged to be an individual contributor but also a team collaborator.

We value team members who bring an entrepreneurial mindset to every task and will embrace our culture of innovation. Every day at Figure is a journey in continuous learning yet a daily focus on getting work done that makes a difference.

This is an opportunity to work with a team of proven leaders who have already created billions of dollars in value in the Fintech space. Join us!

About the Role

Each member of the Data team plays an integral part of what we are building at Figure. We rely on advanced techniques in machine learning, cloud platforms and big data to drive decisions across the organization. If you are interested in working with an impressive team of Data pros who collaborate and challenge each other, and want to solve interesting problems to propel the company's growth, apply now!

What You'll Do
Develop custom models and algorithms to apply to large datasets, as well as, processes for monitoring and analyzing their performance.
Mine and analyze data from different resources, and use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, customer acquisition, underwriting and other business outcomes.
Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
Work with stakeholders throughout the organization to identify opportunities for leveraging data to drive business decisions.
Understand and apply proper risk framework to your analysis and modeling.
Collaborate cross functionally to implement models and monitor outcomes.
What We Look For
8+ years of hands on Data Science experience building Models and partnering with stakeholders to make business decisions
Credit and Risk modeling experience in consumer finance
Strong problem solving skills with an emphasis on translating real-life problems into a concrete model development strategy. Blend academic rigor with a sense of pragmatism for rapidly prototyping and delivering solutions.
Experienced in using Python for analysis and modeling (TensorFlow is a big plus)
Experience applying a wide range of statistical techniques to large data sets, and understanding their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Experience using web services (AWS, GCP), and distributed data/computing tools (Spark, Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Hive, etc.)
Excellent cross-functional communication skills.
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced environment.
Benefits To You
Competitive salary based on experience and skills
Firm-wide performance based bonus
Competitive stock options package as an early member of the team
A flexible paid time off and vacation policy
Comprehensive health, vision, dental insurance
Company FSA, 401k, work from home benefits
And much more to come!
Figure will not sponsor work visas for this position. In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification form upon hire.",4.4,Figure,Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,154.0,Remote,3587,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,1,1,0,0,0
1660,160,Data Scientist - Adtech,$145k-$163k,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Kforce is working with a growing tech startup (a well-known firm) that is seeking a Data Scientist in Ann Harbor, Michigan (MI), New York, Fort Worth, and Austin, TX office. This firm is growing across multiple offices. They will consider 100% remote as long as you are located generally in a market local to their office (Austin, Fort Worth, Ann Arbor, MI, New York).

Data Scientist:
Are you passionate about development in leading technologies? Are you looking to become a major player on a diverse team in your next career adventure? The Data Scientists drive innovation by embracing challenges and leveraging decision science to solve complex problems in AdTech. In this position, you will be responsible for designing, building, and deploying complex systems to model and glean useful insights from billions of rows of data. You will inform decisions based on complex statistical modeling using machine learning, optimizing and forecasting algorithms powered by industry-leading technologies. Candidates for this role may be based out of Fort Worth, TX; Austin, TX; Ann Arbor, MI; or New York, NY.

Duties:
Build production grade models on large-scale datasets to optimize marketing performance by utilizing advanced statistical modeling, machine learning, or data mining techniques and marketing science research
Use models to address key growth challenges and provide meaningful insights on problems such as cross-channel optimization, targeting optimization, and A/B testing
Provide thought leadership in applying innovative machine learning techniques to solve complex data science problems
Work with cross-functional teams to implement and improve data-driven solutions
Use large scale data processing such as Spark, Hive, and machine learning platforms
Collaborate with marketing leadership, design, product and engineering teams
Participate in project planning/prioritization meetings, partner meetings, etc.
REQUIREMENTS:
Preferably, you have an advanced degree in Statistics, Engineering or related field
Minimum of 5 years of working experience as a data scientist
You have demonstrated expertise with Python (preferred) or R
You have worked extensively with machine learning techniques and advanced analytics (e.g. time series, regression, neural networks, econometrics, causal inference, mathematical optimization
You have advanced SQL skills - comfortable working with very large data sets
Preferably, you have experience with big data using technologies like Hadoop, Hive, and Spark
We offer a superb package including 100% medical paid for the entire family, a 100% Match on 401K and lots of other perks.

Kforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",4.1,Kforce,"New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,54,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,154.0,NY,2935,0,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
1661,161,"Data Scientist II, Product Analytics",$145k-$163k,"The Opportunity


At Livongo, data is at the heart of our culture of innovation. We're looking for a Data Science analytics team member to collaborate with Product Management and Marketing as we work toward optimizing our UX and messaging.

As a Data Scientist, Product Analytics your main focus will be to measure member experience and guide product decisions, ultimately making Livongo's products more valuable, delightful and intuitive to our Members. We're looking for someone with at least 2 years of experience in Data Analytics. In addition to technical data science skills, core competencies such as collaboration, decision-making, communication and flexibility will be key to your success.

This role offers the challenge and excitement of converting data analysis into real-life benefits. Come help us break new ground, while measurably improving lives and saving millions in healthcare costs.

Responsibilities
Provide insights about our products and member experience to inform Product teams for roadmap and feature decisions
Conduct exploratory analysis and develop statistical models to answer key product usage and engagement questions
Help Product and Marketing teams use experimentation (A/B testing) and cohorting to test assumptions and launch new marketing campaigns, features and product releases
Partner with Product teams to define and benchmark metrics for new features launches and initiatives and help create a culture of measurement
Candidate Profile
2+ years of work experience in product/data analytics or a related discipline
Data science experience (SQL, Python, R) and familiarity with managing large data sets
A general knowledge of machine learning approaches is a plus.
The ability to collaborate and communicate with Product Managers and help them craft hypotheses, and define and measure KPIs
Confidence working with ambiguity, unknown variables, and missing context (and the ability to find ways to bridge those gaps when necessary)
A self-starter approach, with strong motivation and drive for excellence
BS degree in Engineering, Computer Science or a related filed in lieu of degree, relevant work experience and/or trade school
Why Join Livongo?


The Transformative Name in Healthcare: The transformative industry forces in Community, Content and Commerce are now household names. As Amazon is to Commerce, Livongo is to Healthcare. With our Applied Health Signals engine, AI+AI, we've transformed how care is delivered.

Our Work Truly Matters: Livongo's proprietary, consumer-first technology is revolutionizing the experience of living with a chronic health condition. Our data-driven digital health engine enables our Members to seamlessly manage multiple health conditions on one empowering platform. We use smart, connected devices, personalized digital guidance, and 24x7x365 access to health professionals to make it easier for people to stay healthier.

Make an Impact: Do you want to accomplish something meaningful? To create results that matter? Livongo's innovative solution produces industry-leading member satisfaction, measurable clinical outcomes and proven healthcare costs savings. Here you can truly improve lives.

The Largest Digital Health IPO in History: We are at a milestone period in our history. On July 25, 2019 we took our company public, in order to elevate and expand the way the industry views us, thus ushering us into a whole new set of mission-critical conversations that will help us accomplish the work still to be done. As we reach new levels of achievement, we accelerate our ability to deliver life-changing services.

Focus on PEOPLE: Livongo has been voted one of the Best Places to Work in healthcare, by Fortune Magazine and Best Place to Work! Talented, passionate individuals make the difference, in this fast-moving, collaborative and inspiring environment.

Diversity and Inclusion: At Livongo we believe that personal and professional diversity is the key to innovation. We hire based solely on your strengths and qualifications, and the way in which those strengths can directly contribute to your success in your new position.

Growth and Innovation: We've already made healthcare history, yet we remain on the threshold of very big things. Leading the industry with our Applied Health Signals category, we have cracked the code to transforming healthcare. Come grow with us and support our mission to make a tangible difference in the lives of our Members.

See photos, watch videos and learn more about Livongo: follow us on Glassdoor.

#LivongoIPO #appliedhealthsignals

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we never have and never will discriminate against any job candidate or employee due to age, race, religion, color, ethnicity, national origin, gender, gender identity/expression, sexual orientation, membership in an employee organization, medical condition, family history, genetic information, veteran status, marital status, parental status or pregnancy (including breastfeeding we have a mother's room in both our offices). In our innovative and inclusive workplace, we prohibit discrimination and harassment of any kind.",4.7,Livongo,"Mountain View, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,6,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,154.0,CA,5127,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1662,162,Big Data Engineer - Chicago - Future Opportunity,$145k-$163k,"ABOUT US

Are you ready to transform an industry? At Centro we are building a comprehensive tech platform that radically increases efficiencies and impact across businesses, teams, and campaigns. Our clients can run all their digital business through Basis, with robust business intelligence, workflow automation, search and social integrations, and the number one rated DSP.
We’re taking the digital advertising world by storm and are proud to be headquartered in the rapidly growing tech hub of Chicago, with offices that span across the United States, Canada, Mexico, and London. Join us in our mission to improve the lives of everyone working in the industry!
WHY WORK WITH US?
At Centro, we believe that lasting success is achieved through continual dedication to the growth and well-being of the individual. Our people are the core of what makes Centro unique. Driven by the Centro Manifesto and our guiding principles, we look to hire the best and brightest minds—curious, passionate learners who are driven to create impact.
We are committed to building a culture of highly motivated individuals who create a positive and supportive environment together. When we work hard, stay focused, and act in service to others, we believe that anything is possible. Come grow with us!

ABOUT THE TEAM

Technology is at the core of what we do. Centro’s innovative Engineering team designs and develops new features and integrations for Basis, our industry-leading, comprehensive software solution. Our platform processes over 300 billion events per day and uses AI and machine learning to automate and simplify the entire digital campaign process.

This team is all about data—and in order to create value from the massive amount of data we collect, engineering leverages their dynamic Data Engineering, Data Science, and Business Intelligence teams to create insights that benefit the industry as a whole.

Our Tech Stack:
• Ruby, Java, Python, and React.js
• Kubernetes, Docker, Kafka
• PostgreSQL, NoSQL
• AWS

ABOUT THE ROLE

We are looking for engineers who are excited about building distributed data pipelines. We want you to help us shape our internal and external brand-new data warehouses, leveraging the latest advances of big data processing: a combination of Kafka Streams, Hadoop, and traditional RDBMS.
YOU WILL
Be a part of our Big Data team and of an overall Data Organization spanning multiple offices.
Participate in architecture discussions and bring your experience in scalable data pipelines using Kafka Streams and/or other Big Data tools.
Take ownership of design and implementation of scalable and fault tolerant projects.
Maintain and incrementally improve existing solutions.
Get to build brand new pipelines with the technology stack including Spark, Spark Structured Streaming, Kafka, Hadoop, MySql, Python.
WHAT WE ARE LOOKING FOR
Solid understanding of distributed system fundamentals.
Experience in developing, troubleshooting, diagnosing, and performance tuning of distributed data pipelines at scale.
Demonstrated professional experience working with various components of Big Data ecosystem: Spark/Spark Streaming, Hive, Kafka/KSQL, Hadoop (or similar NoSQL ecosystem), et. al, in a production system.
Strong software engineering skills with Python.
Knowledge of some flavor of SQL (MySQL, Oracle, Hive, Impala), including the fundamentals of data modeling and performance.
EVEN BETTER IF YOU HAVE
Skills in real-time streaming applications.
Knowledge of Scala.
A development workflow using Docker containers.
Compulsion for automating your day-to-day processes.
WHAT WE OFFER
Ability to see your direct impact on a high visibility project.
An opportunity to both create new projects and help improve the existing big data pipelines.
Work in a mature, private, nationally-known company with a CEO approval of 90% on Glassdoor and a positive atmosphere in our San Francisco tech team.
401K plan with employer matching.
Commuter pre-tax contributions.
Flexible working hours and work-from-home days.
Health plan.
In-office snacks.
Organized team events.
LIFE WITH CENTRO

We take care of our people. Our team has put together a thoughtful benefits package and provides a wide range of perks, including competitive 401k matching, a tax-free health savings account, tuition reimbursement, generous maternity/paternity leave, and more.

Aside from benefits, we’re always finding new ways to invest in the personal and professional growth our employees. We’re proud to support a variety of employee-led communities that enrich our culture of uniqueness, inclusivity, and empowerment. Centro is more than a workplace.

Centro is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We respect and support an inclusive workplace diverse in thought, perspective and culture. We celebrate all team members regardless of gender/identity, sexual orientation, race or cultural background, religion, physical disability and age. We are better together.",3.9,Centro,"Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,19,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,154.0,IL,4948,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1663,163,"Risk Specialist, Data Science - Suptech",$145k-$163k,"Overview

Financial Institution Supervision and Credit (FISC) at the Federal Reserve
Bank of San Francisco supervises financial institutions, and service providers
to financial institutions, in the 12th Federal Reserve District. Our mission is
to ensure a safe, sound, and accessible financial system. The Suptech (ST) Team
within the Risk, Policy, and Analysis Group directly supports FISC’s strategic
objective of deepening our knowledge of, and thought leadership in, the
utilization of new and evolving technologies in our supervisory programs and
examination processes. This cross-disciplinary team of developers and/or data
scientists collaborates with colleagues throughout FISC to identify product
development opportunities, design solutions, and facilitate their implementation.
ST additionally has education, outreach
and advocacy responsibilities on the use of technology in supervision.

Job Summary

The Risk Specialist, Data Science for Suptech plays an essential role in
supporting FISC’s supervision objectives and functions. We are looking for a
subject matter expert with data science expertise to support assessment and
monitoring of risk at supervised institutions.
You will lead or provide critical input to the identification,
prioritization, and development of applied data science opportunities across
FISC, with a focus on the Regional, Community and Foreign Examinations Group.
Additionally, you will work closely with multiple stakeholders throughout the
Bank to support the overall Mission, and to deliver on FISC’s vision for
developing and implementing innovative solutions, powered by data and machine
learning and integral to the risk assessment, supervisory program, and
examination processes.

Key
responsibilities include:
Develop or build
upon already existing expertise around machine learning applications, as well
as supervisory examination, risk assessment, and risk monitoring processes, to
help lead developing methods for applying data mining, NLP, and machine
learning to improve the Division’s analytical and supervisory capabilities.
Collect and
direct, perform, or support analysis of data to generate and test working hypotheses,
conduct thorough assessments, and draw actionable recommendations to be used by
examination team(s) and a broader Reserve Bank audience.
Direct and/or build
data ingestion processes to prepare, extract, and enrich a variety of both
structured and unstructured data sources such as news, internal/external
documents, external financial information, and confidential supervisory
information.
Develop, document
& maintain statistical, financial and/or econometric models to analyze
capital, asset quality, earnings, liquidity risk exposure, or other
sophisticated concepts, including non-financial risk, at banking institutions.
Direct, or provide
analytical support to, the development of innovative solutions leveraging
emerging technologies to address evolving needs of supervision and examination
management and staff, with a particular focus on identifying, measuring,
monitoring, and mitigating existing risk and emerging risk concerns, or improving
efficiencies in supervisory program or examination processes.
Collaborate with
business partners across FRBSF and FISC to prioritize requirements in the risk,
supervision and data science domains.
Position Requirements
Bachelor's
and Master's Degree preferably in Business/Finance or an analytical field such
as Economics, Mathematics, Engineering, Computer Science with a minimum of 3+
years of related experience to include:
3+ years of
experience in a data science/modeler role specifically focused on risk, banking
supervision, and/or financial regulation.
2+ years of
experience in working at financial regulatory institutions with large datasets
to build models and algorithms with open source technologies as part
supervisory and/or risk assessment processes.
Established
ability to work with large structured and unstructured financial data sets and
have the required statistical skills to analyze and prepare them for modeling
and algorithm development.
Knowledge of
the banking industry and related supervision and regulation framework
Proficiency
and applied experience in quantitative risk modeling, including the use of
modeling software.
Ability to
analyze and interpret quantitative financial information, including but not
limited to balance sheet data and market data.
Strong
statistical modelling and programming skills in R or Python
Proficiency
in SQL – able to write structured and efficient queries on large data sets.
Comfortable
working in a loosely structured organization on a tight schedule.
Strong
written and verbal communication and presentation skills including ability to
effectively share results with both technical and non-technical audiences
Experience
with data visualization packages (e.g. ggplot2, plotly); experience building
interactive dashboards and apps (e.g. Shiny) is a plus but not required.
Familiarity
with model development lifecycle, and in particular model validation processes
(e.g. SR 11-7).
We are looking for candidates
that exhibit these behavioral competencies: analytical thinking, innovation,
communication for results, flexibility, initiative, collaboration, and risk
management.

The Federal Reserve Bank of
San Francisco believes in the diversity of our people, ideas, and experiences
and are committed to building an inclusive culture that is representative of
the communities we serve.

We will ensure that
individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to
participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential
job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment.

The Federal Reserve Bank of
San Francisco is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",3.6,Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,107,Government,financial_related,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,154.0,CA,5803,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,1
1664,164,Data Engineer,$145k-$163k,"Kingfisher Systems, Inc. specializes in providing a full range of Information Technology, Cybersecurity, Intelligence, and support services to the U.S. Government. Kingfisher Systems core competency is technology-enabled services, with a specific focus on national security. Since 2005, Kingfisher has established itself as a recognized and trusted mission partner whose mission is safeguarding sensitive information, operations, and programs for our Federal customers and warfighters.

Responsibilities:

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is seeking a Data Engineer to provide data flows and transformations to automate, script, visualize, and modeling subnational wealth. Day to day technical tasks include meeting with the customer to understand and refine the requirements. The candidate will use Nifi and Python to create data flows and transformations and understand the workflow of the project. They will work with the customer to implement any requested updates, move data storage to RDS, and work with security to ensure the entire system is compliant. They will compile security controls and artifacts and contribute to the Standard Operating Procedures and other related documents.

Skills Requirements:
The successful candidate should have experience with scripting in Python and using Nifi. Some knowledge of geospatial software such as ArcGIS, QGIS is preferred or willingness to learn.
Knowledge of best practices for data standards, data management, data quality.
Experience with SQL, PostGreSQL/PostGIS. Ability to communicate analysis to experts and lay persons alike.
Years of Experience: Minimum of 3 years experience.

Degree Requirement: Bachelor's degree in computer science, geography, or related field.

Minimum Clearance Requirement: Minimum Top Secret clearance with SCI Eligibility. Applicants selected will be subject to an additional security investigation and thus may have additional eligibility requirements to meet.

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, among other things, or status as a qualified individual with a disability.",4.5,Kingfisher Systems,"Falls Church, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,15,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,154.0,VA,2236,0,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1670,170,Data Scientist/Machine Learning Expert,$145k-$163k,"26-Aug-2020

Job ID
301660BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""ONE Global Discovery Chemistry Community working across 7 disease areas at the Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research (NIBR) is seeking a hardworking and motivated Data Scientist to join our Computer-Aided Drug Discovery (CADD) Department in Cambridge, MA. The successful candidate will join an energizing and collaborative research organization, working alongside colleagues who are dedicated to improving human health through the discovery of transformative medicines.

We are seeking an outstanding data scientist with the skills, experience and passion to extract new knowledge and ground-breaking insights from the expanded body of data collected by one of the world’s leading pharmaceutical companies. You will be a member of our global CADD group, an interdisciplinary team of expert molecular modelers, cheminformaticians, and data scientists. Teamed up with domain specialists from biology, chemistry and translational medicine, this is a unique opportunity to develop and apply cutting-edge machine learning technologies to uncover insights to real-world drug discovery problems and innovate paths to transformative medicines.

What you'll do:
Develop and implement approaches for extracting patterns and correlations from both internal and external data sources using machine learning toolkits
Develop workflows for conducting comparative analysis among Novartis’ diverse data sources as well as generalizing approaches crafted in-house or externally.
Enable open-source solutions for internal use and implement cutting-edge published scientific methods.
Develop customized machine learning solutions including data querying and knowledge extraction.
Interact and be part of matrixed project teams to drive effective decision-making by mining and developing predictive models
Develop skills in the area of cheminformatics and drug discovery and improve those to accelerate development of novel machine learning algorithms
Know the latest breakthroughs in scientific literature and interact with scientists to integrate data science technologies
Posting Title
Data Scientist/Machine Learning Expert",4.0,Novartis,"Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,24,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,154.0,MA,2191,0,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1674,174,Machine Learning Engineer,$145k-$163k,"Machine Learning Engineer*
Are you obsessed with software and machine learning? Looking to work with an awesome team in a modern, successful software company? Geisel Software, based in Worcester, Massachusetts, is a premier software developer that is working with and creating today's hottest software technologies. We are looking for a motivated individual to join our team, learn new technology, and help us build some great software!

Geisel Software develops web, mobile and embedded software, with a focus on robotics, medical devices, and machine learning. We seek a talented individual who is not afraid to work hard, learn something new and get lots of stuff done. We have a helpful staff, but it is also important that you can work independently and solve problems with little outside direction. Your problem-solving skills will be put to the test, whether that means tracking down the answer on Google, or building your own new solution.
Here's what we work with regularly*
TensorFlow and OpenCV
Robotic Simulation with ROS, RVIZ, and Unreal Engine
LAMP - Linux, Apache, MySQL and PHP
iPhone/Android application development
Embedded Development in C/C++ (Arm or x86)
Web Frontend (AngularJS, JavaScript, jQuery, Bootstrap, etc.)
Scripting Languages (Python, BASH, or other)
Web Technologies - HTML5, CSS3, XML, JSON
Linux - As a user at least, but also administration and kernel development
Web Frameworks - Django, Codeigniter
Agile and Waterfall design methodologies
Embedded platforms (Raspberry Pi, BeagleBone, OMAP, etc.)
Here’s what we require*
You're passionate about software development -- it's what you do even in your free time.
1 - ∞ years of experience with C, C++ and/or Python.
Master’s degree in Computer Science or related field (PHD highly preferred).
Willingness and ability to write software as part of a team as well as work on ground-breaking machine learning IP. This role will be a mix of both!
Good software foundational skills: CS theory; clean, well-documented code; collaborative style; solid algorithms understanding; mastery of more than one language.
An aptitude for learning new platforms and technologies on the fly. We’re constantly working on new projects that will push you and keep you always learning new technologies.
Able to take ownership of a project and independently architect, execute and troubleshoot it through completion and customer delivery.
Actively pursuing new knowledge and technologies. If you’re a web frontend guru, are you building your backend skills? If you’re an embedded developer, are you developing apps for Android or iOS?
Already comfortable on Linux. You can be a Windows/Mac pro, but you'll be doing at least 50% of your development on Linux. You should be comfortable with that.
Willing to commute to Worcester, MA (Note: Ability to temporarily work remotely during this trying time of COVID-19).
Looking for full-time employment.
Must be a US Person.
Here’s what we would prefer*
ROS or other robot operating system experience.
An educational focus in Machine Learning and Data Science.
Published work in the field of machine learning.
Robotic simulation and 3D game engine knowledge (Godot, Unreal, Unity, RVIZ, Drake).
Any experience with physical modeling would be a plus.
What you’ll get*
An opportunity to work with the latest technologies across a variety of platforms.
A fun, exciting work environment focused on the results, not the politics.
An experienced team and mentor who can help you grow in your craft and career.
A position with a growing company, offering competitive benefits and salary.
Apply now*
E-mail us at *jobs*@*geisel.software* and *include your resume and a brief cover letter* explaining why you think you'd be a great fit at Geisel Software. We'd love to hear about what you've done with technologies we're using, or other projects you've worked on. What do you think you’re really good at and why? What have you done outside your current job to improve your craft? Why do you think you’d be a great fit?

Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.geisel-software.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,Geisel Software,"Worcester, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,154.0,MA,4195,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,0,1,0,1,0,1
1675,175,Sr. Data Engineer,$145k-$163k,"Join our team of Data Consultants and work on dynamic long-term projects. The majority of our team members are long-term employees who enjoy consistent work and a collaborative team approach!
Background in computer science and comfortable in programming in a variety of languages, including Java, Python, Scala;
Determining the appropriate software packages or modules to run, and how easily they can be modified;
Handling large scale structured and unstructured data from internal and third-party sources;
Architecting highly scalable distributed data pipelines using open source tools and big data technologies such as Hadoop, Pig, Hive, Presto, Spark, Drill, Sqoop and ETL frameworks;
Utilizing Linux shell scripting and containerization technologies (Docker, Kubernetes); and,
Leading teams in a dynamic work environment while managing stakeholder expectations and scope.
Requirements
Bachelor's degree, preferably in technology related disciplines.
Cloud computing platforms such as Azure, AWS, and GCP;
Relational databases and writing SQL queries, evaluating their performance
Strong experience with data processing software in Azure, AWS and GCP
Or Big data machine learning toolkits such as SparkML, messaging systems (Kafka) and NoSQL databases (Cassandra, HBase, MongoDB) desirable
Building data lakes and data pipelines that adhere to our engineering philosophy
Benefits

For more than 20 years, Moser Consulting has been the go-to source for exceptional IT talent with the ability to self-manage. At Moser Consulting, our people are our #1 asset. We hire the best people, welcome them like family, connect them with opportunities, and let them do what they do best: produce innovative solutions to technology problems.

Our culture gives us a competitive advantage by keeping our employees happy, healthy, and by lowering stress levels in a very demanding industry. It is no accident that we are recognized as one of the Best Places to Work in Indiana. We focus on giving employees: an incredible work space; a fun, collaborative, and creative atmosphere; an extremely generous compensation package; and dozens of outstanding and unique perks usually not found at one company.

Equal Opportunity Employer–minorities/females/veterans/individuals with disabilities/sexual orientation/gender identity.",4.8,Moser Consulting,"Indianapolis, IN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,24,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,154.0,IN,2311,1,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,0
1677,177,Principal Data Scientist,$145k-$163k,"Technology. Flexibility. Diversity. At the center of it all are the Digital Accelerator and Advanced Analytics teams at Cummins, working together as a high-energy startup within a Fortune 500 organization. At this Midwestern technology hub, today’s sharpest, most curious minds transform what-ifs into realities.

#LifeAtCummins is about POWERING YOUR POTENTIAL .You’ll have global opportunities to develop your career and make your community a better place - to break ground professionally and be your best personally.

About Digital Accelerator and Advanced Analytics:

Cummins' Digital Accelerator functions as our own tech startup, with strategic access to Fortune 150 resources and talents. Steering the innovation of new experiences for customers, Digital Accelerator is boldly transforming Cummins into a modern and agile technology company. Through the conception, build and launch of inspiring digital solutions, the unique hub of vision and creativity leverages open architecture, connectivity, big data, advanced analytics, internet-of-things, edge computing and more, to drive the company forward on its journey towards smart technologies.

This is an exciting opportunity in Columbus, IN for a Principal Data Scientist. This is an active business facing role where you will work and collaborate with teams to solve problems in a results, customer centric environment.

Your impact will happen in these and other ways:

Manages and Implements advanced analytics projects which solve complex analytical problems using quantitative approaches through a combination of analytical, mathematical and technical skills.
Researches, designs, implements and validates cutting-edge algorithms to analyze diverse sources of data to achieve targeted outcomes by leveraging complex statistical and predictive modeling concepts, machine-learning approaches, clustering and classification techniques.
Liaises with business stakeholders and leverages business knowledge to industrialize and monetize insights from advanced analytics projects.
Leads key objectives and business goals through the use of data science methodology.
Leverages data science methodology to solve complex business problems.
Creates algorithms using more complex statistical methodologies through the use of statistical programming languages and tools.
Partners with domain experts to verify model capabilities and translate modeling outputs from statistical inferences into business language.
Partners with Solution Architect to enable appropriate data flow/data model, development using appropriate tools/technology, rapid prototyping and informs the design of analytical products.
Trains and mentors less experienced employees on data science tools and methodologies.
Continuous development and advancement of the organization through knowledge sharing and collaboration.
Participates in planning for advancement of the Data Science profession.

Qualifications

Experience:

Significant experience in a relevant discipline area is required with a demonstrated track record of analyzing complex business systems and large data sets. Knowledge of the latest technologies and trends in data science is highly preferred and includes:

Familiarity analyzing complex business systems, industry requirements, and/or data regulations
Background in processing and managing large data sets
Applied knowledge of big data, open source and third party toolsets
SQL query language
Clustered compute cloud-based implementation experience
Experience in building analytical solutions
Experience coaching on implementation of machine learning solutions

Significant experiences in the following are preferred:

Designing and implementing Big Data platform solutions using open source and third-party tools
Microsoft Azure and/or Amazon Web services environment
Experience in Agile software development
Familiarity with validation and testing of machine learning systems
Familiarity with Continuous Integration and Continuous Delivery (CI/CD)

Manage the analytics technical road map in collaboration with supported delivery partners
Design analytics solution approach in collaboration with delivery partners
Provide design direction and technical guidance to developments teams
Oversee in-use model performance and corrective action
Manage activities of a small team of employees

Skills

Programming - Creates, writes and tests computer code, test scripts, and build scripts using algorithmic analysis and design, industry standards and tools, version control, and build and test automation to meet business, technical, security, governance and compliance requirements.

Data Mining - Extracts insights from data by identifying relationships and patterns through use of a suite of data exploration and data visualization techniques to understand the underlying structure of the data and enable sound conclusions upon model building.

Predictive Modeling - Develops analytical or machine learning models by using appropriate variable transformations, feature selection strategies, imputation strategies, class rebalancing, resampling strategies and quality control measures to generate predictive insights used in solving business questions.

Statistical Modeling - Develops descriptive and explanatory statistical models, and simulations for regression, classification, outlier detection, anomaly detection, time series forecasting using knowledge of foundational statistics such as null hypotheses significance tests, regression models, generalized linear modeling, time series analysis, rank statistics, probability distribution fitting survival analysis, etc. to validate hypotheses for any given statistical or business question.

Problem Solving - Solves problems using a systematic analysis process by leveraging industry standard methodologies to create problem traceability and protect the customer; determines the assignable cause; implements robust, data-based solutions; identifies the systemic root causes and recommended actions to prevent problem reoccurrence.

Requirements Analysis - Evaluates relationships and interdependencies between requirements based upon their complexity and value to the business in order to determine feasibility and prioritization.

Strategic Roadmap Planning - Produces a high-level, multi-year product and capability roadmap utilizing internal and external business resource, asset and market knowledge and experience to communicate the organization's focus and priorities to internal and external stakeholders.

Tech savvy - Anticipating and adopting innovations in business-building digital and technology applications.

Manages complexity - Making sense of complex, high quantity, and sometimes contradictory information to effectively solve problems.

Collaborates - Building partnerships and working collaboratively with others to meet shared objectives.

Develops talent - Developing people to meet both their career goals and the organization’s goals.

Communicates Effectively - Developing and delivering multi-mode communications that convey a clear understanding of the unique needs of different audiences.

Education, Licenses, Certifications

College, university or equivalent degree or equivalent work experience in relevant technical discipline is required.
This position may require licensing for compliance with export controls or sanctions regulations.

Compensation and Benefits

Base salary rate commensurate with experience. Additional benefits vary between locations and include options such as our 401(k) Retirement Savings Plan, Cash Balance Pension Plan, Medical/Dental/Life Insurance, Health Savings Account, Domestic Partners Coverage and a full complement of personal and professional benefits.

Cummins and E-verify

At Cummins, we are an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer dedicated to diversity in the workplace. Our policy is to provide equal employment opportunities to all qualified persons without regard to race, gender, color, disability, national origin, age, religion, union affiliation, sexual orientation, veteran status, citizenship, gender identity and/or expression, or other status protected by law. Cummins validates right to work using E-Verify. Cummins will provide the Social Security Administration (SSA) and, if necessary, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS), with information from each new employee’s Form I-9 to confirm work authorization.

Ready to think beyond your desk? Apply for this opportunity to start your career with Cummins today.careers.cummins.com

Not ready to apply but want to learn more? Join our Talent Community to get the inside track on great jobs and confidentially connect to our recruiting team: https://www.cumminstalentcommunity.com/profile/join/

#DAAAI

Job
SYSTEMS/INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Primary Location
United States-Indiana-Columbus-US, IN, Columbus, Sears Building
Job Type
Experienced - Exempt / Office
Recruitment Job Type Exempt - Experienced
Job Posting
Jul 23, 2020, 8:42:21 PM
Unposting Date
Ongoing",3.9,Cummins Inc.,"Columbus, IN",-1,10000+ Employees,101,Company - Public,manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,154.0,IN,9012,1,data scientist,0,0,1,0,0,1,0,0,0
1681,181,Senior Data Engineer,$145k-$163k,"Our Data Warehouse team is looking to add a Senior Data Engineer. Qualified applicants will have 5-7 years’ experience in a Data Engineer position with a background supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency, and workload management. Ideal candidates will be experts in Talend, Python, Snowflake, CID and SQL.

Here's what you can expect from the job and what you need to be successful:

Job duties
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture, including building a data pipeline infrastructure for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL , cloud based relational or non-relational databases employing Talend, and/or scripting languages like Perl/Python
Build complex data platforms, and large scale CI/CD data pipelines utilizing a variety of technologies (REST APIs, Teamcity, Jennkis) and cloud databases (Snowflake)
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements, including automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in the organization’s data integration platform
Collaborate with technical staff to identify, learn, and understand software problems
Follow established configuration/change control processes
Identify options for potential solutions and assessing them for both technical and business suitability
Work closely with peers, stakeholders, and end users to ensure technical compatibility and user satisfaction
Essential Skills
A minimum of 5 years of developing ETL processes using Talendnformatica including the processing of NoSQL and JSON formats. Talend Certification preferred.
Strong skills with Ant, Maven, GIT, Jenkins, TeamCity.
Experience in writing Jenkins, Teamcity pipeline groovy, PowerShell scripts
Strong skills in source code repository tools such as Clear Case, SVN, CVS, and Git.
Advanced working knowledge in scripting languages, including Python, Perl and Shell.
Deep understanding of ETL, ELT, Talend, Informatica, Hadoop
Demonstrate independence, creativity, and initiative; as well as the ability to master the company's product architecture and its business goals
Experience in working in an Agile project management environment
Excellent problem solving and critical thinking skills
Superb verbal and written communication skills
Location: San Jose, CA 95134

First Tech is not currently offering Visa sponsorship for this position",3.4,First Tech Federal Credit Union,"San Jose, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,68,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,154.0,CA,2530,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,1,0,0,1
1683,183,Data Scientist,$145k-$163k,"When you’re the best, we’re the best. We instill an environment where employees feel engaged, satisfied and able to contribute their unique skills and talents. We provide extensive opportunities for personal and professional development, building both employee competence and organizational capability to fuel exceptional performance now and in the future.

Summary:

In this role, you will conduct sophisticated data analysis to help address critical business and member questions, the outputs of which enable members to drive improvements in clinical, operational, and economic outcomes.

Responsibilities:

Provide analysis to identify critical issues/questions around member performance.

Conduct exploratory data analysis from complex, disparate data sources to recognize patterns, and identify member performance improvement opportunities.

Generate hypotheses and analyze data to test and interpret results.

Design and develop data models to predict member outcomes or future impact of key member decisions.

Communicate findings from exploratory and predictive data analysis broadly to team and leaders.

Identify improvement opportunities in reporting and BI tools and collaborate with Products Technology to implement enhancements.

Serve as the resident data expert and share best practices/approaches for statistics, machine learning techniques, data modeling, simulation and advanced mathematics.

Collaborate with key leaders and clinicians to build analytical acumen across all analytic roles in the organization.

Qualifications:

Relevant degree preferred. Advanced degree a plus.

5 or more years of relevant work experience.

Proficient programming experience using SAS/Python/R.

Demonstrated ability to manage large disparate data sets and using quantitative and qualitative analysis.

Experience effectively communicating and presenting data to a variety of audiences required.

Experience working with health care administrative claims data (ICD-10, MS-DRG, CPT/HCPCS) or electronic medical record data tools (Epic Clarity/Caboodle, Cerner CCL-Discern/PowerInsight) strongly preferred.

#LI-DM

#IDS

Equal Opportunity Employer: Females/Minorities/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The Company is committed to equal employment opportunity to all employees and applicants without regard to race, religion, color, gender identity, ethnicity, age, national origin, sexual orientation, disability status, veteran status or any other category protected by applicable law.",3.8,"Vizient, Inc.","Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,43,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,154.0,IL,2496,0,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0
1684,184,Senior Data Engineer,$145k-$163k,"Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in computer science, information technology, or a related field or equivalent experience
Preferred Qualifications
3 years of experience working with database tools
3 years of programming experience using Python and C#
3 years of experience working with SQL server integration services or ETL tools
3 years of experience working with data integration tools
Proficiency in the Microsoft Office suite
Experience working with ETL tools
Knowledge of data integration tools
Knowledge of software programming languages, such as Python and C#
Job Summary

The Senior Data Engineer works with database engineers to design, develop and maintain the infrastructure of data within the data warehouse, including setting the ETL (extract, transform, load) processes, bringing in new data sources, modifying existing data sources, making sure data is clean, complete and consumable, as well as designing data models within the data warehouse.

The Senior Data Engineer works as part of one or more project teams and is responsible for designing and building mechanisms to move, integrate, cleanse and publish large volume datasets. This is a developer role with a specialty in data and requires deep knowledge of a variety of programming languages and design patterns.

Responsibilities
Design and support the new and evolving sources of data being brought into the data warehouse
Work closely with data architects and follow best practices for data management consumption
Work closely with business analysts to work through business requirements and develop processes to provide the needed data visibility via the data warehouse and reporting platform
Assist with application layer and metadata design
Assist with the design and create automated applications and reporting solutions
Work closely with front-end developers to ensure data is being brought in and data integrity is being maintained
Monitor and troubleshoot performance issues on the data warehouse servers
Research and promote new tools and techniques to shape the future of the data environment
Mentor and train other data engineers
Who We Are

We're America's largest mortgage lender, closing loans in all 50 states. J.D. Power ranked Quicken Loans ""Highest in Customer Satisfaction in Primary Mortgage Origination"" for the past 10 consecutive years, 2010 - 2019. The company was also ranked highest in the nation for client satisfaction among mortgage servicers by J.D. Power for 6 consecutive years, 2014 through 2019, each year the company was eligible. There's a simple reason we've been so successful: We care about the people we work with.

If you're tired of stuffy, bureaucratic workplaces, then you'll be delighted to find something different here. We strive to make a creative, fun and collaborative environment you simply won't find anywhere else. Quicken Loans was named #1 in ESSENCE Magazine's first ever list of ""Best Places to Work for African Americans"" in 2015. We've been on Computerworld's ""Best Places to Work in IT"" list for 13 years running, hitting #1 the last 5 years. We were also ranked #14 in FORTUNE Magazine's list of ""100 Best Companies to Work For"" in 2018, remaining in the top 30 for the past 15 years.

Disclaimer

This is an outline of the primary responsibilities of this position. As with everything in life, things change. The tasks and responsibilities can be changed, added to, removed, amended, deleted and modified at any time by the leadership group.",3.8,Quicken Loans,"Detroit, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,35,Company - Private,financial_related,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,154.0,MI,3487,1,data engineer,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1689,189,Lead Data Scientist,$145k-$163k,"Summary
Tranzact is hiring a lead data scientist to assist our team in driving our data science and analytics group forward. You’ll be joining a group of curious, smart, technically minded yet business savvy data scientists looking to make a difference to the company by further designing and building out our data decisioning capabilities. We have been up and running for several years and our team must grow to meet the demands of our business partners—they see the value we have provided and want more.

The Lead Data Scientist is passionate about using data and insights to drive business strategy and develop data products. A successful candidate will manage data science projects including scoping, designing, and executing the vision with the help of more junior data scientists / analysts. They would also identify and prioritize initiatives to deliver value to our internal stakeholders. The ideal candidate would have experience managing data science projects, managing stakeholders, and working cross functionally. This person would have real world experience “in the data trenches” as a data scientist and be an all-star individual contributor. We expect this person to have a passion for driving projects for business outcomes, strong analytical skills, and a strong desire to make an impact in our growing data science practice!

What you’ll do:
Become the domain expert in multiple areas of the Tranzact business (i.e. retention, call center effectiveness, etc.) and contribute to the advancement of those area through thought leadership.
Lead new projects and initiatives through understanding business needs, executing, presenting and influencing stakeholders.
Be a technical leader on the team that can advise, mentor, and delegate tasks to more junior data scientists and analysts.
Facilitate data-driven decision making and prioritize initiatives.
Develop strong cross functional partnerships with business and technology stakeholders.
Act as a subject matter expert within the organization on all things data.
Find new and improved ways for us to use data in our products, operations, and business strategies.

What we do:
We achieve competitive advantage through data-driven marketing and full management of the customer experience. We’re constantly refining our technology and our strategies, that’s why we’re the industry leader in delivering the best results to the top insurance brands in America.

That’s not just lip service either, we’re consistently awarded partner of the year from brands like AFLAC, Humana, and more. Our work has also been featured on The Dr. Oz Show, Forbes, and Vox -- to name a few.

We want people who fit within our Be Real culture. We want a diversity of programmers and writers and designers and data scientists and strategists and more. We’re made up of introverts and extroverts, suits and rebels, corporate types and anti-corporate types. We’re an environment where every person feels their full potential is only limited by their ability to conceive of it and make it happen. Our company grew from entrepreneurial roots but has big company resources to get amazing things done.

What we’re looking for:
BA/BS in a quantitative field (Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, etc.)
5 years of experience in data science at a B2C or direct to consumer company (experience in marketing, business operations, or customer retention is a plus)
Experience implementing predictive and prescriptive models in production systems
Experience managing data science projects and mentoring data scientists / analysts
Proficiency with Python, SQL, Excel, and a data visualization tool (Tableau, Power BI, etc.)
Ability to manage multiple projects and deadlines
Experience communicating strategy and results to different audiences
Ability to work cross functionally and influence others
A lifelong learner that is excited to learn new data science technologies and apply those to technologies to our business
Ability to be objective, follow the facts, cut through noise and create a story with data
Thrives in a fast-paced environment that is constantly changing
What’s in it for you:
Medical, dental, vision, paid time off/holidays, 401(k), and bonus opportunity
Frequent office events and outings
Employee development programs, conference and training reimbursement
Work remote flexibility
Joining a growing and exciting team making a big impact on the business!
EOE, including disability/vets",3.8,TRANZACT,"Fort Lee, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,31,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,154.0,NJ,4454,1,data scientist,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0
1690,190,Lead Data Scientist - Investments,$111k-$184k,"Job Description

Since 1851, MassMutuals commitment has always been to help people protect their families, support their communities, and help one another. This is why we want to inspire people to Live Mutual. Were people helping people.

A career with us means you will work alongside exceptional people and be empowered to reach your professional and personal goals. Our employees are the foundation of what makes MassMutual a strong, stable and ethical business. We seek and value unique and varied perspectives and experiences because we believe we are stronger when all voices are heard. We invite you to bring your bright, innovative ideas to MassMutual as we continue to help millions of Americans rely on each other.

Description

Position Summary:

MassMutuals Advanced Analytics group is seeking an exceptional, highly motivated and self-directed data scientist. In this role, you will perform data-driven research, problem solving, and algorithm development through the systematic application of mathematics, statistics and computer science as well as cutting edge data technologies. Results of this work manifest themselves in a variety of ways, including interactive visualizations, presentations, publications, web applications, predictive algorithms, and APIs.

This is an opportunity to join a small but growing high performing team with diverse backgrounds in applied math, computer science and physics that have been tasked with developing, maintaining and extracting knowledge from a strategic data asset. Our work revolves around studying fundamental and high impact business questions that directly impact the direction of the company and industry at large.

Overall Responsibility:
Set strategy and assume a leadership role in the investments domain expertise
Develop roadmaps for projects and services, data, and technology
Oversee operations of algorithm and system deployments
Partner with executive leadership to ensure alignment of data science initiatives and company strategy
Lead projects and research initiatives
Develop algorithms and predictive models, create prototype systems, visualizations, and web applications
Design and analyze experiments
Assemble data sets from disparate sources and analyze using appropriate quantitative methodologies, computational frameworks and systems
Disseminate findings to non-technical audiences through a variety of media, including interactive visualizations, reports and presentations
Mentor junior team members
Candidate Requirements:
2+ years Investments Experience Required
7+ years working with data and relevant computational frameworks and systems
7+ years developing of probabilistic models and machine learning algorithms
Proficient level of understanding in the following areas and an expert in at least one: machine learning, probability and statistics (esp. Bayesian methods), natural language processing, operations research
Exceptional problem solving skills and willingness to learn new concepts, methods, and technologies
Expert in data analysis using R or Python (numpy, scipy, matplotlib, scikit-learn, pandas, etc.) programming languages
Knowledge of HTML/CSS/Javascript, d3.js and web application frameworks (Flask, Django, Play!, etc.)
Knowledge of NoSQL systems, Hadoop/map-reduce, Spark, Hbase, etc.
Experience in database design and SQL
Ability to work in a highly collaborative environment
Outstanding communication skills (publication history a plus)
Education - M.S. or Ph.D. in a quantitative discipline (Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Electrical Engineering, Physics, etc.) is required",3.8,MassMutual,"Boston, MA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,169,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,147.5,MA,3605,1,data scientist,1,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0
1691,191,Senior Data Scientist - Experimentation Platform,$111k-$184k,"Data influences all of the decisions we make at Tinder. As a senior data scientist working on Tinder’s Experimentation Platform, you will help conceive novel ideas, manage experience rollouts and interpret experimentation results. You will have tons of responsibility, freedom, and opportunity to have a direct and immediate impact on exploring new ideas to drive user satisfaction and company growth. You will help Tinder to evolve relentlessly through rapid iterations on product features, revenue, user growth and advanced matching algorithms. We would love to talk to you if you are interested in helping Tinder users achieve stronger matches, engage more effectively, and create more love, at a truly global scale.
In this Data Science role, you will:
Help and guide all three stages of experimentation: ideation, experience delivery and results interpretation
Support and improve existing experimentation analytics pipelines and systems in production
Design and develop new data pipelines and streaming processes that are highly available, scalable, and reliable for our KPI anomaly and alert system
Partner with engineering, analytics, and product stakeholders to define experimentation standards, guidelines and best practices

We're looking for:

BS/MS in Mathematics, Statistics or related technical discipline
5+ years experience working on and maintaining large scale analytics systems
5+ years programming experience in SQL or SQL like query language
Experience with NoSQL or RDBMS platforms - DynamoDB, Redis, or Postgres
Bonus points for exposure to scala, spark and AWS
As part of our team, you’ll enjoy:

· The hustle of a startup with the impact of a global business
· Tremendous opportunity to seek some of the industry’s most exciting problems
· Working with an outstanding team of creative, fun and highly motivated people
· Comprehensive health coverage, competitive salary, and 401(k) match

At Tinder, we don’t just accept difference — we celebrate it, we support it, and we thrive on it for the benefit of our employees, our products, and our community. Tinder is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",3.9,Tinder,"San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,8,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,147.5,CA,2132,1,data scientist,0,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,0
1692,192,Data Engineer with Top Secret,$111k-$184k,"Job Opportunity: Our team is seeking a talented Top Secret cleared Data Engineer to work in our NW Washington DC location.

This role supports DHS’s Office of Intelligence and Analysis (I&A). I&A is responsible for developing DHS-wide intelligence through managing the collection, analysis and fusion of intelligence throughout the entire Department. I&A disseminates intelligence throughout DHS, to the other members of the United States Intelligence Community, and to first responders at the state, local, and tribal level.
What You'll Get To Do as a Data Engineer: *
Create and maintain data pipelines and transformation flows in a cloud environment
Data management/mapping among multiple distinct data sources
Cloud management and server administration of domain services
Big Data infrastructure services and cross domain data transfer
You’ll Bring These Qualifications: *
Active Top Secret clearance with SCI Eligibility
BS degree in a related scientific or engineering discipline from an accredited college or university and ten (10) to fourteen (14) years of progressive experience, or an MS degree in a related scientific or engineering discipline, and eight (8) to twelve (12) years of progressive experience, or a Ph.D. degree in a related scientific or engineering discipline and four (4) to seven (7) years of progressive experience.
Familiar with ETL technologies, MapReduce, JSON/XML transformations and schemas
Familiar with AngularJS
Familiar with Apache NiFi and Java (NAR) NiFi Archives
Knowledge of Amazon Web Services (AWS Cloud)
Programming languages – Java/JEE, Javascript, Python, Groovy, Shell Script
HTTP via REST and SOAP
Datastores – HDFS, MongoDB, S3, Elastic, NoSQL, RDBMS
Build and Configuration Management Tools – Maven, Ansible, Puppet
Working knowledge with public keys and digital certificates
Linux/Unix server environments
These Qualifications Would be Nice to Have: *
Master’s level education
Familiarity with: jQuery, XPath, XQuery, Spark, Impala, Sqoop, Hive/Pig, Python, Gradle, Maven, PL/SQL, Unix Shell, C++/C, AngularJS, Spring, JSON, XML/XSLT/HTML, JPA/Hibernate, Spark, Accumulo, MapReduce, Storm/Kafka, HSpace, Pig, Servlet/JSP, LDAP
About OneGlobe: *
OneGlobe LLC was founded in 2005 to provide quality Information Technology solutions that exceed expectations. We focus on IT System Modernization using agile software development practices and DevSecOps to deliver intuitive and maintainable systems that we help our customers improve their processes and capabilities.

We provide full service IT solutions and have the skill to identify, plan and perform cost-saving steps throughout the system lifecycle to enhance system efficiency, while optimizing the value that we deliver to our customers. Our team has the drive and right mindset to feel ownership on the projects they work. They partner with our customers to give the extra effort sometimes required to deliver success.

We provide highly competitive benefits package to include: extensive medical/dental/vision, 7% of your annual salary toward 401(k), Paid Time Off (PTO), $5K annually toward ongoing education and training, and more. We also have monthly social and tech events!

See additional positions at: http://www.oneglobeit.com/#careers

OneGlobe is a proud equal opportunity employer. We are a drug free, EEO employer committed to a diverse workforce. We will consider all qualified candidates regardless of race, color, national origin, sex, age, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, gender identity, family responsibilities, disability, political affiliation or veteran status.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Professional Development Assistance
Referral Program
Retirement Plan
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
NiFi: 5 years (Preferred)
Java: 5 years (Preferred)
Hadoop: 5 years (Preferred)
Python: 5 years (Preferred)
ETL: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.oneglobeit.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,OneGlobe LLC,"Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,15,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,147.5,DC,4272,0,data engineer,1,0,1,1,0,1,0,0,1
1694,194,Machine Learning Engineer,$111k-$184k,"At Sisu, we're building a software platform that empowers people to make better decisions using data. Based on years of cutting-edge research at Stanford, Sisu enables users to quickly and comprehensively understand what’s driving their key metrics, so they never miss a window of opportunity to act.

Sisu leverages the massive amounts of data available within private, first-party data warehouses, which capture a real-time, structured view of organizational behavior. By monitoring the performance of key metrics like revenue, retention, and churn, and their relationships to interactions between key factors like user demographics, campaigns, and acquisition channels, we can help users make better decisions. The key problem Sisu solves is to help identify what’s driving change among this enormous feature and hypothesis space. To do so, we combine statistical analysis and machine learning at scale to provide users personalized, real-time diagnoses of changes in their metrics via an explainable, interpretable user interface.

As a machine learning engineer, you’ll have the opportunity to shape the future of machine learning on massive, structured data. Much like public search engines rely on sophisticated models for ranking and relevance over unstructured text, machine learning is integral to Sisu’s value proposition of ranking and highlighting key drivers behind metrics derived from structured data. These results inform our users on how to take action as their businesses are changing.

You will be responsible for investigating and developing state-of-the-art algorithms in Sisu’s large-scale streaming structured data context. ML engineers at Sisu deliver their features end-to-end, from Jupyter notebook prototypes to production in Rust.
Responsibilities
Deliver state-of-the-art, scalable algorithms to production for forecasting time series, personalized ranking, robust statistical analysis of key customer business metrics
Build and maintain the infrastructure for data and model management
Work closely with the Sisu design and engineering teams for ML-adjacent components, such as viz and data processing
Give talks, write blog posts, and produce peer-reviewed publications
Preferred Qualifications
Either 4+ years of professional experience with ML or quantitative analysis, or Ph.D. in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, Mathematics, or Physics
Proficiency with Python and experience with data processing tools (e.g., scipy, numpy, pandas, Pytorch, and Spark)
Competency with forecasting deadlines, modular design, testing, code review, and working with new codebases
Strong technical communication skills
Please note that this is a full-time, non-remote role based in San Francisco.

Sisu is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.",4.0,Sisu Data,"San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,147.5,CA,3065,0,machine learning engineerr,1,0,1,1,1,0,0,0,0
1696,196,Staff BI and Data Engineer,$111k-$184k,"Job Description: Staff BI and Data Engineer
Location: San Jose, CA (or) New York, NY
Department: Data Engineering
Hours/Shift: Full Time
Reports To: VP, Data Engineering
Job Description:
Affinity Solutions is looking for a hands-on and self-driven Staff BI and Data Engineer, preferably with experience in the bank card loyalty/fin-tech/advertising/marketing space, to enhance and automate its data and analytics infrastructure to support its growing customer base and expanding partner ecosystem. The position is based in San Jose, CA., and reports into the Data Engineering division. The demand for advanced analytical solutions continues to grow exponentially, and this is your opportunity to grow with us in a fast-paced, collaborative environment.
The ideal candidate is a passionate and highly skilled individual, who can utilize programming and analytics tools such as SQL, Python, and Tableau to query and process large data sets to produce high quality customer facing data deliverables and insights. If you have experience designing and building business intelligence/analytics applications, especially around credit/debit card transactions, unified consumer behavioral and profile data, and excited about leveraging your experience to catapult a venture-backed company into hyper-growth, this job is for you.
Responsibilities:
Develop high quality analytical data assets with an eye towards process efficiency and automation through scripting. Experience in building data marts is a plus.
Build automated QA process to validate the quality of the data and report on data quality
Communicate and present data to both internal and external customers by developing reports/dashboards/charts using BI tools such as Tableau
Work closely with a dynamic and growing team of account managers, data engineers and data scientists to perform quantitative analysis of customer data, including gathering data requirements and validate data, applying judgement and statistical analysis to assist with planning and decision making.
Other responsibilities include but not limited to - data validation, troubleshooting issues, and process documentation.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science or related field such as Mathematics and Statistics, preferably with focus on Data Analytics.
At least 3 years of hands-on experience in designing and building data pipelines, analytical data applications and BI Reporting.
Proficient in SQL and Tableau, familiar with at least one coding language in Python/Shell scripting.
Experience in using Cloud based managed services and Big Data Environments for data warehousing/analytics is a big plus – e.g. Amazon RedShift, Google BigQuery, Spark, MapR etc.,
Very strong written and verbal communication skills; Ability to tell a story with the data
Analytical thinker, with an ability to evaluate multiple products/technologies to address various aspects of a big data platform.
Experience working on UNIX / Linux development and production environments
Experience working in Agile software development environments
Strong organization skills with attention to detail is a must.
Ability to manage multiple conflicting priorities, take proactive ownership of problems and outcomes, think outside the box
Knowledge of Retail and Financial verticals is useful but not required.",3.1,Affinity Solutions,"San Jose, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,22,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,147.5,CA,3333,0,data engineer,1,0,0,1,0,1,0,0,1
1697,197,Principal Data Scientist,$111k-$184k,"Principal Data Scientist, Oncology
The Machine Learning and AI team in AstraZenecas Oncology Data Science group is where we develop and apply sophisticated algorithms and techniques to solve the hardest problems in oncology drug discovery and development. The team uses their scientific, quantitative, and problem-solving skills to work on a broad range of challenges across the whole oncology portfolio, working collaboratively with other scientists across a range of disciplines to scope, define, and deliver projects that both advance the state of the art in data science and accelerate the delivery of innovative medicines to patients.

NOTE: This position can be filled in either GAITHERSBURG MARYLAND OR WALTHAM, MASSACHUSETTS

As a Principal Data Scientist, you will play a key role on the front line in this rapidly growing team working to extract insight from complex biomedical data. You will develop your leadership skills and apply and develop your expertise in rigorous quantitative data science to provide solutions to a variety of data science problems, researching, recommending and delivering novel methodologies to solve the problems that matter to the oncology pipeline.

Examples of projects the team works on include developing machine learning models for digital biomarkers, patient risk stratification for clinical trials, new algorithms for survival analysis, approaches to quantitatively analyse wearable data, linking of medical imaging data with omics and longitudinal outcomes to identify and/or validate new drug targets, and much more!

Day-to-Day:
Developing novel data science and machine learning solutions where off-the-shelf methodologies do not fit.
Leading small (2-3 person) data science projects of defined scope.
Coaching/mentoring junior data scientists and others to drive the development of data science as an AZ capability.
What You'll Need:

Essential:
MSc degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering)
Extensive hands-on experience applying data science tools in practice.
Practical software development skills in standard data science tools (such as R or python)
Extensive knowledge of mathematical modelling and statistical modelling techniques and drive to continue to learn and develop these skills
Outstanding communication, business analysis and consultancy
Desirable:
PhD degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering).
Experience within the pharmaceutical industry.
In-depth experience of working in a global organization with complex/geographical context",4.0,AstraZeneca,"Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,107,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1,(Glassdoor,0,0,147.5,MD,2602,1,data scientist,1,0,1,0,0,0,1,0,0
